1-464 FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94S90010A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TAKTIKA (ROTA, BATALON) CHAST VTORAYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Book "Tactics (Company, Battalion), Part II", by Colonel A. </F>
V. Bykov et al, edited by Colonel General Ye. I. Krylov, 
approved by CinC Ground Troops as a textbook for cadets of 
higher combined arms and tank command schools, USSR Ministry of 
Defense, Voyenizdat, 495 pages; indented material with a line 
down the left-hand side is noted in text with "begin" or "end 
side line"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Chapter I - Soviet Military Doctrine </H5>
  The Soviet Union firmly and steadfastly follows a Leninist 
peaceloving foreign policy whose chief goal is to create 
favorable external conditions for further development of Soviet 
society and its revolutionary renewal based on perestroyka, to 
ensure that the Soviet people have an opportunity to work under 
conditions of peace and freedom, to eliminate the arms race and 
threat of a new world war, and to strengthen international 
security. Soviet military doctrine serves this goal. 
  It was the Great October Revolution that laid down 
foundations of contemporary USSR military doctrine, and the main 
credit for this goes to V. I. Lenin. He worked out political 
aspects of the doctrine, and the most important provisions of 
military-technical questions of Soviet military doctrine are 
his. He spelled out the purpose and missions of the Armed Forces 
and principles of their organizational development, training and 
employment, and formulated the fundamentals of the socialist 
state's military art. 
  It was in our state that a peace policy and the defense of 
freedom and equal rights of all peoples were proclaimed from the 
first days of its existence, as set forth in the very first 
state acts of Soviet authority adopted in October 1917. Armed 
defense of the October achievements and assurance of peaceful 
conditions for building socialism in our country became one of 
the especially important tasks in this period under conditions 
of fierce attacks by world imperialism and internal 
counterrevolution. 
  In the work "Yedinaya voyennaya doktrina `Krasnaya armiya'" 
["Red Army" Unified Military Doctrine], M. V. Frunze formulated 
the essence of military doctrine for the first time in 1921, 
singling out two fundamental components of its structure, 
technical and political, and directing attention to the fact 
that military doctrine must determine the nature of Armed Forces 
organizational development, troop combat training methods, and 
their "leadership" with consideration of assigned 
missions.[.sup]1[/] 
  Military organizational development of that period had a 
defensive direction, inasmuch as capitalist countries were 
threatening the country with aggression. 
  The Soviet state did everything necessary to prevent war and 
exclude it from the arsenal of means for resolving 
contradictions among states. The struggle to prevent war has 
been an inalienable and very important element of the political 
aspect of Soviet military doctrine since times of the October 
Socialist Revolution. 
  The Great Patriotic War and postwar period confirmed the 
correctness of provisions of Soviet military doctrine and its 
conformity to our socialist state's foreign policy line and to 
requirements for the country's development. At the same time, 
significant changes in the world situation, especially the 
increased aggressiveness of reactionary circles of the largest 
capitalist states, insistently demanded a clear emphasis on the 
defensive nature of Soviet military doctrine and clarification 
of the attitude toward war, above all nuclear war. 
  The contemporary stage of our state's development is 
characterized by revolutionary transformations in all areas of 
society's life and new political thinking in international 
relations. The Soviet Union and allied states base their foreign 
and military policy on the Leninist theory of peaceful 
coexistence and a policy of peace. 
  The USSR's peaceable, open policy finds support in broad 
circles of the world community, which led to important positive 
processes in international relations. It has been acknowledged 
that considering war to be a means of achieving political goals 
is amoral and criminal under present conditions. Today the 
majority of world countries reject the principle of force in 
resolving international problems. At the same time, the enormous 
military potential of the sides, especially the accumulation of 
a large quantity of nuclear weapons and the sharply increased 
casualty-producing properties of conventional weapons, made the 
problem of preventing a new world war extraordinarily acute. 
Under these conditions the Soviet Union advanced the concept of 
equal security for all based on a balance of interests and on 
exclusion of violence from the practice of relations among 
states. In accordance with this, the Soviet state's Armed Forces 
are given as the priority mission that of repelling an 
aggressor's invasion by defensive operations. 
  In connection with the new approach to problems of war and 
peace, Soviet military doctrine presently represents a set of 
officially adopted, fundamental views on prevention of war, 
military organizational development, preparation of the country 
and USSR Armed Forces for repelling aggression, and methods of 
fighting a war in defense of socialism. Stemming objectively 
from the nature of the Soviet social and state system, this 
doctrine has an unequivocally defensive direction and is 
subordinated to the primary mission of preventing war, both 
nuclear as well as conventional, and protecting the country from 
possible outside aggression. 
  The main goal of our military doctrine is to prevent war, 
strengthen international security and protect the homeland, 
inasmuch as herein lies the principal meaning of our foreign 
policy and a very important condition for the country's 
successful development. 
  Soviet military doctrine conforms to the goals of military 
operations in repelling aggression and at the same time it takes 
into account general USSR defense missions. In case of 
aggression the Soviet people and their Armed Forces will defend 
their Motherland with all determination. 
  Soviet military doctrine includes two aspects--political and 
military- technical. 
  The political aspect is the principal one, since 
it reflects Soviet state policy in the defense area and 
determines the attitude toward problems of war--its prevention, 
the nature of military threat to the USSR and its allies, and 
political tasks stemming from this. 
  The main direction of the political aspect of Soviet 
military 
doctrine consists of the following provisions: resolution of 
international issues only in a peaceful way; total exclusion of 
world war, both nuclear as well as conventional; and that the 
security of peoples can be only mutual and, within the framework 
of the international community, universal. 
  In accordance with these provisions the Soviet Union 
never will begin military operations first if it does 
not become the target of armed aggression itself. The Soviet 
Union never will employ nuclear weapons first. 
  While coming out in favor of mutual rejection of the use of 
military force, the Soviet Union at the same time is taking 
necessary steps to strengthen its defense capability. 
  The principal military-political tasks of the Soviet state 
stem from the political aspect of doctrine: a) in peacetime to 
keep the country's defense capability at the level of necessary 
defense sufficiency, not allow initiation of a world war by 
imperialism, and ensure constant readiness of the Armed Forces 
to repel armed aggression; b) in case of war to repel 
aggression, defend the Motherland, fulfill allied obligations, 
inflict decisive damage on the aggressor and deprive him of the 
capability to continue the war. 
  The military-technical aspect of Soviet military 
doctrine is subordinated to the political aspect. It determines 
the following provisions: nature of the military threat and 
warfare; the Armed Forces makeup and structure necessary for 
repelling aggression and defending the country; methods of 
employing the Armed Forces in case of war; and the direction of 
Armed Forces training to perform defense missions. 
  The following missions are the basis of this aspect of 
military doctrine: ensure military-strategic parity and not 
allow military superiority of armies of the probable enemy; 
maintain sufficient defense might; prepare retaliatory 
operations to repel aggression and give a crushing rebuff to the 
aggressor as the principal method of Armed Forces operations. 
  Considering the development of all kinds of weapons, 
including nuclear weapons, in armies of NATO countries, the USSR 
Armed Forces must be trained to repel aggression to an equal 
extent with or without the use of nuclear weapons. In case of 
nuclear war, the USSR Armed Forces must be capable of inflicting 
unacceptable damage on the aggressor. 
  Our state, which adheres to a defensive military doctrine, 
has no aggressive intentions with respect to other states and is 
not preparing to initiate military operations against them. It 
will begin retaliatory operations only in case it is subjected 
to armed attack itself. It carries out Armed Forces 
organizational development based on the concept of military 
sufficiency. 
  Defense sufficiency is understood to mean the level of 
military potentials of opposing sides (states) that ensures each 
of them guaranteed protection and repulse of aggression but is 
insufficient to conduct large scale offensive operations. The 
level of reasonable defense sufficiency is determined in such a 
way as to ensure strategic stability at the lowest possible 
level of the sides' military confrontation, reliable repulse of 
aggression, and successful performance of strategic missions 
while maintaining parity in strategic nuclear assets, equality 
of military forces in principal theaters of military operations, 
and their sufficiency for defense on other axes. 
  The defensive nature of Soviet military doctrine and the 
level of military sufficiency are determined by the fact that 
there are no classes in the USSR interested in war and that 
preemptive wars with a preventive or precautionary goal are 
alien to the nature of socialism. The USSR views attack, 
including nuclear attack or an attack using only conventional 
weapons, as a crime against the people of its country and 
against mankind as a whole. 
  But the Armed Forces must be in high combat and mobilization 
readiness to preclude surprise aggression, and in case of 
aggression they must repel an enemy invasion by an active 
defense and then rout him by counteroffensive operations. The 
immediate delivery of surprise retaliatory counterstrikes 
against the enemy is envisaged with the beginning of his 
aggression. Defense will be their basis at the beginning of a 
war. 
Footnotes 
  1. See M. V. Frunze, "Izbrannyye proizvedeniya" [Selected 
Works], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1984, pp 34-35. 
<H5>  Chapter II - Principles of Employing the Company and </H5>
Battalion in Battle 
<H5>  1. Combat Employment of the Motorized Rifle (Tank) Company </H5>
and Battalion 
  Modern combined arms battle is conducted through united 
efforts of all troops involved (Diagram 1), but the principal 
role in winning victory in combined arms battle rests with 
motorized rifle and tank subunits. Only they are capable of 
completing the enemy's rout and seizing his territory. They 
fight the battle, and subunits of other combat arms work 
together with them to perform these missions. 
  Organizationally the motorized rifle company [MRC] (tank 
company [TC]) is part of a motorized rifle battalion [MRB] (tank 
battalion [TB]). It is a tactical subunit and serves as a unit 
of calculation for various tactical calculations performed in 
the motorized rifle regiment [MRR] (tank regiment [TR]). 
  Organizationally the MRB (TB) is part of an MRR (TR). It is 
the basic combined arms tactical subunit and the tactical unit 
of calculation of the formation in planning battle and 
performing calculations for making a march and for transport 
movement by rail, water routes, air and so on. 
  The MRC (TC) and MRB (TB), outfitted with modern arms and 
with combat and other vehicles, have powerful fire, high 
mobility, maneuverability, armor protection, and the capability 
to resist effects of enemy mass destruction weapons. 
  A company (battalion) can march great distances and quickly 
exploit results of nuclear strikes to complete the enemy's rout. 
In coordination with adjacent subunits or independently, it is 
capable of successfully attacking or firmly holding an occupied 
strongpoint (area) in the defense on various terrain and in any 
weather, and of destroying enemy airborne assault forces, 
helicopters and other low-flying targets. 
  In the defense the MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) are capable of 
inflicting damage on the enemy by organized fire of all weapons 
on approaches to the FEBA; repelling his tank and infantry 
assaults and helicopter strikes; stubbornly holding an occupied 
strongpoint (defense area); and, when the enemy has penetrated 
the defense, completing his rout by a counterattack by the 
second echelon. 
  Coordinating among themselves as well as with artillery and 
subunits of other combat arms and special troops, the MRC (TC) 
and MRB (TB) perform the primary mission of immediate 
destruction of enemy personnel and weapons in close combat. By 
exploiting results of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy and 
skillfully combining fire and movement in the attack, they can 
assault the enemy swiftly and destroy his personnel, tanks, 
infantry fighting vehicles [IFV's], artillery and antitank [AT] 
weapons as well as means of nuclear and chemical attack, 
aircraft and helicopters. 
  They are capable of taking enemy defensive positions from 
the 
move, repelling counterattacks, and developing the attack in the 
depth at a rapid pace. They can conduct a meeting battle, force 
water obstacles from the move, negotiate obstacles and 
destructive damage, pursue a retreating enemy at a fast pace and 
capture intermediate defensive lines in the depth of a defense 
from the move. 
  As a rule, a company (battalion) fights as part of the MRB 
or 
TB (MRR or TR) or independently, and may operate in a 
reconnaissance detachment, in a forward security element or 
flank security element (advance guard, rear guard), in a 
tactical airborne assault force (raiding detachment) or an 
enveloping detachment; it may defend a forward position 
(positions in the security zone); and it also may fight a 
defensive battle in the mountains, the desert, and northern 
areas. 
  The battalion mortar battery and grenade launcher platoon 
[GLP] usually remain subordinate to the battalion commander and 
as a rule are used at full strength to support first echelon 
MRC's. Sometimes the GLP may be attached at full strength to an 
MRC defending on an axis of concentration of battalion main 
efforts or it may be attached by squads to first echelon 
companies. 
  The battalion antitank platoon [ATP] usually remains 
subordinate to the battalion commander and as a rule is used at 
full strength on a likely avenue of tank approach to repel 
assaults by enemy tanks and other armored vehicles. The platoon 
may be attached to first echelon companies at full strength or 
by squads on terrain providing concealment and rough terrain. 
  The attached air defense subunit as a rule remains directly 
subordinate to the battalion commander. 
  Company (battalion) reinforcement. For greater 
independence in fighting, subunits of other combat arms and 
special troops usually are attached to or assigned in support of 
a company (battalion). 
  Attached reinforcing subunits become fully subordinate to 
the 
company (battalion) commander. He assigns them missions in the 
course of battle, but if necessary they may be used to perform 
missions under the plan of the senior commander (chief). For 
example, in penetration of an enemy defense an artillery 
battalion attached to a maneuver battalion will take part in 
artillery preparation of the assault and engage the enemy under 
the senior commander's plan. 
  Supporting subunits remain subordinate to the senior 
commander (chief) and perform missions he assigns as well as 
missions assigned by the commander of the company (battalion) 
which they are supporting, within limits of allocated force 
assets (detail). 
  The number and makeup of subunits to be attached depend on 
the nature of the mission to be performed by subunits and on 
situation conditions. 
  A mortar or artillery battery and an AT, grenade launcher, 
combat engineer, and flamethrower subunit may be attached to an 
MRC and also a tank platoon [TP] in the defense and when 
attacking in the city, in the mountains and in the forest. 
  An artillery battery, motorized rifle subunit and combat 
engineer subunit may be attached to a TC. 
  An MRB (TB) may receive as reinforcement one or two TC's 
(MRC's), an artillery battalion or battery, a subunit of AT 
weapons, an air defense subunit, and also subunits of engineer 
and chemical troops. 
  Artillery subunits are intended for engaging enemy means of 
nuclear and chemical attack, precision weapon systems, 
artillery, tanks, IFV's, AT and other weapons, and also enemy 
personnel, helicopters at landing sites, air defense weapons, 
command and control [C[.sup]2[/]] facilities and electronic 
equipment. In addition, they demolish enemy fortifications and 
may carry out remote mining of terrain, provide illumination 
support in conducting a night battle, lay aerosol (smoke) 
screens and perform other missions in the course of battle. 
Artillery subunits perform fire missions from indirect firing 
positions, selecting them at a distance of 2-6 km from the 
friendly FEBA. In a number of cases (when fighting in a city, 
repelling counterattacks, penetrating a fortified area) 
individual pieces, platoons and batteries may be used to conduct 
direct fire to destroy enemy tanks, other armored targets and AT 
weapons. 
  Subunits of antitank guided missile [ATGM] systems and of AT 
grenade launchers are intended for repelling assaults by enemy 
tanks and other armored vehicles. In addition, they can be used 
to destroy weapons situated not only in open, but also in 
covered fortification structures, and in certain cases also 
enemy combat helicopters flying at low altitudes. 
  A grenade launcher subunit is a powerful fire delivery means 
of the MRB. It is intended for engaging enemy personnel and 
weapons in the open, in emplacements (trenches) and behind 
terrain folds. Grenade launchers are especially effective in 
repelling enemy mechanized infantry assaults ahead of the FEBA 
and repelling their counterattacks in the course of an attack. 
  The air defense subunit is intended for destroying the 
airborne enemy at extremely low and low altitudes. Being in the 
battalion battle, approach march, or march formation, it 
conducts fire against airborne targets in movement or from short 
halts, from afloat in forcing water obstacles, and from prepared 
firing positions on defense and when disposed at the halt. In 
addition, the air defense subunit may be used to combat enemy 
ground targets and targets on the water's surface. 
  Engineer subunits are attached to perform engineer 
reconnaissance of the enemy, terrain and installations; fortify 
strongpoints, positions and disposition areas; conduct engineer 
measures of maskirovka [lit. "camouflage", however, includes 
"concealment" and "deception" -- FBIS] and protection against 
precision weapons; emplace engineer obstacles; breach obstacles 
and rubble; clear mines from terrain and installations; prepare 
and maintain crossings during a forcing of water obstacles; 
perform measures of preparing and maintaining water supply 
points, and so on. 
  Subunits of chemical troops are intended for conducting 
radiological and chemical reconnaissance, radiological and 
chemical monitoring, decontamination of subunits, and maskirovka 
of subunits with aerosols (smoke), and for inflicting losses on 
the enemy with incendiary munitions. 
  Flamethrower subunits attached to the battalion are intended 
for engaging enemy personnel, weapons, and combat and other 
vehicles and creating centers of fire. The battalion commander 
usually attaches them to first echelon MRC's. As a rule, they 
operate in those companies' battle formations, firing 
flamethrowers on the move, from short halts or from in place. 
  The battalion signal subunit is intended for establishing 
and 
maintaining stable communications with subordinate (attached) 
subunits, supporting C[.sup]2[/], and maintaining 
communications with the senior commander (chief) and adjacent 
subunits. 
  Battalion support subunits are intended for servicing, 
maintenance and minor repairs of weapons and vehicles, 
maintaining reserves of ammunition, fuel and other supplies, 
delivering them to subunits, replenishing ammunition and fuel, 
and providing hot meals for the personnel. 
  The battalion aid station is intended for searching for the 
wounded, transporting or carrying them from the battlefield, 
giving paramedic assistance to the wounded and sick, and 
preparing them for evacuation. 
  Company (battalion) formations. An MRC (TC) or MRB 
(TB) may operate in march, approach march or battle formation 
depending on specific situation conditions. 
  The company (battalion) march formation is the 
alignment of subunits for column movement. It is used in making 
a march and executing a covert maneuver and should ensure a high 
rate of movement and rapid deployment into approach march and 
battle formation. The march formation also should ensure least 
vulnerability of personnel, weapons, and combat and other 
vehicles to enemy mass destruction weapons and air and precision 
weapon strikes, and maintenance of stable C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits. 
  The company (battalion) march formation usually consists of 
the main body column and security. Depending on specific 
situation conditions and presence of means of reinforcement, the 
company (battalion) main body column may have a varying 
alignment. When a battalion moves along an independent route, a 
forward security element consisting of a reinforced platoon or 
reinforced company is sent forward as security from the main 
body column to a distance of from 5 to 10 km, and patrol squads 
or tanks are sent to flanks and the rear. 
  The company (battalion) approach march formation 
is the alignment of company (battalion) subunits for movement in 
columns dispersed laterally and in depth. The company 
(battalion) approach march formation is formed by platoon 
(company) columns, and that of an MRC (MRB) operating in 
dismounted formation without BMP's (BTR's) also by squad 
columns. The position of platoons (companies) in the company 
(battalion) approach march formation may be in a line, wedge, 
reverse wedge, echelon right, or echelon left. 
  The approach march formation is used to ensure swift 
deployment of subunits into battle formation; least 
vulnerability of subunits to mass destruction weapons, air 
strikes, precision weapon strikes and artillery fire; attainment 
of high rates of advance; and rapid negotiation of various 
obstacles and areas of contamination, destructive damage, fires 
and floods. 
  The battalion commander determines companies' places in the 
approach march formation with consideration of the planned 
battalion battle formation. Places of platoons (squads) in the 
company (platoon) approach march formation are indicated only if 
necessary. They operate primarily in a fixed alignment of 
platoons (squads): the first in the center, second on the right 
flank, third on the left flank. 
  Intervals and distances are 150-300 m between platoon 
columns 
and 300-600 m between company columns. A company intended for 
operations in the second echelon or reserve proceeds at a 
distance of 1.5-2 km. 
  TC's (TP's) attached to an MRB as a rule proceed in front of 
the MRC's (MRP's). Motorized rifle subunits attached to a TB 
usually proceed behind the TC's (TP's). 
  Weapons which have been left directly subordinate to the 
company (battalion) commander proceed in places in the approach 
march formation indicated by the commander. 
  A company (battalion) deploys from march into approach march 
formation successively into platoon (company) columns and squad 
columns independently when they reach indicated deployment lines 
(points) or at a command (signal) from the company (battalion) 
commander. 
  The company (battalion) battle formation is the 
alignment of subunits for fighting. It should correspond to the 
mission received and the commander's concept and ensure 
successful conduct of battle with use both of nuclear as well as 
only conventional weapons; greatest involvement of weapons in 
battle and full use of subunit combat capabilities; swift 
exploitation of results of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy 
and favorable terrain conditions; timely buildup of efforts in 
the course of battle and timely execution of a maneuver. In 
addition, it should ensure stability and activeness of subunits 
in the defense; least vulnerability of subunits to strikes by 
all kinds of weapons, including precision weapons; maintenance 
of continuous coordination; and convenience of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  The company battle formation consists of first echelon 
subunits (and in the defense also second echelon subunits), 
company weapons and reinforcing subunits; it may include an 
armored group and fire ambushes. 
  The battalion battle formation consists of first echelon 
subunits; second echelon or reserve subunits; and weapons which 
remain directly subordinate to the battalion commander. 
  The battalion battle formation in the defense also may 
include an armored group and fire ambushes. 
  The battalion first echelon usually includes MRC's (TC's) 
with means of reinforcement. When the MRB battle formation is 
aligned in two echelons, the first echelon as a rule includes 
two MRC's and tank subunits attached to the battalion. An MRC 
usually is assigned to the second echelon. When the battle 
formation is aligned in one echelon, from a platoon to an MRC 
may be assigned to the reserve. 
  An attached artillery battalion or battery, air defense 
subunit, and ATP usually may be in the mix of weapons remaining 
at the battalion commander's disposal. 
<H5>  2. Methodology for Calculating Company and Battalion Combat </H5>
Capabilities in Battle 
  The MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) have rather powerful weapons and 
combat vehicles in the inventory, but war experience showed it 
has to be used skillfully and most effectively in battle, i.e., 
take fullest advantage of combat capabilities. Therefore the 
company (battalion) commander's thorough knowledge of combat 
capabilities of weapons which his subunit has, counting attached 
and supporting troops, and also of the personnel's morale and 
political attitude is an important condition for making a 
substantiated decision and permits exercising competent 
C[.sup]2[/] of subordinate troops in battle. 
  Frunze said that the commander's art is manifested in the 
ability to select from the diversity of means at his disposal 
those which will provide best results in a given situation and 
at a given time. 
  In organizing for battle, a large number of questions arise 
for the company (battalion) commander which he is obligated to 
resolve before the beginning of battle: How many and what forces 
will have to be put to use to perform the combat mission he has 
received? What result of battle should be expected with a given 
makeup of friendly and enemy forces and assets considering 
conditions of the terrain and meteorological situation, state of 
weather, time of year and day and so on? 
  He can obtain correct answers to the questions posed above 
if 
he knows and is able to assess the combat capabilities not only 
of friendly but also of enemy troops. 
  Just what should we understand combat capabilities to mean? 
  Combat capabilities in general terms customarily 
are understood to be quantitative and qualitative indicators 
characterizing subunit capabilities to perform specific combat 
missions in a prescribed time and in a specific situation. 
Combat capabilities depend on the number of personnel, the 
subunit (unit) in question, level of its preparedness for 
fighting, and availability and status of weapons and of combat 
and other vehicles; ability of command personnel to exercise 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits; and troop organizational structure 
and state of supply. They also depend on the enemy makeup and 
nature of opposition; terrain conditions; and meteorological 
situation (state of weather, time of year and day) in which the 
battle is being organized and fought. 
  Company (battalion) combat capabilities also depend on the 
kind and nature of upcoming battle. 
  Combat capabilities of subunits of different combat arms are 
expressed by specific indicators. For example, combat 
capabilities of the MRC (TC) or MRB (TB) are described in terms 
of the makeup of enemy forces and assets which they are capable 
of routing (destroying) in an attack (repelling an enemy attack 
in the defense); width of attack frontage (size of a defense 
area [or] strongpoint); depth of subunits' combat missions and 
their rate of advance; depth of fire effect against enemy 
targets; radius of actions of weapons and time for preparing 
them to deliver a strike, and so on. Fire capabilities for 
destroying enemy tanks, IFV's, aircraft and other weapons may be 
determined separately. 
  Company (battalion) combat capabilities can be examined in 
terms of kinds and means of destruction (tanks, BMP's, BTR's, 
artillery, small arms). In addition, the capability of creating 
necessary densities of forces and assets per kilometer of 
frontage is taken into account. 
  It is common knowledge that firepower, striking power and 
maneuverability are the components of company (battalion) combat 
capabilities. 
  The firepower of an MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) as a 
rule is formed from fire capabilities of organic and attached 
artillery, tanks, BMP's, AT weapons, air defense weapons and all 
kinds of small arms. Minefields also are included in firepower 
in conducting defensive battle. 
  The firepower of an MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) usually is 
expressed by the total scope of fire missions which can be 
performed by organic and attached reinforcing weapons with the 
amount of ammunition allocated in accordance with existing 
norms. Damage inflicted on the enemy and expressed by a certain 
degree of his neutralization or destruction is the result of 
realization of firepower. 
  The number of objectives (targets) to be engaged and extent 
of their damage (including platoon strongpoints) usually are 
included in the indicators of MRC (MRB) firepower. The number of 
enemy weapons and combat vehicles (especially tanks and ATGM's) 
destroyed and the mathematical expectation of damage inflicted 
on a grouping of enemy troops is determined without fail. 
  The striking power of an MRC or TC (MRB or TB) is 
manifested in the capability of these subunits to deliver 
powerful strikes against the enemy by a combination of fire and 
movement in an indicated direction. Organic, attached and 
supporting artillery, tanks, BMP's, BTR's, AT weapons, automatic 
grenade launchers and all kinds of small arms may take part in 
the company (battalion) in carrying out a strike. Fire is 
conducted on the move and from short halts. Taking advantage of 
the fire of senior chiefs and conducting fire from all kinds of 
their own weapons, company (battalion) subunits swiftly advance 
into the depth, destroying surviving enemy weapons and personnel 
in the course of movement and take indicated lines (areas) of 
the terrain or strongpoints in the enemy defense. 
  Striking power is characterized above all by densities of 
forces and assets established on the entire attack frontage and 
on the axis of concentration of main efforts and by the number 
of motorized rifle and tank platoons (companies), tanks, BMP's, 
BTR's, guns, mortars, and AT and other weapons per kilometer of 
attack frontage. Striking power in the defense is realized in 
routing an enemy who has penetrated the defense, i.e., in 
conducting counterattacks and completing the rout of an enemy 
who has penetrated. 
  The striking power of an attacking company (battalion) 
depends on the density of forces and assets of a defending or 
attacking enemy and is characterized by the ratio of opposing 
sides' forces and assets. 
  Obviously, the higher the densities of forces and assets 
established by a company (battalion) in battle and the less they 
are for the enemy, the greater will be the force of the 
company's (battalion's) attack and consequently it will perform 
the assigned mission faster. 
  As a rule, armored vehicles (tanks, BMP's, BTR's) with their 
weapons and personnel, which usually fight together, make up the 
basis of company (battalion) striking power. They are capable of 
destroying enemy weapons not only by fire, but also by tracks 
(wheels). Striking power and firepower are manifested in 
inseparable unity here, which is achieved by organizing and 
maintaining precise, continuous coordination of all forces and 
assets participating in the battle. 
  Maneuverability is a property of force elements of 
different branches of the Armed Forces, combat arms and special 
troops describing their degree of mobility and capability for 
quickly accomplishing movement and deployment in preparation for 
and in the course of combat operations, and the capability of 
military vehicles to change speed and direction of movement 
quickly. 
  Maneuverability of a company (battalion) is its capability 
to 
redeploy and change the mutual position of forces and assets in 
an organized, rapid manner; assume a particular alignment; make 
ready for particular operations at a certain time; build up the 
force of the initial attack; transfer efforts from one axis to 
another; cross zones of radioactive and chemical contamination 
and areas of destructive damage, roadblocks and fires; and 
retarget one's weapons for simultaneous engagement of the most 
important enemy targets. In addition, maneuverability in a 
defense describes the capability of subunits to occupy a defense 
in an organized, rapid manner and move battle formation elements 
to any threatened axis in short time periods for taking up a 
defense, conducting counterattacks, destroying a landed enemy 
airborne assault force and so on. 
  Preempting the enemy in opening fire and in delivering an 
attack is the result of realizing maneuverability, which 
contributes to fuller use of firepower, striking power and a 
favorable position. Preempting the enemy in seizing lines 
favorable for defense and building up efforts on threatened axes 
are the result of realization of maneuver capabilities of 
subunits in the defense. Maneuverability of the company 
(battalion) in the attack usually is described in terms of time 
indicators for execution of a maneuver by subunits. 
  Methodology of calculating company (battalion) 
firepower. Company (battalion) firepower is made up of the 
offensive potential of organic and attached subunits of 
artillery, AT and air defense weapons, BMP's, tanks, as well as 
small arms. Therefore the methodology of firepower calculations 
consists of a number of independent, individual methodologies 
for the kinds of weapons. 
  Methodology of calculating damage of the enemy by 
artillery fire. Combat capabilities of artillery are 
described in terms of fire and maneuver capabilities and range 
of fire. Fire capabilities are the basic indicator of artillery 
combat capabilities and are expressed by the scope of fire 
missions performed by it simultaneously or successively in 
specific situation conditions. 
  Artillery performs the following missions with its fire in 
battle: engages means of nuclear and chemical attack, precision 
weapon systems and artillery; engages tanks, IFV's, and AT and 
other weapons; engages personnel, helicopters at landing sites, 
air defense weapons, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and electronic 
equipment; demolishes enemy fortifications; performs remote 
mining of terrain and illumination support; and lays aerosol 
(smoke) screens. 
  Artillery subunits can have various artillery systems in the 
inventory. Their characteristics are given in Table 1. 


Table 1 - Principal Specifications and Performance Characteristics of Guns, 
Mortars and Fighting Vehicles 

                            Self- Propelled Guns 

Basic Data       D-30       122-mm SP    152-mm SP    120-mm     BM-21 
                 122-mm     Howitzer     Howitzer     Mortar     Fighting 
                 Towed                                           Vehicle 
                 Gun 

Range of fire,   15.3       15.2         17.3         7.2        20.7 
km 

Grazing-fire     940        940          580          - 
range, m 

Rate of fire,    6-8        5-4          3            615        40 
rounds/min 

Unit of fire     80         80           60           80         120 

Ammunition       HE-F,      HE-F, S-C,   HE-F, S-C,   HE-F,      HE-F, In 
types*           S-C, I,    I, L         I            In, S, I 
                 S, L 

Time of          1.5- 2.5   1            2            1-1.5      3 
change-over 
from traveling 
to deployed 
position, min 

March speed,     35         30           30           35         48 
km/hr 

Maximum speed,   60         60           60           60         60 
km/hr 

*Key: HE-F--HE-fragmentation; S-C--shaped-charge; I- illumination; S-- 
smoke; L--leaflet; In--incendiary 


  Service rounds are made up of shells for various 
purposes: high explosive, fragmentation, HE-fragmentation, armor 
piercing, shaped-charge, incendiary, special (illumination, 
smoke, leaflet) and proof and testing. 
  High explosive, fragmentation and HE fragmentation 
shells make up the bulk of ammunition in units of fire of 
artillery pieces and are intended for engaging personnel and 
combat vehicles and demolishing light, field-type shelters. 
  A shell's blast effect consists of its deep penetration into 
an obstacle and its burst within the obstacle (or soil). 
  A shell's fragmentation effect consists of its instantaneous 
burst on contacting an obstacle (or the soil). 
  A shell's blast-fragmentation effect consists of its burst 
at 
a certain depth in the obstacle (soil). 
  Armor-piercing shells are intended for engaging 
enemy armored targets. 
  The effect of armor-piercing shells consists of the 
penetration of armor and injury of personnel behind the armor by 
core fragments. 
  In contrast to armor-piercing shells, shaped 
charge shells penetrate armor not through kinetic energy of 
the shells, but thanks to the concentrated, directed effect of a 
burster charge with a shaped-charge cavity. Damage behind the 
armor is accomplished by fragments of the armor and gases from 
the burster charge. 
  Incendiary shells are used for firing against 
wooden structures, fuel and ammunition depots and other highly 
flammable targets and are intended for creating centers of fire 
and injuring personnel. 
  Illumination shells are used for illuminating 
terrain in the vicinity of a target at night (or placing marker 
lights). 
  Smoke shells are intended for laying smoke 
screens, registering and signaling. 
  Leaflet shells are used for delivering leaflets, 
official statements, appeals and so on to the enemy disposition 
to exert an ideological and political effect on him. 
  Fire missions of artillery subunits in engaging a 
target may be annihilation, destruction, neutralization or 
harassment, depending on the nature and importance of the target 
and combat situation conditions. 
  Annihilation of a target consists of inflicting 
such losses (damage) on it that it completely loses combat 
effectiveness. The individual- target kill probability is 
0.7-0.9 or the mathematical expectation of the number of targets 
damaged in the makeup of a group target is 50-60 percent. 
  Destruction of a target consists of putting it in 
an unserviceable condition. 
  Neutralization of a target consists of inflicting 
such losses on it and creating such conditions by fire under 
which it is temporarily deprived of combat effectiveness, its 
maneuver is limited (prohibited) or C[.sup]2[/] is disrupted. 
The mathematical expectation of the number of damaged targets 
will be around 30 percent. 
  Harassment consists of a moral-psychological 
effect on enemy personnel by the conduct of harassing fire by a 
limited number of guns (mortars) and a limited amount of 
ammunition for a prescribed time. 
  Artillery subunits employ the following types of 
fire (Fig. 1) in fire damage of the enemy: fire against a 
single target, concentrated fire, a single-line standing 
barrier, single-line rolling barrier, successive fire 
concentration, and rolling barrage. In addition, they 
participate in massed fire. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-09A>      Fig. 1. Types of fire employed by an artillery battalion (battery): </FIG>

  Fire against a single target is the fire of a 
battery, platoon or gun (mortar, fighting vehicle, ATGM 
launcher) conducted independently from an indirect firing 
position or by direct fire [ogon pryamoy navodkoy]. 
  Concentrated fire is fire conducted by several 
batteries simultaneously against one target. 
  A standing barrier is a continuous curtain of fire 
created ahead of the frontage of an assaulting 
(counterattacking) enemy. A single-line standing barrier is used 
to repel assaults (counterattacks) by enemy infantry. 
  The width of a standing barrier sector is set figuring no 
more than 50 m per piece. 
  Standing barrier lines are codenamed for names of trees such 
as Klen [Maple], Bereza [Birch] and so on. 
  Fire is conducted by HE-fragmentation shells with impact 
fuze 
set for fragmentation effect, by shells with proximity fuzes, 
and by shells with time fuze at one range setting. 
  In conducting single-line standing barrier fire, fire 
commences at the moment infantry and tanks approach the standing 
barrier line and is conducted until the infantry is cut off from 
the tanks and stops the assault (counterattack). If the enemy 
infantry has gone to ground, it is engaged by concentrated fire. 
  A rolling barrier is a continuous curtain of fire 
created at one line on the path of movement of enemy tanks, 
IFV's and APC's and shifted successively to designated lines as 
the bulk of tanks (IFV's, APC's) exits the zone of fire. The 
rolling barrier is prepared at several lines located on the path 
of movement of enemy tanks (IFV's, APC's). The distance between 
rolling barrier lines can be 400-600 m depending on their rate 
of movement. The width of a battery (battalion) rolling barrier 
sector is set figuring no more than 25 m per piece. Lines are 
given a common name of predatory animals such as Lev [Lion], 
Tigr [Tiger] and so on, and each line beginning with the far 
line is given its own serial number such as Lev-1, Lev-2 and so 
on. 
  Barrier-fire lines are assigned on terrain sectors 
observable 
from ground observation posts [OP's]. A battalion is assigned a 
sector on a barrier line which is divided into battery sectors. 
Each battery's place in the division sector is established in 
advance by the battalion commander. 
  A successive fire concentration is used during 
fire support of the assault. Successive fire concentration lines 
are assigned 300-1,000 m from each other with consideration of 
the enemy defense alignment. Successive fire concentration lines 
are codenamed for predatory animals such as Lev [Lion], Tigr 
[Tiger] and so on, and lines are numbered in the order of the 
sequence of conducting fire against them beginning with the near 
line. A battalion is assigned one group target or two or three 
single targets on a successive fire concentration line. The 
group target area should not exceed 9 hectares. A battery 
conducts fire as part of the battalion or independently. With 
independent conduct of fire, a battery is assigned a target 
whose size should not exceed 3 hectares for a 6-gun battery or 4 
hectares for an 8-gun battery. 
  The rolling barrage is used in fire support of the 
assault and is conducted against primary and intermediate lines. 
Primary barrage lines are assigned 300-1,000 m from each other 
and intermediate barrage lines every 100- 300 m between primary 
ones. Primary barrage lines are codenamed for predatory animals 
such as Bars [Snow Leopard], Lisa [Fox] and so on, and lines are 
numbered in the order of the sequence of conducting fire against 
them beginning with the near line. Intermediate lines are 
numbered separately from primary lines and are called first 
intermediate, second intermediate and so on. A battalion is 
assigned one sector on a barrage line, which is divided into 
battery sectors. The areas of battalion and battery sectors are 
determined figuring 25 m per gun and 15 m per mortar. 
  Massed fire is conducted simultaneously by all or 
the bulk of artillery against an enemy grouping with the mission 
of decisive damage of one or more important objectives (targets) 
in a short time. 
  Procedure for engaging different enemy targets 
(objectives). As a rule stationary, unobserved (visually 
from ground OP's), unarmored targets in the open are 
annihilated, while covered and armored targets are neutralized 
or annihilated. No less than a battery is used for firing on 
such targets. 
  Artillery and mortar batteries and platoons (sections) as 
well as individual pieces are engaged at firing positions. 
  SP gun batteries (platoons) usually are annihilated, while 
SP 
mortar platoons are neutralized. 
  As a rule, SP gun batteries (platoons) are engaged 
immediately on detection by fire assaults conducted by rapid 
fire. 
  Personnel and weapons in the open usually are annihilated. 
  Sheltered personnel and weapons usually are neutralized. 
  Enemy AT weapons (ATGM launchers and AT guns) and subunits 
of 
these weapons are annihilated or neutralized depending on the 
situation. Subunits of unarmored and lightly armored AT weapons 
in disposition (concentration) areas as well as single, 
unsheltered, unarmored AT weapons disposed at positions as a 
rule are annihilated. 
  Enemy platoon strongpoints, mortar platoons, command 
observation posts [COP's], radars, and companies in 
concentration areas [rayon sosredotocheniya] and on the march 
usually are objectives and targets for engagement by artillery 
fire. 
  Fire capabilities of artillery to engage enemy objectives by 
fire from indirect firing positions are determined by the nature 
of the targets, shell density used, number of available guns and 
mortars, amount and quality of ammunition issued, and the time 
in which missions must be accomplished. 
  The number of shells and mortar rounds which can be fired in 
this time is determined for each artillery system depending on 
the number of guns and mortars which a battery has, the duration 
of fire preparation and the method of fire. By dividing this 
amount by the average ammunition expenditure norm we obtain the 
number of objectives which can be neutralized (annihilated) 
during artillery preparation of the assault. 
  The following indicators are used in calculating fire 
capabilities of artillery firing from indirect positions against 
personnel and weapons in the open: 50 m per gun and mortar for 
placing a standing barrier; 25 m per gun and mortar for placing 
a rolling barrier; and 15 m per gun up to and including 100-mm 
caliber and mortars of all calibers, and 25 m for guns over 
100-mm caliber for conducting a rolling barrage. For a 
successive fire concentration based on the size of battalion 
sectors on one line: 6 hectares for battalions armed with guns 
up to and including 100-mm caliber and with mortars of all 
calibers; and 9 hectares for battalions armed with guns over 
100-mm caliber. 
  Methodology for calculating subunit capabilities to 
combat enemy armored targets and other targets by direct 
fire. The calculation methodology is based on use of combat 
effectiveness factors, which are given in Table 2. To calculate 
capabilities, multiply the number of AT weapons by their factor. 


Table 2 - Combat Effectiveness Factors of AT Weapons in Combating Enemy 
Tanks 

             Effectiveness Factor 

AT Weapons   In Penetrating a    In Repelling a    In the         In a 
             Defense             Counterattack     Defense        Meeting 
                                                                  Battle 

ATGM         0.3[.sup]1[/]/0.5    2[.sup]2[/]/2.5    2.5            2 
fighting                                           [.sup]3[/]/2 
vehicle 

Fagot ATGM   0.3/0.5             1.15/2            2/1.5          1.5 


Metis ATGM   0.3/0.5             1/1.5             1              1 


BMP          0.3/0.5             1.3/1.5           2/1.5          1.3/1.5 

Tanks        0.3/0.5             1/2               2.5/1.5        1.5 

SPG [heavy   0.1/0.15            0.8/1             1/0.8          0.8 
AT grenade 
launcher] 

RPG- 7       0.05/0.08           0.2               0.3/0.2        0.2 

1. Emplaced enemy tanks in numerator, tanks in open in denominator. 

2. Friendly AT weapons in open in numerator, emplaced friendly AT weapons 
in denominator. 

3. Emplaced friendly AT weapons in numerator, friendly AT weapons in open 
in denominator. 


  It is accepted that two or three AT weapons should be 
assigned to destroy one target in conducting direct fire on the 
FEBA and in the immediate depth of defense in the period of fire 
preparation of the assault. 
  In launching an attack from immediate contact with the 
enemy, 
three Metis ATGM's are used for this purpose in a BTR-equipped 
MRC. In a BMP-equipped company and in a tank company 50-60 
percent of tanks and BMP's are used. The above companies can 
destroy up to 5-6 targets with their own assets. 
  A BTR-equipped MRB in the defense may use 6 Metis ATGM's, 6 
Fagot ATGM's, 1 SPG-9 and 18 RPG-7's in aligning the battle 
formation in two echelons. There is a total of 30 AT weapons 
which can be used to destroy around 30 assaulting enemy tanks. 
  Capabilities of motorized rifle and tank subunits to combat 
enemy tanks in repelling a counterattack and in the defense are 
given in Table 3. 


Table 3 - Capabilities of Motorized Rifle and Tank Subunits to Combat Enemy Tanks, IFV's and APC's in Repelling a 
Counterattack and in the Defense 

                           In Repelling a Counterattack                 In the Defense 

                           Effectiveness Factor   Capabilities for      Effectiveness Factor   Capabilities for 
                                                  Destroying                                   Destroying 

AT Weapons      Number     Against    Against    Tanks      IFV's      Against    Against    Tanks      IFV's 
                of AT      Tanks      IFV's                 and        Tanks      IFV's                 and 
                Weapons               and                   APC's                 and                   APC's 
                                      APC's                                       APC's 

BTR-equipped 
MRC 

Metis ATGM      3          1.5        2.5        3-4        7 8        1          1.5        3          4-5 

RPG- 7          9          0.2        0.5        2          45         0.3        0.5        2-3        4-5 

Total           12         -          -          5-6        11-13      -                     5- 6       8-10 

BMP-equipped 
MRC 

ATGM on BMP     11         1.5        2.5        16-17      27 28      2          3          22         33 

RPG- 7          9          0.2        0.5        2          45         0.3        0.5        2-3        4-5 

Total           20         -          -          18-19      31-33      -                     24-25      37-38 

Tank company    10-13      2          3          20-26      30- 39     2.5        3          25-32      30-39 

BTR-equipped 
MRB 

Metis ATGM      9          1.5        2          13-14      18         1          1.5        9          13-14 

Fagot ATGM      6          1.5        2          9          12         2          3          12         18 

SPG-9M          1          1.0        1.5        1          1-2        1          2          1          2 

RPG-7           27         0.2        0.4        5-6        10-11      0.3        0.5        8          13 

Total           43         -          -          25-30      41-43      -                     30         56-57 

BMP-equipped 
MRB 

ATGM on BMP     33         1.5        3          49-50      99         2          3          66         99 

RPG- 7          27         0.2        0.4        5-6        10-11      0.3        0.5        8          13 

Total           60         -          -          54-56      104-110    -          -          74         112 

Tank            31-40      2          3          62-80      93- 120    2.5        3          78-100     93-120 
battalion 


  It is customary to consider that 70 percent of capabilities 
of AT weapons and tanks are used in combating enemy tanks and 30 
percent in combating enemy IFV's, APC's and other armored 
targets. Capabilities of those means to combat enemy APC's and 
IFV's are 2-3 times greater than against tanks, since APC's and 
IFV's have weak armor protection, which protects personnel only 
against bullets and against artillery and mortar round 
fragments, and naturally the APC's and IFV's will be disabled 
after being hit by the very first round. 
  Methodology of calculating company (battalion) 
capabilities for damaging the enemy by small arms fire. 
Mathematical expectation of damage done to enemy personnel is 
the basic indicator of company (battalion) capabilities of 
damaging the enemy by small arms fire. Fire capabilities of 
damaging the enemy by small arms fire usually are calculated 
only in subunits. 
  The calculation methodology is based on a comparison of the 
sides' small arms fire densities expressed by the number of 
bullets per meter of frontage in the indicated sector (zone) of 
fire. Experience has established that when a company attacking 
in dismounted formation comes to within 400 m of the enemy 
defense, it commences fire from all kinds of weapons against his 
forward edge with a density of at least 8-10 bullets per minute 
per meter of frontage and is conducted with that density for 4 
minutes (in an assault at a rate of 100 m in one minute). Such a 
fire density leads to enemy personnel losses of up to 30 percent 
on the forward edge of defense. 
  The procedure for calculating subunit fire capabilities of 
damaging the enemy by small arms fire is as follows: determine 
the number of a battalion's MRC's operating in the first 
echelon; count the number of assault rifles, machineguns and 
other weapons in each company; then, by dividing their 
cumulative effective rate of fire by the company (battalion) 
attack frontage, determine how many bullets will be fired in one 
minute per meter of frontage. 
  Methodology of calculating striking power of 
subunits. The magnitude of subunits' striking power is 
judged from the quantitative makeup, densities, and in the final 
account the number of forces and assets of opposing sides and 
rates of advance. The densities and ratio of close-combat forces 
and assets permit drawing a conclusion about the capability of 
routing the enemy and performing the assigned mission. Densities 
in a company are figured by squads and in a battalion by 
platoons. For example, to conduct a successful attack it is 
necessary to have a superiority of 23 times in favor of 
attacking subunits in the company (battalion) attack frontage, 
to create a superiority of 4-6 times in a penetration sector 
(i.e., overwhelming superiority over the enemy), and thereby, 
taking advantage of the superiority achieved, to assault the 
enemy swiftly right after the fire, rout him and capture the 
designated line from the move. 
  Nine motorized rifle squads [MRS's] and an AT squad carry 
the 
striking power of a BTR-equipped MRC. Usually up to 2-3 platoons 
of tanks operate together with the company on its axis of 
attack, which considerably increases its striking power. In a 
BMP-equipped company the main striking power consists of the 
BMP's (11 of them), which can successfully fight not only enemy 
personnel, but also his tanks and other armored targets. But 
even a BMP-equipped company must coordinate closely with tank 
subunits. 
  Nine MRP's and 33 BMP's are the basis of striking power of a 
BMP-equipped MRB. The experience of field fire exercises which 
have been held showed that a BMP- equipped MRB reinforced by a 
TC and attacking in a 1-2 km frontage is capable of destroying 
all main weapons in 2-3 platoon strongpoints at one line (400 m 
wide and 200 m deep, gaps of 200 m or more between enemy platoon 
strongpoints), expending 0.2-0.3 unit of fire of different 
ammunition for this. 
  A BTR-equipped MRB reinforced by two TC's also has the very 
same capabilities. The TB of an MRR usually is attached to 
MRB's. The striking power of MRC's and MRB's is considerably 
increased because of the tanks. The TB of a TR can 
simultaneously destroy weapons in 2-3 platoon strongpoints, 
i.e., up to a mechanized infantry company, by gun and machinegun 
fire of 30 tanks. Working closely together with the TC attached 
to the battalion, exploiting results of nuclear and fire damage 
of the enemy, and in coordination with adjacent subunits, an MRC 
is capable of completing the rout of an enemy in 2-3 platoon 
points during the time of battalion execution of the mission. 
For their part, an MRB reinforced by tanks and the TB of a TR 
are capable of completing the destruction of personnel and 
weapons in 8-9 platoon strongpoints successively at three lines 
in a day's battle, i.e., routing up to three enemy companies. 
  The magnitude of indicators of striking power of 
counterattacking subunits depends on the number and quality of 
TP's and MRP's being used for the attack which have tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's) in their makeup, and also on the number of AT 
weapons operating together with the counterattacking subunits. 
The higher the density of these forces and assets, the greater 
will be the indicators of striking power. Based on experience of 
the Great Patriotic War and postwar scientific research 
exercises using only conventional weapons, a superiority of 2-3 
times in forces and assets over the enemy in favor of the 
counterattacking subunits was considered sufficient for routing 
an enemy who had penetrated if he had not managed to consolidate 
at the line reached. If an enemy who has penetrated is being 
routed under conditions of the use of nuclear weapons, then 
equal or one and one-half times superiority is sufficient. 
  Based on field fire exercise experience, under conditions of 
the use of nuclear weapons a BMP-equipped MRC working together 
with a TP (TC) can rout a penetrated enemy of up to a mechanized 
infantry company in strength. 
  A BMP-equipped MRB reinforced by one TC and a BTR-equipped 
MRB reinforced by two TC's, with an expenditure of 0.2-0.3 unit 
of fire of different ammunition and delivery of an attack 
against the flank and rear of the penetrated enemy is capable, 
in coordination with adjacent battalions, of routing a 
penetrated grouping equal to its own makeup. 
  The TB of a TR has approximately the very same capabilities 
under the very same conditions. 
  Thus, a rout (or completion of a rout together with the 
regiment's second echelon) of an enemy grouping which has 
penetrated the defense can be the result of realization of the 
striking power of subunits in the defense. 
  The depth of possible advance of counterattacking subunits 
is 
determined by the depth of disposition of enemy forces and 
assets which have penetrated the defense. 
  Methodology for calculating maneuver capabilities. 
Maneuverability of the company and battalion is determined by 
the maneuver qualities of their organic and attached subunits in 
terms of speed, tempo, time, displacement and readiness for 
certain actions. The company (battalion) may employ a maneuver 
of fire, forces and assets. 
  A maneuver of fire is used for more effective 
engagement of the enemy. It consists of a timely concentration 
of the fire of organic and attached subunits against one target 
or a group of important targets, and the transfer of fire from 
one target to another and distribution of fire against several 
targets. The time from transmission of commands to the burst of 
a projectile (munition) at the target is the basic indicator 
characterizing capabilities of the maneuver of fire. It depends 
on the kind of target (objective) (planned or opportunity 
target) against which fire is commenced. The time of delivery of 
a fire strike against an opportunity target is formed from the 
time for transmitting commands and preparing firing data. If 
fire is conducted against a planned target, then time 
expenditures for preparing new firing data are not taken into 
account, since it was done in advance. 
  Maneuver of forces and assets (subunits). A 
maneuver is executed to occupy a more favorable position for 
delivering a strike against the most vulnerable place in the 
enemy combat formation, especially his flank and rear, and to 
move friendly subunits out from under an enemy strike. A 
maneuver of forces and assets can be accomplished along roads or 
cross country routes and by air or water. The maneuver should be 
simple in concept and be executed swiftly, covertly and as a 
surprise to the enemy. Timely, fullest exploitation of results 
of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy should be made the basis 
of a maneuver of forces and assets (subunits). A close 
envelopment, deep envelopment, their combination, and the 
withdrawal are kinds of subunit maneuver. The close envelopment 
is a maneuver executed to move subunits for an attack against an 
enemy flank. The deep envelopment is a deeper maneuver executed 
by subunits to attack the enemy from the rear. A close 
envelopment usually is accomplished in close tactical and fire 
coordination and a deep envelopment only in tactical 
coordination with subunits attacking from the front. A 
withdrawal is a maneuver used to move friendly troops out from 
under an attack by superior enemy forces, to win time and to 
occupy a more favorable line (area). A withdrawal is conducted 
only by permission or order of the senior commander. In the 
defense a maneuver is executed to replace or reinforce subunits 
which have suffered losses, conduct counterattacks, occupy 
alternate positions and lines of firing positions, and destroy 
an enemy who has moved to the flank or rear of a strongpoint 
(defense area). 
  The general content of a maneuver of company (battalion) 
forces and assets on the terrain is made up of the following 
actions: leaving occupied areas of a position or leaving 
occupied lines; closing up subunits into columns and extending 
the columns; shifting to new areas, positions or lines and 
deploying to perform the combat mission. 
  Time of executing a maneuver is the basic indicator of a 
maneuver of forces and assets (Table 4). 


Table 4 - Subunit Maneuver Capabilities 

Subunit Actions                            Time, min 

In the defense 

Occupying a battle formation and           55 
organizing a system of fire by MRC 

Changing a firing position by MRC (TC)     6 

Moving forward and occupying a line of     9 
firing positions by TC to repel an enemy 
assault 

In the attack 

Rate of subunit movement to the line of    15 20 km/hr 
departure 

Combat rates of assault: 

Dismounted                                 4-5 km/hr 

In BTR's, BMP's, tanks                     8-12 km/hr 

Time of deployment from march column 
into approach march formation: 

MRC (TC)                                   2 

MRB (TB)                                   4 

Time of deployment from column into 
battle formation toward the front: 

MRC (TC)                                   3.5 

MRB (TB)                                   8 

Occupying a line by MRC (with dismount)    5 
to repel enemy counterattack 

Time for changing from battle formation 
to approach march formation: 

MRC (TC)                                   1 

MRB (TB)                                   3 (4) 

Deployment of tractor-drawn artillery 
battalion into battle formation: 

In prepared area                           18 

In unprepared area (from the march         23 
during displacement) 

Deployment of SP battalion into battle 
formation: 

In prepared area                           7 

In unprepared area                         10 

Leaving firing position: 

Battery                                    2 

SP artillery battalion                     6 

Tractor-drawn battalion                    11 


  The following are considered initial data for calculating 
capabilities for a maneuver of forces and assets by a company 
(battalion): content and depth of the maneuver; rates of subunit 
movement along roads and cross-country routes with consideration 
of terrain accessibility; type of column; norms of time required 
by forces and assets to leave areas (positions, lines), close up 
into columns and extend them; time for a column to pull into a 
new area, deploy into battle formation and prepare to perform a 
mission. 
  The procedure for calculating the time for executing a 
maneuver of forces and assets on the terrain can be as follows: 

  -  analyze the goal and content of the maneuver; determine 
from a map the depth of the maneuver with consideration of 
corrections for terrain relief and map scale; break the route 
into 5-10 km segments and determine rate of movement along 
sectors with different trafficability. In breaking up routes 
into 5-10 km segments, make corrections for each segment; 
  -  figure the time for crossing each sector (divide sector 
length 
by movement rate), preparing for movement (leaving disposition 
areas, closing up and extending columns), deploying in the new 
area and preparing to execute the mission (using tabular data); 
  -  determine overall time for executing the maneuver by adding 
up 
the indicators obtained. 


    In calculating time for forward movement, take into account 
the following: have mixed columns move at average speeds of 
20-25 km/hr; move up to the line of departure at a speed of 
15-20 km/hr. 
  The time for subunits to concentrate in (pull into) an area 
is figured from the formula 
  T[.sub]pull-in[/]=D[.sub]col[/]D[.sub]area[/]/s, 
  where 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|D[.sub]col[/]                       |--depth of march column;              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|D[.sub]area[/]                      |--depth of area;                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|s                                     |--rate of concentration (equal to one-| 
|                                      |half of march speed, i.e., 10- 12 km/-| 
|                                      |hr).                                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Example 1. Figure the time for commitment of a 
second-echelon battalion which is 6 km from the commitment line. 
  Solution. The battalion will arrive at the line 
for deployment into platoon columns in 16.5 minutes (5x1.1=5.5 
km); (5.5x6020=16.5 minutes). The battalion will move from 
the line of deployment into platoon columns to the commitment 
line in 3 minutes (1x6020). Deployment of companies into 
battle formation during the day will take 4 minutes. Twenty- 
four minutes are required for commitment. The battalion 
commander and staff will require up to 20 minutes for 
decisionmaking and assigning (updating) missions to companies. 
Thus, a regiment's second echelon battalion can be committed in 
44 minutes (16.5+3+4+20) after the combat mission has been 
updated for it (assigned to it) by the senior commander. 
  The maneuver of company (battalion) forces and assets when 
operating in a tactical airborne assault force includes company 
(battalion) movement up to the concentration area, boarding and 
loading, flight to the landing area and the landing. 
  The following are initial data for calculating the time for 
executing a maneuver by air: rates of forward movement of 
landing forces and assets under their own power; norms of time 
required for boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading); 
distance of boarding sites from drop zones; and type and flight 
speeds of air assault assets. 
  The procedure for calculating time for landing of a tactical 
airborne assault force requires the following: determine flight 
distance from a map; calculate flight time of the assault force; 
determine the time for forward movement of landing forces and 
assets to concentration areas and time for boarding; establish 
the time for disembarking (unloading) after landing; determine 
overall time by adding up the indicators obtained. 
  Based on exercise experience, a reinforced MRC will take 
20-25 minutes and an MRB will take 45-50 minutes to board 
(disembark). 
  Consideration of moral-political attitude of subunits 
in assessing their combat capabilities. Firepower, striking 
power and maneuverability represent the potential capabilities 
of a company (battalion). As we already established, material 
resources are the basis of combat power inasmuch as the sides' 
mutual damage is the basic content of battle and is accomplished 
by material resources, above all by fire from all kinds of 
weapons. Consequently, the outcome of battle is decided by 
weapons, but weapons do not operate of themselves. The outcome 
of battle depends largely on what kind of moral-fighting 
qualities a person possesses. 
  The moral-fighting qualities of personnel are understood to 
mean the aggregate of the most important qualities of people 
determining their behavior in battle. This includes both 
individual as well as collective qualities of people. Individual 
qualities usually are subdivided into political, moral, 
psychological and professional. 
  People's moral qualities are the basic regulator of behavior 
in all spheres of their activity, including in battle. Moral 
qualities are characterized by such categories as a sense of 
duty, responsibility, conscience, honor and dignity. The entire 
set of moral-fighting qualities of personnel in battle is 
realized and materialized through professional qualities, and 
all qualities form and are manifested under the influence of 
political views. This must not be forgotten and must be taken 
into account in determining combat capabilities of the company 
and battalion in modern battle. 
  Constant consideration and use of the moral-political and 
psychological factor in the interests of performing an assigned 
mission are the most important condition for achieving success 
in battle. This is achieved by constant, profound knowledge of 
the personnel's political-moral and psychological state, by 
organization and conduct of active political work to strengthen 
such a state, by a systematic study of the enemy's 
moral-political qualities, by identification of his strong and 
weak points, and by creation of active opposition to his 
ideological subversion in propaganda. 
  In estimating the enemy, the company (battalion) commander 
takes the following into account: Subunit organization and 
strength level, combat experience and traditions; level of 
personnel's professional training; ethnic-psychological features 
of personnel; level of discipline and relationships between 
commanders and subordinates and among soldiers of different 
nationalities, and the attitude toward allied armies; system of 
brainwashing personnel and its effectiveness; servicemen's 
attitude toward socialism and war as a whole; and measures which 
must be carried out to undermine and weaken the morale of enemy 
troops. 
  In estimating the state of morale of friendly troops, the 
company (battalion) commander proceeds from the fact that our 
social system is a source of soldiers' high morale. Moral forces 
are not a constant value; they depend on the level of political 
and military education. Therefore in estimating the state of 
morale of friendly subunits the following always must be taken 
into account in addition to other questions of political work: 
state of ideological-educational work to strengthen military 
discipline, efficiency and order; the personnel's state of 
supply of necessary material resources for battle. 
  As a result, a conclusion is drawn about the extent to which 
the moral factor contributes (or does not contribute) to 
performance of combat missions and what measures must be taken 
to change the personnel's moral political attitude. 
<H5>  Chapter III - Command and Control of Subunits </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of Command and Control of Subunits </H5>
  C[.sup]2[/] of subunits is the purposeful activity of the 
company (battalion) commander, his deputies and the battalion 
staff to maintain subunits' constant combat readiness, prepare 
them for battle and lead them in performing assigned missions. 
  C[.sup]2[/] of subunits includes the following: organizing 
and accomplishing measures to improve or maintain their combat 
readiness and ensure or restore their combat effectiveness; 
maintaining high morale, psychological stability, firm military 
discipline, efficiency and constant combat readiness in the 
subunits; continuously collecting, gathering, generalizing, 
analyzing and assessing situation data; making decisions; 
assigning missions to subordinate subunits; organizing and 
maintaining continuous coordination; organizing and fulfilling 
measures for political work and comprehensive support; and 
organizing C[.sup]2[/]. In addition, the commander and staff 
carry out practical work in subordinate subunits to direct their 
immediate preparation for battle, organize the performance of 
assigned missions in the course of battle, and perform other 
measures. 
  It is common knowledge that C[.sup]2[/] theory and 
practice also developed and changed along with the development 
of armed forces. Thus, before the appearance of mass armies 
C[.sup]2[/] was exercised directly by the commander (field 
general), since at that time he could observe the actions of all 
his troops and could issue necessary orders and command the 
troops personally or through adjutants, orderlies and messengers 
without the help of a special entity (a staff). 
  With the appearance of mass armies and consequently also 
with 
the increased scope of combat operations and changed conditions 
of preparing and conducting battle, it became more and more 
difficult for one commander to lead the troops and he could no 
longer cope with this mission alone. The need arose to establish 
a permanent, special C[.sup]2[/] entity. A Military Council 
under the commander in chief was introduced for this initially, 
then the army staff was established in the middle of the 18th 
century, and in the early 19th century staffs appeared in 
divisions, regiments and battalions. The staffs developed and 
were perfected and improved all the while, becoming the 
commander's irreplaceable assistants in C[.sup]2[/] both in 
peace as well as wartime. 
  New combat arms and special troops, which began to take part 
in battle, appeared in the course of further evolution of the 
armed forces of many states. This led to a further expansion in 
the circle of appointed persons used for leadership of 
formations, units and subunits. Chiefs of these combat arms and 
special troops appeared in the organizational structure of 
troops. 
  The basic content of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits consists of 
maintaining high political attitude and morale and the constant 
combat readiness of subunits; collecting and studying situation 
data and discovering enemy intentions; making decisions; 
communicating missions to subordinates; organizing and 
maintaining coordination among subunits of the battalion and 
other combat arms participating in battle; comprehensively 
supporting battle and monitoring its preparation and subunits' 
performance of assigned missions. 
  Timely, well organized, uninterrupted C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits facilitates seizing and holding the initiative, 
covertness in preparing for battle, surprise in delivering 
attacks against the enemy, swift exploitation of results of 
nuclear and fire damage of the enemy, and timely accomplishment 
of measures for protecting subunits against mass destruction 
weapons. In addition, it permits more effective use of the 
combat capabilities of all forces and assets involved in the 
battle. 
  Conditions for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits. 
Conditions for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits have become 
substantially more complicated in modern battle compared with 
the Great Patriotic War. In the past war C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits was exercised in a situation where the battle developed 
relatively slowly and its outcome depended chiefly on rifle 
subunits, sometimes reinforced by tanks and artillery fire. 
  As a rule, company and battalion COP's were disposed in 
battle formations of subunits, usually being in one and the same 
place for a lengthy time (especially in a defense). 
  The modern MRC and MRB became highly mobile and 
maneuverable. 
While a company (battalion) of the Great Patriotic War period 
had a rate of advance of 4- 5 km/hr, now it can march at an 
average speed of 20-25 km/hr. Under present conditions, if the 
enemy uses nuclear weapons the commander will have to control 
his subunits fighting in areas of contamination, destructive 
damage, fires and flooding. Now the combat situation on the 
battlefield may change often and substantially, which will 
necessitate updating a decision or organizing it anew. 
  The growth in spatial scope of battle, both defensive as 
well 
as offensive, and of its tempo of conduct leads to a more 
frequent change in locations of C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
will force a commander to exercise control of subunits on the 
move. As we know, this hampers C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and 
complicates their protection and protection of the means of 
C[.sup]2[/] against nuclear and precision weapons, air and 
artillery strikes, and actions by enemy raiding parties, which 
as a rule will have the mission of knocking out command posts. 
  Changes which occurred in organization and technical 
outfitting of our own and enemy troops led to substantial 
changes in the content and nature of modern combined arms 
battle, in methods of its organization and conduct and in 
methods of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits. Battle became decisive, 
dynamic, maneuverable and fast-moving. The spatial scope of 
battle increased substantially compared with the Great Patriotic 
War period. Thus, a modern MRB may attack a deliberate enemy 
defense in a frontage up to 2 km and defend an area with a 
frontage of 3-5 km. 
  Under such conditions the company (battalion) commander will 
control subunits over radio communications equipment, as a rule 
in movement or from short halts. The volume of information on 
the enemy which the company (battalion) commander must quickly 
collect, generalize, study, analyze, make a decision on and 
report to the senior commander has grown substantially. 
  In modern battle the company (battalion) commander will be 
forced to make or update a decision at least 3-4 times in the 
course of a 24 hour period, in less time than was the case in 
the Great Patriotic War, and often under conditions where the 
COP will be in movement for a considerable time. Therefore the 
factor of time now has a deciding effect on all C[.sup]2[/] 
processes. Under these conditions the company (battalion) 
commander must think out and determine well the location of his 
COP and the organization of communications from it with 
subunits, adjacent subunits and the senior commander. 
  The company (battalion) commander's place should be a place 
from which he can confidently lead subordinates and exert an 
effective influence on them in preparing for and conducting 
battle. The presence of communications equipment (especially 
radio equipment) in the company and battalion gives the 
commander great mobility in choosing his location, but the 
commander's attachment to communications equipment should not 
contribute to his rejection of contact with subordinate, 
attached and supporting subunits. 
  The experience of the past war shows that a company 
(battalion) commander should have a good view from his COP of 
his subunit's battle formation and of the enemy whom he is 
fighting. 
<H5>  2. Requirements Placed on C </H5>[.sup]2[/] of Subunits 
  The highly maneuverable nature of combat operations as well 
as frequent, abrupt situation changes demand of a company 
(battalion) commander that C[.sup]2[/] be stable, 
continuous, efficient and concealed, and accomplished so 
the necessary degree of centralization of C[.sup]2[/] is 
combined with granting of initiative to subordinate commanders 
in determining methods of performing assigned missions. 
  Stability of C[.sup]2[/] of the company 
(battalion) is manifested in the constant influence of the 
commander and staff (in the battalion) on operations of subunits 
participating in the battle in the interests of their successful 
performance of assigned mission under any combat situation 
conditions. Great Patriotic War experience indicates that even a 
temporary loss of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits leads to 
nonperformance of the combat mission and in some cases also to 
defeat. 
  Stability of C[.sup]2[/] is achieved by knowing the combat 
situation which actually has taken shape and the combat mission 
received, making the decision promptly and assigning missions 
precisely to subordinate subunits; maintaining stable 
communications with subordinate, attached and coordinating units 
(subunits) and with the senior commander (chief), and ensuring 
reliability of its operation; and making comprehensive use of 
all C[.sup]3[/] equipment at the disposal of the company 
(battalion). In addition, back when organizing the battle 
measures are taken to protect friendly organic radio equipment 
and electronic C[.sup]2[/] systems and oppose enemy technical 
reconnaissance assets. 
  Continuity of C[.sup]2[/] consists of the 
commander's constant influence on the course of battle by word, 
action and means at his disposal in the interests of subunits' 
successful performance of the assigned mission. In battle the 
company (battalion) commander is obligated to carefully follow 
the course of battle and continuously conduct reconnaissance and 
know the enemy's actions and intentions. He must promptly assign 
or update missions to platoons (companies) and to attached and 
supporting subunits. Constant knowledge and analysis of the 
battlefield situation both within one's own boundaries as well 
as ahead of adjacent subunits, and foresight of the most 
important changes are necessary conditions for achieving 
continuity of C[.sup]2[/]. This will permit the commander to 
employ all organic and attached weapons skillfully in the course 
of battle and effectively exploit results of nuclear and fire 
damage of the enemy. 
  To achieve continuity of C[.sup]2[/] it is very important 
to select the site of one's COP, dispose it covertly and 
displace it promptly, especially when conducting battle at night 
and on rough terrain. The company (battalion) commander must be 
on the most important axis at a given point in time and exert 
timely influence on the course of battle with all forces and 
assets at his disposal. The commander must lead subunits in 
difficult moments of battle by personal example, showing 
boldness, initiative, resourcefulness and unshakable resolve, 
and perform the combat mission regardless of any difficulty or 
even a threat to life itself, instilling this resolve in all 
subordinates. 
  Back while organizing for battle the commander should 
appoint 
deputies for himself in addition to authorized ones and issue an 
order on them. The battalion commander and staff immediately 
take steps to restore C[.sup]2[/] disrupted in the course of 
battle. 
  Efficiency of C[.sup]2[/] consists of timely, 
swift accomplishment of all measures connected with leading 
company (battalion) subunits in preparation for and in the 
course of battle; constant knowledge of the situation and swift 
reaction to its changes; timely updating of a decision and of 
missions assigned to subunits; and the company (battalion) 
commander's ability to use the most effective work methods in a 
given situation and perform assigned missions within time 
periods ensuring preemption of the enemy in operations. In 
addition, great importance is attached to the ability of 
commanders at all levels in the company (battalion) to operate 
organic battalion communications equipment and conduct 
conversations briefly and using formatted documents. 
  Especially high efficiency is needed in the company 
(battalion) commander's work in organizing for battle in a short 
time and in the dynamics of battle, when it will be necessary to 
update a decision or organize anew. 
  For example, if company (battalion) subunits attack at a 
rate 
of 3-4 km/hr and a combat mission based on a new situation is 
communicated to them in 20 minutes, then during this time they 
will move forward 1 1.3 km, and may cover up to 2.6 km in 
pursuing the enemy at a rate of 8 km/hr. Therefore if a 
commander's reaction to the development of events is delayed, 
his orders (instructions) will be late and will not correspond 
to the actual situation. 
  A rapid situation estimate, timely decisionmaking and its 
timely communication to subunits are of decisive importance for 
maintaining C[.sup]2[/] efficiency. 
  Concealment of C[.sup]2[/] is achieved by 
following established rules and procedures for conversations 
over technical communications equipment; strictly fulfilling 
rules of secure C[.sup]2[/]; strictly complying with measures 
of maskirovka and of concealed placement of C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities; involving a strictly limited number of appointed 
persons for carrying out measures connected with preparation of 
battle and keeping the measures in strictest secrecy; using 
various ciphers and codes, tables of callsigns and signals, 
prearranged message codes and coded maps; prohibiting 
conversations in the clear; reliable maskirovka of COP's; and 
keeping all conversations concerning preparation and conduct of 
battle secret. 
  Concealment of C[.sup]2[/] was of great importance in 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits in past wars. Under present 
conditions it is given even greater attention in connection with 
the increased role of surprise of enemy operations, increased 
capabilities of enemy reconnaissance, and use of nuclear, 
precision and other kinds of weapons. Therefore keeping all 
measures connected with preparation and conduct of battle secret 
is a very important condition for concealment of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Role of the commander and staff in C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits. It is common knowledge that the commander's 
decision is the basis of C[.sup]2[/]. The company (battalion) 
commander bears full personal responsibility for his subordinate 
subunits' combat readiness and preparation for battle, their 
proper employment and their successful performance of combat 
missions within prescribed time periods. In addition, he is 
responsible for political work, indoctrination, military 
discipline, psychological preparation and political attitude and 
morale of personnel. 
  The company (battalion) commander exercises C[.sup]2[/] of 
subordinate and attached subunits by issuing verbal operation 
orders and instructions and by commands and various prearranged 
signals. 
  The place and time of deployment of the company (battalion) 
COP and procedure for its displacement are specified in the 
order. 
  The company (battalion) COP should not lag behind or break 
away from subunits, especially in an attack at night and in the 
fog. The company (battalion) commander must observe the 
battlefield, receive timely situation reports and react 
immediately to situation changes. The battalion COP usually was 
disposed up to 300 m and that of the company up to 200 m from 
first echelon subunits in the attack, and up to 2 km and 800 m 
respectively in the defense. 
  When the battalion COP is disposed together with the COP of 
an attached artillery battalion, it may occupy an area up to 0.2 
hectares and vehicles are placed 30-50 m from each other. 
  For mutual recognition and for determining the affiliation 
and location of subunits, a recognition and identification point 
(post) [punkt (post) oboznacheniya] is assigned from a squad or 
crew specially trained for this purpose in each first echelon 
company (battalion) in direct contact with the enemy or 
conducting battle or reconnaissance in the enemy rear. 
  Subunits are located by activating visual and technical 
means 
of recognition from the recognition and identification point 
(post) at a command of the company (battalion) commander or 
battalion chief of staff in accordance with directions of the 
higher staff. 
  Usually no more than three persons, an NCO and two privates, 
are assigned to a company (battalion) recognition and 
identification point (post). It is supplied with observation 
devices (binoculars, stereoscopic telescopes) and a large-scale 
map or diagram of the terrain. In addition, a control log, 
compass, watch, flashlight, communications equipment (telephone 
or radio) and means of giving recognition, identification and 
warning signals are allocated for the point (post). Technical 
means of recognition and identification usually are set up near 
the battalion COP. 
  The point (post) makeup, location, observation sectors, and 
the recognition, identification and warning signals usually are 
indicated when a mission is assigned to a point (post). 
  C[.sup]2[/] of company (battalion) subunits in the course 
of conducting battle means above all the commander's continuous 
influence on the course of battle and direction of their efforts 
toward performing the assigned mission within prescribed time 
periods. 
  A battle is a two-sided process in which each side strives 
to 
achieve set objectives with forces and assets at its disposal. 
Therefore one should not get the idea that an attack that has 
begun, for example, will develop in full conformity with the 
outlined commander's concept. Enemy opposition by various means, 
by stubborn holding of strongpoints and lines and by 
counterattacks of reserves not only will hamper performance of 
assigned missions, but also fundamentally alter the situation 
and the nature of combat operations. 
  Depending on this, the need may arise for the company 
(battalion) commander to further detail the decision and update 
it in different stages of performing a combat mission. 
  The experience of the Great Patriotic War and field training 
exercises shows that in the course of battle the company 
(battalion) commander is required to have the ability to quickly 
collect data on the situation and on the nature of operations of 
enemy and friendly troops so as to immediately issue necessary 
instructions to subordinates. This is achieved by the company 
(battalion) commander constantly observing changes in the 
situation and assessing it. The extent to which this is 
important is apparent from the following example. In the course 
of artillery preparation of an assault in the Belorussian 
Operation (June 1944), B. Fedorov, commander of a rifle 
battalion of 61st Guards Rifle Regiment, 19th Guards Rifle 
Division, determined that the enemy had begun withdrawing from 
the first trench 30 minutes before preparation fire ended. He 
immediately reported this through channels. As a result the 
decision was updated, in accordance with which artillery fire 
was shifted into the depth and the battalion with tanks was 
committed into the fire corridor which formed. Such updating of 
the decision led to rapid capture of a crossing over the Luchesa 
River and performance of the assigned mission ahead of the 
prescribed time and with minimum losses.[.sup]1[/] 
  The commander must be on the most important axis and exert 
timely influence on the course of battle in its decisive moments 
in the course of an assault on the enemy defense, in repelling 
counterattacks, and in an enemy assault on a company strongpoint 
(defense area). 
  A battalion commander not only controls battalion subunits 
personally, but also through deputies and his staff. The 
battalion staff is the principal entity ensuring C[.sup]2[/] 
of battalion subunits. As a rule, the staff arranges all its 
work of organizing and preparing battle based on the battalion 
commander's decision and instructions, and also instructions of 
the regimental staff. 
  Such an entity in the company is the command group, which 
includes the deputy company commander for political affairs, 
senior technician (in his place in the TC is the deputy company 
commander for weapons), company first sergeant and medical party 
NCOIC. 
  The battalion chief of staff is the battalion commander's 
first deputy, and only he has the right to issue orders and 
instructions to subordinates on behalf of the battalion 
commander. He is fully responsible for organization and 
maintenance of continuous C[.sup]2[/] of subunits, their 
combat readiness, and combat support to battalion operations in 
all situation conditions. The battalion staff (and in the 
company the command group) organizes systematic collection and 
study of situation data; helps prepare necessary calculations 
and suggestions for the company (battalion) commander for 
employment of weapons, tactical employment of organic, attached 
and supporting subunits and for the decision as a whole; issues 
warning orders to platoons (companies) and plans battle in 
accordance with the commander's decision. In addition, by 
direction of the battalion commander the chief of staff 
communicates missions to subordinates, organizes reconnaissance 
and carries out other kinds of combat support. Special attention 
here is given to organizing communications with combat subunits 
and adjacent subunits and protecting communications against 
enemy ECM. 
  The battalion chief of staff is obligated to sign operation 
orders and instructions issued by the battalion commander to 
subunits and monitor their fulfillment. He must constantly keep 
an eye on the subunits' state of supply of everything necessary 
for fighting the battle, especially availability of ammunition, 
and promptly deliver it to subunits. 
  The battalion chief of staff must constantly organize 
reconnaissance both of the ground as well as the air enemy. To 
this end he is obligated to assign reconnaissance missions not 
only to the battalion reconnaissance platoon, but also to 
commanders of MRC's and separate platoons of the battalion, 
monitor their fulfillment, and through them communicate to 
subunits the methods and signals for recognition of friendly and 
enemy aircraft (helicopters). 
<H5>  3. Forces and Assets for C </H5>[.sup]2[/] of the Company and 
Battalion in Battle 
  Communications is organized in the company (battalion) in 
accordance with the commander's decision and with directions of 
the battalion (regimental) chief of staff. The company commander 
is responsible in the company and the battalion chief of staff 
is responsible in the battalion for the organization and status 
of communications. The battalion chief of communications (signal 
platoon commander) directly organizes communications and is 
responsible for its stable, precise operation. 
  There is a signal platoon to support C[.sup]2[/] in the 
MRB; it includes two control squads and a radio squad. 
  The signal platoon in a BMP-equipped battalion has 2 BMP-1K 
command vehicles and in a BTR-equipped battalion it has 2 
BTR-70K's. The radio squad is authorized 7 R-107M (R-159) 
radios, 15 R-157 (R-158) radios, a P-193M telephone switchboard, 
8 km of P-274 field telephone cable and 15 TA-57 telephones. 
  In addition, the headquarters platoon in a mortar battery 
has 
a signal squad with 4 R-107M (R-159) radios, 4 km of P-274 field 
telephone cable and 5 TA-57 telephones. 
  The TB signal platoon consists of the commander's tank, a 
control squad and a radio squad. 
  The battalion chief of staff's BMP-1K command vehicle is in 
the control squad. The radio squad has 3 R-159 (R-107M) radios, 
a P-193M telephone switchboard, 4 km of field cable and 5 TA-57 
telephones. The radio squad is accommodated in a BMP. 
  The BMP-1K command vehicle set has 2 R-123 radios, a TA-57 
telephone, R-124 tank intercom for five subscribers, ASh-4 
antenna, and combination whip antenna on an 11-meter mast. 
  The makeup of communications equipment in the BMP 
1K permits accomplishing the following: 

  -  telephone communications among officers and crew members 
within the vehicle; 
  -  radiotelephone communications on two VHF 
radio nets or links. 


    Two workstations for battalion staff officers are equipped 
in 
the vehicle. 
  The BTR-70K set has two R-123 radios and the R-124 tank 
intercom. 
  Communications equipment, other equipment and combat 
capabilities of the BTR- 70K are completely similar to the 
BMP-1K. 
  The commander's tank is equipped with R-123M and R-130M 
radios, R-124 tank intercom for four subscribers and ASh-4 
antenna. 
  Communications equipment of the battalion commander's tank 
supports telephone communications between commander and crew 
members within the tank, radio telephone communications over VHF 
and HF radio nets, and sound telegraph communications over the 
HF radio net. 
  Radios. The R-123M low-power VHF radio installed 
in BTR's, BMP's, tanks and maintenance vehicles is intended for 
supporting telephone communications among armored vehicles and 
control of subunits during battle. R-107M, R-157, R-158 and 
R-159 portable VHF radios serve to provide radiotelephone 
communications among subunits. 
  The R-130M low-power HF radio serves for telephone and sound 
telegraph communications. It is used in the TB for communicating 
with the regimental commander. 
  Wire communications equipment. The MRB has the P 
193M switchboard, P-274 field cable and TA-57 telephone sets. 
They are intended for setting up wire telephone communications 
at the battalion COP with subordinate subunits and for remote 
control of portable radios. 
  The P193M switchboard is intended for preparing a 
lowcapacity 
telephone exchange at the battalion COP. Switchboard capacity is 
10 numbers. Time for deploying the switchboard is 3-4 minutes. 
  Organization of C[.sup]3[/]. Radio, wire, 
mobile and signaling means of communications are employed in the 
company (battalion) for supporting C[.sup]2[/]. All 
C[.sup]2[/] activity of the company and battalion commander 
in battle is accomplished from the COP. 
  The company COP may include the company commander, deputy 
company commander for political affairs, senior technician (in 
the TC the deputy company commander for weapons), company first 
sergeant and medical party NCOIC. Technical equipment may 
include the company commander's BTR (BMP) or tank. A radio net 
is set up in each company made up of radios of all company 
fighting vehicles and radios of company and platoon commanders. 
Portable radios are used for maintaining communications when 
commanders are outside the fighting vehicles and for 
communicating with MRP's operating in dismounted formation. 
  In defensive battle, radios of attached tanks located in the 
company strongpoint may be included in the MRC radio net. Other 
subunits attached to the company also are included in this same 
radio net. 
  The commander of the artillery subunit attached to the 
company as a rule is with the company commander. During movement 
of COP's, communications between them is maintained by 
connecting the radio net of the commander of an attached or 
supporting subunit into the company commander's radio net. 
  Wire communications with the MRC (TC) usually is organized 
by 
the battalion commander in the defense, when the battalion is 
disposed at the halt, and in the assembly area [iskhodnyy rayon]. 
  Communications by mobile means in the company is used in all 
kinds of battle and also on the march and when disposed at the 
halt. Motor vehicles, BTR's, BMP's, foot messengers, and 
sometimes also tanks may be used as mobile means. 
  A group of couriers sent out from organic and attached 
subunits may be established in the company and sometimes also in 
the MRB; they usually are at the company (battalion) COP. 
  Communications signaling devices may be used in the company 
(battalion) in all kinds of battle for transmitting commands, 
reports, and warning, control and coordination signals. 
  Visual and audible means usually are used for giving 
signals. 
Signals must be simple, easy to memorize and permit sharp 
distinction of one signal from another. An observer with 
necessary means (binoculars, signal flags, pyrotechnic flares, 
flashlights, pointers and so on) is assigned in advance in each 
subunit for giving and receiving signals. All subunit personnel 
must know the warning signals. 
  Coordination communications between adjacent subunits in the 
battalion usually is organized from right to left and 
accomplished by wire and mobile means of the neighbor on the 
right. 
  The battalion COP includes the battalion commander, deputy 
battalion commander for political affairs, deputy battalion 
commander for weapons, chief of staff, deputy chief of staff and 
battalion chief of communications. 
  The battalion communications equipment at its COP usually is 
combined organizationally and technically into a communications 
center, which is considered one of the important elements of the 
battalion COP. It is intended for accomplishing reliable 
communications with the regimental command post (with the 
regimental commander and chief of staff) and with COP's of 
subordinate, attached, supporting and coordinating subunits. It 
usually includes a BMP-1K command vehicle, individual radios, a 
telephone exchange and a group of couriers. 
  The BMP-1K command vehicle is considered the basic element 
of 
the MRB (TB) COP communications center. 
  The telephone exchange is intended for providing 
communications over wire lines and remote control of radios. It 
consists of the P 193M switchboard and subscriber telephones. 
The switchboard usually is installed in the signal platoon BTR 
or a shelter. It includes cable lines laid from COP's of 
companies and attached subunits, the commander's BMP-1K and the 
battalion chief of staff's BTR, and also wire from the 
communications center of the regimental CP and the supporting 
(attached) artillery battalion. 
  As a rule, two radio nets are organized to provide reliable 
control of subordinate and attached subunits in the battalion: 
the battalion commander's net and chief of staff's net. 
  The battalion commander's radio net usually includes radios 
of the battalion commander and chief of staff and of commanders 
of MRC's, the mortar battery, support platoon and servicing and 
maintenance platoon. Radios of the commander of the ATP, 
reconnaissance platoon and GLP, and the BMP (BTR) radio net made 
up of R-123M (R-173) radios of all battalion BTR's (BMP's) also 
may be included in this net. Centralized control of companies, 
platoons and squads usually is accomplished over this radio net 
when making a march and fighting in BMP's (BTR's). 
  Radios of the reconnaissance patrol, if it is sent out, may 
be included in this radio net. 
  Control of tanks attached to the battalion is exercised over 
the radio net of the attached tanks. It usually includes the 
R-123 radio of the battalion commander and chief of staff. The 
commander of the artillery subunit attached to the battalion is 
at the battalion COP. When the COP is in movement, 
communications between them is maintained by including the 
artillery subunit commander in the battalion commander's radio 
net. 
  Communications with the regimental commander and staff is 
maintained over two radio nets: regimental commander's and chief 
of staff's. 
  Communications with the regimental rear control post and aid 
station is established over the rear radio net by having one of 
the battalion radios enter this net. 
  For C[.sup]2[/] in the defense, wire communications is 
organized between the battalion COP and COP's of subordinate 
subunits over cable lines run and serviced by signal platoon 
personnel. Wire communications lines are run to the MRC's 
(mortar battery) by links; communications with the ATP is 
maintained over a line run to the MRC or through the commander 
of the company with which they operate together in battle. 
  In the mortar battery a cable line is run from the COP to 
the 
battery firing position. 
  Features of organization of communications in the 
TB. The TB COP is approximately the very same in makeup as 
that of the MRB. Its communications center consists of the 
commander's tank, a command vehicle, individual radios, and 
sometimes also (in the defense) a team of couriers. In battle 
the TB commander controls subunits from the tank. The tank 
commander's R-130M radio is used for communicating with the 
regimental commander. The R- 123 radio usually is used for 
C[.sup]2[/] with subordinate subunits. 
  The BMP-1K command vehicle is the basic element of the 
communications center. Using the radios installed in it, 
communications is maintained with the regimental staff, with 
motorized rifle and artillery subunits operating together with 
it, and with the battalion's subordinate subunits. 
  The R-123M radio of the signal platoon BMP can be used for 
communicating with those radios not included in the radio net of 
the commander's tank or the BMP- 1K. 
  In organizing radio communications it is advisable to set up 
three radio nets in the battalion for continuous C[.sup]2[/] 
of subunits with any situation changes and with transition from 
one kind of battle to another. This will allow maintaining 
reliable communications both during battalion operations at full 
strength as well as during operations of TC's with MRB's. 
  When the TB is fighting at full strength, subunits are 
controlled over the battalion commander's radio net, which 
consists of radios of the battalion commander, chief of staff, 
and commanders of the TC's, platoons, line tanks, support 
platoon and servicing and maintenance platoon. 
  If TC's are attached to MRB's, the radios of all company 
tanks are switched into the radio net of the MRB commander and 
staff. The number of such radio nets may be according to the 
number of MRB's. 
  When a TB (less TC) is attached to an MRB, C[.sup]2[/] of 
them is exercised by the TB commander over his own radio net. 
  In addition, a technical observation post and a repair and 
recovery team are set up in the battalion and headed by the 
deputy battalion commander for weapons. The technical 
observation post usually is located together with the COP, and 
one of the communications center radios must be included in the 
regimental technical support radio net. Communications is 
accomplished over this radio net with the deputy regimental 
commander for weapons, with repair and recovery teams and with 
maintenance companies. Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) needing 
evacuation or technical assistance switch their radios into this 
same radio net. 
<H5>  4. Work of the Company (Battalion) Commander in Organizing </H5>
for Battle 
  The continuous development and upgrading of means of warfare 
inevitably leads to a change in the nature of battle and 
substantially affects the content and methodology of the work of 
the commander and staff to organize it. 
  The scope of tasks which a commander must perform in 
organizing for battle has grown considerably under present 
conditions, and time for performing this work has been reduced 
sharply at the same time. The time factor now has a deciding 
influence on all C[.sup]2[/] processes. While a battalion 
commander had several days to organize for battle in the Great 
Patriotic War, this work has to be done in a shorter time in 
modern war. 
  Making an advisable decision in a short time, when the 
commander assumes responsibility for the fate of the people 
entrusted to him, is a very important moment in his work. 
  The fact is that, like any other process in which a person 
takes part, the decisionmaking process has two sides--objective 
and subjective. 
  The objective side includes the combat mission and situation 
elements existing outside of our awareness and independent of 
our will and desire; the subjective side includes the commander, 
who possesses certain knowledge, experience and intellectual 
features. 
  In connection with the fact that something objective is 
reflected differently in the awareness of each person, a 
decision made by two commanders based on a study of one and the 
same situation elements also may differ in content. 
  A decision can be advisable only if the situation elements 
and other factors independent of the commander's will are 
grasped by him as precisely as possible. Therefore in order to 
make an advisable decision the commander must possess high 
command qualities and professional expertise, have detailed 
knowledge of the theory of modern combined arms battle and the 
organization and operating tactics of probable enemies, and be 
able to get his bearings quickly in a complicated, abruptly 
changing situation. 
  Those times have passed when a decision for battle could be 
made only on the basis of intuition and natural talent alone. 
Science, a scientific approach to military phenomena, precise 
calculations and substantiated conclusions now are the basis of 
military art. A correct decision is the result of the 
commander's painstaking mental work in studying situation 
conditions and his knowing to perfection military affairs and 
the laws and principles of conducting modern war. 
  At the same time, in order to be able to make a decision 
quickly and implement it boldly and firmly, in addition to 
knowledge a commander must possess such command qualities as 
decisiveness and determination, independence and high 
exactingness, bravery and purposefulness. 
  A commander without such qualities vacillates long and 
agonizingly in making a decision. He spends so much time on this 
that in the final account he is late in making a decision and, 
having made it but not having displayed proper determination and 
resolve, he cannot always achieve success even with superiority 
over the enemy. 
  Content and sequence of a company (battalion) 
commander's work of organizing for battle. Organization for 
battle includes a large set of measures taken by the commander 
and staff from the moment the combat mission is received until 
the moment subordinate commanders report subunit readiness to 
execute it. 
  The content and sequence of the company (battalion) 
commander's work of organizing for battle depend on the combat 
mission received, availability of time and situation conditions. 
  As a rule, the company (battalion) commander begins the work 
of organizing for battle on receiving an operation order 
(operational instructions, warning order) or after the battalion 
(regimental) commander has announced his decision for battle. 
  The battalion commander's work sequence may be as follows. 
On 
receiving a warning order (Fig. 2) he analyzes the mission; 
determines measures which must be taken immediately for swiftest 
preparation of subunits to perform the assigned mission; 
performs a time calculation (or approves a calculation offered 
by the chief of staff); orients his deputies on upcoming 
operations; issues directions to the chief of staff on preparing 
battalion subunits to perform the combat mission, on organizing 
reconnaissance, and on the time and procedure of work on the 
terrain; estimates the situation; determines his commander's 
concept and reports it to the senior commander (chief). Then he 
familiarizes his deputies with it, issues verbal warning orders 
to subunit commanders and gives instructions on organizing 
coordination, comprehensive support of battle, C[.sup]2[/] 
and political work. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-23A>      Fig. 2. Sequence of company (battalion) commander's work in organizing for battle on </FIG>


  On receiving the operation order the company (battalion) 
commander completes decisionmaking, performs ground 
reconnaissance, issues a verbal operation order and organizes 
coordination. Then he directs immediate preparation of subunits 
for battle and, within the prescribed time, reports company 
(battalion) readiness for performing the combat mission to the 
senior commander. 
  On receiving an operation order or operational instructions 
(Fig. 3), the work of the company (battalion) commander is done 
in the same sequence as on receiving a warning order, the only 
difference being that after the situation estimate, a decision 
is made to the full extent, which then is briefed to the senior 
chief (commander). After its approval the company (battalion) 
commander performs ground reconnaissance and issues the 
operation order. 
  The company (battalion) commander's work sequence also may 
be 
different depending on the situation and availability of time. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-24A>      Fig. 3. Sequence of battalion (company) commander's work in organizing for battle on receiving </FIG>


  Methodology of company (battalion) commander's 
decisionmaking for battle. The decision for battle is 
understood to mean a finally chosen plan of action of the 
commander for performing the assigned mission, which specifies 
in basic outlines the procedure for using available forces and 
assets in the upcoming battle. 
  The decision is a volitional act of the commander. It 
answers 
questions about what is to be done where, when, how, and by whom 
so as to perform the assigned mission with least expenditure of 
forces and assets. It contains important initial data for 
conducting all basic measures connected with organization for 
battle and with C[.sup]2[/] of subunits in the course of 
battle. 
  The content of the commander's decision for battle is 
spelled 
out by the "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground Troops 
Field Manual]. The company (battalion) commander makes the 
decision personally based on his analysis of the mission 
received and on a situation estimate. In the decision 
the company (battalion) commander specifies the commander's 
concept, combat missions for subunits, basic questions of 
coordination, and organization of C[.sup]2[/]. In addition, 
the decision may specify missions for kinds of support and for 
political work. 
  Decisionmaking is a very complex, important process in the 
commander's work requiring him to have not only a detailed 
knowledge of the theory and organization of modern combined arms 
battle and of combat capabilities of friendly and enemy troops, 
but also mastery of this work methodology developed by many 
years of experience of subunit commanders' activity and 
incorporated in the Manual. 
  As a rule, the company (battalion) commander performs the 
work of organizing for battle on the terrain. In those cases 
where the situation does not permit traveling onto the terrain 
(little time for organizing battle, open terrain), the company 
(battalion) commander performs this work from a terrain map 
(model). But even in this case he has to find time to travel out 
on the terrain to update missions for subordinates and organize 
coordination. 
  In all cases the commander must perform the work of 
organizing for battle so as to ensure continuous C[.sup]2[/] 
of subunits, timely decisionmaking and assignment of missions; a 
large part of the allotted time must be given to subordinate 
subunits for preparation and performance of the mission. 
  Analysis of the mission begins the company 
(battalion) commander's decisionmaking work. Company (battalion) 
efforts can be directed properly toward performing the combat 
mission only on condition that the commander has a clear picture 
of the goal of upcoming operations, the senior commander's 
concept, his own mission, his place in the battle formation and 
the role of his company (battalion) in performing the senior 
chief's mission. 
  In modern war knowing the senior commander's concept also is 
necessary to ensure greater independence in the company 
(battalion) commander's actions when communications with the 
battalion (regimental) commander is lost. By knowing the senior 
chief's concept the company (battalion) commander will be able 
to assume control if necessary. He can learn the content of the 
concept from the senior commander's order (operational 
instructions). 
  On receiving a mission personally from the battalion 
(regimental) commander, the company (battalion) commander 
usually analyzes it on the spot and while returning to his own 
COP (to the battalion staff). 
  Correctly understanding the senior chief's concept means 
firmly learning what enemy he intends to rout where and in what 
sequence; where he is delivering the main attack (concentrating 
main efforts); how he is exploiting results of nuclear and 
precision weapon strikes delivered by the senior commander, and 
how he is using conventional weapons, especially on the axis of 
company (battalion) operations; what kind of grouping of forces 
and assets the senior commander is establishing; and what kind 
of maneuver he envisages executing in the course of battle. 
  The role of the company (battalion) is determined by the 
nature and degree of its involvement in performing the mission 
assigned to the senior commander. Therefore in order to 
correctly understand the role of the company (battalion) in 
performing the mission assigned to the battalion (regiment), it 
is necessary to firmly learn the content of the company 
(battalion) combat mission, as part of what element of the 
battalion (regimental) battle formation it is fighting, what 
enemy grouping it must rout and what line to take (what 
strongpoint to hold), the depth of the combat mission, how much 
time is allotted for performing the combat mission, and 
readiness time. 
  Based on an analysis of the combat mission, the company 
(battalion) commander draws conclusions in which he determines 
the axis for concentrating main efforts (if not specified by the 
senior chief), combat missions for subunits, nature of the 
maneuver, alignment of the battle formation, rate of advance and 
other matters. In addition, the commander determines measures 
which must be taken immediately for preparing the company 
(battalion) and the calculation of time for organizing for 
battle. 
  Having analyzed the mission and drawn appropriate 
conclusions, the company (battalion) commander can 
determine measures which must be taken immediately. 
They can be divided into two groups: on preparing company 
(battalion) subunits for performing the combat mission and on 
the work of deputies (the staff) connected with decisionmaking 
and preparation for battle. The first group usually includes 
measures concerned with preparing vehicles and personnel, 
replenishing supplies, evacuating sick and wounded, taking 
immediate measures for protecting subunits against mass 
destruction weapons, providing replacements for subunits, 
repairing vehicles and weapons and so on. 
  The second group can include measures on organization of 
reconnaissance, on preparation of data for decisionmaking, on 
the time and procedure of work on the terrain and so on. 
  The time calculation is one of the most important 
conclusions made from analyzing the combat mission. The company 
(battalion) commander usually performs the calculation of time 
for organizing for battle himself. The following are initial 
data for calculating time for organizing for battle: time of 
receipt of the combat mission and company (battalion) readiness 
for executing it; time of briefing the decision to the senior 
commander; time periods for the commander's participation in 
measures conducted by the senior commander in organizing for 
battle on the terrain. 
  In performing the time calculation the company (battalion) 
commander first determines the presence of overall time 
available for preparing for battle and determines the length of 
daylight. Then he determines the following: how much time 
(including daylight) to give subordinate commanders for 
organizing for battle and to allot to himself for 
decisionmaking, assigning combat missions, performing ground 
reconnaissance, updating the decision, issuing the operation 
order, listening to and approving subordinate commanders' 
decisions, and organizing coordination; in what time periods to 
prepare subunits for performing the mission and to give them 
necessary assistance; and when to report readiness for 
performance of the combat mission to the senior chief. 
  In calculating time, its bulk should be given to 
subordinates. 
  Situation estimate. The situation estimate is 
understood to mean the aggregate of all objective conditions in 
which a company (battalion) has to perform the combat mission. 
In this stage conditions of the assigned combat mission usually 
are studied and factors are identified which will facilitate or 
hamper its performance. In other words, the situation estimate 
is where the commander comes to understand objective conditions 
of upcoming battle and finds the most correct ways of taking 
advantage of these conditions for successful performance of the 
assigned mission. 
  The enemy, friendly troops, adjacent subunits, terrain, and 
the NBC situation usually are elements of the situation 
estimate. In addition, the state of weather, time of year and 
day and their effect on preparing and conducting battle are 
taken into account. 
  The situation elements enumerated above have a varying 
effect 
in deciding one and the same question. In connection with this 
the conclusions at which a commander arrives as a result of 
their estimate also are not only different, but even 
contradictory. The greatest influence will be exerted in one 
instance by the status or position of enemy troops, in another 
instance by the status and position of friendly troops, in a 
third instance by features of the combat operations area, and in 
a fourth instance by time of year or day, visibility conditions 
and so on. But the enemy is the most important and dynamic 
situation element of all. He is the objective of combat effect. 
Actions of friendly troops largely depend on his actions. 
Therefore it is recommended that a situation estimate begin with 
an estimate of the enemy. 
  Enemy estimate. Destruction of the enemy in the 
attack (defense) frontage is the content of the company 
(battalion) combat mission. Success in accomplishing it 
naturally depends fully on a correct understanding of this 
enemy's makeup, position, intentions and capabilities. 
  The battalion commander estimates the enemy on the axis of 
attack of the battalion and adjacent subunits to the depth of 
disposition of the enemy brigade, and in greatest detail to the 
depth of the battalion combat mission. The company commander 
estimates the enemy to the depth of the battalion defense and in 
greater detail to the depth of the company combat mission. In 
the defense he estimates that enemy grouping which may launch an 
attack on the axis of company (battalion) defense and on the 
flanks. 
  As a rule, data on the enemy always will be insufficient and 
some may be unreliable, contradictory, obsolete and even false. 
But the company (battalion) commander must be able to compare 
available information on the enemy, take into account his 
tactics, troop organization, and possible nature of actions, and 
draw correct conclusions on the basis of this. 
  It is recommended that the enemy estimate be conducted in 
the 
following sequence: initially study and analyze the general 
nature of operations and the position, makeup, status and degree 
of protection of the enemy grouping in the zone of advance (in 
the defense sector) of the battalion (regiment); then estimate 
that part of his grouping which must be routed in performing the 
assigned mission, i.e., in the company (battalion) attack 
frontage; finally, relying on a knowledge of enemy tactics and 
knowing the degree of protection and the system of 
fortifications, fire and obstacles and having determined the 
enemy's strong and weak points, the commander uncovers the 
probable nature (concept) of his operations as the company 
(battalion) performs the mission. 
  The company (battalion) commander draws conclusions based on 
a detailed, comprehensive analysis of the enemy and the probable 
nature of his operations: what enemy is ahead of the company 
(battalion) and the probable nature of his operations; where the 
main body of the enemy grouping is whose destruction will 
sharply degrade his combat capabilities; the enemy's strong and 
weak points. 
  These conclusions enable the company (battalion) commander 
to 
determine the axis for concentrating main efforts (terrain 
sectors on whose holding the stability of the defense depends); 
what enemy to rout by what method and in what sequence; 
procedure for engaging the enemy by fire of organic and attached 
weapons; company (battalion) battle formation; combat missions 
for subunits; principal questions of coordination and the 
procedure for comprehensive support of battle; and on what to 
perform final reconnaissance and by what time. 
  In addition, the commander determines tasks for political 
work based on the enemy estimate. 
  The company (battalion) commander formalizes results of the 
enemy estimate on his working map. On it are plotted the 
position of mechanized infantry and tank subunits down to 
platoon (platoon strongpoints), artillery firing positions, 
command posts and other elements of the enemy battle formation 
and also possible directions and lines of counterattacks and 
commitment of follow- on forces in the defense, makeup and time 
periods for moving to them, and locations of radars, individual 
weapons and AT weapons (tanks, ATGM's, machineguns and so on). 
  Estimate of friendly subunits. Friendly subunits 
are understood to mean organic, attached and supporting subunits. 
  Like that of the enemy, a correct estimate of friendly 
troops 
is of great importance for decisionmaking, since its primary 
purpose is to determine combat capabilities of organic and 
attached company (battalion) subunits, determine their political 
attitude and morale, and find the best ways of using them to 
perform the assigned mission. 
  The company (battalion) commander as a rule will have 
exhaustive data on his own subunits. 
  According to requirements of manuals, in estimating friendly 
troops the company (battalion) commander studies the makeup, 
position, status, capabilities, degree of protection and state 
of supply of his own, attached and supporting subunits. 
  The company (battalion) commander draws individual 
conclusions in studying each element of the estimate of friendly 
subunits. For example, in studying the strength level, the 
battalion commander concludes that one of the companies suffered 
the greatest losses in battle and must be brought up to strength 
or moved to the second echelon. 
  The company (battalion) commander usually estimates friendly 
troops in the following sequence: initially he analyzes the 
position of organic and attached subunits, then studies their 
makeup and finally determines their combat capabilities for 
performing upcoming missions. 
  In estimating the position of friendly troops the company 
(battalion) commander studies the position of company 
(battalion) subunits with respect to the enemy and the nature of 
their actions (attacking, defending, located in an area, on the 
march); distance of subunits from the planned line of departure 
(defense area) and time needed for their forward movement; 
location, nature of actions, and time and areas of arrival of 
attached subunits, and time for changing the areas (positions) 
they occupy. 
  In the process of estimating the makeup and status of 
friendly subunits the commander analyzes the table of 
organization structure of the company (battalion), whether or 
not all organic subunits are present and, if not, where they are 
now and when they will arrive; makeup of attached subunits; 
political attitude, morale and physical condition of personnel 
and the condition of weapons and combat vehicles; training level 
and combat experience of subunits; and organizing abilities of 
subunit commanders. 
  In estimating the state of supply of friendly troops the 
commander determines the company (battalion) state of supply of 
material resources and time periods for establishing their 
reserves in subunits; norms of expenditure of material resources 
and requirements for them for performing the combat mission; 
organization of delivery and evacuation; and technical and 
logistic support. 
  In estimating combat capabilities of friendly subunits the 
company (battalion) commander determines artillery capabilities 
for engaging enemy objectives from indirect firing positions and 
for destroying tanks, ATGM's and other weapons; capabilities of 
air defense weapons for combating airborne targets; and 
capabilities of motorized rifle and tank subunits for 
establishing a superiority over the enemy in penetrating his 
defense (repelling assaults ahead of the FEBA). 
  Based on the estimate of the enemy and friendly troops, the 
company (battalion) commander performs a 
quantitative-qualitative analysis of their makeup, political 
attitude, morale and combat capabilities, and with consideration 
of this determines the absolute and quantitative-qualitative 
status of the sides' forces. 
  A comprehensive estimate of friendly troops permits the 
company (battalion) commander to draw conclusions about the 
general status, degree of protection and combat effectiveness of 
subordinate subunits; whether or not their position conforms to 
the nature of the combat mission received, whether or not a 
regrouping is necessary and time required for this; where to 
concentrate main company (battalion) efforts; how to align the 
battle formation and distribute forces and assets; what combat 
missions to assign subunits based on their capabilities; what 
main questions of organizing coordination and of comprehensive 
support of battle to plan; and how to organize C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Estimate of adjacent subunits. Adjacent subunits 
customarily are understood to mean subunits operating on flanks 
(on the right, on the left) and in front, or which are in the 
rear, but operate on the company (battalion) axis in the course 
of battle. 
  The main goal of estimating adjacent subunits is to 
determine 
their influence on company (battalion) performance of the 
assigned mission and to detail the procedure for joint 
operations with them to rout the enemy. 
  In estimating adjacent subunits the company (battalion) 
commander studies the makeup, position, and nature of actions of 
adjacent subunits and conditions of coordination with them. In 
estimating the nature of their actions the commander determines 
what they are doing as of the moment he makes the decision for 
battle and what maneuver they will execute in preparing to 
perform assigned combat missions. 
  In estimating conditions of coordination with adjacent 
subunits the commander determines how those subunits will 
contribute to routing the enemy; what assistance must be given 
them in performing combat missions; what maneuver of forces and 
assets to execute to exploit possible success of adjacent 
subunits; what measures to take to secure flanks; and what 
procedure of coordination with adjacent subunits to provide for 
in routing the enemy. 
  The company (battalion) commander can draw the following 
conclusions from the estimate of adjacent subunits: how actions 
of adjacent subunits influence performance of missions; where it 
is advisable to concentrate main efforts and what enemy must be 
routed in coordination with adjacent subunits; what enemy 
targets (objectives) to engage by company (battalion) weapons on 
flanks with adjacent subunits; alignment of the battle 
formation; with which adjacent subunits coordination should be 
organized most closely in routing which enemy and on what 
questions; what assistance to give adjacent subunits in joint 
destruction of the enemy; what maneuver of forces and assets to 
provide for to exploit possible success of adjacent subunits; 
what data must be additionally received from adjacent subunits 
and what questions must be coordinated in the interests of 
maintaining coordination and communications with them in the 
course of battle; how to support commitment of the second 
echelon and coordinate actions with it; and the procedure for 
passing company (battalion) subunits through battle formations 
of subunits operating in front. 
  Terrain estimate. The company (battalion) 
commander studies the terrain to determine its influence on 
combat employment of friendly and enemy troops. As a result of 
its study he determines the extent to which terrain helps the 
enemy organize and conduct a defense and helps our attack. 
  In estimating the situation it is necessary to study the 
nature of terrain and its influence on subunit operations and 
also to study the most likely axes of operations of enemy 
aircraft and helicopters and other airborne targets flying at 
low and extremely low altitudes. 
  The following methodology for studying terrain has been 
developed in troop practice. Initially terrain is estimated in 
the enemy disposition, then in the friendly troop disposition. 
Before beginning the terrain estimate the company (battalion) 
commander carefully studies changes which occurred on the 
terrain compared with the map as a result of the opposing sides' 
use of nuclear weapons. 
  Then the terrain usually is estimated in the following 
sequence: general nature of terrain; conditions for observation, 
fire, maskirovka and disposition; conditions of trafficability 
and protective features; and changes which may occur as a result 
of the use of nuclear weapons and in the course of battle. 
  In studying the general nature of terrain the battalion 
commander identifies the following: type of relief, local 
features, hydrography, and degree of ruggedness and 
observability; favorable lines for enemy defense and lines whose 
taking creates conditions for successful development of the 
attack by our troops. 
  In estimating conditions of observation, fire, maskirovka 
and 
disposition the company (battalion) commander determines the 
following: commanding heights and other places for observation; 
natural screens, cover, and favorable areas for disposing 
elements of the battle formation, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
rear subunits; favorable lines for deployment, departure, 
repulse (delivery) of counterattacks, and remote minelaying; 
conditions of maskirovka; probable axes of operations of enemy 
aircraft, helicopters and other airborne targets at low and 
extremely low altitudes, and so on. 
  In studying trafficability conditions and protective 
features 
of terrain, the commander determines the following: presence and 
status of roads and maneuver, supply and evacuation routes; 
nature of soil and off-road terrain passability; nature of 
natural obstacles; presence of water obstacles and engineering 
structures on them whose destruction can hamper operations of 
company (battalion) subunits, and so on. 
  In studying the terrain the commander forecasts changes 
which 
may occur as a result of the use of nuclear and incendiary 
weapons, destruction of dams, fires, flooding, torrential rains, 
snowstorms and so on. 
  As a result of the terrain estimate the company (battalion) 
commander determines the following: how the terrain influences 
employment of different combat arms and performance of the 
combat mission; most accessible axes for operations of friendly 
and enemy troops and where, based on this, it would be advisable 
to concentrate main efforts (and on the defense in addition, he 
determines terrain areas on whose holding stability of the 
defense depends); enemy objectives for engagement by fire of 
conventional weapons (artillery from indirect firing positions, 
tanks, ATGM's, AT weapons, grenade launchers and machineguns); 
how to align the battle formation and where to place its 
elements, support subunits and COP, and the direction of COP 
displacement; lines of immediate and subsequent missions of 
subunits (in the defense, locations of company and platoon 
strongpoints); second echelon commitment lines (in the defense, 
lines of firing positions, axes and lines of deployment for 
counterattacks); and sectors for forcing water obstacles. He 
also draws conclusions relating to questions of coordination, 
comprehensive support of battle and organization of political 
work. 
  NBC situation estimate. The NBC situation is 
understood to mean the situation which has arisen with use of 
mass destruction weapons as a result of contamination of 
terrain, air, personnel, equipment and various installations by 
radioactive substances, chemical agents and bacteriological 
warfare agents. The NBC situation estimate is made to identify 
its effect on subunits' combat effectiveness and determine 
advisable directions and methods of their operations, and to 
outline basic measures for protecting personnel against mass 
destruction weapons. 
  The NBC situation estimate is made on the basis of 
reconnaissance, forecasting and radiological monitoring data. 
Results of a forecast of the radiological and chemical situation 
in the area of operations usually are announced to the battalion 
commander by the regimental staff. 
  In estimating the scale and nature of NBC contamination of 
terrain, the company (battalion) commander determines the 
following: kinds, time, method and means of contamination of the 
company (battalion) disposition area and axis of attack; 
boundaries and nature of zones of radioactive contamination and 
how they can change by the beginning of company (battalion) 
subunit operations in them; type of chemical agents, boundaries 
of areas, duration of contamination, and depth of spread of 
contaminated air; kind of contagious disease pathogens; 
boundaries of contaminated areas; what subunits have entered 
(will enter) the zone of contamination and destructive damage; 
and levels of contamination. 
  In estimating the nature of the effect of contamination on 
company (battalion) subunits and possible consequences, the 
commander determines the following: possible radiation doses of 
personnel from radioactive substances (counting those received 
previously); possible degree of personnel injury by chemical and 
bacterial warfare agents; degree of contamination of 
communications equipment, weapons, supplies and water; possible 
personnel losses from contamination; and the need for performing 
decontamination (partial and complete). 
  As a result of the NBC situation estimate the company 
(battalion) commander usually draws the following conclusions: 
how the NBC situation can affect subunits' combat effectiveness 
and performance of the combat mission; measures for mopping up 
in the aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction weapons and 
for restoring subunit combat effectiveness; what instructions on 
protection must be issued in the given situation and to whom; 
the safest axis (area) for subunit operations and, in connection 
with this, where it is advisable to specify the axis for 
concentrating main efforts (in the defense in addition, also 
terrain sectors on whose holding stability of the defense 
depends); what enemy to rout, by what method and in what 
sequence based on the existing NBC situation; procedure for 
engaging the enemy by fire of organic and attached weapons; what 
battle formation to have and where to place it; and combat 
missions of subunits. He also outlines the main questions of 
coordination and the procedure for comprehensive support of 
battle, and determines organization of C[.sup]2[/], the 
method of crossing a contaminated area and tasks for political 
work. 
  In addition, in the situation estimate the company 
(battalion) commander takes into account the state of weather 
and time of year and day, since these factors have a very great 
influence on troop combat operations, especially with an abrupt 
change of weather, without knowledge and consideration of which 
it is impossible to make a substantiated decision. 
  Making the decision. The essence of the company 
(battalion) commander's work in this stage of decisionmaking 
consists of comparing conclusions drawn from individual elements 
(questions) of the decision (in the course of analyzing the 
mission, estimating the situation and making tactical 
calculations) for the purpose of final determination and 
formulation of component elements of the decision. The decision 
should not only conform to the real situation, but also contain 
elements of creativeness, aggressiveness, reasonable risk and 
use of operating methods unknown to the enemy, i.e., everything 
that ensures routing the enemy with a minimum expenditure of 
forces and in the shortest possible time. 
  The company (battalion) commander usually begins making and 
formulating the decision by determining the commander's concept. 
In the course of analyzing the mission and estimating the 
situation, he draws appropriate conclusions for each element of 
the commander's concept. Conclusions drawn from analyzing the 
mission and estimating the situation may be identical for some 
elements of the concept. Consequently, the commander could 
determine these elements of the concept once and for all back in 
the process of estimating the situation. Conclusions may be 
contradictory for other elements of the concept. For final 
determination of these elements the commander needs to compare 
the conclusions he drew previously and choose the most advisable 
one. 
  Thus, final determination of all or some elements of the 
decision is the concluding stage of the commander's work of 
decisionmaking. 
  Formalization of the decision. As the decision is 
made, the battalion commander together with the chief of staff 
(and the company commander independently) plots everything on 
the map that can be depicted graphically. As a rule, the 
following is plotted on the map: enemy battle formation; axis 
for concentrating main efforts (in the defense in addition, 
terrain sectors on whose holding the stability of the defense 
depends); company (battalion) missions, missions of adjacent 
subunits and boundary with them, and weapon missions to be 
performed by forces and assets of senior chiefs; missions of 
subordinate subunits and the methods and time periods for their 
performance; COP locations of battalion and companies and 
directions of their displacement. In addition, basic questions 
of coordination, C[.sup]2[/] and support of battle are 
reflected on the map. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-30A>      Figure </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-31A>      Figure </FIG>


  In addition to the graphic part, tables are drawn up on the 
working map which may show means of reinforcement, distribution 
and ratio of forces and assets, their densities and other 
matters. 
  Thus, by the moment decisionmaking work is done the 
commander 
has a plan of company (battalion) actions which has formed in 
his mind once and for all and is graphically displayed on the 
map. Now he can brief his decision to the senior commander, 
announce it to deputies and staff officers (subordinate 
commanders), and perform ground reconnaissance, issue the 
operation order and organize coordination. 
  Assignment of combat missions to subordinates is 
done by various methods depending on specific situation 
conditions. If sufficient time is available the company 
(battalion) commander issues a verbal operation order. Combat 
missions as a rule are communicated by verbal operational 
instructions or warning orders in organizing for battle in a 
short time, especially in the course of battle. 
  The battalion commander's verbal operation order must be 
entered in a workbook by the battalion chief of staff or his 
deputy. The order is not duplicated. 
  In operational instructions the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: conclusions from 
the enemy estimate; objectives to be engaged by the senior 
commander's weapons in support of the platoon (company); the 
combat mission and readiness time for executing it. If necessary 
the operational instructions may indicate missions of adjacent 
subunits and other data. 
  In a warning order the company (battalion) 
commander usually indicates the following: information on the 
enemy; objectives to be engaged by the senior commander's 
weapons in support of the platoon (company); the combat mission 
with a degree of detailing corresponding to the decision made by 
the senior commander as of the time the warning order was 
issued; readiness time and basic measures of preparing for 
battle; time and methods of communicating missions, and other 
data. 
  Organization of coordination is an important 
measure taken by the company (battalion) commander in organizing 
for battle. Coordination is organized by missions, time, place 
and possible options of operations. 
  The company (battalion) commander organizes coordination 
with 
the participation of his deputies and the commanders of platoons 
(companies) and attached subunits. As a rule, it is organized on 
the terrain to the depth of visibility, or on a terrain model 
(map) to the full depth of the combat mission received. 
  Coordination may be organized by two methods: by the method 
of reports by subordinate subunit commanders on the procedure 
for their subunits' operations in performing assigned missions, 
with a run-through of the main tactical episodes; and by the 
method of commander's instructions. This method usually is used 
when battle is being organized in an extremely limited time. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
has to coordinate efforts of organic, attached and supporting 
subunits in performing the assigned mission; achieve uniform 
understanding by all commanders of the goal of battle, combat 
missions and methods of their performance; and outline and 
coordinate options of subunit operations and measures for 
deceiving the enemy which take account of the possible nature of 
enemy operations. The company (battalion) commander also is 
obligated to indicate warning, control, coordination, mutual 
recognition and target designation signals. During battle 
coordination is accomplished continuously, is constantly 
updated, and is organized anew with abrupt situation changes and 
when a new decision is being made. 
  In organizing C[.sup]2[/], the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: places and time 
of deployment of COP's of the company (battalion) and attached 
subunits and the procedure for their displacement in the course 
of battle; procedure for maintaining communications and radio 
traffic, and methods and time periods for submitting reports; 
degree of engineer preparation of COP's and procedure for their 
security. 
Footnotes 
  1. See N. Alekseyev, "Oskolkom oborvannaya zhizn" [A Life 
Cut 
Short by a Fragment], Moscow, Politizdat, 1978, pp 72-74. 
<H5>  Chapter IV - The Defense </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of Defensive Battle </H5>
  As one of the basic kinds of battle, the defense arose 
simultaneously with the offense. Upgrading of existing weapons 
and appearance of new ones, a change of troop organization, and 
defenders' use of new means of warfare increase subunit combat 
capabilities, give the defense new features, make it more stable 
and active, and change the kinds of defense and methods of 
operations of subunits and units. On the other hand, an 
attacking enemy also uses modern weapons and combat vehicles 
permitting him to deliver powerful, precise strikes to a 
considerable depth and create breaches in the defense in a short 
time. In developing new and upgrading existing methods of 
attack, the enemy pays special attention to achieving surprise, 
creating a decisive superiority in forces and assets, and 
delivering massed strikes. Reliance is placed above all on 
precision weapon systems, by which it is proposed to inflict 
damage on defending subunits and units in a short time to the 
full depth of their battle formation. For timely exploitation of 
results of fire damage, the enemy envisages decisive operations 
of attacking subunits and units from the front in combination 
with wide use of aviation, airborne assault forces and EW assets. 
  Under present conditions defenders will have to repel 
assaults of an enemy who has a superiority of 5-6 times in 
personnel and combat vehicles. As a result, the defense must 
successfully withstand a powerful enemy attack and support the 
repulse of massed air and precision weapon strikes and the 
assaults of his tanks and mechanized infantry. 
  A defense may be occupied on a deliberate or forced basis to 
perform these missions. Subunits or units shift to the defense 
deliberately when more active (offensive), decisive operations 
are inadvisable, and on a forced basis as a result of a 
situation that has shaped up unfavorably. In addition, it may be 
prepared in advance before the beginning of combat operations or 
organized in the course of battle. At the beginning of a war the 
defense will be the most prevalent kind of battle. 
  Inasmuch as defenders are inferior to the attacking enemy in 
forces and assets, the possibility of repelling his attack 
largely is determined by the ability of subunit and unit 
commanders to take advantage of strong aspects of the defense. 
  Defending subunits above all must skillfully use the 
terrain's protective features, since they choose the place of 
battle. For this it is important that positions, trenches and 
strongpoints be disposed where possible behind natural barriers, 
on slopes, on commanding heights and in other terrain sectors 
affording a good field of view and fire toward the enemy to 
maximum range of their weapons. Natural barriers in themselves 
hamper operations not only of mechanized infantry, but also of 
tanks. 
  Occupation of lines favorable for defense, use of the 
terrain's protective features and its skillful engineer 
preparation also considerably reduce the effectiveness of enemy 
employment of nuclear and conventional weapons, including 
precision weapons. For example, just the simplest foxholes 
reduce subunit losses from nuclear weapons by approximately 
three times, and losses from artillery fire by seven or more 
times. 
  Weapons possess comparatively greater capabilities in the 
defense than in the offense. For example, in the war years 
neutralizing an enemy battalion attacking in dismounted 
formation and inflicting 20-30 percent losses on it (forcing it 
to give up the attack) required using three artillery battalions 
and expending 0.3-0.4 unit of fire, but inflicting the very same 
losses on a battalion in the defense with engineer preparation 
required at least nine artillery battalions and their 
expenditure of the entire unit of fire. 
  Having modern weapons, defending subunits and units are 
capable of delivering preemptive strikes against the most 
important enemy objectives in concentration areas, on routes of 
advance and on lines of deployment for an assault. This permits 
inflicting considerable losses on him even before he arrives at 
the FEBA and deprives him of an opportunity for a simultaneous 
assault. 
  The possibility of wide, advance use of various obstacles, 
especially minefields, is an important advantage of defenders 
over attackers. They permit holding up or reducing the rate of 
forward movement, deployment and assault of tanks, IFV's and 
APC's and thereby increasing the effectiveness both of AT 
weapons as well as of artillery fire by several times. In 
addition, in crossing minefields the enemy will suffer losses 
not only in vehicles, but also in personnel. 
  Subunit maskirovka capabilities increase in the defense. By 
concealing the true and showing a false trace of trenches and 
the location of strongpoints, firing and other positions, and 
COP's, subunits force the enemy to deliver strikes against empty 
places or secondary objectives and expend a considerable number 
of artillery and mortar rounds and missiles. 
  Being on defense, subunit and unit personnel can study the 
terrain in detail, create a system of trenches, strongpoints and 
firing positions both at the first position as well as in the 
depth, and thoroughly organize fire. Commanders can provide for 
the maneuver of forces and assets, prepare routes of advance for 
counterattacks and lines of firing positions, create a flexible 
C[.sup]2[/] system, supply subunits with an additional amount 
of ammunition, and carry out maskirovka measures. Thus, 
defending subunits are capable of destroying a comparatively 
large amount of enemy personnel, tanks and other armored 
vehicles and repelling his assaults with fewer forces. 
  The principal goal of the defense is to repel an attack by 
superior enemy forces, inflict maximum losses in personnel, 
weapons and vehicles, hold important terrain areas (objectives) 
and thereby create favorable conditions for launching an attack. 
  Ways of achieving the goal of defense can be as 
follows. 
  First of all, by engaging above all the main enemy 
grouping by fire of all weapons (combat helicopters, artillery, 
mortars, tanks, BMP's, small arms) both during forward movement, 
deployment and the assault on the FEBA as well as when he 
penetrates into the depth of the defense. 
  Thus, a battalion can engage the enemy by mortar fire 5-6 km 
from the FEBA and conduct a successful fight against armored 
vehicles at distances of 3 km from the FEBA by the fire of 
tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and ATGM's. 
  Secondly, the goal of the defense is achieved by a 
broad maneuver of fire, forces and assets. War experience showed 
that the defender countered an attack by an enemy of superior 
strength not only by stubborn resistance at occupied positions, 
but also by a broad maneuver of fire, forces and assets. 
  For example, in the Battle of Kursk on 7 July 1943 the 
Germans concentrated up to two infantry battalions and six tanks 
for the next assault in front of the center of the sector of 
151st Rifle Regiment, 8th Rifle Division. Executing a maneuver 
of trajectories, subunits of 476th Mortar Regiment and a guards 
rocket launcher battalion disrupted the enemy's intentions with 
massed fire and his assault did not take place.[.sup]1[/] 
  Thirdly, the goal of the defense is achieved by 
firmly holding important terrain areas, among which are areas 
which include tactically favorable sectors with natural barriers 
intercepting probable axes of enemy attack. Without a tenacious 
defense of such areas it is impossible to ensure effective fire 
against the enemy and execution of a bold, swift maneuver. 
Meanwhile, holding such terrain sectors permits immobilizing the 
attacker and creating favorable conditions for engaging the 
enemy by fire of all weapons and destroying him by a 
counterattack. 
  And fourthly and finally, the goal of the defense 
is achieved by skillful destruction of an enemy who has wedged 
into its depth. 
  Based on this, the essence of the defense lies in repelling 
the attack of superior enemy forces by inflicting damage on him 
by air strikes and fire of all weapons, with wide use of 
obstacles ahead of the FEBA and in the depth in combination with 
a maneuver of fire, forces and assets and decisive 
counterattacks, with the simultaneous tenacious holding of 
important (key) positions and terrain areas, thereby creating 
favorable conditions for launching an attack. 
  Subunits may shift to the defense under different situation 
conditions. The latter should be understood to mean the 
aggregate of factors of the combat situation in which the 
defense is prepared and a transition is made to it. Such factors 
are the position, the status and nature of terrain, time of year 
and day, state of weather and so on. 
  The position of subunits with respect to the enemy is a 
deciding condition for shifting to the defense. Depending on 
this and the mission received, a company (battalion) may shift 
to the defense in advance before the beginning of combat 
operations or the shift may be organized in the course of 
battle, out of contact with the enemy or in direct contact with 
him. An advance shift of subunits to the defense may be carried 
out both in peacetime as well as wartime. A shift to the defense 
in peacetime will be accomplished to cover border areas and 
repel an enemy invasion. 
  For example, subunits of 715th Rifle Regiment, 122nd Rifle 
Division shifted to the defense to cover our country's northern 
border in one of its sectors. They cut two roads leading from 
Kotala and Kelloselka to Kuola-Yarvi several days before 
the 
beginning of the war.[.sup]2[/] This permitted completing 
construction of the main defensive zone by the beginning of the 
enemy attack. 
  An advance shift to the defense in the course of war may 
occur where an attack is inadvisable or impossible for a number 
of reasons and situation conditions (on secondary and 
hard-to-reach axes, on a seacoast, on islands and in other 
cases). Under the given conditions subunits shift to a defense 
out of direct contact with the enemy. Subunits which are part of 
followon forces of units and formations in the deep rear of 
defending troops also may shift to the defense out of contact 
with him. 
  Under such conditions in particular subunits of 1075th Rifle 
Regiment, 316th Rifle Division shifted to the defense in the 
decisive period of the Battle of Moscow. Not having direct 
contact with the enemy, they prepared the occupied areas for 
four days beginning on 12 October 1941.[.sup]3[/] 
  The possibility of shifting to the defense out of contact 
with the enemy even in the course of an attack is not precluded. 
For example, on 26 October 1944 17th Rifle Division was 
successfully attacking in East Prussia. On the evening of that 
same day reconnaissance reported an imminent counterstrike by 
enemy reserves. To mislead him and create favorable conditions 
for the division main body to shift to the defense, the division 
commander ordered one company of each battalion to continue the 
attack and the main body to shift to the defense on a favorable 
line.[.sup]4[/] 
  As Great Patriotic War experience shows, subunits' shift to 
the defense in direct contact with the enemy will occur most 
often in the course of an attack when repelling counterattacks 
of superior enemy forces, consolidating captured lines, securing 
flanks of attacking troops, or with an unsuccessful outcome of a 
meeting battle. 
  Thus, in November 1943 the enemy tried for two days to halt 
an attack by subunits of 1147th Rifle Regiment, 353rd Rifle 
Division southwest of Dnepropetrovsk by counterattacks. All 
enemy counterattacks were successfully repelled, but on 5 
November the power of the enemy counterattacks rose and subunits 
shifted to the defense to repel them.[.sup]5[/] 
  The shift of subunits to the defense also is possible with 
an 
unsuccessful outcome of a meeting battle. This also is shown by 
the past war's experience. Thus, on 1 August 1944 a meeting 
battle occurred in the vicinity of Iodzhimyay during which 
subunits of 729th Rifle Regiment, 145th Rifle Division routed up 
to an enemy battalion and took the populated point. But during 
subsequent attacks they encountered strong resistance of the 
enemy, who counterattacked 729th Rifle Regiment subunits with 
forces of up to two battalions with 12 tanks and supported by 
the fire of three artillery battalions. By this time four 
infantry battalions already were operating against the regiment. 
The subunits were forced to hold up the attack and shift to the 
defense.[.sup]6[/] 
  In the course of an attack subunits and units often will 
have 
to force water obstacles and seize and hold bridgeheads. Great 
Patriotic War experience showed that battles for bridgeheads 
were characterized by high activeness on the enemy's part. 
  Thus, after forcing the Tisza River in the vicinity of 
Mehesz 
on the night of 27/28 October 1944, 4th Rifle Company of 795th 
Regiment took up a defense 200- 300 m from the water obstacle. 
The enemy repeatedly assaulted the defending subunit with forces 
of up to two infantry companies supported by artillery and 
mortar fire, but all his attempts to eliminate the bridgehead 
failed.[.sup]7[/] 
  Shifting to the defense in direct contact with the enemy is 
exceptionally difficult. This is determined by the fact that as 
a rule the defense will be organized under enemy fire in a short 
time, not always on a favorable line and as a rule on a line 
without engineer preparation. Subunits will have to perform 
several missions simultaneously: conduct a fire fight with a 
defending or counterattacking enemy, repel his air strikes, take 
steps to mop up in the aftermath of enemy use of nuclear, 
chemical and precision weapons and of fire strikes, reorganize 
the battle formation, replenish reserves of ammunition, fuel and 
other supplies, and organize the battle, the system of fire, and 
engineer preparation of occupied positions and strongpoints. 
  In addition, the situation also will be complicated by being 
understrength in personnel, weapons, vehicles and supplies 
caused by losses in the course of the attack. 
  Often it will be necessary to improve subunits' positions by 
battle or shift to the defense at the line which has been 
reached. In the first instance the need arises to destroy the 
opposing enemy by an attack, capture the line indicated for 
defense, consolidate on it, then shift to the defense. In some 
cases subunits will be forced to withdraw to the most favorable 
line. 
  In shifting to the defense out of contact with the enemy, 
subunits may have greater time for preparing the defense and 
better conditions for studying terrain ahead of the FEBA and in 
the depth of their defense, selecting more favorable positions 
and strongpoints with consideration of natural barriers, 
aligning the battle formation, organizing the system of fire and 
maneuver, and making wide use of engineer vehicles and 
improvised materials for preparing positions. 
  Meanwhile, absence of direct contact with the enemy does not 
preclude the possibility of his exerting an effect on subunits 
shifting to the defense by means of artillery, MLRS, aviation, 
raiding and reconnaissance parties, and precision weapons. This 
in turn requires taking measures for preparing the defense with 
observance of measures of maskirovka, security and protection. 
  Combat experience shows it is very difficult to shift to the 
defense during the day, especially in direct contact with the 
enemy. In this case the subunits' success is determined by the 
speed of their actions in taking the indicated line, timely 
assignment of missions to subordinates, organization of 
observation, a system of fire and engineer preparation, and 
skillful use of terrain relief and smoke in combination with 
fire damage of the enemy. In this period special attention 
should be given to destroying enemy AT weapons, helicopters and 
aircraft, and steps should be taken for protection against 
nuclear and fire strikes, including by precision weapons. 
  The most favorable conditions are created when shifting to 
the defense at night, under other conditions of limited 
visibility, and on terrain offering concealment. The nighttime 
and limited visibility (snowfall, fog, heavy rain and so on) 
reduce activeness of operations by enemy ground troops and 
aviation; in addition, at night the depth to which he conducts 
reconnaissance by observation and the effectiveness of fire is 
reduced considerably and conditions improve for performing 
engineer work. At the same time, selection of terrain sectors 
suitable for the defense is hampered, which necessitates 
updating positions and strongpoints with the arrival of dawn and 
updating conditions for organizing the system of fire. 
  The influence of these and other conditions should be taken 
into account by the subunit commander in organizing and 
conducting defensive battle. In launching an attack, the enemy 
may employ nuclear, chemical and precision weapons, airborne 
assault forces, airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance 
subunits, a large number of tanks, IFV's, APC's and aircraft 
(helicopters), and the massed fire of artillery, mortars and 
other weapons; he may remotely mine terrain to a considerable 
depth; and finally, he may assault swiftly with superior forces. 
In order to withstand the strikes of all these kinds of enemy 
weapons, repel his massed assaults and hold occupied areas 
(lines), the defense must be impregnable. Impregnable means 
stable and active, capable of withstanding strikes by all kinds 
of weapons and an assault by large masses of enemy tanks and 
infantry and conducting an active fight against his airborne 
assault forces and airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance 
parties. In addition, the defense must be antitank, antiaircraft 
and antilanding, deeply echeloned, and ready for lengthy battle 
under conditions of enemy use of mass destruction and precision 
weapons and EW assets. 
  Impregnability of the defense is achieved by tenacity, 
staunchness, determination and high morale of defending troops; 
continuous reconnaissance of the enemy and timely discovery of 
his preparation for an attack and of possible axes of attack; 
thorough maskirovka of the battle formation and misleading the 
enemy regarding the defense alignment and the concept of 
operations; skillful, varied defense alignment; skillful use of 
favorable terrain conditions and its engineer preparation; 
creation of a carefully organized system of fire, especially AT 
fire, in combination with systems of engineer obstacles, 
strongpoints and firing positions; reliable air defense; a 
timely maneuver of units (subunits), weapons and fire to 
threatened axes; immediate destruction of an enemy who has 
penetrated the defense and of his assault forces which have 
landed; use of unexpected tactics in the defense that are 
capable of stunning the enemy, placing him in a difficult 
situation and imposing one's will and initiative on him; 
constant fulfillment of measures for protection against enemy 
mass destruction and precision weapons; and tenacious, lengthy 
holding of defense areas (strongpoints) in combination with 
participation in conducting counterattacks. 
  Counterattacks are conducted under favorable conditions to 
destroy an enemy who has penetrated the defense or to take a 
line favorable for defense. Stability should be understood to 
mean the capability of withstanding powerful enemy strikes by 
all kinds of weapons, repelling an attack by his superior 
forces, holding occupied positions, strongpoints and important 
terrain areas and destroying the enemy in case he penetrates. 
Subunits must defend occupied positions tenaciously and hold 
them under all circumstances, even out of tactical contact with 
adjacent subunits and under conditions of total encirclement. A 
tenacious defense is a matter of the defenders' honor. They do 
not have the right to leave occupied positions and withdraw 
without an order of the senior commander. Successful performance 
of this mission depends on the subunit personnel's morale and 
fighting qualities, staunchness and determination, efficiency 
and firm military discipline, excellent combat proficiency and 
the desire to perform the assigned mission no matter what 
without sparing themselves. A deep alignment of the battle 
formation; a skillfully created system of fire, especially AT 
fire, in combination with obstacles; skillful engineer 
preparation of occupied positions, strongpoints and areas; and a 
ground-based air defense--all this also contributes to tenacious 
holding of defended positions. 
  Impregnability of a defense is inconceivable without its 
activeness. The defense will be active when the 
attacking enemy is constantly engaged by fire of all weapons on 
distant approaches to it during forward movement, deployment, 
and ahead of the FEBA, in the course of repelling an assault, 
and also in the depth of the defense in case the enemy 
penetrates. A maneuver of forces, assets and fire is the basis 
of activeness of the defense. A maneuver executed covertly, 
suddenly and swiftly permits placing friendly subunits in the 
most favorable position and inflicting decisive damage on a 
numerically superior enemy with fewer forces. It stands to 
reason that activeness of the defense is impossible without 
firmly holding defended positions. 
  Consequently, activeness of the defense consists of 
continuous engagement of the enemy by all available means, 
imposing one's will on him, creating unfavorable conditions for 
the attack, and conducting a broad maneuver of fire in all 
stages of battle. 
  It is common knowledge that nuclear weapons possess the 
greatest destructive properties. Therefore the defense must be 
stable in the antinuclear sense, i.e., possess the capability of 
withstanding nuclear weapon strikes and preserve the necessary 
number of forces and assets for repelling enemy assaults. This 
problem is solved in subunits basically by dispersal of elements 
of the battle formation, skilled use of terrain and its engineer 
preparation. 
  In the course of an attack the enemy also will employ tanks 
en masse for penetrating the defense. Great Patriotic War 
experience also attests to this. 
  Based on experience of the past war and local wars, the 
fight 
against tanks and other armored vehicles in the defense today 
acquires priority importance. Therefore it also has to be an 
antitank defense, capable of withstanding massed tank assaults 
and destroying them both ahead of the FEBA as well as in the 
depth of the subunits' defense. This is achieved by skillful use 
of the terrain's protective properties and its engineer 
preparation, skilled alignment of the defense, skillful 
organization of fire, especially of AT weapons, and creation of 
a system of obstacles in combination with natural barriers. 
  The defense can be positional or mobile 
depending on the mission received, combat capabilities of 
subunits and units, nature of terrain and extent of its engineer 
preparation, and the selected method of conducting battle. 
  The positional defense is the basic kind of 
defense. It most fully meets the principal objective of the 
defense and is conducted by inflicting maximum losses on the 
enemy ahead of the FEBA and in its depth. A positional defense 
is based on holding a number of defensive positions established 
by subunits within limits of occupied areas for a certain time, 
making maximum use of subunits' fire capabilities, and fullest 
possible engineer preparation of terrain. 
  The basic method of conducting a positional defense is to 
destroy the enemy by fire of all weapons as he approaches the 
FEBA and stubbornly hold tactically favorable terrain areas 
prepared for defense. A positional defense is used on the 
majority of axes, above all where loss of territory is 
impermissible. 
  The mobile defense is conducted to inflict losses 
on the enemy, gain time and preserve friendly forces by 
successive defensive battles at preplanned lines echeloned in 
depth in combination with brief counterattacks, wide use of fire 
ambushes, and organization of obstacles and the demolition of 
important installations. 
  It should be noted that as a rule a battalion conducts a 
positional defense. In individual cases it may participate in a 
mobile defense or may conduct it independently when assigned to 
defend a security zone. 
  The mobile defense allows abandoning certain areas of the 
territory and can be used for repelling an enemy invasion and 
when conducting battle in a security zone. 
  At each line the battalion occupies a defense area in which 
separate company and platoon strongpoints are established 
intercepting the most likely axes of enemy advance and helping 
to hold favorable terrain sectors. In the course of such a 
defense the battalion forces the enemy to advance in a direction 
in which a stable positional defense is prepared, or the enemy 
is drawn into an area providing favorable conditions for routing 
him by counterattacks. 
  As a rule a company (battalion) defends as part of the 
battalion (regiment) in coordination with adjacent subunits and 
with support of the senior commander's assets. A company 
(battalion) may occupy any place in the battalion (regimental) 
battle formation and perform various missions in the course of 
battle. 
  Based on this, a company (battalion) may be in the first or 
second echelon. When defending in the first echelon, depending 
on the mission received, a company (battalion) may defend on one 
of the flanks or in the center of the battle formation on the 
axis of concentration of battalion (regimental) main efforts. 
  In addition, a battalion (company) may make up a combined 
arms reserve or be in an antilanding reserve. A battalion 
(company) may receive a mission to operate in a security zone or 
at a forward position. During disengagement and withdrawal a 
battalion may be assigned to a rear guard and a company may be 
assigned to a rear (flank) security element or for operations as 
a covering- force subunit. 
  The company (battalion) role in the defense will depend on 
the place it occupies in the battle formation of the 
battalion (regiment) and the mission the company (battalion) is 
performing. The role of subunits will change constantly in the 
course of a defensive battle. Thus, in repelling an enemy 
assault ahead of the FEBA, a company (battalion) defending in 
the first echelon on the axis of concentration of battalion 
(regimental) main efforts will play the principal role in 
performing missions of the defense, since it will have to repel 
the assault of superior enemy forces, inflict significant losses 
on the enemy and hold the occupied area. 
  At the same time, a second echelon company (battalion) 
disposed in the depth of the defense is in readiness to perform 
assigned missions. Its role in this period primarily will be 
secondary. The company (battalion) begins to perform the primary 
role in case the enemy penetrates into the depth of the defense, 
since stability of defense not only of the battalion, but also 
of the regiment, depends on successful operations. 
  The content of missions to be performed and makeup of means 
of reinforcement are determined for a subunit depending on its 
role and place in the defense. 
  Thus, a mortar (artillery) battery, TP, AT subunit, grenade 
launcher subunit and combat engineer subunit may be attached to 
an MRC defending in the first echelon; an artillery battery, 
motorized rifle subunit and combat engineer subunit may be 
attached to a TC. 
  An artillery battery (an artillery battalion on the axis of 
concentration of main efforts) may be attached to the MRB (TB). 
In addition, a battalion may receive a TC (MRC), combat engineer 
platoon, AT subunit and air defense subunit as reinforcement. 
  In addition, a company (battalion) may be supported by an 
artillery battalion (battery) in the course of a defensive 
battle. 
  A first echelon company of the battalion defends a 
strongpoint in the first and second trenches with the mission of 
inflicting damage on the enemy by fire of all weapons and not 
permitting his penetration of the FEBA. 
  A first echelon battalion defends an area with the 
mission of repelling an enemy attack, destroying him ahead of 
the FEBA and when he has penetrated the defense at the first 
position, and also holding an important terrain area and 
creating favorable conditions for routing the enemy. 
  The tank battalion of an MRR as a rule is used for 
reinforcing the MRB's, and some of its forces are used in the 
combined arms reserve. It also may be in the second echelon. 
  The MRB of a TR as a rule is used for reinforcing the TB's. 
It also may operate independently, occupying a defense at the 
first position or in the security zone (at a forward position). 
  A second echelon company of the battalion has the 
mission of halting and under favorable conditions also 
destroying by counterattack enemy subunits which have penetrated 
the first and second trenches. A TC (BMP- equipped MRC) in 
addition may perform the mission of destroying enemy tanks by 
fire from lines of firing positions. 
  A second echelon battalion of the regiment 
occupies a defense at the second position, as a rule on an 
important axis. Its mission is to hold the occupied area firmly, 
reinforce (replace) first echelon subunits in case they lose 
combat effectiveness, execute counterattacks, and also destroy 
enemy airborne assault forces and airmobile subunits. A TB and 
BMP-equipped MRB in addition perform missions of repelling enemy 
tank assaults from lines of firing positions (by fire from in 
place). 
  A battalion making up the combined arms reserve 
occupies the indicated concentration area (defense area) and is 
in readiness to perform opportunity missions or to reinforce 
(replace) first echelon subunits in case they lose combat 
effectiveness. 
  A battalion assigned for defense in a security 
zone, operating as a forward detachment, has the mission of 
misleading the enemy regarding alignment of the first position, 
delaying the advance of his superior forces, forcing them to 
deploy prematurely and advance in a direction unfavorable for 
him, inflicting losses on him and winning time for preparing the 
defense. 
  A company (battalion) may defend at a forward position in 
case a security zone is not established. Such a position is 
established 4-6 km from the FEBA by decision of the senior 
commander to mislead the enemy regarding the trace of the 
forward edge and the defense alignment, prevent an enemy 
surprise attack on first echelon subunits, repel his 
reconnaissance in force and force him to deploy his main body 
prematurely. 
<H5>  2. Defense Alignment </H5>
  The company and battalion defense alignment (Diagram 2) 
includes the battle formation, system of strongpoints and firing 
positions, system of fire and system of engineer obstacles. All 
these elements represent a single whole and are mutually 
dependent. 
  In each specific case the defense alignment should conform 
to 
the commander's concept and take into account the nature of 
terrain and enemy operations. It should mislead the enemy 
regarding the trace and alignment of positions, battle formation 
and disposition of weapons, hamper his selection of targets of 
fire strikes, and thereby force him to deliver strikes against 
dummy, weakly occupied or unoccupied sectors. 
  The defense alignment as a whole should support growing 
opposition permitting prevention of enemy penetration of the 
defense area (strongpoint) and create conditions for his 
destruction. 
  The battle formation is the alignment of subunits 
for battle. it should correspond to the mission and concept of 
upcoming battle and ensure the following: defense stability and 
activeness; successful conduct of defensive battle both using 
only conventional weapons as well as using nuclear and other 
weapons; fullest use of subunits' combat capabilities for 
engaging the enemy during forward movement, deployment, and when 
launching an assault (or in the attack position [iskhodnoye 
polozheniye dlya nastupleniya]), when repelling an assault by 
his tanks and infantry ahead of the FEBA and destroying them 
during penetration of the defense area (strongpoint); least 
vulnerability of subunits to strikes by all kinds of weapons; 
maneuver of fire and subunits in the course of battle; maximum 
use of favorable and concealing properties of terrain; 
possibility of repelling enemy air strikes and destroying his 
airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance parties; and 
maintenance of continuous coordination and C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits. 
  The company (battalion) battle formation basically depends 
on 
its mission, importance of the defended axis, strength level of 
subunits, makeup of attached assets, size of the strongpoint 
(defense area), expected force and axes of enemy assaults, and 
nature of terrain. 
  The battle formation of the MRC (TC) is formed in one or two 
echelons (Diagram 3). 
  The company first echelon consists of MRP's (TP's) 
with means of reinforcement. It is intended for inflicting 
maximum damage on the enemy by fire of all weapons ahead of the 
FEBA and tenaciously holding important terrain sectors 
(objectives) on the FEBA. With a single echelon alignment of the 
company battle formation, it includes all MRP's (TP's) with 
means of reinforcement, and with its two-echelon alignment two 
platoons are assigned to the first echelon and one to the second. 
  The company second echelon is intended chiefly for 
firmly holding a strongpoint in the depth of the defense (in the 
second trench) and destroying an enemy who has penetrated. 
  Depending on the nature of terrain, platoons in a company 
strongpoint may be disposed in a reverse wedge or have an 
echelon or other disposition which provides best organization of 
the system of fire ahead of the front and on the strongpoint 
flanks. First echelon platoons are disposed at the first trench 
and the second echelon platoon at the second trench. 
  A battalion battle formation may be formed in two echelons 
or 
one echelon (Diagram 4). It consists of first echelon subunits, 
a second echelon or reserve, and weapons and subunits of 
reinforcement remaining directly subordinate to the battalion 
commander. In a single-echelon alignment of the battle formation 
a reserve is assigned made up of at least a platoon. Such an 
alignment usually is used with a shortage of forces and assets, 
on terrain difficult of access for enemy operations, in a 
defense in the second echelon or on another axis, and during 
battle in the security zone. 
  A battalion may have a varying disposition of companies 
depending on the mission to be performed and nature of terrain. 
One company may be moved forward or backward, forming a fire 
sack, and on open terrain be disposed in an echelon [left or 
right]. In all cases company strongpoints should be disposed so 
they intercept probable enemy axes of advance. 
  The first echelon of an MRB (TB) consists of MRC's 
(TC's) reinforced by tank (motorized rifle) subunits, ATGM's and 
combat engineer subunits. It is intended for destroying the 
enemy ahead of the FEBA and when he penetrates into its depth, 
firmly holding important terrain sectors and preventing a 
breakthrough of the occupied defense area. 
  With a single-echelon alignment of the battle formation, the 
first echelon may include all MRC's with their means of 
reinforcement, and with a two-echelon alignment it may include 
two companies. First echelon companies defend strongpoints at 
the first and second trenches. 
  The battalion second echelon is intended for 
defending a strongpoint in the depth of the defense with the 
mission of halting and under favorable conditions also 
destroying by counterattack an enemy who has penetrated the 
first and second trenches. A company usually is assigned to the 
second echelon; it defends a strongpoint at the third and 
sometimes also the fourth trench. 
  The battalion reserve (at least a platoon) 
occupies a concentration area in which it prepares a strongpoint 
for defense and is in readiness to perform opportunity missions. 
  The mortar (artillery) battery and grenade launcher subunit 
usually remain subordinate to the battalion commander and as a 
rule are employed at full strength for supporting the battle of 
first echelon MRC's. Sometimes the GLP is attached to first 
echelon companies by squads or attached at full strength to an 
MRC defending on the axis of concentration of battalion main 
efforts. 
  The AT subunit of the battalion (a platoon) usually remains 
subordinate to the battalion commander, occupies a concentration 
area and as a rule is used at full strength on a likely avenue 
of tank approach to repel assaults by enemy tanks and other 
armored vehicles, cover an exposed flank and support a 
counterattack. On terrain affording concealment and on rugged 
terrain it may be attached to first echelon companies. The AT 
subunit performs its missions from firing positions or from 
lines, the number of which is determined by the battalion 
commander. 
  As a rule, air defense subunits remain directly subordinate 
to the battalion commander and are disposed in company 
strongpoints and in the vicinity of the battalion COP so as to 
provide reliable cover of subunits against air strikes. 
  An armored group and fire ambushes may be part of the 
company 
(battalion) battle formation depending on the situation. 
  The company (battalion) armored group is established to 
increase activeness of the defense, promptly reinforce its 
stability on the most threatened axes, and close breaches which 
have formed as a result of enemy fire strikes. In addition, it 
is established to perform other missions as well which require 
swift, mobile operations and effective fire damage of the enemy 
and also to make more complete use of combat capabilities of 
tanks, BMP's and BTR's. The armored group makeup may include 
several tanks, BMP's or BTR's (usually without a mounted force) 
assigned from first and second echelon subunits defending 
outside of axes of concentration of main efforts. 
  With occupation of a defense by the company (battalion), 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) intended for operating as part of an 
armored group usually are disposed and make ready for battle in 
their own platoon strongpoints. Then at the prescribed time they 
concentrate in an area with reliable protective and concealing 
features of terrain (in ravines, on reverse hillslopes, in the 
forest and in other sheltered places), carefully conceal 
themselves and prepare to perform missions assigned to the 
armored group or to occupy a defense in their own platoon 
strongpoints. 
  One of the deputy platoon commanders may be appointed 
commander of a company armored group and one of the platoon 
commanders of a second echelon company may be appointed 
commander of a battalion armored group. 
  A fire ambush is organized to inflict maximum damage on the 
enemy by direct fire commenced suddenly, by surprise close-range 
concentrated fire, and by use of minefields. 
  A platoon (squad, tank) reinforced by flamethrower operators 
and combat engineers may be assigned to a fire ambush. 
  A system of strongpoints and firing positions is 
established for performing defense missions in a company 
(battalion) in accordance with the commander's decision, combat 
capabilities of subunits, time available and nature of terrain. 
It includes the following: combat security outpost position (in 
the battalion); strongpoints of platoons and companies 
consolidated into a battalion defense area; firing positions of 
tanks, BMP's (BTR's), ATGM systems and other organic and 
attached weapons; trenches and communication trenches. 
  The combat security outpost position is established to 
prevent an enemy surprise attack and his conduct of ground 
reconnaissance. A reinforced platoon usually is sent out as a 
combat security outpost from a first echelon battalion to a 
distance up to 2 km. The platoon is assigned a position up to 
500 m in frontage which is prepared for a perimeter defense. 
Obstacles are arranged ahead of the platoon position and on the 
flanks. 
  A combat security outpost is not sent out when in direct 
contact with the enemy. In this case its missions are assigned 
to subunits occupying the first trench. 
  Battalion defense areas, which unite company strongpoints, 
are the basis of each defensive position. 
  A company strongpoint (battalion defense area) is a terrain 
sector (area) of specific size with engineer preparation in 
accordance with the commander's decision, adapted for a 
perimeter defense and occupied by a subunit. 
  A company defends a strongpoint 1-1.5 km in frontage and up 
to 1,000 m deep. An MRC strongpoint is prepared as two trenches 
or one trench and consists of strongpoints of MRP's and 
positions of weapons of the company and attached subunits 
interconnected by a unified system of fire, obstacles and 
communication trenches within limits of the company strongpoint. 
A TC strongpoint consists of the strongpoints of TP's and 
positions of attached subunits. 
  Tanks attached to an MRC occupy a defense in its strongpoint 
and reinforce its capabilities to combat enemy armored targets, 
and motorized rifle subunits attached to a TC usually occupy 
positions ahead of the tanks and also in gaps between TP's and 
on flanks. 
  Communication trenches must be used widely for a perimeter 
defense of a company strongpoint, platoons must be assigned 
secondary sectors of fire, and alternate firing positions are 
prepared for weapons with consideration for conducting fire 
toward flanks and to the rear. Some weapons should be disposed 
in the depth of the defense. Obstacles are arranged on flanks, 
in gaps between platoons and in the rear of the strongpoint. 
  Gaps between company strongpoints may reach 1,000 m and must 
not fail to be under continuous observation; covered by 
flanking, oblique and cross fire of all weapons, especially AT 
weapons; and also covered by fire ambushes, artillery fire and 
obstacles. Trenches and alternate positions are prepared in gaps 
between platoon (company) strongpoints. 
  A battalion defends an area 3-5 km in frontage and 2-2.5 km 
in depth. It builds the defense within one position and prepares 
3-4 trenches. A battalion defense area consists of company 
strongpoints and the positions of organic and attached weapons 
interconnected by a unified system of fire, obstacles and 
communication trenches. 
  The width and depth of a battalion defense area and the 
distance between trenches, subunits and weapons are not constant 
values. In each specific case they must ensure repulse of enemy 
tank and mechanized infantry assaults ahead of the FEBA and 
their destruction when wedged into the defense; convenience of 
situating elements of the battle formation; dispersal of 
subunits for least vulnerability to enemy nuclear strikes, 
artillery fire and precision weapons; and an opportunity to 
execute a maneuver of fire and subunits. For example, the 
battalion defense frontage may be greater on terrain that is not 
accessible everywhere for operations of attacking troops and 
also when defending in a security zone. 
  Company strongpoints are disposed in a battalion area so 
they 
intercept the most likely axes of enemy attack by their 
disposition and fire, preclude stereotype in aligning the 
defense, and ensure stability of defending subunits. 
  Firing positions are prepared within the subunit battle 
formation to perform fire missions and improve survivability of 
weapons. A firing position is a place with or without engineer 
preparation occupied or intended for occupation by a tank, BMP 
(BTR) or other weapons. Skillful selection of firing positions 
is an important condition for successful performance of assigned 
missions. 
  Firing positions must be selected so they provide a good all 
around view of terrain and the conduct of fire in primary and 
secondary sectors of fire, possibility of firing to maximum 
range in given directions, engagement of the enemy by 
concentrated fire, reliable maskirovka and shelter of weapons 
against various enemy weapons, a concealed passage from the 
primary to an alternate position, a convenient move into a 
counterattack or a withdrawal, and an opportunity for mutual 
fire support and conduct of fire into gaps, from behind flanks 
and over the heads of friendly subunits. 
  Firing positions are subdivided according to 
purpose into primary, temporary, alternate and dummy. 
  Primary firing positions are intended for 
performing assigned missions in the course of battle. They are 
prepared for BMP's (BTR's), tanks, ATGM launchers, machineguns, 
grenade launchers and other weapons. 
  Temporary firing positions are prepared for duty 
weapons, BMP's (BTR's) and tanks and are intended for performing 
individual missions and misleading the enemy regarding the true 
alignment of the system of fire. Fire is conducted from these 
positions to destroy an enemy attempting to perform 
reconnaissance, breach obstacles or penetrate into the depth of 
the defense. After performing assigned missions, weapons occupy 
primary firing positions by direction of the company (battalion) 
commander. 
  Alternate firing positions are intended for 
executing a maneuver in the course of a defensive battle, and 
also in case it is impossible to perform the assigned mission 
from the primary position. It is advisable to designate one or 
two alternate positions for each kind of weapon. The transfer to 
and occupation of alternate positions is done only by order of 
the commander. 
  Dummy firing positions are established to mislead 
the enemy regarding the true position of weapons. For fighting 
vehicles these positions (emplacements) usually are prepared 
10-15 m from the primary firing position with simulation of the 
main revealing signs. 
  Depending on the degree of cover against ground observation, 
firing positions may be direct fire or indirect fire positions. 
Tanks, BMP's (BTR's), AT weapons and machineguns occupy and 
conduct fire from direct fire positions. 
  Firing positions should be established in such a way as to 
ensure dispersed placement that is not in a straight line. 
  Trenches and communication trenches should provide 
convenience in conducting fire, especially flanking, oblique and 
cross fire, sheltered disposition of subunits and weapons, and 
their swift, concealed maneuver laterally and into the depth, 
and also hamper the enemy in discovering the battle formation 
and system of fire. 
  The first trench of the first position is the 
forward edge, which is designated by the senior commander. 
Antitank and antipersonnel obstacles are established ahead of 
the first trench. It is selected where possible behind natural 
antitank barriers and should provide good observation of the 
enemy and best conditions for creating continuous fire of all 
kinds ahead of the FEBA, on flanks, in gaps and from the depth 
of the defense. Terrain ahead of the FEBA should hamper enemy 
observation and his choice of sheltered areas for concentrating 
tanks and infantry and concealed approaches to the FEBA. 
  The second trench is prepared 300-600 m from the 
first so its defending subunits could destroy an enemy on 
approaches to the FEBA by their fire, cover obstacles in front 
of the FEBA and support subunits located in the first trench. 
  The third (fourth) trench is prepared 600-1,000 m 
from the second (third) trench. It should allow its defending 
subunits to conduct fire in the belt between the second and 
third (fourth) trenches, and in some sectors also ahead of the 
FEBA, and use it to maneuver to threatened axes. 
  Communication trenches are used for fighting an enemy who 
has 
penetrated the defense, for concealed maneuver of subunits, and 
for evacuating wounded and delivering ammunition and food. At 
least one communication trench is dug for each platoon from the 
first to the second trench and at least one communication trench 
is prepared for each company from the second to the third 
(fourth) trench. This will permit organizing a perimeter defense 
in a short time if necessary. Trenches and communication 
trenches should be dug full profile and in some sectors 
strengthened by revetments to reduce losses from the effect of 
enemy nuclear weapons, artillery fire and air strikes. Covered 
sectors, dugouts [blindazh] and bunkers [ubezhishche] are made 
for personnel in trenches and communication trenches, and niches 
and small excavations are made for ammunition and other supplies. 
  Trenches and communication trenches are used for personnel 
movement to platoon, company and battalion assembly areas [rayon 
sbora] when disengaging and withdrawing. 
  Fire is the basic means of destroying the enemy in the 
defense. To perform this mission the company (battalion) has 
diverse weapons (assault rifles, machineguns, RPG's, BMP's 
(BTR's), tanks, ATGM's, automatic grenade launchers, mortars, 
air defense weapons) differing both in range and effectiveness 
as well as in type of targets engaged and degree of protection. 
To ensure the most effective fire, it must be organized in a 
unified system corresponding to the concept of upcoming battle. 
In addition, the defense is organized as a rule to fight an 
enemy considerably superior in forces. Consequently, the enemy's 
quantitative superiority in tanks and mechanized infantry must 
be countered by quality of fire, which is reflected in a 
specific system of the disposition and use of available weapons. 
  The system of fire should be understood to mean 
the disposition of weapons organized under a unified plan and 
the combination and distribution of their fire missions by 
targets, place and time with consideration of maximum use of 
their fire capabilities in accordance with the commander's 
decision for engaging the enemy on his approach to the FEBA, his 
deployment and his launching of an assault; and repelling an 
assault by enemy tanks and mechanized infantry ahead of the 
FEBA, on flanks, and with penetration of the strongpoint. 
  Considering the great importance of the system of fire in 
performing defense missions, the subunit commander builds it 
with consideration of fire capabilities of all kinds of weapons 
at his disposal and their close interworking in combination with 
engineer obstacles and natural barriers. 
  The system of fire must ensure creation of a zone of fire of 
AT weapons and continuous, multilayered fire of all kinds ahead 
of the FEBA, in gaps, on flanks and in the depth of the 
strongpoint (battalion defense area), and a rapid transfer, 
distribution and concentration of fire on any threatened axis or 
sector. 
  The company (battalion) system of fire includes the 
following: sectors of concentrated fire and defensive fire lines 
of artillery and mortars prepared on approaches to the defense, 
ahead of the FEBA, on flanks, in gaps between company 
strongpoints and in the depth of the defense; zones of fire of 
AT weapons and continuous, multilayered fire of all kinds of 
weapons ahead of the FEBA, in gaps, on flanks and in the depth 
of the defense above all for destroying enemy tanks and other 
armored vehicles; and a prepared maneuver of fire to concentrate 
it on any threatened axis or sector in a short time. The basis 
of the company system of fire is the fire of tanks and BMP's; 
the basis of the battalion system of fire is the AT fire of 
companies, organic and attached AT weapons and direct fire of 
artillery, with consideration for employing the regiment's AT 
reserve and mobile obstacle detachment on a likely avenue of 
tank approach. 
  Thorough organization of AT fire is a very important 
obligation of all subunit commanders. Weapons must be disposed 
covertly in the company strongpoint (battalion defense area) 
with consideration of terrain relief. Their disposition must 
ensure conduct of fire to maximum range and engagement of the 
enemy by flanking, cross and surprise close-range concentrated 
fire, they must have fire coordination with each other and they 
must create fire sacks. 
  To keep the enemy from uncovering the system of fire, 
weapons 
must be carefully camouflaged and a broad network of alternate, 
temporary and dummy positions and of roving tanks, guns and 
BMP's must be established. Linear disposition of weapons is 
impermissible. 
  To combat enemy tanks and other armored vehicles the 
battalion (company) commander specifies the zone of AT weapon 
fire. It represents a terrain sector ahead of the subunit 
forward edge, on flanks, in gaps between strongpoints and in the 
depth of the defense against which fire is prepared in advance 
and conducted from tanks, ATGM's, BMP's and other AT weapons. 
  In modern battle the enemy will attempt to take advantage of 
the gun fire of tanks and BMP's (BTR's) at maximum grazing range 
during an assault and, if the vehicles have launchers for firing 
ATGM's, to destroy the defenders' armored weapons. Based on 
this, the above enemy weapons should be expected to commence 
fire when they come to a line 2-3 km from the FEBA. 
  The depth of the AT fire zone should ensure engagement of 
enemy tanks and BMP's (BTR's) when they move into the impact 
zone of defenders' AT weapons. The far boundary is specified 
(established) depending on the range of effective fire of the 
weapon being used with consideration of terrain conditions ahead 
of the FEBA, on flanks and in the depth of the defense. The 
range of effective fire of a weapon (subunit) is the range at 
which a target is killed with a single round (volley) with a 
probability of 0.5. For example, it is 2-2.5 km for modern tanks. 
  A zone of continuous, multilayered fire of all kinds of 
weapons is created to repel enemy massed tank and infantry 
assaults. It represents a terrain sector (area) in which each 
terrain point is under effective fire. Within this zone small 
arms fire is reinforced by fire of machineguns mounted on BMP's 
(BTR's), and fire of AT weapons is reinforced by RPG's. 
  In each specific instance the depth of the zone of 
continuous, multilayered fire is determined by the nature of 
terrain and range of effective fire of weapons involved and may 
be up to 400 m. 
  Establishing zones of fire gives a defense a monolithic 
nature with respect to fire. Lines for commencing fire from 
various weapons are designated in these zones for organized 
engagement of the enemy. When the enemy moves to these lines 
fire is commenced by ATGM launchers, tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and 
small arms. 
  Special attention in organizing a system of fire should be 
given to creating fire sacks. A fire sack is a terrain sector 
ahead of the FEBA or in the depth of the defense against which 
high density fire of all or the bulk of subunit weapons is 
prepared from flanks and from the front to inflict maximum 
damage (loss) on the enemy in a short time. It is created by 
skillfully disposing platoon (company) strongpoints and weapons 
with consideration of terrain conditions so the terrain within 
its limits is covered by cross, flanking and frontal fire of all 
weapons. Fire sacks may be created by a maneuver of fire, 
weapons and subunits in the course of a defensive battle. 
  Minefields are laid and artillery, mortar and concentrated 
small arms fire is prepared within the fire sack. 
  The size of a fire sack can be 900-1,000 m in frontage and 
up 
to 1,000 m in depth when created ahead of the FEBA, and 500-800 
m in frontage and up to 1,000 m in depth when created in the 
depth of the defense area (strongpoint). 
  Concentrated and defensive fire of artillery (mortars) and 
concentrated fire of tanks, BMP's and small arms is prepared for 
engaging the enemy on possible forward movement routes, 
deployment lines, and axes of his attack and penetration. 
  Concentrated fire is conducted against a precisely detected 
target or group of targets by several tanks, BMP's (BTR's), 
machineguns, assault rifles and other weapons as well as by one 
or more of the company subunits. In some cases prepared 
concentrated fire may be conducted for neutralization, 
annihilation or prevention of enemy advance. Neutralizing a 
target consists of inflicting such damages (losses) on it which 
temporarily deprive it of combat effectiveness, restrict its 
maneuver or disrupt C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Annihilation of a target consists of inflicting such damage 
(losses) on it that it completely loses combat effectiveness. 
  Concentrated fire is conducted at the following ranges: 
2,000 
m from the KPVT [14.5 mm Vladimirov heavy machinegun], 1,000 m 
from the PKT [Kalashnikov tank machinegun], and 800 m from 
machineguns and assault rifles. When concentrated fire is 
conducted by subunits, this range increases and is 2.5 km for a 
BMP- equipped MRP, 3.5 km for a TP, 4 km for a BMP-equipped MRC 
and 5 km for a TC. 
  Fire concentration sectors usually are designated against 
road junctions, crossings, defiles, forest openings and other 
terrain sectors constraining enemy actions or compacting his 
battle formation. 
  The size of fire concentration sectors in frontage and depth 
are determined by subunit fire capabilities. It should 
correspond in width to the size of the fragmentation effect zone 
of a shell and be 40 m per gun for tanks and 25 m for BMP's. The 
width of fire concentration sectors should correspond to the 
amount of shell dispersion and be 100 m for tank guns and 50 m 
for BMP's. Based on this, fire concentration sectors can be 120 
m in frontage and 100 m in depth for the TP and up to 75 m in 
frontage and up to 50 m in depth for the BMP platoon. The width 
of a fire concentration sector when firing small arms is 
designated with consideration of ensuring a fire density of 
10-12 bullets per meter of frontage and depends on the number of 
weapons in subunits and involved in the battle. With subunits at 
authorized strength, the fire concentration sector can be up to 
150 m for a platoon and up to 300 m for a company. 
  Firing data are prepared with the help of the longitudinal 
level and traverse indicator to support conduct of tank and BMP 
fire against a fire concentration sector at night or under 
conditions of poor visibility. 
  The method of conducting concentrated BMP and tank fire can 
vary: systematic fire, rapid fire and salvos. In conducting 
systematic fire, the firing BMP's (tanks) fire rounds in a 
certain sequence at set time intervals. Such fire is used during 
registration and to ensure observation of results of fire when 
shifting to fire for effect. 
  Rapid fire is conducted when BMP's (tanks) are ready for the 
next round, and at the maximum rate. It is used during fire for 
effect. 
  In conducting salvo fire, all firing BMP's (tanks) fire 
rounds simultaneously at the subunit commander's command. 
  Frontal fire, flanking fire, cross fire and surprise, close 
range concentrated [kinzhalnyy] fire is prepared to 
increase the effectiveness of engaging the enemy. 
  Frontal fire is fire directed perpendicular to 
target frontage; it is more effective in engaging deep targets. 
  Fire conducted against the enemy (target) flank is called 
flanking fire and is most suitable in firing on 
targets operating across a wide front. Cross fire is 
fire conducted against a target from two or more directions. 
Fire commenced suddenly from close range in one direction is 
called surprise close-range concentrated fire. It is 
prepared at distances not exceeding grazing range for 
head-shoulders chest figure targets and is conducted from 
carefully camouflaged positions at maximum intensity until total 
annihilation of the enemy or interdiction of his attempts to 
advance in a given direction. 
  The company (battalion) commander organizes the system of 
fire when assigning missions and organizing coordination. Zones 
(sectors) of fire, secondary sectors of fire and fire 
concentration sectors are assigned to subunits (weapons). 
  A subunit zone of fire should be at least the width of the 
strongpoint (defense area) in frontage and is indicated on the 
terrain (map, diagram) by four reference points: first on the 
right, then on the left into the depth. The depth of the zone of 
fire is determined by the range of effective fire of subunit 
weapons. To cover boundaries and gaps between subunits by fire, 
the zones of fire of adjacent subunits must overlap at distances 
of 400-500 m from the FEBA. 
  Sectors of fire are indicated for BMP's (BTR's), tanks, 
machineguns and other weapons. Fire of RPG's is prepared in the 
zones of their own squads. 
  Readiness of the system of fire is determined by occupation 
of positions by weapons, preparation of firing data, and 
availability of missiles and ammunition. 
  An important element of the defense alignment is the system 
of engineer obstacles being created by decision of the commander 
to the full depth of defense to inflict damage (losses) on an 
enemy, delay his advance, hamper (constrain) maneuver or force 
him to advance in a direction favorable for the defenders and 
thereby contribute to his destruction by fire and counterattacks. 
  The system of engineer obstacles includes 
minefields, mine clusters, integrated obstacle complexes, 
abatis, other antitank and antipersonnel barriers, and 
installations prepared for demolition (mining) created ahead of 
the combat security outpost position, ahead of the FEBA, in gaps 
and on flanks of the battalion (company) to the full depth of 
the battalion defense area. It is created in accordance with the 
commander's concept in combination with the system of fire with 
consideration of natural barriers and the maneuver of subunits 
(your own and adjacent ones). 
  Minefields emplaced by combat engineer subunits are the 
basis 
of the obstacle system. The procedure for demolishing 
installations in the depth of the defense is determined by the 
senior commander. 
<H5>  3. Preparation of the Defense </H5>
  Preparation of the defense represents an entire set of 
measures taken by the company (battalion) commander for 
successful performance of assigned missions. It begins with 
receipt of the combat mission from the senior commander and 
includes the following: organization for battle (decisionmaking, 
assignment of combat missions to subunits, ground 
reconnaissance, organization of coordination and a system of 
fire, comprehensive support to battle and C[.sup]2[/]); 
development of a diagram of the company strongpoint (battalion 
defense area); preparation of the company (battalion) for 
performing the combat mission; occupation of the defense; 
creation of the battle formation and system of fire; engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area); organization and 
conduct of political work; practical work of the company 
(battalion) commander, his deputies and staff in subordinate 
subunits; and other measures. 
  The duration and procedure of the commander's work of 
organizing the defense depend on conditions for 
shifting to the defense, mission received, how far away the 
enemy is and the nature of his operations, nature of terrain and 
time available. With time available, the defense is organized 
with measures carried out to the full extent; if time is 
lacking, then it is done in a short time with measures carried 
out to an abbreviated extent. In all cases it should not delay 
subunits in taking up a defense and creating a system of fire. 
  When shifting to the defense out of contact with the 
enemy the commander usually arranges his work in the 
following order: analyzes the mission; determines measures which 
must be carried out immediately for most rapid preparation of 
subunits to perform the assigned mission; makes or approves a 
time calculation; gives instructions to commanders of 
subordinate and attached subunits for preparing to perform the 
combat mission and on the time and procedure of work on the 
terrain; estimates the situation; makes the decision and briefs 
it to the senior commander; communicates the decision to his 
deputies and subunit commanders; performs ground reconnaissance, 
during which he updates his decision; issues the operation 
order; and organizes coordination, a system of fire, 
comprehensive support of battle and C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Then he moves the company (battalion) to the indicated 
strongpoint (defense area), organizes its engineer preparation 
and performs practical work of preparing subunits for defense. 
At the prescribed time he reports readiness to perform the 
combat mission to the battalion (regimental) commander. 
  On receiving a combat mission for shifting to the defense 
in direct contact with the enemy, the company 
(battalion) commander arranges his work in the following order: 
analyzes the mission received; determines measures which must be 
taken immediately for a most rapid shift to the defense; makes a 
time calculation; and organizes the capture and consolidation of 
the indicated (favorable) line. In the course of consolidating 
the line he estimates the situation, makes the decision, assigns 
missions to organic and attached subunits (by radio or 
personally), organizes coordination, the system of fire, 
C[.sup]2[/], and protection against enemy mass destruction 
and precision weapons, issues instructions on basic questions of 
comprehensive support to battle, and organizes engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  Then the commander performs ground reconnaissance, during 
which he updates missions for subunits, the coordination 
procedure, and if necessary also other matters. 
  In all cases company (battalion) subunits must be ready to 
repel an enemy attack and air strikes, to destroy an airborne 
assault force and subunits of airmobile troops, and for 
protection against precision weapons. 
<H5>  4. Company Commander's Work of Organizing the Defense Out of </H5>
Contact With the Enemy 
<H5>  (Variant) </H5>
  Tactical situation (Fig. 4) 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-44A>      Fig. 4. 5th MRC commander's decision for defense </FIG>


  The 2nd MRB, alerted on 15 June and having made a 100 km 
night march, concentrated in Gustoy Forest 3 km east of Ivanovka 
(not on diagram) by 0400 hours 16 June, where it is preparing 
weapons and vehicles for battle. (Not all local features cited 
in the text are shown on the diagram due to its small scale.) 
  As 0515 on 16 June the 5th MRC commander received a combat 
mission, from which he learned the following: 
  1. The enemy is concentrating his main body in assembly 
areas 
for an attack [rayon dlya nastupleniya]. His attack should be 
expected to be launched on the morning of 18 June, and with 
consideration of battle in the security zone his arrival at the 
FEBA is possible as follows: forward subunits by 1330-1400 and 
main body by 1500-1600 18 June. 
  2. 2nd MRB with 1st TC shifts to defense of area Hill 134.2 
(not on diagram), Ploskaya Hill, Okunevo (not on diagram) with 
mission of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in 
direction of Grusha Hill, Hill 129.0. Battle formation is in two 
echelons: 4th and 5th MRC in the first and 6th MRC in the second. 
  It is planned to have three trenches in the defense area: 
first--west slopes of Hill 137.0, lone house, ruins, rocks; 
second--quarry (not on diagram), Hill 129.0, west slopes of 
Dlinnaya Hill, Karevo; third--Hill 122.3 (not on diagram), Hill 
112.0, Hill 109.2 (not on diagram). 
  Subunits of 1/3 MRR are defending in the security zone. 
  3. 4th MRC of adjacent regiment is shifting to the defense 
on 
right with mission of preventing enemy penetration in direction 
of Grusha Hill, Kuskovo (not on diagram). 
  1st MRC, 1st MRB is shifting to the defense on left with 
mission of preventing enemy penetration in direction of Hill 
110.0, Sapozhnikovo (not on diagram). 
  The regimental artillery battalion is preparing concentrated 
and barrier fires on possible deployment lines and on axes of 
assault against sectors 201, 202, 203; standing barriers Bereza 
[Birch], Sosna [Pine], Klen [Maple]; and rolling barrier Tigr 
[Tiger]. 
  4. 5th MRC with 2nd TP, 1st TC and a grenade launcher squad 
is shifting to defense of the strongpoint Hill 136.8, Ploskaya 
Hill, Kedrovka with mission of preventing penetration of enemy 
tanks and infantry in direction of Hill 80.1, Kedrovka. Zone of 
fire: on right--lone house, north edge of Kruglaya Grove; on 
left--rocks, Hill 74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in 
direction of ruins. Company fire concentration sectors: 
SO-1--rocks, bushes; SO-2--lone tree, curve in road. 1st Battery 
is supporting. 
  5. Ammunition expenditure for mission accomplishment: 0.4 
unit of fire for small arms and 0.6 unit of fire for tanks and 
BMP's. 
  Occupy defense by 1030 16 June. Readiness of the system of 
fire 1120 hours 16 June, readiness of engineer obstacles and 
first-order engineer work by 1030 17 June. 
  7. Battalion COP on Hill 119.2 as of 1030 16 June, company 
COP on north slopes of Dlinnaya Hill as of 1035 16 June. 
  Company is 95 percent strength in personnel, weapons and 
vehicles. 
  [Begin side line] On receiving the combat mission the 
company 
commander analyzes it and makes a time calculation. 
  The mission analysis has the purpose of ensuring 
decisionmaking for shifting to the defense in accordance with 
the battalion (regimental) commander's concept. In analyzing the 
mission he has received, the company (battalion) commander must 
understand the goal of the defensive battle, the senior 
commander's concept, and above all the direction for 
concentrating main efforts; the holding of which terrain sectors 
supports stability of the company (battalion) defense; procedure 
for engaging the enemy by fire of organic and attached weapons 
during his forward movement, his assault on the FEBA and his 
destruction in the depth of the defense; and objectives 
(targets) to be engaged by senior commanders' weapons in support 
of the company (battalion). In analyzing the mission the 
commander also has to understand the combat mission, place of 
the company (battalion) in the battalion (regimental) battle 
formation and its role in the upcoming battle, missions of 
adjacent subunits and procedure for coordinating with them, and 
readiness time to perform the mission; and also analyze the time 
for occupying the defense, readiness time of the system of fire, 
and the sequence and time periods of engineer preparation of the 
strongpoint (defense area). 
  In conclusions from the mission analysis, the company 
(battalion) commander usually determines the following: on which 
axis and on holding which sector he must concentrate main 
efforts and for what actions he must be ready; how to align the 
battle formation; how much time is available for organizing the 
defense and what must be done to maintain coordination with 
adjacent subunits. [End side line] 
  Mission analysis 
  2nd MRB is shifting to defense of the area Hill 134.2, 
Ploskaya Hill, Okunevo (1.5 km east of Ivanovo) with the mission 
of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in 
direction of Grusha Hill, Hill 129.0. 
  Battalion is concentrating main efforts on holding area Hill 
137.0, Ploskaya Hill, Osinovka (not on diagram). 
  Battalion battle formation in two echelons. 5th MRC with 2nd 
TP and grenade launcher squad shifts to defense in first echelon 
on battalion left flank on axis of concentration of main efforts 
with mission of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and 
infantry in direction of Hill 80.1, Kedrovka. 
  4th MRC on right shifts to defense of strongpoint Hill 134.2 
(not on diagram), Hill 137.0, bushes with mission of preventing 
penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in direction of Grusha 
Hill, Kuskovo (not on diagram). 
  1st MRC, 1st MRB on left shifts to defense of strongpoint 
Kamennaya Hill, cemetery, Karevo with mission of preventing 
enemy penetration in direction of Hill 110.0, Sapozhnikovo (not 
on diagram). 
  Occupy defense by 1030 hours 16 June. Readiness of the 
system 
of fire 1120 16 June. Readiness of first-order engineer work by 
1030 17 June. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. Based on 2nd MRB commander's concept, concentrate main 
efforts on axis Hill 80.1, Kedrovka and on firmly holding Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  2. Align battle formation in two echelons, have platoon 
strongpoints on Hill 136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  [Begin side line] Having drawn conclusions from analyzing 
the 
mission received and having determined the measures which must 
be taken immediately for most rapid preparation of subunits to 
perform the combat mission, the company commander makes a time 
calculation. 
  The time of receiving the mission, time of occupying the 
defense, readiness time of the system of fire, and time of 
briefing the decision (commander's concept) to the battalion 
commander are initial data for the time calculation. 
  In calculating time, determine how many hours set aside for 
preparing for battle are in daylight. It is also necessary to 
determine how much time to set aside for issuing instructions on 
preparing subunits for battle, situation estimate, ground 
reconnaissance, assignment of combat missions, and organization 
of coordination. Having analyzed the mission received and 
performed the time calculation, the company commander begins the 
situation estimate. [End side line] 
  Company commander's time calculation for 
shifting to defense 
  Mission received at 0515 hours 16 June. Occupy defense by 
1030 16 June. Readiness of system of fire 1120 16 June. Total 
time for organizing defense 5 hours. 


                                Time 

Measures To Be Taken            Beginning                  End 

Issue instructions on           0530                       0540 
preparing subunits for battle 


Situation estimate              0540                       0550 

Decisionmaking and              0550                       0620 
communication of decision to 
one's deputies and subunit 
commanders 

Participate in ground           0620                       0720 
reconnaissance conducted by 
battalion commander 

Conduct ground reconnaissance   0720                       0810 
with commanders of 
subordinate and attached 
subunits 

Issue verbal operation order    0810                       0910 
and organize coordination, 
system of fire, comprehensive 
support to battle, and 
C[.sup]2[/] 

Company occupation of           0910                       1030 
strongpoint 

Report occupation of defense    1030 
to battalion commander 


  [Begin side line] In the situation estimate the 
company (battalion) commander clarifies the following: enemy 
makeup, situation, status, degree of protection, possible 
forward movement routes and deployment lines, strong and weak 
points and nature of his operations; makeup, situation, status, 
capabilities, degree of protection and state of supply of his 
own, attached and supporting subunits; makeup, situation, nature 
of terrain, and its effect on company (battalion) operations, 
and the most likely directions of enemy aircraft and helicopter 
operations at low and extremely low altitudes; and the NBC 
situation. 
  In addition, in the situation estimate the state of weather, 
time of year and day and their effect on preparing and 
conducting defensive battle are taken into account. 
  As a result of the situation estimate the company commander 
draws conclusions, based on which he subsequently makes his 
decision. 
  The enemy estimate in organizing the defense is 
made based on his operating tactics with consideration of the 
nature of terrain and other situation conditions. An enemy who 
may attack in the company (battalion) defense frontage, his 
probable axes of forward movement and deployment lines, methods 
and axes of assault, procedure for enemy buildup of efforts in 
the course of battle, and most likely directions of his aircraft 
and helicopter operations are estimated especially carefully. 
  The company (battalion) commander determines the following 
in 
conclusions from the enemy estimate: enemy makeup and 
capabilities, probable axis and time of launching an attack; 
axis where it is advisable to concentrate main efforts and 
terrain sector on whose holding the stability of company 
(battalion) defense will depend; and alignment of the battle 
formation with consideration of taking maximum advantage of the 
capabilities of one's weapons and the terrain. 
  An estimate of own subunits is necessary for 
taking measures which will permit preparing the company 
(battalion) for performing the assigned mission and correctly 
determining the place of subunits in the company (battalion) 
battle formation and their missions considering their state of 
supply and combat capabilities. 
  In studying the situation of his own, attached and 
supporting 
subunits the company (battalion) commander determines within 
what time periods it is possible to establish the battle 
formation and what maneuver must be executed to arrive at the 
designated strongpoint (defense area). 
  In estimating the status of his subunit, he clarifies the 
strength level of the company (battalion), degree of radioactive 
exposure, morale, mental state and combat experience of 
personnel, commanders' job qualities, and technical condition of 
combat vehicles. Then he determines capabilities for combating 
enemy tanks and other armored targets as well as steps which 
must be taken to replenish supplies. 
  In conclusions from the estimate of friendly troops the 
company (battalion) commander outlines the following: what 
subunits are advisable to have on the axis of concentration of 
main efforts and how to distribute means of reinforcement and 
align the battle formation; in what sequence to engage the enemy 
on his approach to the FEBA, during his deployment, when he 
launches an assault, and when he penetrates; what measures to 
take to replenish supplies. 
  In the estimate of the adjacent subunits it is 
necessary to analyze their makeup, situation, nature of 
operations and missions being performed. As a result of the 
estimate of adjacent subunits the company (battalion) commander 
draws conclusions in which the following are determined: 
influence of adjacent subunits on performance of assigned 
missions and on choice of axis of concentration of main efforts; 
with which of the adjacent subunits and in the performance of 
which missions to have closest coordination; measures for 
securing flanks, boundaries and gaps (what forces and assets are 
assigned and the procedure for their operations). 
  The terrain estimate is made by the commander 
initially by studying it on approaches and then in the depth of 
the defense. 
  On approaches to the defense and ahead of the FEBA the 
general nature of terrain (open, offering concealment, semiopen) 
and its influence on the method by which the enemy launches an 
assault are taken into account. Based on this the following are 
determined: probable axes of enemy forward movement, his lines 
of deployment and departure, axis of concentration of main 
efforts and axis of his air operations; firing position areas of 
artillery, mortars and ATGM's and areas of COP's; terrain 
sectors which hamper operations of fighting vehicles and affect 
organization of the system of fire; and places for emplacing 
obstacles ahead of the FEBA. Then the axes are determined for 
which there is a good view to maximum depth. 
  In estimating terrain in the depth of the defense, he also 
studies its general nature (protective and concealing 
properties, condition of roads and so on) and influence on enemy 
operations. The following are determined based on this: axes of 
concentration of main efforts of the enemy and one's own 
subunits and terrain sectors on whose holding stability of the 
defense depends; alignment of the battle formation; trench trace 
and strongpoint locations. In addition, conditions for 
maskirovka, observation and conduct of fire toward the enemy, on 
flanks and in gaps are studied and COP locations of platoons, 
companies and the battalion are selected. 
  The following are determined in conclusions: probable axis 
of 
enemy assault and commence-fire lines for various weapons; axis 
of concentration of main efforts and terrain sector on whose 
holding the stability of the defense depends; alignment of the 
battle formation and locations of platoon (company) strongpoints. 
  In estimating the NBC situation, the company (battalion) 
commander studies the degree and nature of radioactive and 
chemical contamination of terrain in the strongpoint (defense 
area) for the given time and determines the level and doses of 
radiation which personnel received and the effect of these 
factors on conduct of the defense. 
  In his conclusions the company (battalion) commander 
outlines 
the following: basic measures for protection against mass 
destruction weapons and for restoring combat effectiveness; the 
battle formation and locations of strongpoints with 
consideration of the nature of terrain and its contamination; 
forces and assets for performing radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance and their missions. [End side line] 
  Situation estimate 
  The enemy is concentrating his main body in assembly areas 
for the attack [iskhodnyy rayon dlya nastupleniya]. Counting the 
time needed for replenishing supplies and organizing for battle, 
his attack should be expected on the morning of 18 June, arrival 
of forward subunits at the defensive line by 1330-1400 and of 
the main body by 1500-1600 hours 18 June. Operations of his 
aircraft and raiding and reconnaissance parties are possible at 
any time with the beginning of the attack. Konyayevo, Stepanovo, 
Hill 119.2; and Stepanovo, Ivanovo should be considered the most 
likely axes of enemy approach to the defensive line. 
  Enemy deployment into platoon columns is possible on the 
line 
Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0, and possible line of departure is 
rocks, lone tree. Considering enemy operating tactics, it can be 
presumed that an attack of up to one and one-half company task 
forces, the basis of which will be tanks, should be expected in 
the first echelon ahead of the company defense frontage. In the 
course of battle the enemy may commit the battalion second 
echelon (up to a mechanized infantry or tank task force) with 
the taking of platoon strongpoints located on the FEBA. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. The attacking enemy's most probable axes of operations 
are 
along field roads. 
  2. Company main efforts must be concentrated on holding Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill and Dlinnaya Hill. 
  3. Organize the defense as a system of platoon strongpoints 
prepared for a perimeter defense. It is advisable to align the 
battle formation in two echelons, with two MRP's reinforced by 
tanks in the first echelon and one platoon in the second. 
  The company is at 95 percent strength in personnel, weapons 
and vehicles. There is 0.8 of a fueling. The personnel 
understrength will not substantially affect performance of the 
combat mission. The political attitude and morale of personnel 
is good; 20 percent of them have experience in conducting combat 
operations. The attached TP is at full strength in personnel, 
vehicles and ammunition. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. Based on the strength level of platoons, their training 
level and commanders' experience it is advisable to have 3rd MRP 
on the right flank, 2nd MRP on the left flank and 1st MRP in the 
second echelon. 
  2. Dispose attached tanks in first echelon strongpoints. 
  3. The company's basic efforts must be concentrated on the 
Stepanovo, Dlinnaya Hill axis. 
  4. Refuel equipment by 0730 16 June and complete servicing 
and maintenance of vehicles and preparation of weapons for 
battle by 0830. 
  Subunits of 1st MRB, 3rd MRR are defending in front in the 
security zone with the mission of holding up the enemy, 
inflicting damage on him, forcing him to deploy the main body 
and attack in a direction unfavorable for him, and gaining time 
for preparing the defense. 2nd MRP, 4th MRC is shifting to the 
defense on the right on Hill 137.0 with the mission of 
preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in the 
direction of Grusha Hill, Kuskovo. 
  1st MRC, 1st MRB is shifting to the defense on the left. Its 
mission is to hold the strongpoint and prevent enemy penetration 
in the direction of Hill 99.8, Karevo. 
  Gaps between adjacent subunits are 600-700 m, which requires 
covering them by fire not only of small arms, but also of AT 
weapons. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. To secure flanks it is necessary to assign platoons 
secondary sectors of fire and assign missions to the following 
weapons: tank and machinegunner in 3rd MRP and BMP in 2nd MRP. 
  2. Organize coordination with adjacent subunits to destroy 
the enemy who has penetrated into gaps. 
  Terrain relief ahead of the FEBA is level, with the presence 
of small hills and individual groves, and is accessible for 
operations of all kinds of vehicles. Dirt roads leading from 
west to east toward our FEBA create favorable conditions for 
moving forward from the depth. 
  Berezovyy Forest and Dubovaya and Kruglaya groves as well as 
Bezymyannaya Hill and Hill 128.0 enable the enemy to move 
forward and deploy into approach march and battle formations 
covertly. Enemy deployment into platoon columns is possible with 
his arrival at the line Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0. 
  Almost all terrain closer to Bezymyannaya Hill and Berezovyy 
Forest is open and easily viewed from our side. 
  The presence of Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0 and Hill 80.1 
will allow the enemy to conduct observation in our disposition 
up to the line Pridorozhnaya Grove, Malaya Grove. An enemy 
assault most likely will begin from the line rocks, ruins, which 
is 400-600 m from our FEBA. The most convenient axes of advance 
of enemy tanks are along the roads Stepanovo, Hill 119.2; and 
Stepanovo, Ivanovo. 
  The marshy sector on right and left flanks will hamper enemy 
use of tanks in gaps with the adjacent subunit on the right. 
Terrain in the strongpoint of the company and of adjacent 
subunits basically is level and open and permits a favorable 
disposition of platoon strongpoints by taking advantage of Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill, with a good field of view 
and fire in the direction of the enemy. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. Based on terrain conditions, the probable axis of 
concentration of main enemy efforts will be in the direction 
Stepanovo, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  2. Dispose platoon strongpoints as follows: 3rd MRP on Hill 
136.8, 2nd MRP on Ploskaya Hill, 1st MRP on Dlinnaya Hill. 
  [Begin side line] After analyzing the mission received and 
analyzing conclusions from the situation estimate, the company 
(battalion) commander makes his decision. 
  The basis of the decision is the commander's 
concept, which specifies the following: axis of concentration of 
main efforts and terrain areas on whose holding stability of the 
defense depends; procedure for fire engagement of the enemy on 
his approach to the FEBA, his deployment, and launching of his 
attack; procedure for destroying an enemy who has penetrated the 
defense; axis of possible counterattacks; battle formation and 
system of strongpoints and firing positions; and methods of 
deceiving the enemy. [End side line] 
  Decision (concept) 
  I decided: concentrate main efforts on axis 
Stepanovo, Kedrovka and firmly hold Hill 136.8, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  Exploiting results of air strikes and taking advantage of 
artillery fire and favorable terrain conditions, inflict damage 
on the enemy and repel his assault by the fire of tanks, BMP's 
and small arms beginning from line Dubovaya Grove, dairy farm; 
and as he approaches the FEBA. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the strongpoint, firmly hold 
Hill 136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill and inflict damage on 
and destroy him by flanking and cross fire of all weapons and by 
actions of fire ambushes and the armored group from occupied and 
alternate positions. 
  Align battle formation in two echelons: 2nd and 3rd MRP's 
reinforced by 1st TP and grenade launcher squad in first echelon 
and 1st MRP in second. 
  Mislead the enemy regarding alignment of the battle 
formation 
by creating a dummy platoon strongpoint in the center of the 
battle formation and dummy tank and BMP firing positions 
simulating their real position. 
  [Begin side line] Having made the decision, the company 
commander communicated it to his deputy and to platoon 
commanders and traveled out to work on the terrain with the 
battalion commander. On completing the work he arrived at Hill 
136.8 by 0720 hours 16 June to conduct ground reconnaissance 
with subordinate commanders. 
  During ground reconnaissance the company (battalion) 
commander usually studies terrain, designates (indicates) 
reference points and updates the following: 

  -  situation, possible enemy forward movement routes 
(assembly areas) and deployment lines, and likely avenues of 
tank approach; 
  -  FEBA trace, strongpoint (defense area), 
boundaries and missions of the company (battalion); 
  -  axis of 
concentration of main efforts and terrain sectors on whose 
holding stability of the defense depends; 
  -  trench and 
communication trench trace, platoon (company) strongpoints, 
combat security outpost position, places for arranging fire 
ambushes and area for armored group if it is established; 
  -  positions of attached tank (motorized rifle) subunit and of 
other means of reinforcement; 
  -  zones of fire of platoons 
(companies) and fire concentration sectors; primary and 
alternate (temporary) positions of organic and attached 
artillery; firing positions and zones of fire (sector of fire), 
fire concentration sectors and defensive fire lines of subunits 
(weapons) intended for securing flanks and boundaries with 
adjacent subunits and gaps between platoons (companies); 
primary, alternate (temporary) launch (firing) positions of air 
defense subunit and its maneuver routes; axes and deployment 
lines for counterattacks of TC and BMP-equipped MRC in the 
second echelon (reserve), and lines of firing positions for the 
armored group; 
  -  sequence and time periods of engineer 
preparation, locations for laying minefields and passages left 
in them, and locations of dummy strongpoints, positions and 
trenches; 
  -  measures for protecting against enemy mass 
destruction and precision weapons, securing boundaries and 
flanks, destroying airborne assault forces, raiding and 
reconnaissance parties, and airmobile parties, and [protecting 
against] subunit operations at night and under other conditions 
of limited visibility; 
  -  locations of COP and of technical 
support and rear subunits as well as of motor vehicles of 
motorized rifle subunits. [End side line] 

  Ground reconnaissance 
  [Begin side line] After briefing his decision to the 
battalion commander at 0700 hours 16 June on Hill 136.8, the 
company commander selected as reference points local features 
easily visible day and night and most resistant to destruction, 
numbered them and determined distances to them. 
  Platoon commanders and the 1st TP commander arrived on Hill 
136.8 at 0720. The company commander oriented the officers on 
the terrain, indicated to subordinates the reference points, 
local features and their codenames ahead of the company defense 
frontage and on its flanks, and began ground reconnaissance. 
[End side line] 
  The enemy is concentrating his main body in areas for the 
attack along the state border 70 km from the defensive line 
(points it out on the map). His launching of an attack is 
possible on the morning of 18 June and arrival of forward 
subunits at the FEBA should be expected by 1330-1400 hours and 
arrival of the main body by 1500-1600 hours 18 June. Operations 
of enemy aviation and raiding and reconnaissance parties are 
possible at any time from the moment he invades. 
  Based on terrain conditions, the most likely axes of enemy 
approach to the strongpoint occupied by the company will be the 
roads Konyayevo, Stepanovo, Hill 119.2; and Stepanovo, Ivanovo. 
  Enemy deployment should be expected on the following lines: 
into platoon columns--Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0; into battle 
formation--rocks, lone tree. 
  If our withdrawing troop subunits do not succeed in 
disengaging from the enemy, his arrival at the FEBA should be 
expected in approach march or battle formation. 
  Considering terrain relief features and enemy operating 
tactics, up to one and one-half company task forces, the basis 
of which will be tanks, may attack ahead of the company defense 
frontage. In the course of battle, commitment of the battalion 
second echelon (up to a mechanized infantry or tank company task 
force) is possible along field roads (indicates them on the 
terrain) with the taking of first echelon platoon strongpoints. 
The most likely axis of concentration of main enemy efforts is 
Hill 80.1, Kedrovka and the most convenient axes of attack of 
his tanks are along the roads Stepanovo, Hill 119.2; Stepanovo, 
Ivanovo. The possibility of tanks bypassing Hill 136.8 from the 
north is not precluded. 
  The presence of marshy sectors in the gap with 4th MRC and 
ahead of the south slopes of Ploskaya Hill will hamper the enemy 
in using tanks on these axes. 
  Enemy air and helicopter strikes should be expected from the 
Kruglaya Grove, Pridorozhnaya Grove and the Stepanovo, Dlinnaya 
Hill axes. 
  5th MRC with 1st TP and the grenade launcher squad is 
shifting to defense of the strongpoint of north slopes of Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Kedrovka, having the FEBA along the line 
lone house, bushes on south slopes of Hill 136.8, west edge of 
Gustaya Grove, Ploskaya, rocks. The company is concentrating 
main efforts on the axis Hill 80.1, Kedrovka and on firmly 
holding Hill 136.8, Dlinnaya Hill with the mission of preventing 
penetration of enemy tanks and infantry. Zone of fire: on 
right--lone house, north edge of Kruglaya Grove; on left--rocks, 
Hill 74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in direction of 
ruins. Company fire concentration sectors: SO-1--rocks, bushes; 
SO-2--lone tree, curve in road. 
  3rd MRP with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
tanks Nos 206 and 207 is to defend strongpoint of lone house, 
bushes on south slopes of Hill 136.8, Ovalnaya Grove (excluded). 
Concentrate main efforts on the Nizkiye Bushes, Ovalnaya Grove 
axis with mission of inflicting damage on enemy by fire of all 
weapons and preventing penetration of his tanks and infantry 
along field road. Prepare one squad position in depth of 
strongpoint 100 m behind trench to strengthen stability of 
defense. Zone of fire: on right-- lone house, north edge of 
Kruglaya Grove; on left--bushes, Hill 80.1. Secondary sector of 
fire- -to right in direction of ruins. Fire concentration 
sector- -clump of trees, Barrow +2. Secure gap with 2nd MRP, 4th 
MRC by fire of BMP and light machinegun. 
  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 208 is to defend 
strongpoint of ruins, rocks, black knoll. Concentrate main 
efforts on holding Ploskaya Hill with mission of preventing 
penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in direction of clump of 
trees, Sukhaya Grove. Have squad positions in one trench. Zone 
of fire: on right--ruins, Nizkiye Bushes; on left--rocks, Hill 
74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in direction of Barrow 
+2. Fire concentration sector--clump of birches, corner of green 
field. Secure gap with 3rd MRP by fire of tank and light 
machinegun. 
  1st MRP is the second echelon and is to defend strongpoint 
of 
pine on north slopes of Dlinnaya Hill, field road, Kedrovka, 
having the FEBA along west slopes of Dlinnaya Hill. Mission: 
prevent penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in direction of 
Gustaya Grove, Kedrovka. Have one squad position in depth of 
strongpoint 150 m behind trench. Zone of fire: on right--pine, 
clump of birches; on left--knoll, curve in road. Secondary 
sector of fire--to right in direction of Ovalnaya Grove. Fire 
concentration sector-- southeast edge of Gustaya Grove. 
  1st TP is to prevent penetration of enemy tanks in direction 
of Hill 80.1, Dlinnaya Hill. Have tank firing positions as 
follows: No 206 near bushes on north slopes of Hill 136.8. 
Primary sector of fire--east edge of Kruglaya Grove, Nizkiye 
Bushes; secondary--to right in direction of ruins. Alternate 
firing position near knoll. Primary sector of fire--Redkaya 
Grove, rocks; secondary--to right in direction of bushes in 
marsh. No 207- -near wide bush on south slopes of Hill 136.8. 
Primary sector of fire-- felled area, Hill 80.1; secondary--to 
left in direction of clump of birches. Alternate firing position 
near knoll on east slopes of Hill 136.8. Sector of fire--Hill 
129.0, lone tree; secondary--to right in direction of Hill 
119.2. No 208--near knoll on north slopes of Ploskaya Hill. 
Primary sector of fire-- Nizkiye Bushes, north outskirts of 
Stepanovo; secondary--to left in direction of Hill 74.5. 
Alternate firing position--200 m southeast of primary firing 
position. Sector of fire--south outskirts of Stepanovo, Hill 
99.8; secondary- -to left in direction of Kamennaya Hill (not on 
diagram). Platoon fire concentration sector--Nizkiye Bushes, 
ruins. 
  Commence-fire lines: ATGM's--Dubovaya Grove, dairy farm; 
tanks--Grusha Hill, Hill 74.5; BMP guns and machineguns--east 
edge of Kruglaya Grove, Hill 80.1, lone tree; prepare zone of 
continuous fire along line Redkaya Grove, Barrow +2, Pit -3. 
  The company armored group consists of 1st MRP fighting 
vehicles. By 1400 hours 17 June it concentrates in Pridorozhnaya 
Grove in readiness to destroy enemy tanks. I will assign 
missions personally. Group commander is deputy commander of 1st 
MRP. Tank No 207 will operate in a fire ambush; ambush site near 
ruins on north slopes of Hill 80.1. 
  Begin engineer preparation of strongpoints immediately as 
they are occupied by the platoons and as missions are assigned. 
First and second trenches will be dug mechanically from 1040 
until 1400 hours. Complete first- order work by 1030 17 June, 
second-order by 0400 19 June. Combat engineer subunits begin 
laying minefields ahead of strongpoints of 2nd and 3rd MRP's 
from 1220 hours; No 1 extending 200 m in sector of grassy knoll, 
ditch; No 2 extending 450 m in sector of broken birch, 100 m 
west of Sosnovaya Grove, pit; No 3 extending 250 m ahead of 
right flank of 1st MRP. It is planned to make an AT ditch by 
explosive method ahead of right flank of 3rd MRP. A mined abatis 
is being emplaced on road in Sosnovaya Grove. 1st MRP commander 
is to place five persons at the disposal of the combat engineer 
subunit commander from 1820 until 1900 hours. 
  A passage will be left in the minefield along the road ahead 
of the 3rd MRP frontage for passage of our withdrawing troop 
subunits. Commanders of 2nd and 3rd MRP's are to be ready to 
provide fire cover for the combat engineers' work of laying 
minefields. Ammunition supply point and company medical aid 
station are in Malaya Grove. Company COP is on northwest slopes 
of Dlinnaya Hill as of 1025. 
  [Begin side line] After completing ground reconnaissance 
work, the company commander issued a verbal operation order on 
Dlinnaya Hill and organized coordination. 
  In the operation order for defense the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: 
  First paragraph--brief conclusions from enemy 
estimate. 
  Second paragraph--objectives and targets to be 
engaged by senior commander's weapons ahead of the company 
(battalion) defense frontage, and missions of adjacent subunits. 
  Third paragraph--company (battalion) combat 
mission and the commander's concept. 
  Fourth paragraph--combat missions are assigned 
following the words "I order": 
  --For first echelon platoons (companies)--means of 
reinforcement; strongpoints and axes for concentrating main 
efforts; missions for repelling an attack and destroying an 
enemy who has penetrated the defense; number of trenches and 
their trace; zones of fire, secondary sectors of fire and fire 
concentration sectors; with what forces and assets to secure 
flanks, boundaries and gaps and who is responsible for them; who 
is supporting; 
  --For second echelon platoon (company)--the very 
same as for first echelon platoons (companies), and for the 
company in addition the axes and deployment lines for 
counterattacks; for the TC and BMP- equipped MRC in addition, 
lines of firing positions; 
  --For reserve--strongpoint (concentration area), 
missions to be ready to execute; for the TC and BMP-equipped MRC 
in addition, lines of firing positions; 
  --For armored group--makeup, area and time of 
assembly in it, lines of firing positions and missions to be 
ready to execute; 
  --For fire ambush--makeup, location, missions for 
destroying an attacking enemy and procedure of operations after 
performing the mission; 
  --For attached artillery subunits and the mortar 
(artillery) battery--procedure for providing fire support 
of combat security outpost, missions for fire damage of enemy on 
his approach to FEBA, his deployment, his launching of the 
attack and his penetration of the defense, and for support of 
second echelon counterattack; and primary and alternate 
(temporary) firing positions; 
  --For grenade launcher subunit--missions for 
supporting first echelon companies and repelling an enemy 
infantry assault; primary and alternate positions, zone of fire, 
secondary sector of fire, fire concentration sectors and 
defensive fire lines; 
  --For AT subunit--place in battle formation and 
direction of possible operations, deployment lines, procedure 
for occupying them and missions to be ready to execute; signals 
for commencing and ceasing fire, procedure of operations after 
performing the mission; 
  --For air defense subunit--missions, launch 
(firing) positions, sectors for reconnaissance of the air enemy 
and conduct of fire, time and degree of readiness, procedure for 
conducting fire; 
  --For subunit assigned to combat security outpost- 
-position, mission, what weapons assigned for support, procedure 
for calling in their fire, and procedure for withdrawal. 
  Fifth paragraph--expenditure of missiles and 
ammunition for conducting defensive battle. 
  Sixth paragraph--readiness time to perform the 
combat mission, time of occupying the defense, readiness time of 
system of fire and engineer obstacles, sequence and time periods 
for performing measures of maskirovka and engineer preparation 
of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  Seventh paragraph--place and time of deployment of 
COP, and the deputies. [End side line] 
  Operation order 
  1. Enemy is concentrating subunits and units in assembly 
areas for the attack 70 km from the defensive line. Launching of 
an attack is possible on the morning of 18 June, and arrival of 
forward subunits at the defensive line by 1330-1400 hours and of 
the main body by 1500-1600 hours 18 June. Operations of his 
aviation and raiding and reconnaissance parties are possible at 
any time. 
  2. Subunits of 1/3 MRR are operating in front in the 
security 
zone with the mission of holding up the enemy, forcing him to 
deploy, inflicting losses on him and gaining time for preparing 
the defense. 
  The enemy is engaged by air strikes and by concentrated and 
defensive fire of the senior commander's artillery during battle 
in the security zone, his approach to the defense, his 
deployment and his assault. 
  4th MRC is defending on Hill 137.0 on right with the mission 
of preventing enemy penetration in direction of Grusha 
Hill, Kuskovo. 
  On the left 1st MRC, 1st MRB is defending the strongpoint of 
Tankovaya Hill, cemetery (not on diagram), 
Karevo with the mission of preventing enemy 
penetration in direction of Hill 99.8, Karevo (not on 
diagram). 
  3. 5th MRC with 2nd TP and grenade launcher squad is 
shifting 
to defense of the strongpoint of north slopes of Hill 136.8, 
Ploskaya Hill, Kedrovka with the mission 
of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in 
direction of Stepanovo, Kedrovka. Have FEBA (first 
trench) along line of barn, bushes, west edge of 
Gustaya Grove, west slopes of Ploskaya 
Hill, rocks; second trench--west slopes of Hill 129.0, west 
slopes of Dlinnaya Hill, east edge of 
Malaya Grove. Zone of fire: on right--lone tree, 
north edge of Kruglaya Grove; on left--rocks, lone 
tree. Secondary sectors of fire--to right in direction of ruins. 
Company fire concentration sectors: SO- 1--rocks, bushes; 
SO-2--lone tree, curve in road. 
  1st Battery of regimental artillery battalion is supporting. 
  I decided: concentrate main efforts on axis Stepanovo, 
Kedrovka while firmly holding Hill 136.8, 
Dlinnaya Hill. 
  Exploiting results of the senior commander's air strikes and 
artillery fire and taking advantage of favorable terrain 
conditions, inflict damage on the enemy and repel his assault by 
the fire of tanks, BMP's and small arms beginning with the line 
Dubovaya Grove, dairy farm and as he approaches the 
FEBA. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the strongpoint, firmly hold 
Hill 136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill, 
inflict damage on him and destroy him by flanking and cross fire 
of all weapons and by operations of fire ambushes and the 
armored group from occupied and alternate positions. 
  Align battle formation in two echelons: 2nd and 3rd MRP's 
reinforced by a TP and grenade launcher squad in first echelon 
and 1st MRP in second. 
  Mislead the enemy regarding alignment of the battle 
formation 
by creating a dummy platoon strongpoint in the center of the 
battle formation, tank and BMP firing positions simulating their 
real position, and a ramified system of trenches and 
communication trenches. 
  4. I order: 
  3rd MRP with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
tanks Nos 206 and 207 is to defend strongpoint of lone tree, 
bushes on south slopes of Hill 136.8, Ovalnaya Grove 
(excluded) with mission of preventing enemy penetration along 
road. Concentrate main efforts on axis of Nizkiye 
Bushes, Ovalnaya Grove. Have FEBA along line of lone 
tree, bushes. Battle formation is in two lines. 
  Zone of fire: on right--lone tree, north edge of 
Kruglaya Grove; on left--bushes, Hill 80.1. Secondary 
sector of fire--to right in direction of ruins. Fire 
concentration sector--clump of trees, Barrow +2. Secure gap with 
adjacent subunit on right by fire of BMP and light machinegun. 
  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 208 is to defend 
strongpoint of ruins, rocks, black knoll. Concentrate main 
efforts on holding Ploskaya Hill with mission of 
preventing enemy penetration in direction of clump of trees, 
Sukhaya Grove. Have FEBA along west slopes of 
Ploskaya Hill. Have battle formation in a line. Zone 
of fire: on right--ruins, Nizkiye Bushes; on 
left--rocks, Hill 74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in 
direction of Barrow +2. Platoon fire concentration sector--clump 
of birches, corner of green field. Secure gap with 3rd MRP by 
fire of tank and light machinegun. 2nd MRP commander is 
responsible. 
  1st MRP is the second echelon and is to defend strongpoint 
of 
pine on north slopes of Dlinnaya Hill, field road, 
Kedrovka with mission of preventing enemy penetration 
in direction of Gustaya Grove, Kedrovka. 
Concentrate main efforts on right flank, have trench on west 
slope of Dlinnaya Hill. Battle formation in two 
lines. Zone of fire: on right--pine, clump of birches; on 
left--knoll, curve in road. Secondary sector of fire--to right 
in direction of Ovalnaya Grove. Fire concentration 
sector-- southeast edge of Gustaya Grove. 
  1st TP is to prevent penetration of enemy tanks in direction 
of Hill 80.1, Dlinnaya Hill by fire from occupied 
positions. Have tank firing positions as follows: 206--near 
bushes on north slopes of Hill 136.8. Primary sector of 
fire--east edge of Kruglaya Grove, Nizkiye 
Bushes; secondary sector of fire--to right in direction of 
ruins. Alternate firing position--near knoll. Primary sector of 
fire-- Redkaya Grove, rocks; secondary--to right in 
direction of bushes in marsh. 207--near wide bush on south 
slopes of Hill 136.8. Primary sector of fire--felled area, Hill 
80.1; secondary--to left in direction of clump of birches. 
Alternate firing position--near knoll on east slopes of Hill 
136.8. Primary sector of fire--Hill 129.0, lone tree; 
secondary--to right in direction of Hill 119.2. 208--near knoll 
on north slopes of Ploskaya Hill. Primary sector of 
fire--Nizkiye Bushes, north edge of 
Stepanovo; secondary--to left in direction of Hill 
74.5. Alternate firing position--200 m southeast of primary 
firing position. Primary sector of fire--south edge of 
Stepanovo, Kamennaya Hill. Platoon fire 
concentration sector--Nizkiye Bushes, ruins. 
  Company armored group consists of 1st MRP BMP's. Assemble in 
Pridorozhnaya Grove by 1400 hours 17 June in 
readiness to destroy enemy tanks from dummy strongpoint, close 
breaches formed as a result of enemy fire strikes, and cover gap 
between 3rd and 2nd MRP's; operate in own strongpoints and from 
following lines of firing positions: No 1--bushes on south 
slopes of Hill 136.8, lone tree; No 2--south slopes of 
Dlinnaya Hill, Malaya Grove. Group 
commander is deputy commander of 1st MRP. 
  Fire ambush is Tank No 207, ambush site is near ruins. On 
north slopes of Hill 80.1 be ready to inflict damage on enemy 
tanks by direct fire, prevent their organized deployment into 
battle formation, and occupy firing position on south slopes of 
Hill 136.8. 
  5. Ammunition expenditure for performing combat mission is 
0.7 unit of fire for tanks and BMP's and 0.4 unit of fire for 
small arms. 
  6. Occupy defense by 1030 hours 16 June. Readiness of system 
of fire 1120 16 June, system of engineer obstacles by 0700 17 
June, and first-order engineer work by 1030 17 June. 
  7. Company COP is on northwest slopes of Dlinnaya 
Hill as of 1025 hours. Deputy is 1st MRP commander. 
  [Begin side line] After assigning combat missions, the 
company (battalion) commander organizes coordination, the 
system of fire, C[.sup]2[/], and protection against mass 
destruction and precision weapons. 
  The commander organizes coordination by missions, probable 
axes of enemy attack, time, and place by running through the 
main tactical episodes in terms of possible actions of his 
subunits. All work is done with the involvement of commanders of 
subordinate and attached subunits by the method of instructions 
or the method of subordinate commanders' reports with a 
successive rehearsal of actions of all subunits. 
  When time is extremely limited, especially when shifting to 
the defense in direct contact with the enemy, the commander 
usually organizes coordination by the method of instructions. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
coordinates actions of platoons (companies) among themselves and 
with actions of the armored group, fire ambushes, subunits of 
artillery and other weapons, and adjacent subunits for 
destroying the enemy during his forward movement to the FEBA, 
when he deploys, when he launches the assault (in the attack 
position), and when repelling an assault of enemy tanks and 
infantry during penetration of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  The company (battalion) commander indicates (updates) the 
following for engaging the enemy during his forward movement, 
when deploying and when launching an attack (or in the attack 
position): fire missions for artillery subunits, grenade 
launcher subunit, AT subunit and other weapons for destroying 
the enemy; procedure for actions of subunits defending a forward 
position (combat security outpost position) with actions of 
first echelon platoons (companies) and subunits of attached and 
supporting artillery for holding a forward position (combat 
security outpost position), and the procedure for withdrawal of 
subunits defending it; procedure for actions of duty tanks, 
BMP's (BTR's) and other weapons (which ones to assign from whom 
and to where) and subunits for destroying individual enemy 
groups attempting to perform reconnaissance, breach obstacles or 
penetrate into the depth of the defense. 
  In organizing coordination for repelling an enemy tank and 
infantry assault ahead of the FEBA, the company (battalion) 
commander determines (updates) the following: fire missions for 
artillery, grenade launcher subunit and AT subunit for 
destroying (neutralizing) the enemy ahead of the FEBA, on flanks 
and in gaps between strongpoints; procedure for conducting 
observation and for subunits to move out of cover; commence-fire 
line for tanks, BMP's, ATGM launchers, grenade launchers and 
other AT weapons, as well as platoon (company) fire 
concentration sectors on the most important axes and the 
procedure for conducting fire; procedure for actions of first 
and second echelon platoons (companies) with actions of the 
armored group, artillery subunits, grenade launcher subunit, AT 
subunit, attached combat engineer subunit, subunits (weapons) 
operating in fire ambushes, and roving weapons for repelling 
enemy tank and infantry assaults, cutting off infantry from 
tanks, destroying the enemy ahead of the FEBA, on flanks, in 
gaps and on boundaries with adjacent subunits and when he 
penetrates the defense, and combating enemy airborne assault 
forces; procedure for commencing and conducting fire against 
enemy aircraft and helicopters by air defense and motorized 
rifle (tank) subunits; methods and signals for recognition of 
friendly aircraft and helicopters and for marking one's 
position; procedure for actions of forward air controllers and 
recognition and identification posts (points). 
  To destroy the enemy on an axis of possible penetration, the 
company (battalion) commander indicates (specifies) the 
following: missions for artillery and weapons to destroy a 
penetrated enemy and the procedure for performing them; terrain 
sector which must be held firmly to prevent a further spread of 
the enemy into the depth and toward the flanks, and with what 
subunits to hold it; procedure for actions of subunits and 
conduct of fire. 
  In organizing coordination by axes of counterattacks to be 
conducted by the battalion (regimental) commander, the company 
(battalion) commander indicates axes of counterattacks and 
missions for subunits intended for destroying the enemy by fire 
of company (battalion) assets during forward movement and 
deployment of counterattacking subunits, and actions of company 
subunits when they launch an assault. 
  The content of questions to be decided in organizing 
coordination can vary. In each specific case it will be 
determined by situation conditions, time available and the 
commander's experience. [End side line] 
  Coordination instructions 
  In destroying the enemy during his forward 
movement toward the FEBA and his deployment: aircraft and 
artillery neutralize him on forward movement routes and 
deployment lines under the senior commander's plan; with the 
beginning of enemy fire preparation, at the signal Grom 
[Thunder] or a series of red flares, shelter personnel in 
covered slit trenches (dugouts), in readiness to quickly take 
their places at positions to repel the assault; observers, duty 
weapons and squad and platoon commanders remain to observe the 
enemy; BMP and tank crews are in the vehicles; with the enemy's 
arrival at the line Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0 artillery 
inflicts damage on him by fire concentration against sectors 201 
(edge of Dubovaya Grove), 202 (where road exits Berezovyy 
forest), and 203 (intersection of field roads), neutralizing his 
personnel and weapons; the company destroys his armored 
vehicles, above all tanks, by ATGM and tank fire. The TP is in 
readiness to conduct concentrated fire at the signal Udar 
[Strike]-111 or a green flare; as the enemy approaches the 
forward edge of the company strongpoint, artillery neutralizes 
him by concentrated fire and the company destroys enemy tanks by 
fire of tanks, ATGM's and BMP guns, and destroys dismounted 
infantry by machinegun fire. 
  In performing the mission of repelling an enemy tank and 
infantry assault ahead of the FEBA: aircraft continue 
to deliver strikes against enemy artillery and second echelons; 
with the enemy's arrival at the line of east slopes of Grusha 
Hill, west edge of Stepanovo, at the signal "To battle" or a 
series of green flares, personnel occupy positions and make 
ready to repel the assault, and artillery and mortars inflict 
damage on tanks and other armored vehicles and place the enemy 
battle formation in disarray by standing barrier fire against 
lines Sosna [Pine] and Bereza [Birch] and by rolling barrier 
fire Tigr [Tiger]; when the enemy launches an assault tanks and 
BMP's destroy enemy tanks and APC's by fire of guns and ATGM's. 
At the signal Udar [Strike]-111 or a green flare, 2nd and 3rd 
MRP's conduct concentrated fire from all kinds of small arms and 
the armored group destroys enemy tanks by BMP fire from the 
dummy strongpoint; as the enemy approaches the FEBA, fire of all 
company weapons is brought to highest intensity; tanks are 
destroyed by fire of BMP's, tanks and RPG's; enemy infantry is 
cut off from tanks and destroyed by small arms and machinegun 
fire; the armored group continues to destroy enemy tanks and at 
the signal Shtorm [Gale]-555 occupies the disposition area; 
infantry which has penetrated the forward edge of platoon 
strongpoints is to be destroyed by point-blank fire and grenades 
and in hand-to- hand combat, and tanks are to be destroyed by 
RPG's and by BMP and tank guns. 
  In performing the mission of destroying an enemy who has 
penetrated the company strongpoint: aircraft and 
artillery engage second echelons and neutralize enemy COP's, 
artillery and mortars; in case the enemy penetrates the company 
strongpoint between 3rd and 2nd MRP, artillery neutralizes his 
personnel and weapons by concentrated fire; at the signal Udar 
[Strike]-111 or a green flare 1st MRP commences fire against the 
fire concentration sector, and the BMP destroys tanks and APC's; 
firmly holding platoon strongpoints, 3rd and 2nd MRP's repulse 
the assault ahead of the FEBA. The penetrated enemy is destroyed 
by flanking fire of squads, tanks, BMP's and machineguns and is 
not permitted to spread out laterally and into the depth; the 
armored group occupies Line No 1 or 2. 
  When enemy tanks and infantry wedge into the gap with 
4th MRC: artillery neutralizes his personnel and weapons by 
concentrated fire and prohibits envelopment of the 3rd MRP 
strongpoint; firmly holding the north slopes of Hill 136.8, 3rd 
MRP neutralizes the enemy by fire of all weapons in coordination 
with 4th MRC, destroying his tanks and APC's above all. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the gap with 1st MRC 
on the left flank: artillery neutralizes enemy personnel and 
weapons by concentrated fire and places his battle formation in 
disarray; firmly holding Ploskaya Hill and repelling the enemy 
assault from the front, 2nd MRP destroys the penetrated enemy by 
fire of the left-flank squad, BMP's and tanks from the alternate 
firing position in coordination with 1st MRC; 1st MRP is in 
readiness to destroy enemy tanks and infantry which have 
penetrated by fire from the occupied strongpoint. 
  In conducting a counterattack with the battalion 
second echelon: artillery neutralizes the penetrated enemy 
between strongpoints of 2nd and 3rd MRP's and his tanks are 
destroyed by helicopters; firmly holding the strongpoints, 2nd 
and 3rd MRP's inflict damage on the enemy by fire, not 
permitting him to spread out into the depth and toward the 
flanks; 1st MRP destroys the penetrated enemy by fire of all 
weapons and supports the forward movement, deployment and 
assault of 6th MRC. When 6th MRC launches a counterattack, 1st 
MRP assaults the enemy together with it and restores the defense 
along the FEBA. 
  Signals: 

  -  warning: warning of immediate threat and 
beginning of enemy use of mass destruction weapons--"Uragan 
[Hurricane]"; radioactive contamination--"Radiatsionnaya 
opasnost [Radiation Danger]"; chemical and biological 
(bacteriological) contamination--"Khimicheskaya trevoga 
[Chemical Alert]," chemical attack alarm flare; air 
enemy--"Vozdukh [Air]"; 
  -  control and coordination: 
take cover--"Grom [Thunder]," series of red flares; occupy 
positions--"K boyu [To battle]"; request artillery fire-- 
"Perekat [Leapfrog]-333"; armored group change of positions 
(line)--"Shtorm [Gale]-555"; commence concentrated fire--"Udar 
[Strike]- 111," green flare. 

  [Begin side line] Subsequently the company (battalion) 
commander gives instructions on main questions of comprehensive 
support. [End side line] 
  Reconnaissance instructions 
  Conduct reconnaissance by observation, having lookouts for 
the ground and air enemy in each platoon. 1st MRP commander is 
to assign two persons by 1040 hours for organizing observation 
at the company COP. I will assign the mission personally. 
  Concentrate main reconnaissance efforts in the direction of 
Stepanovo, Berezovyy Forest for performing the following 
missions: promptly establish the enemy's forward movement and 
deployment, the makeup of his subunits ahead of the company 
defense frontage and on flanks, artillery and mortar firing 
positions, and forward movement of reserves in direction of 
Berezovyy Forest, Stepanovo. Organize observation after 
receiving the mission. Report reconnaissance results to me at 
the COP. 
  Instructions on protection against mass 
destruction weapons 
  In determining locations of covered slit trenches and 
preparing dugouts, platoon commanders are to use protective 
properties of the terrain (reverse hillslopes, hollows). 
  Warning signals: warning of immediate threat and 
beginning of enemy use of mass destruction weapons--"Grom 
[Thunder]," radioactive contamination-- "Radiatsionnaya opasnost 
[Radiation Danger]," chemical, biological (bacteriological) 
contamination--"Khimicheskaya trevoga [Chemical Alert]," air 
attack--"Vozdukh [Air]." 
  Give warning signals by radio and voice and duplicate by 
chemical attack alarm flare and rapid honking of vehicle horns. 
  When the enemy employs mass destruction weapons, personnel 
are to make use of individual and collective protective gear. 
Perform partial decontamination without ceasing to fight and 
perform complete decontamination and radiological 
decontamination of emplacements with my permission. 
  Maskirovka instructions 
  Platoon commanders are to use concealing properties of 
terrain for maskirovka of strongpoints and defensive works. 
Camouflage combat equipment using authorized means of maskirovka 
and local materials. Complete performance of maskirovka measures 
in the course of engineer preparation by 0600 hours 17 June. 
  At night do not permit bonfires to be lit or vehicles to 
move 
with headlights on. 
  All radio equipment operates only on receive before the 
beginning of battle. 
  Engineer support instructions 
  Prepare the following at positions and in strongpoints: by 
2400 hours 16 June- -two-man foxholes for riflemen and 
emplacements for machinegunners, grenade launcher operators and 
snipers, and emplace obstacles ahead of FEBA, in gaps and on 
flanks; by 0600 hours 17 September [sic]--squad emplacements and 
emplacements for tanks, BMP's and other weapons; by day's 
end--covered slit trenches for squads and a platoon dugout. 
  Prepare timbers for protective emplacements and covered slit 
trenches in groves in the depth of platoon strongpoints. 
  Mixed minefields will be laid ahead of the company defense 
frontage by forces of the combat engineer platoon from 1200 to 
2300 hours 16 June. Emplace concealed obstacles on company 
flanks by 2nd and 3rd MRP personnel. 
  Chemical support instructions 
  Conduct radiological, chemical and nonspecific biological 
(bacteriological) reconnaissance in platoon strongpoints by 
observers and by the crews of BMP's (BTR's), and at the company 
COP by the chemical observer. 
  Platoon commanders are to take readings from dose rate 
meters 
by day's end. 
  Perform partial decontamination in strongpoints by your own 
forces at my command. Perform decontamination immediately when 
contaminated by chemical agents. 
  From 2100 to 2200 hours platoon commanders are to check 
availability and serviceability of individual protective gear 
and the technical condition of protective masks. 
  Technical and logistic support instructions 
  Platoon commanders are to perform daily routine servicing 
and 
maintenance of weapons and military vehicles and complete it by 
0930 hours 16 June. Check operation of night vision devices. 
Perform routine servicing and maintenance on each vehicle in 
turn. 
  Company first sergeant is to deploy ammunition supply point 
on south slopes of Dlinnaya Hill by 1400 hours. Finish refueling 
combat equipment by 0900 hours 16 June. 
  Ammunition expenditure: small arms 0.4 unit of fire; BMP and 
tank guns 0.7 unit of fire; fuel 0.1 fueling. In the course of 
battle evacuate wounded to company aid station in vicinity of 
Dlinnaya Hill by riflemen- medics. 
  [Begin side line] Based on work done to organize for battle, 
the company (battalion) commander works out a diagram of the 
company strongpoint (battalion defense area). It is recommended 
doing this on a sheet of Whatman paper, which should be marked 
out in advance as a formatted document and have a [legend] 
border, commander's signature, and date to save time in 
preparing the diagram. 
  The company strongpoint diagram shows the 
following (Diagram 5): reference points, their numbers, names 
and distances to them; enemy situation; company zone of fire; 
platoon strongpoints, their zones of fire and secondary sectors 
of fire; primary and alternate firing positions of BMP's 
(BTR's), tanks, and AT, flamethrower and air defense weapons; 
firing positions and sectors of fire of weapons supporting 
company flanks and gaps between platoon strongpoints, and on the 
MRC strongpoint diagram also those of attached tanks; fire 
concentration sectors of the company and of each platoon; 
commence-fire lines for tanks, BMP's, ATGM systems and other 
weapons; concentration area and lines of firing positions of 
armored group; positions and maneuver routes of roving weapons; 
locations of fire ambushes; engineer obstacles and 
fortifications; passages in obstacles for roving weapons and 
weapons operating in fire ambushes; places of deployment of 
technical observation post, ammunition supply point and company 
aid station; COP locations of company and platoons and 
disposition of MRC motor vehicles. In addition, the TC 
strongpoint diagram indicates positions of the attached 
motorized rifle subunit and the system of fire of its weapons. 
  The strongpoint diagram and defense area diagram are plans 
for conducting defensive battle; copies of them are submitted to 
the battalion commander and regimental commander respectively. 
  The battalion defense area diagram usually shows 
the following: reference points; enemy situation; combat 
security outpost position; company and platoon strongpoints, 
their zones of fire and fire concentration sectors, and 
commence-fire lines against the enemy for tanks, BMP's, ATGM 
systems, grenade launchers and other weapons; situation of 
adjacent subunits and boundaries with them; firing positions and 
sectors of fire of weapons supporting battalion flanks and gaps 
between company strongpoints; concentration areas and lines of 
firing positions of armored groups; positions and maneuver 
routes of roving weapons; firing positions and fire missions of 
artillery subunits, air defense subunit, grenade launcher 
subunit and other weapons directly subordinate to the battalion 
commander; locations of fire ambushes; axes of counterattacks 
and deployment lines of second echelon company (reserve), and 
for the TC and BMP-equipped MRC in addition, the lines of firing 
positions. The following should be plotted on the diagram: main 
fortifications and engineer obstacles; passages in obstacles for 
armored groups, subunits (weapons) operating in fire ambushes, 
and roving weapons; locations of technical support and logistic 
subunits, motor vehicles of motorized rifle subunits, and COP's 
of the battalion and companies. Lines of deployment (minelaying) 
of the regimental AT reserve (mobile obstacle detachment) and 
fire missions of organic and attached artillery may be indicated 
within the battalion defense area, ahead of its frontage and on 
the flanks. 
  Firing positions and sectors of fire of tanks, BMP's, and 
AT, 
air defense and other weapons are indicated on the diagram in 
addition with advance preparation of the defense. [End side line] 
  Work of preparing subunits for battle 
  Preparing subunits to perform a combat mission is a very 
important measure taken by the commander in preparing the 
defense. It includes the following: bringing it up to strength 
in personnel and creating prescribed reserves of missiles, 
ammunition, fuel and other supplies; immediate preparation of 
commanders and personnel for performing the combat mission, and 
of weapons and vehicles for combat employment; conduct of 
political work with personnel and tactical exercises (drills) 
with subunits as applied to the nature of the upcoming battle. 
  A defense can be occupied and the battle formation and 
system 
of fire can be created under various situation conditions. The 
defense is occupied covertly in a short time out of direct 
contact with the enemy. Subunits occupy their indicated 
strongpoints, prepare the system of fire and carry out engineer 
preparation of strongpoints (defense areas). 
  When shifting to the defense in direct contact with the 
enemy, special attention is given to creating a battle formation 
and a system of fire and engineer obstacles in a short time 
above all on the probable axis of attack of the enemy main body 
in accordance with the company (battalion) commander's decision, 
and it is also given to maskirovka and fortification of the 
strongpoint (defense area) being occupied. 
  In all cases when shifting to the defense, a company 
(battalion) constantly must be ready to repel an enemy surprise 
attack and strikes by his aircraft, helicopters and 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, and to destroy airborne assault 
forces and airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance parties. 
  Engineer preparation of the strongpoint (defense 
area) is a set of measures taken to adapt the terrain for 
fighting and to create conditions contributing to successful 
performance of missions by defending subunits which hamper the 
enemy attack and reduce the effectiveness of his weapons. 
  Engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area) 
includes 
the following: creation of an obstacle plan; construction of 
fortifications (emplacements, trenches, communication trenches, 
slit trenches, dugouts, ditches, escarpments, counterscarps, 
dragons' teeth and so on); preparation of weapon positions; 
preparation of COP's and locations (disposition areas) of rear 
subunits; preparation of maneuver; preparation of water supply 
points (water diversion [vodozabornyy] points) and other 
measures. 
  Two trenches, MRP strongpoints, positions of organic and 
attached weapons of the company, the company COP, ammunition 
supply point and aid station are prepared in the MRC strongpoint. 
  Three or four trenches, company strongpoints, firing 
positions of the mortar battery, grenade launcher subunit and 
air defense subunit, battalion COP, battalion aid station, 
disposition area of the support platoon, and also firing 
positions for tank subunits assigned for reinforcement, lines of 
firing positions of a TC (BMP-equipped MRC) in the second 
echelon (reserve), and lines of firing positions and 
concentration areas of armored groups are prepared in the MRB 
defense area. 
  Trenches and strongpoints of platoons (companies) are 
interconnected by a system of communication trenches to the full 
depth of the defense area (strongpoint). 
  Engineer preparation of the strongpoint (defense area) 
begins 
immediately after positions are specified for subunits and 
weapons and the system of fire is organized. In some cases it 
begins even before occupation of the defense, is done to the 
full extent when subunits occupy strongpoints, and continues 
without let-up in the course of the entire defensive battle. It 
is accomplished simultaneously to the full depth of the defense 
in a sequence ensuring constant readiness of subunits to repel 
an enemy attack and protect them against all weapons, and it is 
done covertly, with full exertion of efforts and maximum use of 
prefabricated fortification structures, constructions and local 
building materials. 
  Engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area) is done 
with wide use of heavy equipment out of direct contact with the 
enemy. 
  In first order engineer obstacles are arranged 
ahead of the combat security outpost position and FEBA, and 
fields of view and fire are cleared; emplacements are dug for 
MRS's and for tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and other weapons; structures 
are built for the COP and aid station; covered slit trenches are 
made for each squad, crew or team; sectors of continuous 
trenches are created in platoon and company strongpoints; and 
weapons and vehicles are camouflaged against reconnaissance and 
for protection against enemy precision weapons. In addition, 
obstacles are emplaced in gaps between subunits, on flanks and 
in the depth of the defense; lines of firing positions are 
prepared for the TC (TB) and BMP-equipped MRC (MRB) in the 
second echelon (reserve), and forward movement routes to these 
lines of deployment for counterattacks are prepared; and water 
supply points (water diversion points) are prepared. 
  In second order company and platoon strongpoints 
are additionally equipped, emplacements are dug for tanks, BMP's 
(BTR's) and other weapons at alternate (temporary) firing 
positions, lines of firing positions and in armored group 
concentration areas; a system of trenches and communication 
trenches is created and upgraded from a combat and housekeeping 
standpoint in the battalion defense area; COP's and aid stations 
are additionally equipped; dugouts are made for each squad, crew 
or team, bunkers are made for each company (battery) and at the 
battalion (company) COP, and shelters are made for weapons, 
equipment, missiles, ammunition and other supplies; the main 
dummy objects are prepared in the company strongpoint (battalion 
defense area); obstacles are additionally emplaced ahead of the 
FEBA, in gaps between strongpoints and on flanks, and maneuver 
routes are prepared. 
  Subsequently a system of trenches and 
communication trenches is developed in the strongpoint (defense 
area), the system of engineer obstacles is built up, a network 
of routes for subunit maneuver, supply and evacuation is 
developed additionally, and dummy strongpoints, trenches, firing 
positions and other objects are prepared. 
  Trenches are prepared for creating a system of 
continuous flanking fire and fire ahead of the FEBA and in the 
depth of the defense, protecting personnel against enemy 
enfilade fire, improving protection against the effect of 
nuclear weapons and artillery shellbursts, and for best 
adaptation to terrain relief. Trenches are dug with a 
curvilinear, broken or staggered trace. Straight sectors (faces) 
are made 40-50 m long with mechanized digging of trenches and 
20-30 m long with manual digging. The angle between trench faces 
should be 90-120. Trenches (communication trenches) are dug 
with a varying depth depending on soil condition and time 
available: with a ditch 60 cm deep for firing from a kneeling 
position and moving at a crawl; 110 cm deep for firing from a 
standing position on the bottom of the ditch and for moving bent 
over; and standard depth with a ditch 150 cm deep for firing 
standing from a fire step and for moving upright. 
  The size of trenches (communication trenches) is 90-110 cm 
on 
top depending on soil density and trench depth. The width of the 
bottom of the ditch in standard trenches as a rule does not 
exceed 40-50 cm. 
  Communication trenches are intended for sheltered movement 
of 
personnel between trenches, positions and strongpoints and 
concealed communication with the rear. In contrast to trenches, 
which usually are dug along the front, communication trenches 
for the most part are made at an angle to the front. To protect 
personnel moving along communication trenches against enemy 
enfilade fire, the trenches are carefully adapted to terrain, 
giving them a curvilinear, staggered or broken trace from an 
overhead view. They are dug to the very same depths as trenches. 
  Primary (main) communication trenches, intended for most 
intensive movement of personnel, delivery of ammunition and food 
and evacuation of wounded, are dug 70 cm or more wide at the 
bottom and at least 150 cm deep. Other communication trenches 
are dug 40-50 cm wide at the bottom. 
  Communication trenches in the tactically most important 
sector are adapted for defense, and firing positions, weapon 
(machinegun) platforms and other structures are made in them. 
  In choosing the direction for communication trenches, try to 
conceal them from enemy observation, for which ravines, reverse 
hillslopes, hollows, bushes and so on should be used. 
  If communication trenches are made on forward hillslopes, 
they should be dug in a staggered manner, directing short 
sectors toward the enemy and long ones along the front. 
Communication trenches should not be disposed along the bottom 
of a hollow, since they will be flooded in rainy weather and 
during the snow melt. 
  Trenches and communication trenches are prepared from a 
combat, housekeeping, and sanitary standpoint to improve subunit 
fighting and resting conditions. 
  Combat preparation includes making firing positions, 
machinegun platforms, firing ports, exits, crossings, revetment, 
observation structures, very basic shelters for personnel and 
equipment, ammunition niches, widened areas, cul- de-sacs and so 
on. 
  Housekeeping and sanitary preparation of trenches and 
communication trenches includes making niches for storing food, 
water and property and making latrines, sumps, soakage pits and 
drainage ditches. 
  A company COP usually is prepared in the depth of the 
strongpoint up to 800 m from the FEBA in a place providing 
observation of terrain ahead of the front and on flanks of the 
company defense, a view of one's own strongpoint where possible, 
and convenience in controlling subunits. 
  A battalion COP is prepared where possible in an area 
difficult of access for enemy tanks immediately behind first 
echelon companies or in the vicinity of the battalion second 
echelon (reserve) strongpoint up to 2 km from the FEBA. 
  The COP location should have good protective and concealing 
properties without prominent local reference points near 
structures. 
  An open structure for observation and a bunker are made and 
two BTR (BMP, tank) emplacements are dug at the company COP 
(Fig. 5). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-58A>      Fig. 5. Company commander's COP </FIG>


  Covered and open structures for observation, a bunker, BTR 
(tank) emplacements, a BTR (BMP) emplacement and two 
emplacements for signal platoon vehicles also are made at the 
battalion COP. 
  All structures and emplacements at COP's are interconnected 
by trench sectors and with trenches by communication trenches. 
Integral assault rifle firing positions are prepared for 
fighting in trenches and communication trenches. 
  In order for the company (battalion) commander to be able to 
direct engineer preparation and monitor work progress, the 
commander (staff) should work out a calculation for engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  Subunit commanders check the promptness and correctness of 
subunit occupation of defense areas, strongpoints and positions; 
readiness of the system of fire and readiness of weapons for 
conducting fire, especially at night and under other conditions 
of limited visibility; the personnel's knowledge of their 
missions and the procedure for maintaining coordination in the 
course of battle; status and degree of readiness of engineer 
obstacles and fortification of strongpoints and subunit 
positions; readiness of the second echelon (reserve, armored 
group) for a maneuver to lines of firing positions and to 
indicated axes; fulfillment of measures for comprehensive 
support to battle and C[.sup]2[/]; and occupation of 
positions by the combat security outpost and its readiness to 
perform the combat mission. 
<H5>  5. Conduct of Defensive Battle </H5>
  Before the beginning of an enemy attack the mission of a 
first echelon company (battalion) is to destroy his individual 
groups attempting to perform reconnaissance, breach obstacles or 
penetrate into the depth of the defense, and to destroy 
low-flying enemy aircraft and helicopters. 
  This mission is performed from alternate or temporary firing 
positions by assigned duty tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and other 
weapons. When in direct contact, duty weapons in addition must 
hamper enemy movement into his disposition area and prohibit him 
from performing engineer work. For their part, snipers kill 
officers, snipers, observers, weapon teams and other enemy 
targets. The other subunits upgrade engineer preparation of 
positions, conduct combat and political training classes and 
service and maintain weapons and vehicles while maintaining 
constant readiness to repel enemy assaults. 
  The company commander gives company personnel a rest 
depending on the situation and the battalion commander's 
instructions. For this they use shelters (dugouts) near trenches 
and weapons, ready to take their places when alerted. Observers 
are posted near the shelters who warn all those resting by a 
prearranged signal, summoning them to the positions. 
  Based on personal observation and reconnaissance data, the 
company (battalion) commander must promptly establish enemy 
preparation for an attack and the beginning of his forward 
movement and deployment, report this to the senior commander, 
update missions for subordinate subunits and attached artillery, 
and place them in full readiness to repel the enemy. 
  Small enemy parties and reconnaissance subunits are 
destroyed 
by fire of the combat security outpost. The battalion commander 
directs the battle of the combat security outpost and supports 
it by fire of the battalion mortar (artillery) battery and of 
attached and supporting artillery from temporary firing 
positions. During fighting to hold the combat security outpost 
position the battalion commander moves his COP forward and 
positions it in one of the first echelon company strongpoints. 
  When major enemy forces approach the combat security outpost 
position, they are engaged not only by fire of the assigned 
platoon, but also by assigned weapons from MRC's (TC's) 
operating on the FEBA. In coordination with assigned weapons, 
the combat security outpost destroys chiefly enemy tanks and 
other armored vehicles ahead of its frontage. Assigned tanks, AT 
weapons, mortars and supporting artillery of the battalion as 
well as the senior commander's duty weapons destroy enemy tanks 
and infantry attempting to go around the combat security outpost 
and move to its flank and rear. When the enemy deploys his main 
forces and assets ahead of the defense frontage of battalions, 
by authorization of the regimental commander the battalion 
commander issues an order to the combat security outpost 
commander to disengage and withdraw, after which he moves his 
COP. The platoon's withdrawal is covered by the fire of 
artillery and assigned weapons of first echelon companies and is 
accomplished by leapfrogging, taking advantage of terrain folds, 
obstacles and aerosols (smoke). A combat security outpost 
platoon which has withdrawn takes up a position in the company 
strongpoint or is moved into the battalion reserve. 
  Reconnaissance in force and an assault by enemy forward 
subunits are repelled by fire of assigned assets and by subunits 
defending these axes. Observation of the enemy is beefed up. 
After the combat security outpost withdraws and the assault is 
repelled, weapons which have revealed themselves change 
positions covertly by direction of the company (battalion) 
commander. Passages which the enemy has made in our obstacles 
are immediately closed or, if this is impossible, the fire of 
artillery and other weapons is prepared against them. 
  If the enemy managed to penetrate the strongpoint (defense 
area) as a result of reconnaissance in force, the company 
(battalion) commander takes all steps to destroy him. 
  Fire preparation usually precedes the launching of an attack 
by the enemy main body. This period of battle is the most 
important for the company (battalion), since the most powerful 
fire strike is delivered at this time. 
  With the beginning of fire preparation or delivery of 
nuclear 
strikes by the enemy, personnel of the MRC or TC (MRB or TB) and 
of attached subunits take cover at the commanders' order or 
independently in slit trenches, dugouts, bunkers and fighting 
vehicles (tanks) and on the bottom of emplacements and trenches 
in readiness to take their places quickly at positions to repel 
an assault. In this period the commander conducts continuous 
observation and updates missions for subunits, artillery and 
other weapons for engaging detected enemy precision weapon 
assets, artillery, tanks, other armored vehicles and infantry 
moving forward or readying for an assault. At the same time he 
estimates the situation in areas of nuclear strikes and takes 
steps to close breaches in the battle formation, restore 
C[.sup]2[/] and the system of fire and coordination, and mop 
up in the aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction weapons. 
  Enemy attempts to breach engineer obstacles ahead of our 
FEBA 
in the period of fire preparation are stopped by fire of duty 
weapons. 
  After enemy fire preparation ends, main efforts of all 
forces 
and assets are concentrated on engaging tanks and mechanized 
infantry. At commanders' signals, company (battalion) subunits 
make ready to repel the enemy assault. The transfer of enemy 
artillery and mortar fire from the FEBA into the depth may serve 
as the beginning of the enemy assault. In this situation it is 
always necessary to be attentive, since the enemy may execute a 
dummy transfer of fire to force company (battalion) subunits to 
emerge from shelters and then inflict additional losses on them 
by a repeat strike of artillery, mortars and aircraft. 
Consequently, preservation of company (battalion) combat 
effectiveness and attainment of success in battle largely will 
depend on correctly determining the moment for personnel and 
combat vehicles to emerge from shelters and prepare to repel 
enemy assaults. Therefore foresight, precise operation of the 
observation and reconnaissance system, a good knowledge of enemy 
operating tactics, faultless communications and continuous 
information about enemy actions are necessary. 
  When the enemy launches an assault the company (battalion) 
commander concentrates fire of all weapons against the enemy 
main body. Organic and attached artillery inflicts damage on 
precision weapon assets, tanks and other armored vehicles by 
concentrated fire, fire against single targets, and rolling and 
standing barrier fire and, placing [battle] formations of enemy 
subunits in disarray, creates favorable conditions for their 
destruction by fire of tanks, BMP's, ATGM's and grenade 
launchers from maximum fire or launch ranges. 
  In the period of friendly air operations against an 
attacking 
enemy, artillery engages his air defense weapons, and 
recognition and identification posts and points mark friendly 
troops at the commands (signals) of subunit commanders. 
  Fire of all company (battalion) weapons is brought to 
highest 
intensity as the enemy approaches the FEBA. Defending subunits 
destroy tanks and other armored combat vehicles by the fire of 
tanks and other AT weapons. If enemy infantry assaults in 
dismounted formation, defending subunits use machinegun and 
assault rifle fire to cut infantry off from tanks and destroy it 
by fire. When enemy infantry comes to within 30-40 m of the 
FEBA, personnel of motorized rifle subunits attack it with 
grenades and destroy infantry which has penetrated the forward 
edge of subunit strongpoints by point-blank fire, grenades, and 
in hand-to-hand combat. 
  An enemy assault should be repelled ahead of the FEBA. The 
primary obligation of commanders in this period above all is 
skilled fire control. A battle is fought for each trench 
according to the principle of "not a step backward." 
  To keep the enemy from fanning out through trenches and 
communication trenches, the personnel quickly set up previously 
prepared hedgehogs, knife rests and other portable obstacles in 
them. If necessary, tanks and BMP's (BTR's) which are part of 
the armored group may move forward and take up positions in 
their own strongpoints under cover of aerosols (smoke) or using 
concealed routes. 
  The air defense subunit as well as motorized rifle (tank) 
subunits not engaged in fighting the ground enemy repel raids by 
low-flying enemy aircraft and helicopters. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the strongpoint (defense area), 
the company (battalion) commander uses the fire of all assets to 
stop him from fanning out laterally and into the depth, and 
consolidates his flanks in the penetration sector. 
  Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) which have penetrated into the depth 
of the defense are destroyed by fire of artillery, all AT 
weapons, tanks and BMP's of the company (battalion) from 
occupied positions or lines of firing positions. In addition, 
the battalion commander may move second echelon (reserve) tanks 
(BMP's) up to a line of firing positions at the spot of the 
penetration, and the AT subunit to a deployment line prepared on 
this axis. 
  When an enemy who has penetrated approaches fire ambushes, 
they commence fire suddenly at the company (battalion) 
commander's command or independently, destroying enemy tanks and 
other armored vehicles above all, and force surviving enemy 
tanks and infantry to advance in a direction unfavorable to them 
or onto previously prepared minefields. 
  Under favorable situation conditions an enemy who has 
penetrated is destroyed by a counterattack conducted until he is 
totally annihilated and the defense restored. 
  A counterattack by the second echelon (reserve) is organized 
by the battalion commander personally and usually is carried out 
(as a rule, together with the regimental second echelon) when 
insignificant enemy forces penetrate. 
  In this situation first echelon subunits use fire of all 
weapons to inflict damage on an enemy who has penetrated and, 
firmly holding favorable terrain sectors in the depth of the 
defense, prohibit an enemy advance toward the flank, thereby 
supporting forward movement and deployment of the second echelon 
for a counterattack. Battalion first echelon subunits use fire 
of all weapons to support the second echelon's counterattack or, 
by order of the commander, some of the forces counterattack 
together with it and destroy an enemy who has penetrated the 
defense. As a rule, a counterattack is conducted until the enemy 
is totally annihilated and the defense restored. The regiment 
(battalion) does not conduct a counterattack on an axis of 
attack of superior enemy forces, but defends according to the 
principle of "not a step backward." 
  An enemy who has penetrated at the boundary with an adjacent 
company (battalion) is destroyed in coordination with the 
adjacent unit by fire of all weapons and, under favorable 
situation conditions, also by a decisive counterattack. 
  If the enemy has gone around the strongpoint (defense area), 
a company (battalion) shifts to a perimeter defense and 
continues to hold occupied positions (the most important terrain 
sectors). Some weapons are moved to a threatened axis. 
  The nature of operations of a second echelon company 
(battalion) will be somewhat different. With the beginning of an 
enemy attack the company (battalion) commander must constantly 
know the situation ahead of the defense frontage and on the 
flanks and have communications with commanders of first echelon 
platoons (companies) and supporting artillery. 
  In case the enemy breaks through into the depth of the 
defense, a battalion (regimental) second echelon company 
(battalion) uses fire of all weapons from the occupied position 
to inflict decisive damage on him and stop his further advance. 
A TC (TB) and BMP-equipped MRC (MRB) move forward to a prepared 
line of firing positions if necessary. 
  On receiving an order to take part in a counterattack, the 
company (battalion) commander sends out reconnaissance and 
updates missions for subunits and weapons. Under cover of 
artillery fire and observing measures for protection against 
precision weapons, subunits quickly move forward onto the 
indicated axis, inflict damage on the enemy by fire of tanks, 
BMP's and other weapons, place his battle formations in disarray 
and, in coordination with adjacent subunits, decisively 
counterattack the enemy primarily against his flank or rear. 
  Motorized rifle subunits counterattack the enemy in BMP's or 
dismounted following tanks. 
  Great Patriotic War experience indicates that rifle subunits 
successfully destroy an enemy who has penetrated only through a 
maneuver of fire and counterattacks. 
  A battalion counterattack usually is not carried out when 
there have been heavy losses from enemy nuclear and fire strikes 
and when considerable forces of enemy tanks and mechanized 
infantry penetrate the defense. In that situation the battalion 
commander concentrates main efforts above all on destroying 
subunits attempting to take terrain sectors on whose holding 
stability of the defense depends. To this end he inflicts damage 
on the enemy by concentrated and barrier fire of artillery and 
mortars and by the fire of tanks, BMP's, BTR's, ATGM launchers 
and all assets of motorized rifle (tank) subunits and halts his 
further spread into the depth and toward the flanks. To 
consolidate flanks and reinforce the defense in the enemy 
penetration sector, he uses subunits defending on this axis, the 
battalion second echelon (reserve), AT weapons directly 
subordinate to him, the combat engineer subunit attached to the 
battalion, and forces and assets from sectors not under attack. 
  Motorized rifle (tank) subunits disposed ahead of the front, 
on flanks of the enemy penetration and in the depth destroy 
enemy tanks and mechanized infantry by fire and by stubbornly 
holding occupied positions in coordination with artillery and AT 
weapons of the battalion and with combat helicopters, and 
prohibit them from fanning out into the depth and toward the 
flanks. A battalion second echelon TC (BMP-equipped MRC) may be 
moved up to a prepared line of firing positions by order of the 
commander. 
  After repelling the assault and destroying the enemy who has 
penetrated, the company (battalion) commander takes steps for 
rapid restoration of the system of fire, replenishment of 
reserves of missiles and ammunition, and restoration of 
demolished fortifications and engineer obstacles; and organizes 
restoration of weapons and vehicles which have been disabled and 
preparation for evacuation of wounded and sick. He reports 
battle results to the senior commander. 
  A battalion (regimental) first echelon company (battalion) 
supports the counterattack by fire or, by order of the battalion 
(regimental) commander, participates in the counterattack with a 
portion of its forces, destroys the enemy who has penetrated and 
restores the position. 
  Having established the beginning of the landing of an enemy 
airborne assault force or having received a mission to destroy 
such a force, the commander of a company (battalion) which makes 
up the regiment (division) antilanding reserve sends out 
additional reconnaissance and updates (assigns) missions to 
subunits and attached weapons. The company (battalion) quickly 
moves out to the airborne assault force landing zone, deploys 
into battle formation on the move, inflicts damage on the enemy 
by fire of all weapons and completes destruction of the assault 
force by a decisive assault. 
  If the enemy airborne assault force has succeeded in 
landing, 
assembling and beginning movement toward the attack objective, 
the company (battalion) quickly moves up to the enemy, 
immobilizes him and inflicts damage by actions of fire ambushes 
and march security, and completes destruction of the assault 
force by the main body in a meeting battle. In case it fails to 
destroy the enemy airborne assault force from the move, the 
company (battalion) immobilizes him by active operations, 
inflicts damage by fire of all weapons and, after brief 
preparation, assaults the enemy again and destroys him. 
  After destroying the enemy airborne assault force the 
company 
(battalion) moves out to a designated area in readiness to 
destroy new assault forces or perform other missions. 
<H5>  6. Features of Battalion Operations in a Regimental Mobile </H5>
Defense 
  The MRB (TB) participates in a regimental mobile defense. 
The 
battalion also may conduct it independently when assigned to a 
forward detachment for defense in the security zone. 
In all cases the battalion as a rule fights at several lines, 
withdrawing successively from one to another, making wide use of 
fire ambushes, emplacing obstacles and performing demolition. To 
perform this mission a battalion may be reinforced by a TC 
(MRC), an artillery battalion, air defense subunits (a platoon), 
combat engineer subunits with obstacle assets, and flamethrower 
subunits. In the course of battle a battalion is supported by 
artillery fire and aircraft under the senior commander's plan. 
  The number of lines for conducting battle and their mutual 
distance are determined in each specific case based on the 
senior commander's concept, mission received and nature of 
terrain. Selection of lines for conducting battle must be given 
careful attention. Where possible, they should run behind 
natural barriers, be covered by engineer obstacles and have 
concealed withdrawal routes. 
  At each line the battalion occupies a defense area in which 
individual company and platoon strongpoints are created 
intercepting the most likely axes of enemy attack and supporting 
the holding of favorable terrain sectors. 
  In connection with this, the frontage of the company 
strongpoint (battalion defense area) will be somewhat larger 
than in a defense under ordinary conditions and may reach 1.5-3 
and 5-10 km respectively. The increased defense frontage will be 
achieved through increased gaps between platoon (company) 
strongpoints. 
  Based on this, the battalion battle formation may be aligned 
in one or two echelons with assignment of a reserve or an 
armored group. The bulk of organic weapons and weapons attached 
to the battalion is attached to companies. It is advisable to 
dispose weapons so there is an opportunity for the majority of 
weapons to conduct fire ahead of the front beginning from 
maximum ranges, cover gaps with adjacent strongpoints by fire, 
and cover the withdrawal of first echelon companies by the fire 
of covering-force subunits and of forward subunits moved back 
into the depth in advance. 
  In accordance with the commander's decision, a combat 
security outpost is put out in front of the battalion FEBA, a 
reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol is sent out, and 
engineer obstacles are emplaced and fire ambushes arranged on 
probable axes of enemy forward movement. 
  A battalion maneuver to a new line is made with permission 
of 
the regimental commander or of the commander who sent out the 
forward detachment. 
  Engineer obstacles will find wide use during defense in a 
security zone, with preference usually given to minefields. The 
latter are emplaced above all on likely avenues of tank 
approach, ahead of platoon and company strongpoints, in areas of 
probable deployment of enemy nuclear weapons and C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities, and on roads not covered by forward detachments but 
along which the movement of enemy troops is not precluded. 
Highway and railroad bridges across water obstacles as well as 
other structures of important economic and military significance 
are prepared for demolition. 
  The necessary number of artillery subunits is assigned for 
support of the battalion by order of the senior commander. They 
may take up temporary positions both in the security zone as 
well as within the main defensive zone depending on the distance 
of defensive lines. 
  In organizing defense at a line (in the security zone), the 
battalion commander determines the following in addition to the 
usual questions: procedure for fire engagement of the enemy from 
maximum ranges and for prohibiting a swift launching of an 
assault by his main body; possible axes of maneuver of subunits 
and fire to prevent envelopment of the battalion defense area 
(company strongpoints); procedure for disengaging (makeup of 
covering- force subunits, assembly area, and sequence for 
subunits to move to it); procedure for executing a maneuver to 
another line; locations of fire ambushes and for arranging 
obstacles and demolitions. 
  Ground reconnaissance conducted to update a decision is an 
important measure in organizing a defense which permits making a 
substantiated decision on defending a security zone. 
  A forward detachment commander usually conducts ground 
reconnaissance from one or two points. 
  In addition to the usual questions in conducting a mobile 
defense (defense in a security zone), in the course of ground 
reconnaissance the company (battalion) commander studies and 
clarifies accessible axes for operations of enemy tank and 
mechanized infantry subunits in front of each line; clarifies 
the axis for concentration of the forward detachment's main 
efforts at each line, terrain areas on whose holding stability 
of the defense at each line depends, and where platoon (company) 
strongpoints should be prepared, and also clarifies tank and BMP 
fire ambush sites; determines alignment of the forward 
detachment's battle formation at each line and locations of 
forward detachment subunits and their missions at each line; 
establishes the procedure and time periods for engineer 
preparation of lines, creation of obstacles ahead of them and in 
gaps between strongpoints, and also the axes and procedure for 
withdrawal of subunits from line to line and into the main 
defensive zone. In addition, he determines COP locations of the 
forward detachment and of commanders of platoons (companies) and 
of attached and supporting subunits in the battle to hold each 
line, as well as locations of technical and logistic support in 
organizing and conducting defensive battle at each line in the 
security zone, and other questions. 
  In assigning missions, in addition to what is set forth in 
organizing a defense under ordinary conditions, the company 
(battalion) commander indicates to subordinates in the operation 
order the procedure for disengaging, the company (battalion) 
assembly area and procedure for withdrawal to the next line. 
  In organizing the system of fire the battalion commander 
determines the following: most likely axes of enemy forward 
movement to each line, possibility of engaging him from maximum 
ranges by fire of his own, attached and supporting weapons as 
the enemy approaches subunit strongpoints (deploys), and also 
ahead of their frontage, in gaps between strongpoints and on 
exposed flanks; procedure for artillery fire cover of the 
removal of subunits out from under an attack by superior enemy 
forces for their occupation of a defense at the next line or 
during withdrawal into the main defensive zone. (A battalion's 
battle in the security zone is shown in Diagram 6.) As the enemy 
approaches, the battalion determines his makeup and direction of 
forward movement by patrol actions and inflicts losses on him in 
personnel and military vehicles (especially tanks) by fire 
ambushes and the combat security outpost. When the enemy moves 
into the impact zone of battalion weapons and begins deploying 
for an assault of the occupied line, the battalion uses fire of 
organic, attached and supporting weapons to inflict maximum 
losses on the attackers. The battalion's primary mission is to 
prevent a breakthrough of the defense from the move and force 
the enemy to deploy the main body and advance in a direction 
unfavorable to him. Skillfully maneuvering fire and subunits and 
taking advantage of obstacles and demolitions, the company 
(battalion) commander prevents the enemy from capturing 
strongpoints of first echelon companies from the move. 
  Individual enemy attempts to envelop strongpoints (defense 
areas) are prohibited by a maneuver of the reserve (armored 
group) to these axes for taking up a line of firing positions or 
executing a sudden, brief counterattack, and also by a maneuver 
of the fire of artillery remaining directly subordinate to the 
battalion commander. 
  The battalion disengages on receiving a withdrawal order. 
Before or in the course of the withdrawal, the battalion may 
counterattack the enemy with the reserve and with subunits, 
above all tank subunits removed from positions not under attack, 
to halt the enemy advance on the most threatened axes. 
  During execution of a maneuver to the next line, a rear 
security element and if necessary also flank security elements 
are assigned from the battalion to oppose close and deep 
envelopments and attacks of an enemy who has penetrated. Taking 
advantage of obstacles previously created on maneuver routes, 
security elements hold up the enemy's advance by fire from in 
place and from the move and by use of fire ambushes until the 
time indicated by the battalion commander. An enemy airborne 
assault force which has landed on a maneuver route is destroyed 
or bypassed after being sealed off. 
  In the course of a maneuver the battalion may cross a line 
defended by other regimental subunits. In this case the 
defending subunits use the fire of their weapons to destroy the 
enemy, supporting the withdrawing subunit's disengagement and 
not permitting an enemy assault on the occupied line from the 
move. Passage of withdrawing subunits is along established axes 
agreed upon in organizing coordination. 
  With its move to the next line the battalion immediately 
occupies a defense and takes measures to restore combat 
effectiveness. The battle at the new line is conducted just as 
at the previous line. 
  A line of combat security outpost positions ahead of the 
FEBA 
can serve as the final mobile defense line of a battalion 
defending in the security zone. Strongpoints are prepared in 
advance if it is planned for the battalion to shift to a defense 
on it. After occupying them the battalion fights in coordination 
with the combat security outpost. 
  The battle to hold each position and strongpoint should be 
distinguished by tenacity, with the goal of holding up the 
attacking enemy for the longest possible time, exhausting his 
forces and inflicting greatest possible losses on him. 
  In the absence of a security zone, a forward position may be 
established in accordance with the senior commander's decision. 
It has the purpose of concealing the trace of the first position 
and alignment of the battle formation from the enemy, inflicting 
damage on the enemy and forcing him to deploy the main body 
prematurely. The distance of the forward position is determined 
in each specific case by the nature of terrain, expected enemy 
operations and other situation conditions and may be 4-6 km. An 
MRB and sometimes also a reinforced MRC (TC), usually from the 
regimental first echelon, is assigned to fight at the forward 
position. 
  Defense at a forward position is built as separate 
platoon and company strongpoints (Diagram 7) prepared for a 
perimeter defense. It is recommended disposing them so they 
intercept axes most likely and accessible for enemy attack. 
  A forward position usually is selected behind natural 
barriers (streams, rivers and so on) or in the tactically most 
important terrain sectors (hills, road junctions and so on). 
  Minefields and nonexplosive obstacles are emplaced and 
strikes of combat helicopters and aircraft and the fire of 
artillery, tanks, BMP's and other weapons are prepared ahead of 
the position, in gaps between strongpoints and on flanks. Fire 
ambushes may be arranged in addition. 
  The system of fire is organized so the enemy is engaged from 
maximum ranges on primary avenues of likely tank approach by 
fire of all weapons, and so gaps between platoon and company 
strongpoints are covered. Special attention is given to 
organizing AT fire. 
  During battle, small enemy groups are destroyed by fire or 
taken prisoner and significant enemy forces are destroyed by 
fire of all weapons in the very same manner as during battle in 
the security zone. 
  The company (battalion) withdraws from a forward position by 
order of the regimental commander in the very same sequence as 
during operations in the security zone. Subunits which have 
withdrawn usually take up a defense at the second position. 
<H5>  7. Defense of a Water Obstacle </H5>
  Water obstacles, which include rivers, canals, reservoirs 
and 
lakes, are characterized by width; depth; current velocity; 
nature of bed, banks and adjoining terrain; and presence of 
fords and hydraulic engineering works. Water obstacles in 
themselves are a serious barrier for an attacking enemy and a 
favorable natural line for a defender. 
  Special attention should be given to selecting the forward 
edge in organizing the defense. Depending on the condition of 
terrain adjoining the river, it may be designated as close to 
the water's edge as possible or be moved back from the bank to a 
more favorable line. In this case it is necessary to put out a 
combat security outpost and emplace obstacles on the bank. 
  In organizing defense of a water obstacle, in addition to 
usual questions of organizing for battle, the company 
(battalion) commander studies the condition of banks and 
determines the water obstacle's width, depth, current velocity, 
nature of bed and the presence of fords and sectors where its 
forcing by the enemy is possible. 
  The system of fire is organized so approaches to the water 
obstacle and the water's surface, especially fords and sectors 
convenient for forcing, are covered by flanking and cross fire. 
Some of the tanks, BMP's, and AT and other weapons may be moved 
up closer to the bank. 
  The greatest AT fire density is created, obstacles are 
emplaced and fire ambushes are arranged in sectors where enemy 
forcing of the water obstacle is possible, especially by tanks 
fording or crossing fully submerged. In addition, fire is 
prepared against the bank itself for repulsing an enemy who has 
crossed. 
  To reconnoiter the enemy the company (battalion) organizes 
continuous observation, especially of sectors convenient for 
forcing and of approaches to them. Out of direct contact with 
the enemy, a reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol and 
reinforced combat security outpost usually are sent to the 
opposite bank of the water obstacle. All local crossing 
equipment (boats, rafts, ferries) is assembled on the friendly 
bank and placed under guard; if impossible to assemble, it is 
destroyed. 
  Weapons should not reveal themselves before the beginning of 
an attack. Weapons are specially assigned to destroy enemy 
reconnaissance subunits, and they perform missions from 
temporary positions. Enemy groups which have crossed are taken 
prisoner or killed. 
  With the beginning of an enemy forcing of a water obstacle, 
subunits use fire of all weapons to destroy above all his 
crossing equipment, personnel, weapons and vehicles without 
permitting them to come ashore. In case the enemy comes ashore 
he is immediately destroyed by concentrated fire of all weapons, 
and under favorable conditions also by a decisive counterattack. 
The counterattack must be executed earlier than under ordinary 
conditions to keep the enemy from consolidating on the captured 
bank. Executing a counterattack along the bank is not precluded. 
  Independently or in coordination with other subunits, a 
company (battalion) also may defend on the opposite bank to hold 
bridges, crossings and sectors convenient for forcing which have 
been captured on the water obstacle. In this case a forward 
(bridgehead) position is established. In preparing its defense, 
special attention is given to organizing AT fire and air defense 
and securing flanks. To increase stability of the defense, an 
exposed flank or flanks must abut the water obstacle and be 
covered by obstacles. In this case it is advisable to set up 
additional reserves of missiles, ammunition, food and medical 
supplies in subunits. The actions of a company (battalion) in a 
defense on the opposite bank should be distinguished by special 
staunchness and tenacity. 
<H5>  8. Night Defense </H5>
  Night conditions substantially affect defensive battle. On 
the one hand, they give the defender advantages, use of which 
facilitates performance of defense missions, and on the other 
hand these conditions create a number of difficulties in 
preparing and conducting defensive battle. Orientation on 
terrain, engineer preparation of the strongpoint and emplacement 
of obstacles are hampered at night. The enemy receives a greater 
opportunity to approach the defense covertly, attack suddenly, 
and infiltrate through gaps into the depth of the defense. In 
addition, C[.sup]2[/] of subunits, maintenance of continuous 
coordination, and conduct of aimed fire from all kinds of 
weapons are more complicated and expenditure of ammunition and 
illumination assets increases. 
  Based on this, the primary mission of subunits in a night 
defense is to repel a surprise enemy assault. To perform this 
mission the company (battalion) commander must reinforce the 
combat security outpost; beef up observation of the enemy and of 
friendly obstacles ahead of the FEBA; organize listening; post 
local security in all subunits (observers, two-man patrols and 
so on); keep the bulk of subunits and weapons which are 
occupying strongpoints at the first position in constant 
readiness to commence fire and repel enemy assaults; prepare all 
weapons, the reserve and the armored group for night operations 
while it is light; specify the procedure for using night vision 
devices and for weapons situated in the depth of strongpoints to 
occupy temporary firing positions on the forward edge; indicate 
terrain sectors ahead of the FEBA, in gaps between units 
(subunits) and on flanks against which to prepare additional 
fire and provide for other measures to secure gaps between 
strongpoints and to secure boundaries and flanks; establish the 
procedure for illuminating terrain ahead of the forward edge of 
friendly defense and also the enemy in the course of battle; 
determine reference points easily visible at night, the 
identifying markings of friendly troops and methods of 
orientation; assign missions to subunits for destroying and 
blinding enemy night vision equipment; supply defending subunits 
with tracer rounds, cartridges with tracer bullets, and terrain 
illumination assets. If engineer work is being performed in the 
strongpoint (defense area), the company (battalion) commander 
organizes security for the subunits at work and establishes 
assembly points for them in case an enemy surprise attack has to 
be repulsed. 
  In a defense at night special attention is given to 
illuminating terrain with authorized illumination assets. With 
an illumination norm of 0.6 lux, the range of fire of 30-mm or 
40-mm pyrotechnic flares up to 450- 600 m and a radius of 
illumination of 400-500 m, one illumination post is capable of 
providing terrain illumination ahead of the company defense 
frontage in a sector of up to 2 km. Three illumination posts 
will be required with a battalion defense frontage up to 5 km. 
  Using day sights to ranges up to 1,500 m, it is necessary to 
have an illumination of 1.5-2 lux to ensure observation of 
targets and conduct of direct fire against them. To create that 
illumination it is advisable to use 120-mm illuminating mortar 
rounds and 122-mm illuminating artillery rounds with the flare 
ignition setting at a distance no closer than 1,200-2,300 m from 
the friendly troop disposition. With closer flare ignition, 
friendly subunits may be illuminated and revealed. 
  On detecting the launching of an enemy assault, subunits 
defending the combat security outpost position as well as 
artillery, mortars and duty weapons commence fire against him. 
Tanks, BMP's and artillery conduct direct fire against single 
targets and concentrated fire against the assaulting enemy. 
  It is advisable to repel an enemy assault from distances 
ensuring effective conduct of fire, using night vision devices 
or with the enemy battle formation illuminated by all available 
illumination support assets. When he comes to within 300-400 m 
of the FEBA, illumination is accomplished by first echelon 
company illumination posts and blinding is accomplished using 
illuminating and smoke projectiles (mortar rounds and rockets). 
  Enemy artillery and mortars firing illuminating rounds and 
his searchlight installations are destroyed first by fire of 
artillery subunits, tanks and BMP's (BTR's). 
  The air defense subunit as well as motorized rifle subunit 
and tank subunit not engaged in fighting the ground enemy repel 
raids by his aircraft and helicopters and destroy air-dropped 
illumination flares and illuminating artillery and mortar rounds. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the company (battalion) 
defense, 
steps are taken to prohibit his advance toward flanks and into 
the depth. In this period the company (battalion) inflicts 
damage on the enemy who has penetrated, halts his advance by 
concentrated artillery and mortar fire and by flanking fire of 
tanks, BMP's and the AT subunit, and subunits firmly hold 
important terrain sectors. A counterattack by the second echelon 
(reserve) is conducted at night against the enemy flank and rear 
along previously checked axes. Special attention is given to 
ensuring timely arrival of counterattacking subunits at the line 
of deployment for the counterattack. Guides may be assigned to 
each route for this purpose in addition to the marking of 
forward movement routes. 
  When shifting from night to day operations, subunits and 
weapons which were moved to temporary firing positions for the 
night covertly occupy their own primary positions before dawn by 
order of the company (battalion) commander. 
<H5>  9. Defense in a City and Other Built-Up Areas </H5>
  Cities and built-up areas with a large number of sturdy 
buildings can be turned into powerful centers of resistance by 
defenders in a short time. The presence of sturdy stone and 
reinforced concrete buildings, a far-flung system of underground 
utilities and structures and a significant number of obstacles 
and difficult-to-negotiate sectors help create an insurmountable 
defense that is more stable than under ordinary conditions. 
  In a city (built-up area) a battalion usually defends one or 
more blocks, a company defends a block or several buildings, and 
a platoon defends one or two buildings. 
  Using its own forces, a company (battalion) must turn each 
built-up area and lone structure into an insurmountable fortress 
with a perimeter defense ensuring its lengthy holding even in 
total enemy encirclement. 
  In organizing defense in a city (built-up area), the 
battalion (company) commander determines the following in 
addition to the usual questions: what buildings to include in 
strongpoints and prepare for defense; procedure for maneuver of 
forces and assets; in what rooms to prepare bunkers; and the 
procedure and time periods for preparing buildings for defense. 
  Company strongpoints (battalion defense areas) are created 
so 
they overlap main streets, boulevards, squares and bridges over 
rivers and canals. The FEBA usually is prepared along the 
outskirts of a city (built-up area) or is moved ahead if 
commanding heights adjoin the city. Strongpoints are prepared 
for a perimeter defense and must have fire coordination with 
each other. Additional reserves of missiles, ammunition, food, 
potable water and medical and other supplies are established in 
them. Strongpoints are interconnected by communication trenches. 
  Especially sturdy corner buildings with semibasement and 
basement rooms providing an opportunity for firing on streets 
and squares are used above all to create strongpoints. 
  Buildings must be adapted for defense: block up windows and 
doors with bricks (sandbags) and other materials, make firing 
ports and embrasures for assault riflemen and machinegunners, 
and prepare basement rooms to accommodate personnel. 
  It is advisable to cover wooden floors with sand and clear 
all buildings of highly flammable materials. Barricades, 
obstacles, destructive damage and roadblocks are arranged in 
gaps between strongpoints and on streets, and approaches to them 
are mined and covered by flanking and cross fire. Light 
structures hampering observation and conduct of fire are 
demolished. 
  Passages are made for subunits to maneuver within blocks, 
and 
underground structures and sewers also are used. Obstacles are 
arranged in underground structures not used for maneuver and 
fire is prepared against exits from them. 
  The company (battalion) system of fire is built on a 
combination of flanking and cross fire of small arms, guns 
assigned for direct fire, tanks, BMP's, and also the fire of 
ATGM launchers, grenade launchers, flamethrowers and artillery 
at indirect firing positions. 
  Subunits occupying a defense in multistory buildings 
organize 
fire in several tiers so all approaches to strongpoints 
(buildings) are covered by fire. A large portion of weapons, 
including individual guns, are located in lower stories of 
buildings and in semibasements. 
  Tanks attached to an MRB are used for operations from fire 
ambushes or in MRP strongpoints. Firing positions of tanks, 
BMP's (BTR's) and guns assigned for direct fire usually are 
prepared behind stone fences and walls in which embrasures are 
made and carefully camouflaged. 
  Firing positions of ATGM and grenade launchers are chosen in 
those places from which there is an opportunity to conduct fire 
along streets and squares. 
  Flamethrowers are attached to motorized rifle subunits in 
pairs or groups. Positions are prepared for them in buildings 
and behind obstacles and fences, above all at street 
intersections. 
  The bulk of artillery is attached to battalions and 
companies 
and used primarily for direct fire. The remaining artillery 
subunits take up indirect firing positions in parks, squares, 
stadiums and other places from which there is an opportunity to 
conduct fire. 
  Air defense weapons are situated on roofs of buildings, 
where 
platforms are prepared for them. Observation posts (observers) 
also are placed on roofs of buildings which provide all-around 
observation. 
  Combat engineer subunits with listening devices are assigned 
to detect siegecraft mine warfare work being done by the enemy. 
  A defensive battle on approaches to a city is conducted just 
as under ordinary conditions, but in the city (built-up area) it 
usually is nodal in nature and is conducted for holding each 
strongpoint and building. Subunits defending them must be 
capable of fighting independently even in encirclement. 
Therefore they are reinforced by tanks, artillery, and engineer 
and chemical subunits. 
  Subunits repel an enemy assault by fire of all weapons. In 
this period enemy infantry and tanks should be cut off and the 
infantry destroyed above all, since individual tanks or groups 
of them which have penetrated into the depth of the defense 
without infantry can be destroyed quickly. 
  If an enemy has succeeded in penetrating a defended 
building, 
he must be destroyed by point-blank fire, with grenades, and in 
hand-to- hand fighting. Tanks, BMP's, guns, flamethrowers and 
other weapons outside the building keep enemy reserves from 
approaching it. 
  Counterattacks are conducted by small forces to get back 
individual buildings and strongpoints captured by the enemy. 
<H5>  10. Defense Under Special Conditions </H5>
  Defense in the mountains. Mountainous terrain with 
rugged sectors and a large number of natural barriers permits 
subunits to create an insurmountable, stable defense on a 
broader frontage by intercepting the most accessible axes of 
enemy operations. 
  At the same time, the relief of mountainous terrain hampers 
preparation and conduct of defensive battle. 
  The limited number of roads and presence of scattered axes 
constrain subunit maneuver from one axis to another. Based on 
this, the defense is built at separate strongpoints to hold 
important terrain sectors (commanding heights, passes, road 
junctions and so on). On a plateau and in a wide valley the 
defense is built the very same as under ordinary conditions. 
  Based on this, main efforts are concentrated on the defense 
of commanding heights, passes, road junctions and other 
important terrain sectors. Strongpoints are prepared for a 
perimeter defense. Reconnaissance and patrolling is 
accomplished, fire ambushes are organized and obstacles are 
emplaced in gaps between them. 
  The FEBA must be chosen along slopes of mountain ridges and 
hills and along mountain spurs so as to provide a good field of 
view and fire on approaches to them, and also on reverse 
hillslopes. 
  A limited number of forces and assets are assigned to defend 
axes difficult of access. 
  The system of strongpoints, firing positions and trenches in 
the area (strongpoint) can be quite varied. Motorized rifle 
subunits usually defend in the first echelon. 
  If tanks, AT guns and ATGM launchers are attached to an MRC 
(MRB), they are used in strongpoints of platoons (companies) 
defending on the most important axes. Firing positions for them 
are prepared in those places which provide for conduct of fire 
to maximum range. Roads; exits from gorges, mountain valleys, 
tunnels and narrows; convenient crossings over rivers and 
passages across canyons; as well as axes which may be used by 
the enemy for envelopment must be covered most densely by all 
kinds of fire in combination with obstacles. Subunits defending 
passes, commanding heights, passages and road junctions are 
reinforced by flamethrower operators. 
  The air defense subunit as well as motorized rifle subunits 
assigned to combat the air enemy take up positions on hills 
providing an all- around field of view and fire against 
aircraft, helicopters and other airborne targets. 
  The system of fire must be built with consideration of 
terrain relief features and so there is no dead ground and 
concealed approaches ahead of the FEBA, on flanks and in gaps 
between strongpoints. To this end it is advisable to dispose 
weapons in tiers both on hillslopes facing the enemy as well as 
on reverse slopes, supporting the creation of multitiered 
flanking fire, cross fire and surprise, close-range concentrated 
fire with consideration of the possibility of executing a 
maneuver. 
  In organizing a defense in the mountains, in addition to the 
usual questions the company (battalion) commander determines 
what subunits (weapons) must be ready to destroy an enveloping 
enemy, and he takes into account the possibility of sudden 
changes in weather conditions, rockfalls, snowslides, 
avalanches, mud flows, and flooding of dried-up river channels 
during heavy rains and snow melt. 
  In a defense of a narrow mountain valley (gorge), weapons 
should be disposed on adjoining mountain slopes to ensure that 
the valley (gorge) is covered by cross fire. Hills forming the 
entrance to the valley (gorge) are strengthened most heavily. 
Approaches to commanding heights are covered by the fire of 
artillery; mortar and grenade launcher subunits; AT subunits; 
and AT weapons. Artillery is used widely for direct fire. 
  In organizing defense of a pass, main efforts are 
concentrated on holding hills located on approaches to it. A 
portion of company (battalion) forces must be situated directly 
in the pass. Obstacles are emplaced on roads leading to the pass 
from both sides and approaches to the obstacles should be 
covered by cross fire from adjoining hills. 
  Passes, roads, mountain trails and gorges are not assigned 
as 
company strongpoint boundaries. 
  Main reconnaissance efforts are concentrated on axes 
accessible for enemy attack and on axes where envelopment of 
defending subunits is possible. The number of observation posts 
(observers) is increased. 
  Terrain folds, mines and caves are used widely for 
protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons. 
  In addition to the usual measures, the clearing of slides 
and 
tree blow-downs blocking the exit of people and vehicles from 
structures is organized immediately in restoring combat 
effectiveness of subunits. 
  Great importance is attached to engineer preparation of 
strongpoints (defense areas) because of terrain relief features. 
Thus, in rocky soils structures primarily of a semiburied and 
fill type are built using rocks covered by a layer of soil as 
well as bags of dirt. In these cases engineer preparation is 
conducted with wide use of demolition charges. Emplacements, 
shelters and other structures are prepared so as to preclude the 
possibility of an incendiary mixture or water flowing into them. 
  Rock roadblocks may be created in a strongpoint (battalion 
defense area) as well as abatis on mountainous woodland; sectors 
of roads (trails) and manmade structures are prepared for 
demolition and minefields are laid on roads. 
  Maskirovka of subunits is achieved above all by skillful use 
of the terrain's concealing properties. 
  An enemy assault is repelled by all weapons with wide use of 
grenades. It is most advisable to destroy enemy tanks when they 
are negotiating upgrades, and especially on serpentines. 
  When the enemy penetrates the defense it is necessary to 
inflict damage on him and hold occupied positions, especially 
commanding heights. Under favorable conditions, an enemy who has 
penetrated is destroyed by a determined counterattack. As a 
rule, it is conducted down from above, along a ridge, or along a 
valley. Before a counterattack it is necessary to deploy 
subunits involved in performing this mission on a previously 
prepared line in advance. This is explained by the complexity of 
the maneuver, especially in conducting a counterattack at night. 
  If the enemy attempts to envelop the strongpoint (defense 
area), he is destroyed by fire of artillery and other weapons 
and by decisive actions of second echelon (reserve) subunits or 
the company (battalion) armored group. 
  In a defense on taiga-covered mountainous terrain, special 
attention is given to preparing strongpoints for a perimeter 
defense, clearing zones (sectors) of view and fire, covering 
gaps and flanks with obstacles, and arranging fire ambushes on 
axes where enemy envelopment of defending subunits is possible. 
  In a defense in the mountains or on taiga-covered 
mountainous 
terrain, battalion technical support and rear subunits are 
located at road and trail junctions in immediate proximity to 
the first echelon. Additional reserves of missiles, ammunition, 
food, water and fuel are established in company strongpoints and 
at artillery and air defense weapon firing positions. In 
high-mountain areas the personnel are provided with special 
gear, warm clothing and sunglasses, and measures for warming 
personnel and promptly evacuating the wounded and sick are 
provided for. 
  Defense in the forest. The forest is a significant 
obstacle to an enemy attack and is not passable everywhere even 
in modern combat vehicles. There are not enough roads in the 
forest, which forces the enemy to operate along accessible axes. 
On the other hand, the forest facilitates maskirovka of 
strongpoints (defense areas) and surprise of subunit operations. 
  Considering relief features, defense in the forest must be 
built as separate platoon (company) strongpoints prepared for a 
perimeter defense. They should be so disposed that they 
intercept roads and openings as well as defiles between lakes 
and marshes. In gaps between strongpoints it is constantly 
necessary to conduct reconnaissance, arrange obstacles and fire 
ambushes and perform patrolling. 
  Preparing a defense in the forest includes the very same 
measures as under ordinary conditions. In addition, the company 
(battalion) commander must provide for disposing BMP's (BTR's) 
and tanks at firing positions so as to bring fire above all on 
roads, openings, treelines and glades and for preparing 
concealed armored group maneuver routes, and he must specify 
measures for fighting forest fires. 
  It is advisable to select the FEBA up to 100 m ahead of the 
treeline or move it into the depth by the very same distance. In 
the latter case a combat security outpost is placed at the 
treeline and subunits clear the woods to improve conditions for 
observing and conducting fire in such a way as not to reveal 
their positions in so doing. The company (battalion) aligns the 
battle formation in two echelons. The second echelon (reserve) 
must be disposed in a strongpoint near roads and openings in 
readiness to execute counterattacks or maneuver to a threatened 
axis. 
  In organizing the system of fire it is advisable to dispose 
all weapons so that axes, roads, passages in marshy sectors, 
glades and felled areas accessible for enemy operations and 
along which an enemy approach and attack are possible are under 
flanking and cross fire of defending subunits. In addition, 
concentrated and barrier fire of artillery and mortars should be 
prepared on these axes. Forest salients are used in the defense 
system for arranging ambushes and organizing flanking fire, 
cross fire and surprise, close-range concentrated fire. 
  Visibility is considerably restricted and C[.sup]2[/] 
deteriorates in the forest. Therefore the bulk of weapons is 
attached to platoons and companies. Tanks, guns, grenade 
launchers and ATGM launchers should be disposed in places 
providing an opportunity to conduct fire along roads and 
openings and against glades and sectors of sparse forest. Their 
firing positions must be covered by motorized rifle subunits and 
obstacles. Some riflemen, snipers and machinegunners are 
assigned to conduct fire from trees. 
  In a defense in the forest, air defense and other weapons 
assigned to combat the air enemy as a rule are disposed in 
glades, on treelines and in felled areas of the forest. This 
permits promptly detecting and bringing fire on enemy aircraft 
and helicopters. Air defense gunners also may be disposed on 
platforms prepared in trees. 
  Reconnaissance in the forest is conducted by observation, 
reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrols and 
reconnaissance ambushes. The system of observation must be 
organized so as to provide for viewing approaches to the FEBA, 
for which observation posts (observers) may be disposed in trees 
or moved forward. 
  Emplacements, shelters, trenches and communication trenches 
of the semifill or fill type are made on terrain with a high 
water table. In sectors where there is no need to dig 
communication trenches, movement routes to the rear are denoted 
by signs or marks on trees. 
  Minefields, fougasses, mined abatis, AT barriers and various 
wire obstacles are used as engineer obstacles in the forest. 
  Above all the forest is cleared for subunits and their 
weapons to improve the field of view and fire, and maneuver 
routes are prepared. Firefighting measures also are provided for. 
  Operations of small subunits in fire ambushes and the fire 
of 
all weapons from short range are widely used during battle in 
the forest. 
  Counterattacks usually are executed by small subunits along 
previously studied and prepared axes, as a rule along roads and 
openings. 
  Defense in the desert. On desert terrain a defense 
is occupied on the most likely axis of enemy operations and is 
based on a well organized system of fire and broad maneuver of 
the second echelon (reserve). The presence of terrain sectors 
with sandhills, dunes and moist solonchaks permits a company 
(battalion) to build a defense in a wider frontage in a single 
echelon with assignment of a reserve and to have larger gaps 
between strongpoints than under ordinary conditions. 
  The battalion defense area and company strongpoints are 
prepared for a perimeter defense and carefully camouflaged. 
Artillery fire is prepared and fire ambushes and obstacles 
arranged in gaps between them. 
  In a defense in the desert, fortification of a position with 
consideration of protection against precision weapons, 
disruptive painting of vehicles, installation of light overhead 
cover (screens) over objects, and other camouflage measures 
receive special attention. 
  In addition to the usual questions of organizing for battle, 
the company (battalion) commander provides for conducting 
reconnaissance to a greater depth than under ordinary conditions 
and engages the enemy by direct fire to long ranges. Reliable 
security of flanks and measures for protecting fortifications 
and water supply points from drifting sand and for preparing 
weapons and vehicles for use during sandstorms acquires special 
importance. Considering the possibility of a change in weather 
conditions, he must take steps to establish water and fuel 
reserves and monitor their consumption and the observance of 
water discipline. 
  In engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area) 
special importance is attached to reinforcing the sides of 
emplacements and shelters, for which brushwood, sandbags and 
available local materials are used. Sandbags, curvilinear 
reinforced shells, corrugated steel elements, and fabric-over- 
frame and other factory-made constructions are used for making 
covered fortification structures. 
  Subunit commanders at all levels must keep an eye on the 
condition of maneuver routes. For this it is advisable to mark 
them with easily visible, stable markers and to check minefields 
periodically. If they are drifted over with a thick layer of 
sand or their presence is revealed, new minefields are emplaced 
or existing ones relaid. 
  Company (battalion) technical support and rear subunits 
usually are located with the second echelon (reserve) near water 
distribution points. Special attention is given to strict 
fulfillment of sanitary- hygienic measures in personnel 
locations and at water supply points. Water sources are defended 
by assigned subunits. The condition of weapons and vehicles must 
be checked regularly and additional measures are taken to 
protect them from dust. 
  A defensive battle in the desert is fought just as under 
ordinary conditions. 
  Defense in northern areas and in winter. The 
presence of vast areas of tundra, marshy forested tundra and 
forested terrain, a large number of lakes, mountainous terrain 
with boulders and rock streams, a limited number of roads and 
difficulties of engineer preparation of strongpoints (defense 
areas) substantially affect organization of defense and combat 
employment of subunits. 
  In addition, the severe climate with lengthy winter, deep 
snow cover, low temperature, increased persistence of chemical 
agents and the arctic night and day have a negative effect on 
personnel. 
  At the same time, terrain with a large number of marshes, 
lakes, rivers, hills and other sectors difficult to negotiate, 
and in the winter period the deep snow cover, contribute to 
establishment of a defense with fewer forces than under ordinary 
conditions. 
  As a result, the defense in northern areas (Diagram 8) is 
organized across a broad front on axes accessible for enemy 
attack and usually is built as separate platoon (company) 
strongpoints prepared for a perimeter defense. Defending 
subunits concentrate main efforts on holding roads and adjoining 
hills, built-up areas, defiles between lakes, crossings over 
water obstacles and other important objectives. 
  Based on this, gaps between company and platoon strongpoints 
may be greater than under ordinary conditions. Various obstacles 
are emplaced in them and fire ambushes and patrolling are 
organized. 
  In organizing the defense in northern areas and in winter, 
in 
addition to the usual questions of organizing for battle the 
company (battalion) commander determines the following: axes 
most accessible for enemy operations, especially his enveloping 
subunits, amphibious (lake) assault forces, and raiding and 
reconnaissance parties, and methods of their destruction; 
measures for holding road junctions, built-up areas, hills and 
other important objectives, for securing flanks and gaps, for 
preparing weapons, vehicles and protective gear for operation 
under low-temperature conditions, for preparing shelters to warm 
personnel, and for protecting them against hypothermia and 
frostbite; and the procedure for clearing fortification 
structures and restoring obstacles after heavy snowfalls and for 
making sumps in trenches, shelters and at firing positions under 
thaw conditions. 
  To maintain high combat readiness of subunits the company 
(battalion) commander provides for measures for checking the 
personnel's performance of duty in a blizzard and snowfall. 
  In engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area), the 
company (battalion) commander must take account of the depth of 
snow cover, freezing of soil, and thickness and condition of ice 
on water obstacles. In permafrost areas, on rocky soil and on 
marshy terrain fortification structures of the fill type usually 
are built. Rocks, bags of dirt, sod, and in winter snow and ice 
in addition are used for this. Making trenches and communication 
trenches out of snow is widely employed with a deep snow cover. 
If time is available it is advisable to ice up slopes facing the 
enemy. 
  Road sectors in defiles, in places difficult to negotiate 
and 
on approaches to the defense, and cover ahead of the FEBA are 
demolished or mined. Minefields, abatis and boulder obstacles 
are emplaced ahead of the FEBA and in the depth of the defense. 
Ice on rivers, lakes and in bays is prepared for detonation in 
some sectors. 
  In organizing technical and logistic support, the company 
(battalion) commander provides for establishing additional 
reserves of missiles, ammunition, food and fuel and keeping 
weapons and vehicles in constant readiness for use under 
low-temperature conditions. Steps are taken in winter to prevent 
frostbite of personnel. In summer personnel are provided with 
means of protection against midges, mosquitoes and other insects. 
  The battalion aid station usually is located in heated 
spaces 
or shelters and supplied with a reserve of fuel as well as warm 
clothing for the wounded and sick. 
<H5>  11. Relief of Subunits </H5>
  Relief of subunits is understood to mean the organized 
receipt and transfer of strongpoints (defense areas) in a combat 
situation. 
  Relief of a company (battalion) in the defense as a rule is 
done at night and under other conditions of limited visibility. 
It must be organized carefully and conducted swiftly, covertly 
and so that subunits being relieved manage to arrive in the 
designated area before dawn and those which have arrived for 
relief manage to occupy strongpoints (defense areas) and 
organize a system of fire. 
  The procedure and time of relief are determined by the 
senior 
commander. Having received a relief order, the company 
(battalion) commander together with the commander of the subunit 
being relieved performs ground reconnaissance, during which he 
studies the enemy; becomes familiar with the disposition of 
subunits turning over the defense, the regime of behavior, 
organization of the system of fire and air defense, engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area), obstacles, and 
the NBC situation; and determines concealed movement routes to 
the relief area, locations of traffic control posts, places for 
meeting arriving subunits, and the relief procedure. It is of 
great importance to conceal the time of a relief and operations 
of subunits from the enemy in this period. 
  The subunit commander turning over a strongpoint (defense 
area) is obligated to present the relieving subunit commander 
with a diagram of the company strongpoint (battalion defense) 
area, and in addition he must give him all available 
intelligence on the enemy, with an indication of the precise 
location of weapons and minefields. The following must be 
pointed out to subordinate commanders: procedure for turning 
over a strongpoint (defense area), assembly area after the 
relief, measures for covering the relief and for maskirovka, 
where to send guides for rendezvousing with and accompanying the 
relieving subunits, where to place command posts, time for 
beginning and end of relief, and the procedure for actions in 
case of enemy use of mass destruction weapons or if he launches 
an attack during the relief. 
  Subunits taking over the defense are in assembly areas 
[iskhodnyy rayon] before the beginning of relief. Subunits move 
out along designated routes to the relief area at the prescribed 
time at a signal (command) from the company (battalion) 
commander. 
  Observation and a system of fire are organized immediately 
on 
arrival at the strongpoint (defense area), missions are updated 
for subunits to repel possible enemy actions and the company 
(battalion) begins the relief. Personnel of subunits turning 
over the defense are at their places in readiness to hand over 
their positions and repel possible enemy actions. 
  Motorized rifle subunits are replaced first, then tank, 
artillery and air defense subunits. Subunits defending a forward 
position or in a combat security outpost are relieved last. 
  During the relief the company (battalion) commander 
receiving 
the defense as a rule is at the COP of the commander turning 
over the strongpoint (defense area) and directs the relief. 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits is exercised over operating wire 
communications lines. 
  During the relief the company (battalion) must maintain the 
very same regime of behavior as was the case before the relief. 
  The company (battalion) commander who has turned over the 
defense covertly moves subunits to the designated assembly area 
and then acts in accordance with the mission received. 
  If the enemy launches an attack in the course of the relief, 
the relief stops and all subunits repel the assault. They are 
controlled at this time by the commander of the subunit being 
relieved. Relieving subunits which have arrived also are 
subordinated to him in this period. Relief of the company 
(battalion) continues after the enemy attack is repelled. 
  Relief of a battalion is formalized by a document. The 
report 
of the company (battalion) commander who has accepted the 
strongpoint (defense area) to his immediate commander about 
completion of the relief is considered to be the moment the 
relief ends. 
<H5>  12. Disengagement and Withdrawal </H5>
  As a kind of maneuver of subunits, withdrawal under present 
conditions is their leaving of occupied strongpoints (defense 
areas) and withdrawing to new lines disposed in the depth. It is 
accomplished to move subunits out from under attacks by superior 
enemy forces and have them occupy a more favorable position for 
subsequent operations. A withdrawal must be made only by order 
or authorization of the senior commander in an organized manner, 
covertly and swiftly, so as to have subunits arrive promptly in 
a prescribed area in a combat-effective status or occupy a 
designated strongpoint (defense area). 
  A withdrawal may be made in a forced or deliberate manner 
depending on the situation. 
  A forced withdrawal will be made when it is impossible to 
repel an enemy assault and hold the occupied strongpoint 
(defense area) with available forces and assets and when the 
situation on flanks creates a real threat of encirclement and 
destruction of a defending subunit. 
  A deliberate withdrawal is accomplished when there is an 
unfavorable ratio of forces and assets with the attacker and an 
unfavorable position of friendly subunits relative to the enemy. 
It can be accomplished to move subunits out from under an attack 
by superior enemy forces and occupy a more favorable position 
with respect to the attacker, transfer efforts to another axis 
or draw the enemy into fire sacks prepared in advance. 
  In all instances the withdrawal should be temporary in 
nature 
and be executed in an organized, planned manner so as not to 
turn into flight and not expose the flanks of adjacent subunits 
being moved out from under enemy attacks. 
  The need for a withdrawal may arise in the course of 
defensive or offensive battle, and also with an unsuccessful 
outcome of a meeting battle and when breaking out of 
encirclement. 
  The disengagement and withdrawal may occur under various 
situation conditions in which the commander's work and subunit 
operations are carried out. The position of subunits relative to 
the enemy is of decisive importance for determining the 
conditions. Based on this it follows that the withdrawal of 
subunits may be made in direct contact with the enemy or out of 
contact with him. 
  As shown by Great Patriotic War experience, our troops most 
often had to withdraw from a position of defense while in direct 
contact with the enemy. The withdrawal is the most frequent and 
complicated phenomenon under these conditions. This is connected 
with the fact that in this period subunits are performing 
several missions simultaneously: defending against an actively 
operating enemy while repelling his assaults from the front and 
flanks; withdrawing subunits from battle and exercising 
C[.sup]2[/] of them; accomplishing a withdrawal as part of 
the regimental (battalion) main body; or operating in the 
advance guard (rear or flank security element or as covering- 
force subunits). 
  More favorable conditions for a withdrawal are created when 
this mission is accomplished out of contact with the enemy. In 
this case disengagement is excluded and subunits begin the 
withdrawal immediately. 
  Disengagement when fighting a defensive battle is a common 
phenomenon and is considered the initial stage of withdrawal. It 
is the removal of subunits from direct contact with the enemy to 
a distance precluding the active effect of his fire and 
providing freedom for subsequent maneuver. 
  A disengagement may occur both in the course of a defensive 
battle as well as in the attack. In the defense it is done to 
withdraw, transfer efforts from one axis to another, execute a 
maneuver, reinforce especially dangerous axes, close breaches 
which formed as a result of enemy use of nuclear weapons, and 
cover exposed flanks; in the attack it is done to transfer 
efforts from one axis to another. 
  A battalion (company) as a rule executes a withdrawal as 
part 
of the regiment immediately to the final line (to the designated 
area) in march formation. 
  Covering-force subunits usually are assigned to cover the 
main body's withdrawal. In terms of their [situation], 
covering-force subunits should be in direct contact with the 
enemy and maintain the previous regime of fire, prevent (stop) 
attempts of enemy reconnaissance to penetrate into the depth of 
the defense (to the main body), repel assaults by his forward 
subunits and not allow an organized transition to the pursuit. 
  One reinforced platoon each from a company defending in 
direct contact with the enemy usually is assigned to be part of 
covering-force subunits. In some cases a company may be assigned 
from a first echelon battalion to perform this mission. 
  Covering-force subunits are supplied with an additional 
reserve of missiles and ammunition and with medical transport. 
  A battalion may be assigned to a rear guard with the mission 
of delaying the attacking enemy for the time necessary for 
withdrawal of the main body. 
  For organized disengagement and withdrawal (Diagram 9), 
subunits operating as part of the main body are assigned 
assembly areas, withdrawal axes or routes, phase lines [rubezh 
regulirovaniya] and a final withdrawal line [konechnyy rubezh 
otkhoda]. 
  The procedure and content of the company (battalion) 
commander's work in organizing disengagement and withdrawal 
depend on situation conditions, the mission received and time 
available. On the whole, it takes place in the very same order 
as in organizing the defense, but has its features. 
  Thus, in the concept for disengagement and withdrawal the 
company (battalion) commander additionally specifies the 
following: final withdrawal line (area) and time of occupying 
it, makeup of covering-force subunits supporting the 
disengagement, and makeup of security elements; procedure for 
disengagement of the main body, assembly areas, and withdrawal 
axis or route; and procedure for evacuating wounded, sick, as 
well as damaged (unserviceable) weapons and vehicles. 
  In the operation order the company (battalion) 
commander indicates the following in assigning combat missions: 
  --For main body subunits--objective of the 
withdrawal, missions, procedure for disengaging, withdrawal axis 
or route, assembly area and time of arrival in it, lines (start 
point and phase lines) and time for crossing them, the final 
withdrawal line (designated area) and for what operations to be 
ready; 
  --For covering-force subunits supporting the 
disengagement--makeup, missions, time up to which they must hold 
occupied positions, and procedure for their further operations; 
  --For artillery subunits, air defense subunit, grenade 
launcher subunit and other weapons remaining directly 
subordinate to the commander--missions and withdrawal procedure; 
  --For security subunits--makeup and missions. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
must indicate the procedure for disengagement and withdrawal of 
subunits, for transporting or carrying out wounded and sick, and 
for evacuating unserviceable weapons and other vehicles; and 
coordinate actions of covering-force subunits and the procedure 
for their withdrawal, for demolition of important installations, 
for emplacement of obstacles, and for support of the covering- 
force subunits by artillery fire. 
  The time and procedure for disengagement depend on the 
nature 
of enemy operations, mission received and other situation 
conditions. In all cases the withdrawal as a rule must be 
carried out at night or under other conditions of limited 
visibility, but it also may be done during the day. Special 
attention here must be given to combating the air enemy and 
enemy tanks. 
  With the beginning of company (battalion) disengagement, 
covering-force subunits remain at occupied positions until the 
time given them or until the order (signal) for withdrawal, and 
they conduct the very same operations as preceded the 
disengagement. C[.sup]2[/] of these subunits is exercised by 
one of the platoon (company) commanders, who is directly 
subordinate to the company (battalion) commander and maintains 
communications with them. Taking advantage of favorable terrain 
conditions and using fire from occupied positions, the subunits 
repel enemy assaults and his attempts to penetrate into the 
depth of the defense. Artillery subunits assigned for their 
support conduct fire in the previous regime. 
  Taking advantage of concealing properties of terrain, 
subunits of the company (battalion) main body move to platoon 
assembly areas and then to the company and the battalion 
assembly area, assume the necessary march formation, and 
continue movement. 
  Covering-force subunits begin withdrawal at the commander's 
order (signal) after the company (battalion) crosses the line 
occupied by the rear guard. They withdraw suddenly, usually all 
of them simultaneously. If the enemy detects their withdrawal 
and begins pursuit, the covering- force subunits withdraw from 
line to line by bounds, delaying his advance, destroying bridges 
(crossings) and roads sections, and they also emplace minefields 
and other obstacles on enemy movement axes. 
  In a disengagement under conditions of active enemy 
operations, the company (battalion) inflicts damage on him by 
fire of all weapons and if necessary may suddenly counterattack 
with some of the forces or at full strength in order to halt the 
enemy and then quickly disengage under cover of assigned 
subunits, artillery and grenade launcher fire, obstacles, smoke 
and aerosols. 
  In the assembly area the company (battalion) commander 
updates missions for the withdrawal for platoons (companies) and 
means of reinforcement and organizes reconnaissance and 
security. On arrival in the assembly area the company 
(battalion) takes its place in the march formation and continues 
the withdrawal. 
  Company (battalion) security during a withdrawal is 
accomplished by the rear security element and if necessary also 
by flank security elements, which delay the enemy's advance by 
fire from the move and from in place and by operations of fire 
ambushes until the time indicated by the battalion commander. By 
order of the battalion commander, security elements also may 
demolish bridges (crossings) and road sections and emplace 
minefields and other obstacles. 
  A battalion assigned for operations in the rear guard takes 
up a defense at the indicated line in advance and holds it until 
the prescribed time or until the order to withdraw. Under all 
situation conditions it must support the regimental main body in 
breaking contact with the enemy and making an organized 
withdrawal. 
  A rear guard withdraws by authorization of the regimental 
commander successively from line to line or by leapfrogging, 
where some subunits withdraw to the next line, occupy positions 
on it across a broad front and support withdrawal of the other 
battalion subunits. In a withdrawal, wide use is made of fire 
ambushes, obstacles and demolitions. After accomplishing the 
mission the rear guard acts by direction of the regimental 
commander. 
  Battalion technical support and rear subunits not used for 
immediate support of the disengagement are withdrawn to the 
designated area in advance. The wounded and sick as well as 
unserviceable weapons and vehicles are evacuated ahead of time. 
Footnotes 
  1. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk" [Tactics in 
Combat Examples: The Regiment], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1974, p 194. 
  2. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk," pp 196-197. 
  3. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk," p 198. 
  4. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk," p 200. 
  5. See "Razvitiye taktiki strelkovykh podrazdeleniy 
Sovetskoy 
Armii v gody Velikoy Otechestvennoy voyny" [Development of 
Soviet Army Rifle Subunit Tactics in the Great Patriotic War], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1988, p 214. 
  6. See "Razvitiye taktiki strelkovykh podrazdeleniy 
Sovetskoy 
Armii v gody Velikoy Otechestvennoy voyny," pp 214-215. 
  7. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Rota," [Tactics in 
Combat Examples: The Company], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1974, pp 
67-68. 
<H5>  Chapter V - The Offense </H5>
<H5>  1. Essence and Characteristic Features of Offensive Battle. </H5>
Conditions and Methods for a Company (Battalion) To Launch an 
Attack 
  The history of wars convincingly attests that only the 
offense leads to decisive victory over the enemy. It is the sole 
kind of battle by whose conduct total rout (destruction) of the 
enemy and capture of important lines (areas) and objectives is 
achieved. Herein specifically lies the objective of the offense. 
  Engagement of the enemy with all available weapons, a 
decisive assault, a swift advance of subunits into the depth of 
his battle formation, the killing and capture of personnel, 
capture of weapons and military vehicles, and the taking of 
planned lines (areas) are the essence of modern offensive 
battle. A rout of the enemy is achieved by skillful use of all 
weapons, decisive exploitation of results of artillery fire and 
air strikes, a timely buildup of efforts into the depth, wide 
use of maneuver of forces and assets, and delivery of assaults 
against his flank and rear. 
  The offense must be conducted with full exertion of efforts, 
at a high tempo, nonstop, day and night in coordination with 
subunits of all combat arms and special troops. 
  As one of the basic kinds of battle, the offense has a 
number 
of advantages over the defense. Above all, the initiative in 
operations, in choosing the axis, time and methods of delivering 
an attack against the enemy, in executing a maneuver to the 
flank and rear, and in imposing one's will on him belongs to the 
attacker. A successful offense lifts the morale of attacking 
subunits and at the same time sharply degrades the morale and 
mental state of the defending enemy. 
  The offense may be conducted against an attacking, 
withdrawing or defending enemy. While the attack against an 
attacking enemy is accomplished by a meeting battle and against 
a withdrawing enemy by the pursuit, against a defending enemy it 
usually begins with a penetration of his defense. 
  Penetrating the defense consists of breaking it by strikes 
of 
all kinds of weapons and by a determined assault of tank and 
motorized rifle subunits in a narrow sector, creating a breach 
in the defense and subsequently expanding it into the depth and 
toward the flanks. 
  Sometimes there may be considerable gaps, breaches and 
exposed flanks in the enemy defense. In this case the attack 
begins with fire damage of the enemy and an assault by a portion 
of forces of subunits from the front and by the other forces 
from flanks and rear through the weakest places in the defense. 
The attack usually will be conducted on a broader front than in 
a penetration of the defense. 
  A company and battalion do not penetrate the enemy defense 
independently, but take an active part in its penetration and 
development of the attack. 
  A company (battalion) may attack in the first echelon, make 
up a second echelon or combined arms reserve of the battalion 
(regiment), or operate in an enveloping detachment or a special 
detachment. A company may be assigned to a forward security 
element (when the regiment is attacking with forward movement 
out of the depth and in pursuit of the enemy), and a battalion 
may be assigned to act as an advance guard (above all in pursuit 
of the enemy), forward detachment, raiding detachment or 
amphibious assault force. An MRC (MRB) in addition may be 
employed in a tactical airborne assault force or be the basis of 
an assault team (assault detachment). 
  Means of warfare, especially nuclear and precision weapons, 
have seen further development in recent years, the proportion of 
armored vehicles in units and subunits has grown, the 
effectiveness of artillery and aviation has increased, and 
engineer vehicles and means of combat, technical and logistic 
support have been upgraded. Because of this, decisiveness of 
objectives, high fluidity, intensity and dynamic nature are 
characteristic features of the modern offense. It acquired a 
ground-air nature, the essence of which is accomplishment of 
simultaneous fire damage to the full depth of the enemy troop 
alignment with use of more diverse methods of performing combat 
missions in a difficult electronic environment. 
  The ground-air nature of the offense presumes the delivery 
of 
a combination strike against the enemy and accomplishment of 
more decisive methods of routing him. A simultaneous strike by 
attacking subunits (units) from the front and by tactical 
airborne assault forces from the rear in coordination with 
aviation, especially helicopters, is achieved. Fire superiority 
of the sides beginning from distant approaches is strengthened 
in a modern offense, and the role of maneuver grows. 
  The attack by a company (battalion) may be carried out under 
varying situation conditions. Situation conditions are 
understood to mean factors exerting an influence individually or 
in the aggregate on the procedure and content of commanders' 
work of preparing for battle, especially work of organizing it, 
and also on methods of launching and conducting the attack. 
Those factors basically are the following: employment of 
conventional or nuclear weapons and other weapons; makeup, 
status and nature of the enemy defense; situation, status and 
combat capabilities of friendly subunits by the beginning of the 
attack, and also time available for preparing the attack; nature 
of terrain, condition of weather, time of day and year, and the 
NBC situation. 
  When an attack is conducted using only conventional weapons, 
the enemy is routed by reliable fire damage of his immediately 
opposing forces and assets, with a simultaneous effect on 
reserves and important objectives in the depth of the defense, 
and also by a decisive buildup of efforts to exploit success. 
Under these conditions a successive rout of the defending enemy 
is the basic method of conducting the attack. Subunits usually 
will assault him on a relatively lesser frontage (in a 
penetration sector). In addition, they must be in constant 
readiness to conduct an attack employing nuclear weapons. 
  In attacking an enemy who has shifted to the defense in 
advance, a company (battalion) often will have to cross his 
security zone, in which the enemy will establish nuclear 
minefields. 
  Under conditions of the use of nuclear weapons, the basic 
method of the attack is simultaneous engagement of the enemy and 
important objectives by nuclear strikes to the full depth of the 
defense with subsequent completion of his rout by decisive 
operations of tank and motorized rifle units and subunits. Also 
of great importance are effective steps to disrupt and weaken 
enemy nuclear strikes, subunits' decisive exploitation of 
nuclear and fire damage in order to complete the enemy's rout, 
and beating him to the punch in restoring combat effectiveness 
of friendly subunits and organizing their subsequent operations. 
Under these conditions subunits decisively assault the enemy on 
a broader frontage and usually operate along axes. As a rule, 
with the need to negotiate zones of radioactive contamination 
and sectors of destructive damage, their advance will be uneven 
along the front and into the depth of his defense. 
  Before launching an attack on a defending enemy a company 
(battalion) may take up an attack position [iskhodnaya 
pozitsiya] (assembly area [iskhodnyy rayon]) in direct contact 
with the enemy or be in an assembly area in the rear of friendly 
troops. 
  A company (battalion) may launch an attack against a 
defending enemy from a position of direct contact with him or 
from the move. 
  Based on defensive doctrine, in the initial period of war 
the 
basic method is to launch an attack from a position of 
direct contact with the enemy after regrouping. The essence 
of this method is that the company (battalion) commander's work 
in organizing the attack is done on the terrain and its 
preparation is completed on the whole in direct contact with the 
enemy. A company (battalion) launches an attack in the 
previously established battle formation. It is formed after the 
necessary regrouping from a position of defense and sometimes, 
under favorable conditions, simultaneously with the relief of 
defending subunits while moving forward out of the depth. In 
that method of launching an attack, subunits have an opportunity 
to study the enemy and terrain in advance, but the company 
(battalion) will be in the effect zone not only of enemy 
tactical nuclear attack weapons, but also of his artillery for a 
relatively long time. It is easier for a defending enemy to 
discover the forces and assets of attacking subunits. All this 
hampers preservation of their combat effectiveness and requires 
careful fortification of the attack position (assembly area) and 
conduct of measures for ensuring concealment and achieving a 
surprise assault. 
  In this method of launching an attack, an MRC is assigned an 
attack position equal in size to the company attack frontage and 
consisting of a trench or trenches, the adjoining communication 
trenches, and firing positions of BMP's (BTR's) and attached 
weapons. If it is impossible for BMP's (BTR's) to occupy firing 
positions covertly with their company near the FEBA, they may be 
placed at an attack position or assembly position 
[vyzhidatelnaya pozitsiya] together with tank subunits. The 
attack position of a first echelon MRC is specified in the first 
trench, and that of a second echelon company in the second and 
third trenches. 
  In order to occupy an attack position, the battalion is 
assigned an assembly area (Diagram 10). It should provide for 
concealed disposition of subunits and their least vulnerability 
to all enemy weapons and must be on the axis of attack. 
  An assembly area is specified for a first echelon battalion 
within the first defense position. It is limited from the front 
by the first trench, from the rear by the depth of disposition 
of battalion forces and assets and from the flanks by its 
boundaries. The following are basic elements of the area: attack 
positions of motorized rifle subunits (three trenches with 
communication trenches) and sometimes of tank subunits; firing 
positions of organic and attached artillery and other weapons, 
including those assigned to conduct direct fire, and launch 
(firing) positions of air defense subunits; sites of 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities; routes providing concealed approach, 
disposition and rapid forward movement of the battalion for 
launching an assault; and lines of deployment and departure of 
the tanks. Attack positions of tank subunits are designated 2-4 
km from the enemy FEBA in the case where there is concealment 
against enemy observation and listening. 
  An assembly area as a rule is chosen for the regiment's 
second echelon battalion at the second defense position. An 
assembly position usually is designated for a TB 5-7 km from the 
enemy FEBA. Terrain at the position must provide concealed 
disposition of tanks, their least vulnerability to all kinds of 
enemy weapons and convenience of moving up to the line of 
departure. 
  The essence of a hasty attack is that preparation 
for battle is accomplished in a period when subunits are out of 
contact with the enemy and their forward movement, deployment 
and transition to the assault are conducted nonstop, from the 
move. This method of attack has not only a number of advantages, 
but drawbacks as well: the personnel's physical exertion and 
consumption of fuel and other supplies increase in connection 
with forward movement to the enemy FEBA. The possibility exists 
that during forward movement it will be necessary to cross (or 
bypass) areas of destructive damage, minefields laid by remote 
minelaying equipment, and zones of radioactive and chemical 
contamination, centers of fire and areas of flooding. The enemy 
may deliver nuclear and fire strikes against subunits in the 
period of forward movement, especially with precision combat 
systems. Reliable fire support is accomplished by the senior 
commander's forces and assets to weaken these enemy strikes. 
  An attack usually is launched from an assembly area, which 
is 
assigned to the battalion with an area of up to 10 
km[.sup]2[/]. The battalion usually is disposed in it by 
company with means of reinforcement. A company is disposed in 
the area under cover along the route of forward movement, taking 
advantage of the terrain's protective and concealing properties. 
  The distance of the assembly area from the enemy FEBA should 
preclude engagement of the subunits in the area by artillery 
fire and provide concealment against radar reconnaissance 
assets. The least time possible should be spent moving up to the 
enemy FEBA. Shelters are made for personnel, weapons and 
military vehicles and the area is prepared for defense if 
necessary. Security, air defense, maskirovka, and protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons are organized in 
it. The ATP and GLP are disposed together with or behind first 
echelon MRC's. The air defense subunit is disposed at firing 
positions in readiness to fire on airborne targets. 
  For organized forward movement, deployment, and assurance of 
simultaneous transition to an assault, the company (battalion) 
usually is assigned a forward movement route, start point 
(line), point (line) of deployment into platoon (company) 
columns, line of departure and safety limit (Diagram 11). In 
addition, a dismount line also is specified for the dismounted 
assault of an MRC (MRB). 
  Places for personnel to board tanks as a mounted force are 
designated for motorized rifle subunits in motor vehicles if 
necessary. 
  A start point (line) is intended for a prompt beginning of 
company (battalion) forward movement from the assembly area. Its 
distance from the assembly area should allow the battalion 
column with means of reinforcement to extend and begin movement 
at a given speed. This distance may be 5-10 km. 
  A route is designated for movement of subunit columns up to 
the first deployment line. Subsequently forward movement will be 
accomplished along cross-country routes. 
  The point (line) of deployment into company columns is 
intended for beginning the battalion deployment into company 
columns. Its distance from the enemy FEBA should ensure that 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) cannot be engaged by fire of enemy 
ATGM's, tanks and guns assigned for direct fire and may be 
within 4-6 km. 
  The point (line) of deployment into platoon columns is 
designated where possible behind terrain folds 2-3 km from the 
enemy FEBA. Engagement of tanks and BMP's by short-range ATGM 
fire and the fire of IFV guns and other infantry weapons should 
be precluded with their arrival at this line. 
  A line of departure is chosen so that forward movement of 
first echelon companies to it is covert. The distance of the 
line should ensure effective fire from the main kinds of weapons 
of assaulting subunits and permit them to reach the enemy FEBA 
at the designated H hour nonstop at maximum speed. The line of 
departure may be up to 600 m from the enemy FEBA and sometimes 
even more depending on the nature of the enemy defense, degree 
of fire damage, terrain conditions and methods of assault. 
  The motorized rifle subunit dismount line is designated as 
close to the enemy FEBA as possible, usually in places providing 
cover from the fire of his machineguns and short-range AT 
weapons. Based on exercise experience, the dismount line was 
300-400 m from the enemy FEBA. This permits preserving the 
motorized riflemen's energy for the assault dash and at the same 
time ensures their safe distance from friendly artillery 
shellbursts at the moment they dismount. 
  The safety limit is specified so as to preclude damage of 
forward moving subunits from casualty-producing factors of a 
nuclear strike (strikes) delivered by friendly troops against 
enemy strongpoints on the forward edge. 
  Under favorable situation conditions, especially in the 
course of developing an attack, a company (battalion) may 
assault the enemy by deploying into battle formation from march 
columns, i.e., directly from the march. This makes it 
considerably more difficult for the enemy to execute a maneuver 
and at the same time helps achieve surprise. In this situation 
organization for battle usually is accomplished in movement or 
during short halts. Subunits launch the assault as they approach 
the FEBA. 
<H5>  2. Company (Battalion) Attack Frontage, Combat Missions, </H5>
Means of Reinforcement and Battle Formations 
  A company (battalion) attacks in a certain frontage 
determined by its place in the battle formation, its role in 
performing the battalion (regimental) mission, the subunit's 
status and combat capabilities, weapons employed, the defender's 
forces and nature of terrain. 
  Thus, the company (battalion) attack frontage will be 
relatively less when attacking using conventional weapons in the 
regimental penetration sector, i.e., on its main axis of attack. 
At the same time, the company (battalion) attack frontage as a 
rule is wider in operations using nuclear weapons or on another 
axis of regimental attack (not the main one). 
  When attacking in the regimental penetration sector, a 
company (battalion) should attack in that frontage which would 
ensure necessary superiority over the enemy in tanks, BMP's, 
ATGM's and small arms. In the Great Patriotic War a successful 
attack on a deliberate enemy defense required subunits of the 
attacking echelon to create a ratio of 6:1 in tanks and SP 
artillery to enemy tanks and 4:1 in rifle companies in the 
penetration sector. That superiority also is needed under 
present conditions, since subunit combat capabilities are 
growing approximately the very same both for us as well as for 
the probable enemy. 
  Consequently, to determine the company (battalion) attack 
frontage in the regimental penetration sector using only 
conventional weapons, it is necessary to create the indicated 
superiority in forces and assets. Damage done to the enemy in 
tanks and IFV's in appropriate periods of fire engagement, which 
should be at least 60 percent, is taken into account. In this 
case losses of our tanks, BMP's and small arms from enemy fire 
may reach 10- 20 percent. In addition, tank (motorized rifle) 
subunits interworking with (attached to) an MRC or TC (MRB or 
TB) are taken into account in calculations. Thus, the company 
(battalion) attack frontage is determined based on combat 
capabilities of ATGM-equipped BMP's, tanks and small arms. 
  Based on the initial data set forth above, the methodology 
of 
calculating company attack frontage can be as follows, and the 
following are determined in so doing: 

  -  number of ATGM-equipped IFV's and Dragon and TOW ATGM 
systems of the defending enemy mechanized infantry task force 
(made up of three mechanized infantry companies and one TC) with 
consideration of losses from our fire damage; 
  -  density of AT weapons and tanks per kilometer in the first 
echelon of the enemy battle group defending in a frontage of 5 
km (it is considered that up to 70 percent of AT weapons and 
tanks are disposed in the group's first echelon); 
  -  number of 
ATGM-equipped BMP's and tanks necessary for creating a 
superiority of 5-6 times over the enemy per kilometer of attack 
frontage; 
  -  number of BMP's and tanks used in the company attack with 
consideration of permissible losses from enemy fire; 
  -  company attack frontage on condition of establishing 
requisite 
superiority in ATGM-equipped BMP's and tanks over the 
enemy. 


    Let us determine the attack frontage of a BMP-equipped MRC 
interworking with 5-6 tanks (or of an MRB reinforced by a TC). 
  The enemy battalion task force may have 80 ATGM-equipped 
IFV's, Dragon and TOW ATGM systems and tanks, or 32 counting 
losses from our fire damage (up to 60 percent). Around 23 of 
this number of AT weapons and tanks are used in the task force 
first echelon, which will comprise a density of around 5 per 
kilometer with its defense frontage of 5 km. To establish a 
superiority of 5- 6 times over the enemy it is necessary for the 
attacking company to have 25-30 tanks and BMP's per kilometer. 
In the course of the attack, counting permissible losses (up to 
20 percent), an MRC will have 12 BMP's and tanks: (10 BMP's + 5 
tanks) x 0.8. By establishing the necessary superiority, a 
company is capable of attacking in a frontage of 400-600 m, 
i.e., up to 500 m with that number. 
  Let us examine the frontage in which an MRC is capable of 
attacking based on combat capabilities of small arms. The 
following are determined: 

  -  cumulative effective rate of small arms fire of the enemy 
task force first echelon subunits with consideration of losses 
(at least 50 percent) from our fire damage; 
  -  density of enemy fire (number of bullets) per meter per 
minute; 
  -  necessary bullet density per meter of frontage per minute 
with 
consideration of a superiority of 3-4 times over the enemy; 
  -  cumulative effective rate of fire of the company in one 
minute 
with consideration of permissible losses from enemy fire (10-20 
percent); 
  -  company attack frontage. 


    In accordance with the above methodology, let us determine 
an 
MRC's attack frontage based on requirements of achieving the 
necessary small arms ratio. 
  The cumulative effective rate of fire of first echelon 
mechanized infantry subunits of a battalion task force (there 
are two mechanized infantry companies) counting losses (50 
percent) is 24,375 bullets in one minute (rifles--111x175)+(M60 
machineguns--9x250)+(MG3 machineguns- -18x150). With a task 
force defending a frontage of 5,000 m, enemy fire density will 
be 4-5 bullets per meter per minute. To establish a superiority 
of 3-4 times, a company must ensure a density averaging 15-16 
bullets per meter per minute. The cumulative effective rate of 
fire of an MRC is 9,750 bullets (AK [Kalashnikov assault 
rifle]--39x100)+(RPK [Kalashnikov light machinegun]-- 9x150)+(PK 
[Kalashnikov machinegun] and PKT [Kalashnikov tank machinegun]-- 
18x250). Counting permissible losses (20 percent), the rate of 
company small arms fire will be 7,800 bullets in one minute. 
Consequently, to create requisite bullet density per meter of 
frontage, the company must attack in a frontage up to 500 m 
(7,80015=520 m; 7,80016=480 m; (520+480)2=500 m). 
  In what frontage is an MRB (TB) capable of conducting a 
successful attack? The methodology of this calculation is the 
very same as for determining company attack frontage. The 
difference lies only in the fact that it is necessary to take 
into account the density of all forces and assets of the enemy 
battalion task force in its defense frontage, not just of its 
first echelon. 
  Let us calculate the attack frontage of an MRB reinforced by 
a TC based on the need for creating a superiority over the enemy 
in ATGM- equipped BMP's and tanks. 
  There may be ATGM-equipped IFV's, Dragon and TOW ATGM 
systems 
and tanks numbering 80 in a battalion task force defense, or 32 
counting losses from our fire damage (80x0.4). That number of AT 
weapons and tanks permits creating a density of approximately 6 
of them per kilometer (with the force defending in a 5 km 
frontage). To establish a superiority of 5-6 times over the 
enemy, an attacking battalion must have 30-36 ATGM-equipped 
BMP's and tanks per kilometer of frontage. In an MRB reinforced 
by a TC, counting losses there may be 32-34 ATGM-equipped BMP's 
and tanks: (30 BMP's+10 tanks)x0.8=32. Consequently, a battalion 
is capable of conducting a successful attack in a frontage up to 
1,000 m (based on creating the necessary superiority in ATGM- 
equipped BMP's, ATGM systems and tanks). 
  The attack frontage of an MRB based on the presence of its 
small arms should be determined according to the methodology of 
calculating a company frontage, but it is necessary to take into 
account small arms existing in the enemy task force. 
  When nuclear weapons are used, in connection with 
destruction 
of the defending enemy's main forces and assets, a company 
(battalion) attack frontage will be wider than when conventional 
weapons are used. This frontage should ensure interworking among 
subunits and their operations in approach march formation and 
along axes, bypass of destructive damage, and convenience of 
observation and C[.sup]2[/]. Based on this, combat training 
experience has shown that under the conditions in question a 
company is capable of conducting an attack against a defending 
enemy in a frontage up to 1,000 m and a battalion in a frontage 
up to 2,000 m. 
  In conducting an attack on another axis (outside the 
penetration sector), a company and battalion will require 
approximately half the forces and assets to achieve necessary 
superiority per kilometer of frontage. This is explained 
basically by the fact that on such an axis the enemy usually 
will defend on a wider front (for example, a battalion will 
defend up to 8 km) and in addition, the company (battalion) will 
have a more limited mission to perform than in the regimental 
penetration sector. 
  Intervals between attacking tanks and BMP's may reach 100 m, 
and this makes it convenient for observation and C[.sup]2[/]. 
In addition, these intervals permit BMP's to conduct fire 
between attacking tanks, which may execute the assault in a 
zigzag (S-weave) without interfering with each other in the 
course of the assault. Continuous engagement of enemy infantry 
in the attack frontage is provided by single-layer gun fire when 
fire is conducted by tanks attacking with intervals up to 100 m, 
and with double-layer gun fire with intervals of 50 m. 
  It is necessary to specify combat missions for subunits 
correctly in organizing an attack. The procedure of their 
operations also depends on the combat missions. The combat 
mission is the basis for organizing battle, including 
coordination and comprehensive support. 
  It is apparent from the calculations cited above for 
determining attack frontage against a defending enemy that a 
reinforced company is capable (with the necessary superiority) 
of inflicting damage on his personnel and weapons in the platoon 
strongpoint and continuing to advance into the depth. A 
reinforced battalion in turn has an opportunity to crush the 
enemy to the full depth of the battalion defense in the attack 
frontage and preserve forces and assets for continuing it. The 
capability of the company and battalion to inflict such damage 
on the enemy is their common mission. As shown by the experience 
of wars and exercises, based on effective range of fire by 
tanks, BMP's and small arms and also on the need for maximum 
involvement of weapons to engage the enemy in assault 
objectives, a reinforced company is capable of realizing its 
combat capabilities in the initial alignment of the battle 
formation, which also is retained for subsequent operations, 
i.e., when the company attacks, all its forces and assets must 
take part in the assault simultaneously. A reinforced battalion 
is forced to change the initial alignment of forces and assets 
for full utilization of its combat capabilities and for 
performing the common mission (routing the enemy to the depth of 
defense of his battalion) in order to retain necessary 
superiority in forces and assets. 
  In this connection, in an attack on a defending enemy the 
overall combat mission of a first echelon battalion is divided 
into two intermediate missions--immediate and subsequent 
(Diagram 12). The company mission is not divided--it is assigned 
only an immediate mission. The company and battalion commander 
are given a direction for continuing the attack to orient them 
for subsequent operations after performing common missions. 
  As a rule, the combat mission is characterized by 
tactical content and depth. The content of the combat mission is 
destruction of a specific enemy at a specific point (in a 
specific area) and taking of a line on the terrain by a 
designated time. Mission depth is determined by the distance of 
the line to be taken from the enemy FEBA or from the line of the 
previous mission. 
  The enemy unquestionably is the primary objective of the 
attack. Only with destruction (capture) of personnel and damage 
(seizure) of weapons is its goal achieved. Routing the enemy and 
taking a line is a unified process. The line which should be 
taken must be a tactical line favoring the attackers (seizure of 
a hill, water obstacle (bridgehead), pass, opposite edge of the 
forest and so on). 
  Thus, the immediate mission of a first echelon 
company (also including a TC attached to an MRB) is to 
destroy the enemy in the first echelon platoon strongpoint and 
take the strongpoint. Mission depth may be up to 0.5 km. The 
direction for continuing the attack is indicated in such a way 
that it supports performance of the battalion's immediate 
mission. 
  The immediate mission of a second echelon company 
when committed may be to complete destruction of the enemy in 
strongpoints in the depth of the defense together with first 
echelon companies and take the first position. The direction for 
continuing the company attack is assigned so as to ensure 
performance of the battalion's subsequent mission. Mission depth 
may be 3 km or more. 
  The immediate mission of a first echelon battalion 
as a rule is to destroy the enemy in strongpoints of first 
echelon companies in its own attack frontage and take them. The 
subsequent mission is to develop the attack, rout the enemy in 
the depth of the defense area in coordination with adjacent 
battalions and take the first position. The direction for 
continuing the attack is determined so as to ensure performance 
of the regiment's subsequent mission. The depth of missions may 
reach up to 2 km for the immediate and 3 km or more for the 
subsequent mission. 
  The immediate mission of a second echelon battalion 
when committed may consist of completing the destruction 
of enemy brigade (regimental) reserves together with first 
echelon battalions and taking their line. The depth of the 
immediate mission may be 5-7 km and sometimes even more. 
  New missions are assigned to a first echelon company and 
battalion after performance of combat missions. As with second 
echelon subunits, they usually are assigned one mission and a 
new direction for continuing the attack. The mission content may 
differ and is determined by the existing situation. Under some 
conditions the mission may be to develop the attack into the 
depth and take an important line and, under others, to repel an 
enemy counterattack. 
  To perform combat missions during an attack, a company 
(battalion) is reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and 
special troops. Depending on the assigned mission, a mortar 
(artillery) battery and an AT, grenade launcher, flamethrower 
and combat engineer squad may be attached to the MRC and an 
artillery battery, MRP and combat engineer squad may be attached 
to the TC. In addition, the MRC (TC) may be supported by fire of 
an artillery (mortar) battery and interwork with a tank 
(motorized rifle) company (platoon). 
  An MRB (TB) usually is reinforced by one or two TC's 
(MRC's), 
an artillery battalion or battery, combat engineer platoon, 
subunits of AT and air defense weapons, subunits of chemical 
troops, mineclearing equipment, bridgelayer, obstacle-clearing 
engineer vehicle (or BAT route clearance dozer) and other 
equipment. In addition, the battalion is supported by fire of an 
artillery battalion, sometimes by combat helicopters, and is 
covered by air defense weapons in the regimental system. 
  An MRC attached to a TB as a rule is resubordinated to TC's 
by platoon. A TC attached to an MRB usually operates at full 
strength and is directly subordinate to the battalion commander. 
A TC may be attached to MRC's by platoon when attacking in a 
city, in the mountains, in the forest and against a fortified 
area. 
  The mortar (artillery) battery and GLP operate at full 
strength in direct subordination to the battalion commander. 
Sometimes the battery is attached by platoon and the GLP by 
squads to first echelon MRC's. The AT squad (platoon) as a rule 
remains at the disposal of the company (battalion) commander and 
operates at full strength. 
  To perform the assigned mission in an attack against a 
defending enemy, company (battalion) forces and assets are 
aligned in a battle formation which should conform to the 
mission, concept of upcoming battle and situation conditions at 
hand. 
  The following requirements are placed on the battle 
formation 
in the attack. It is aligned so as to ensure the following: 
successful conduct of the attack with employment both of 
conventional as well as nuclear weapons; timely concentration of 
efforts on the selected axis; maximum involvement of weapons in 
the battle and full use of subunits' combat capabilities; 
decisive damage to the greatest possible depth; swift 
exploitation of results of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy 
and of favorable terrain conditions. The need for building up 
efforts in the course of battle and executing a maneuver, least 
vulnerability of subunits to strikes of all kinds of weapons, 
maintenance of continuous coordination, and convenience of 
C[.sup]2[/] also are very important requirements placed on 
the battle formation alignment. 
  A typical feature of the modern company (battalion) battle 
formation is their greater tactical and fire independence than 
in the Great Patriotic War. This is explained by the fact that 
at the present time the company and battalion possess higher 
striking power, firepower and mobility. In addition, subunits of 
other combat arms and special troops are attached to or support 
them. In connection with this the number of elements of the 
battle formation has increased and its alignment is becoming 
more varied than before. 
  As a rule, the battle formation of a company in the attack 
is 
aligned in a single echelon and consists of platoons and 
reinforcing weapons and subunits which remain directly 
subordinate to the company commander. The battalion battle 
formation may be formed in one or two echelons. It consists of 
first echelon companies with means of reinforcement, a second 
echelon or reserve, and also reinforcing weapons and subunits 
remaining directly subordinate to the battalion commander. 
  The first echelon is intended for performing the immediate 
mission and in addition must develop the attack into the depth. 
Therefore it must be stronger. Thus, as a rule all MRP's are 
used in the first echelon of the MRC and interworking tank 
subunits attack with them in addition. Usually two and sometimes 
even three reinforced MRC's (less a platoon) and tank subunits 
attached to the MRB are used in the MRB first echelon. 
  The battalion second echelon, usually up to a company, 
performs the mission of exploiting success of the first echelon 
in the depth of the enemy defense, widening the penetration of 
the defense toward the flank. In addition, it may be used to 
repel a counterattack, replace subunits which have lost combat 
effectiveness, and destroy the enemy remaining on the flanks and 
in the rear of the first echelon. A specific combat mission is 
assigned to the second echelon simultaneously with the first 
echelon. 
  A reserve is assigned when there is a single-echelon 
alignment of the battalion battle formation. It is intended for 
performing missions arising in the course of the attack. From a 
platoon to a company is assigned to the reserve. A combat 
mission is assigned to it during commitment. 
  The attached artillery battalion (battery) is used to 
destroy 
and neutralize enemy means of nuclear and chemical attack, 
tanks, AT weapons, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and electronic 
equipment, demolish fortifications and provide illumination 
support. 
  Supporting artillery subunits perform fire missions in 
support of the company (battalion) under the battalion 
(regimental) commander's plan. 
  Air defense subunits are used for combating low-flying 
aircraft, helicopters and drones and destroying enemy airborne 
assault forces at low and medium altitudes. Being in the battle 
formation, air defense subunits conduct fire against airborne 
targets in movement or from short halts. 
  The AT squad of the MRC (MRB) and AT grenade launcher 
subunits are intended for destroying enemy tanks, IFV's and 
other armored targets. They also may be employed for destroying 
weapons, including those in fortification structures, and for 
combating helicopters. 
  The MRB's GLP is intended for engaging enemy personnel and 
weapons outside of shelters, in open emplacements (trenches) and 
behind terrain folds. 
  The attached subunit of engineer troops basically is used in 
the course of an attack for performing engineer reconnaissance 
of terrain, destroying enemy nuclear mines, breaching obstacles 
and destructive damage, making crossings over barriers and 
preparing and maintaining crossings. 
<H5>  3. Fire Engagement and Methods of Assault </H5>
  The goals of fire engagement are as follows: destroying 
(neutralizing) means of nuclear and chemical attack and the main 
enemy grouping; winning and maintaining fire superiority over 
the enemy; disorganizing C[.sup]2[/] and fire control; 
disrupting his air defense system and operation of the rear; and 
creating favorable conditions for units and subunits to perform 
combat missions successfully. These goals are achieved by 
comprehensive fire effect on the enemy by forces and assets of 
subunits of the Armed Forces, combat arms and special troops 
using missiles and ammunition filled with conventional means. 
  Fire engagement is organized, planned and carried out by the 
senior commander and his staff and is conducted to a 
considerable depth of the enemy defense. 
  Missile subunits, artillery, aviation (including army 
aviation), weapons of defending units (subunits), as well as 
tanks, ATGM launchers and guns for direct fire, ordinarily 
assigned from second echelons of units, usually are used for 
fire engagement in support of attacking troops. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy in an attack usually 
is planned for three periods: fire preparation of the assault, 
fire support of the assault, and fire accompaniment of attacking 
subunits in the depth. Sometimes it may be conducted for the 
last two periods in a meeting battle and when the battalion 
(regimental) second echelon is committed. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy includes artillery and air 
engagement. In taking part in it, artillery uses the following 
types of fire: against a single target, concentrated, massed, 
standing barrier, rolling barrier, successive fire concentration 
(it may be single, double or triple), rolling barrage (single, 
double) and so on. 
  Battalion artillery and artillery attached to the company 
(battalion) may employ fire independently against a single 
target, concentrated fire and standing barrier fire and also be 
used to conduct massed fire, rolling barrier fire and a rolling 
barrage as part of or together with the regimental artillery 
group. 
  Fire preparation of the assault is accomplished 
before subunits launch the assault and is conducted to a 
considerable depth of the enemy defense. Thus, back in the Great 
Patriotic War a trend appeared toward increasing the depth of 
simultaneous fire engagement of the enemy, which at the end of 
the third period often reached 15 km and more. 
  The goal of fire preparation of the assault is to inflict 
damage on means of nuclear and chemical attack, artillery, AT 
weapons, tanks, personnel and weapons in defense strongpoints, 
the C[.sup]2[/] system, precision weapons, air defense 
weapons, electronic equipment and so on. 
  When launching an assault against a defending enemy from a 
position of direct contact with him, fire preparation of the 
assault begins when subunits are ready for the assault and ends 
with the arrival of tank subunits at the line of departure from 
assembly areas (attack positions). 
  In an attack launched from the move, fire preparation of the 
assault begins when first echelon subunits approach the line 
reached by enemy artillery fire, but not later than when they 
reach the line of deployment into battalion columns, and ends 
with the subunits' arrival at the line of departure. 
  Duration of fire preparation of the assault basically 
depends 
on preparedness of the defense and its necessary degree of 
damage, extent of fire missions to be performed, artillery's 
technical capabilities and ammunition available and may be 
around one hour. 
  Fire preparation of the assault is conducted by several 
artillery fire assaults and usually by one air raid of front 
aviation. In the first fire assault artillery usually engages AT 
weapons, tanks and personnel in platoon strongpoints of 
companies of the first line, as well as artillery, mortars, and 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities of first echelon battalions. In the 
middle of artillery preparation, fire assaults are conducted 
against targets both in the depth of the enemy defense (in 
second echelon battalions) as well as on the forward edge (in 
the first position), especially against AT weapons and tanks. 
Fire preparation of the assault ends with a powerful artillery 
fire assault against strongpoints of the first line and against 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
  Tanks, ATGM's, guns and other weapons assigned for direct 
fire destroy and neutralize above all enemy AT and armored 
weapons on the FEBA and in its immediate depth in the period of 
fire preparation of the assault. 
  Air preparation of the assault is accomplished by front and 
army aviation, which most often performs its missions in the 
middle and at the end of fire preparation, when artillery is 
neutralizing the enemy at the first position. 
  Fire support of the assault is conducted to keep 
the enemy from restoring the disrupted system of fire and 
C[.sup]2[/] and to create conditions for assaulting subunits 
to complete the enemy's rout. This is achieved by engaging means 
of nuclear attack, elements of the automated artillery fire 
control system, AT weapons, tanks and other targets which have 
been newly detected or have come alive. 
  Fire support of the assault begins with arrival of first 
echelon subunits at the line of departure and is conducted 
continuously to the depth of defense of the enemy first echelon 
brigade (regiment) (8-10 km and sometimes even more), with main 
efforts concentrated on damaging him at the first position. 
  Artillery support of the assault may be conducted by a 
rolling barrage, successive fire concentration, concentrated 
fire against single targets or a combination of these methods. 
Basic methods of artillery support of the assault to the depth 
of the enemy first echelon battalion may be a successive fire 
concentration or rolling barrage, since these methods conduct 
fire against several lines simultaneously and thus provide for 
engaging AT weapons at a considerable depth. 
  Front aviation destroys newly detected targets in the depth 
of the enemy defense, and combat helicopters in pairs and 
flights deliver strikes against tanks, other armored targets, AT 
weapons and counterattacking enemy subunits. 
  Fire accompaniment of attacking subunits in the 
depth begins following the end of fire support of the 
assault and, depending on the nature of the defending enemy, is 
accomplished to the depth of new missions assigned to subunits 
in developing the attack in the enemy defense. 
  The basic method of artillery accompaniment of subunits' 
attack in the depth is concentrated, massed and barrier fire and 
fire against single targets. Air accompaniment of the attack is 
accomplished by delivering strikes against newly detected means 
of nuclear attack, approaching reserves, airfields, 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities and other targets. Army aviation 
delivers simultaneous or successive strikes against a 
withdrawing enemy, above all against tanks and AT weapons. 
  Nuclear strikes may be delivered against the enemy before 
troops launch an attack and in its course. 
  The company (battalion) commander's skillful use of 
principles of fire engagement of the enemy is of great 
importance in achieving success in the attack. The most 
important principles are the following: massing of weapons on 
the axis of concentration of main efforts; swift maneuver of 
fire; close, continuous coordination of attacking subunits and 
weapons; assurance of survivability of weapons from enemy fire 
strikes; surprise delivery of fire strikes against the enemy; 
continuous fire pressure on the enemy; and flexible control of 
subunits and weapons. 
  Fire engagement is organized in the company (battalion) in 
accordance with the situation and mission received. It is an 
important component in organizing the attack as a whole and 
usually includes the following: making the decision for fire 
engagement; assigning missions to weapons, including those 
assigned for direct fire; organizing coordination among weapons 
and assaulting subunits; organizing fire control; establishing 
safety measures for subunits in conducting fire; and monitoring 
readiness of weapons to perform missions. 
  Under conditions where the company (battalion) attacks as 
part of a battalion (regiment), the bulk of fire engagement 
matters are decided by the senior commander, including with the 
involvement of battalion weapons. In this case the commander 
usually determines the following based on a mission analysis and 
situation estimate: secondary missions for organic, attached and 
supporting artillery (if fire capabilities exceed the scope of 
missions assigned it by the senior commander) by periods of fire 
engagement; missions for weapons assigned for direct fire; 
missions for weapons in the capture of strongpoints, repulse of 
counterattacks, commitment of follow-on forces, consolidation of 
the captured line and so on; and procedure for interworking of 
weapons. In the course of estimating the situation the company 
(battalion) commander may listen to commanders of organic, 
attached and supporting artillery subunits about missions they 
have received and fire capabilities. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy is organized by the company 
(battalion) commander to the full extent when a company 
(battalion) is performing a mission independently in isolation 
from the main body (such as during operations in a special or 
enveloping detachment, and for the battalion in addition in a 
forward or raiding detachment). 
  In the decision for fire engagement he usually specifies the 
following: missions for organic and attached artillery by 
periods of fire engagement; procedure for engaging the enemy by 
fire of tanks, BMP's (BTR's), grenade launchers and other 
weapons when destroying the enemy in the course of performing 
the mission; weapon readiness times to perform the mission. Fire 
engagement missions are assigned to subunits in the operation 
order. 
  In organizing coordination the procedure and time of forward 
movement of artillery and weapons assigned for direct fire and 
of their occupation and preparation of firing positions are 
updated; the procedure for fire engagement by periods is 
coordinated; distribution of enemy objectives (targets) for 
engagement by fire of artillery and other weapons is clarified; 
the procedure for shifting from fire preparation to fire support 
of the assault as well as the beginning and end of fire by 
weapons assigned for direct fire and the procedure for their 
further actions is indicated; the procedure for requesting, 
transferring and ceasing fire in the course of battle is 
established; artillery fire and air strikes are coordinated with 
subunit actions in penetrating the defense and developing the 
attack, in repelling counterattacks, during commitment of 
follow-on forces and in performing other missions; and methods 
of marking the front line and the procedure for target 
designation for aviation are clarified. 
  Depending on the degree of fire damage of the enemy, the 
nature of his defense and terrain and the outfitting of 
motorized rifle subunits with combat vehicles, the assault is 
accomplished by two methods: dismounted following tanks, or in 
BMP's (BTR's) without dismounting the personnel. Tank subunits 
assault the enemy in an extended line under any situation 
conditions. 
  An assault is a swift, nonstop movement of tank 
and motorized rifle subunits in battle formation in combination 
with intensive fire from tanks and BMP's (BTR's) and, as they 
close with the enemy, also from other kinds of weapons for 
purposes of destroying him. It is the most decisive moment of 
the attack and is conducted at a fast tempo with full exertion 
of attackers' efforts. 
  Success of the assault largely is ensured by its 
forcefulness, the daring of attackers' actions, surprise of the 
strike, swiftness of the maneuver and a continuous combination 
of fire and movement. 
  In terms of time of operations it is a day or night assault 
and in terms of directions of conduct it is frontal, flanking 
and from the rear. The assault begins from attack positions or 
from a line of departure depending on methods of launching the 
attack. 
  A dismounted assault by motorized rifle subunits is 
conducted 
in penetrating a deliberate enemy defense and fortified areas, 
and also on very rugged or difficult terrain for tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's). Dismounted personnel attack in an extended line 200-250 
m behind the extended line of tanks, which ensures their mutual 
support. 
  After personnel dismount, gunner-operators (machinegunners), 
drivers and deputy platoon commanders remain in the BMP's 
(BTR's). BMP's (BTR's) displace by bounds from cover to cover 
(from line to line) behind assaulting subunits at a distance 
which would ensure their reliable fire support. BMP's with 
stabilized weapons usually attack directly in the extended line 
of their own subunits. 
  Motorized rifle subunits in motor vehicles as a 
rule assault the enemy in dismounted formation. In some cases 
they may operate as a mounted force on tanks (especially in the 
season of bad roads, in the presence of a deep snow cover and so 
on). After the personnel dismount, motor vehicles proceed to 
designated assembly sites and are disposed by company or by 
battalion 2-4 km from the enemy FEBA. The battalion commander, 
or the company commander with his permission, summons motor 
vehicles to the subunits. 
  A dismounted assault permits motorized rifle 
subunits to accomplish it to the full depth of the combat 
mission only at a relatively slow tempo, on the order of 1-1.5 
km/hr, which is confirmed by Great Patriotic War experience. It 
is natural that the tempo of the direct assault on the enemy 
FEBA should be higher by approximately 2-3 times or more. During 
development of the battle in the depth, when subunits execute a 
maneuver in approach march formations and in columns, the tempo 
of the attack naturally will be higher than when destroying the 
enemy at positions. 
  The assault by motorized rifle subunits is 
accomplished in BMP's (BTR's) under situation conditions where 
the enemy defense has been reliably neutralized by fire and a 
large portion of his AT weapons have been destroyed, in an 
attack on a hastily occupied defense that has had insufficient 
engineer development, and on favorable terrain. 
  In this case the tanks assault right after friendly 
shellbursts, and motorized rifle subunits in BMP's (BTR's), in 
an extended line 100-200 m behind the tanks, destroy AT weapons 
and other targets by their fire. 
  Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) should move up to the line of 
departure and directly into the assault at a speed of 15-20 
km/hr or more. Remember that the higher the speed of tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's) when closing with the enemy, the faster his zone 
of continuous, multilayered fire is crossed and consequently 
also the greater the degree to which their survivability 
increases. 
  With this method of assault, motorized rifle subunits are 
provided with high tempos of advance as a whole to the full 
depth of combat missions. The high assault tempos permit 
subunits to exploit results of fire and nuclear damage of the 
enemy in shorter time periods and hamper him in closing breaches 
in the defense and executing counterattacks. War and exercise 
experience shows that with an increase in assault tempos by one 
and one-half times, losses of assaulting subunits to enemy fire 
are reduced by 2-3 times. 
  Close interworking of tank, artillery and motorized rifle 
subunits and subunits of other combat arms and special troops 
must be achieved with any methods of assault. 
<H5>  4. Preparation of an Attack Against a Defending Enemy </H5>
  Preparation of the attack begins in the company (battalion) 
on receiving a combat mission. It envisages conduct of a set of 
measures, the most important being the following: organization 
for battle; preparation of the company (battalion) to perform 
the combat mission; preparation of the attack position (assembly 
area); organization and conduct of political work; practical 
work of the company commander (battalion commander, his deputies 
and staff) in the subunits; and other measures. 
  It should be noted that under present conditions in 
connection with qualitative change in means of warfare, the 
scope of work to prepare the attack has grown sharply on the one 
hand and the time for performing it has been shortened on the 
other. Thus, while 2-3 days usually were spent at the 
battalion-company level to prepare the attack in the past war, 
now the time has decreased considerably. 
  Organization for battle includes the following: 
decisionmaking by the company (battalion) commander for the 
attack; ground reconnaissance; assignment of combat missions to 
subunits; and organization of coordination; fire damage of the 
enemy, comprehensive support and C[.sup]2[/]. 
  The procedure and content of the company (battalion) 
commander's work of organizing for battle are determined by 
situation conditions and above all by methods of launching the 
attack, the combat mission and time available. Thus, in 
launching an attack from a position of direct contact with the 
enemy, the company (battalion) commander has an opportunity to 
perform all work of organizing for battle directly on the 
terrain. 
  It should be noted that when launching an attack from a 
position of direct contact with the enemy, simultaneously with 
questions of organizing for battle, the company (battalion) 
commander also decides questions of regrouping or relieving 
defending subunits. When launching an attack after regrouping 
from a position of defense, organization for battle on the 
terrain (in the direction of attack) is accomplished in the 
period when the company (battalion) is in the strongpoint 
(defense area) under enemy fire pressure. But when launching an 
attack with simultaneous relief of defending subunits or from 
the move, battle is organized on the terrain in the 
concentration area and in the assembly area respectively out of 
contact with the enemy. 
  Sometimes when attacking from the move there will be no 
opportunity to travel out on the terrain with subordinate 
commanders. In this case organizing for battle is done in the 
assembly area from a map or on a terrain model, but during 
subunits' forward movement to the line of departure and with the 
beginning of the assault the commander updates the mission and 
coordination procedure for them. 
  In a situation where it is necessary to participate in 
penetrating a defense (as a rule, hastily occupied) in the 
course of developing the attack, the company (battalion) 
commander is forced to make a decision from the map and assign 
missions to subordinates during their forward movement toward 
the enemy defense. Missions and the coordination procedure are 
updated for the subunits in the period of deployment into 
approach march and battle formations and with the beginning of 
the assault. 
<H5>  5. Company Commander's Work of Organizing the Attack From a </H5>
Position of Direct Contact With the Enemy 
<H5>  (Variant) </H5>
  Tactical situation (Fig. 6) 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-83A>      Fig. 6. 2nd MRC commander's decision for the attack </FIG>

  As a result of losses, the enemy has been forced to cease 
the 
attack and by the end of 5 July shifted to a defense at the line 
reached. 
  Our subunits withdrew to a prepared defensive line along the 
east bank of Chernyy Brook, halted the enemy advance, and 
simultaneously are preparing for an attack. 
  At 1200 hours 6 July 1st MRB commander assigned missions to 
subunit commanders in the vicinity of the farmstead and 
organized coordination, from which the 2nd MRC commander learned 
the following: 
  1. 1st MRB with 2nd TC is launching an attack after 
regrouping from a position of defense. The battalion destroys 
the enemy in the company strongpoint barn, Bibirevo, Hill 108.0 
and takes the line Kvadratnaya Grove, Sinkovo. The battalion 
concentrates main efforts in the direction of sand pit, 
windmill. 1st Artillery Battalion is supporting. 
  2. 2nd MRC with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
2nd TC (less TP) destroys the enemy in the platoon strongpoint 
barn, rocks (excluded), Hill 105.0 by an assault from the attack 
position barn (excluded), farmstead and takes the line Hill 
110.0 (excluded), sheepfold. Direction for continuing the 
attack--lone house, Hill 108.0. 1st Battery, 1st Artillery 
Battalion is supporting. Report decision at 1320 hours. 
  Begin regrouping at 2230 and complete it by 2400 6 July; 3rd 
MRP relieves 1st MRC and 2nd MRP relieves subunits of 3rd MRC. 
  3. 4th MRC on right destroys enemy in vicinity of spruce, 
barn, Hill 102.0 and takes the line lone house, Hill 110.0; 
direction for continuing attack-- north slopes of Hill 110.0, 
barrow. 
  Boundary with it is lone tree (excluded), bushes, 
Kvadratnaya 
Grove. 
  1st MRC on left destroys enemy in vicinity of rocks, 
Bibirevo, Ovalnaya Grove and takes the line sheepfold 
(excluded), Belaya Grove; direction for continuing 
attack--Ovalnaya Grove, north outskirts of Sinkovo. 
  4. In period of fire preparation of assault artillery 
neutralizes enemy artillery and mortars and destroys tanks, 
IFV's and ATGM's on FEBA and in depth of enemy battalion defense 
area; artillery support of assault is by double successive fire 
concentration to depth of defense of enemy battalion. 
  5. Readiness for attack 0400 7 July. 
  2nd MRC defends strongpoint barn, Hill 104.3, Veselovo 
(excluded). 
  Company is 85 percent strength in personnel, weapons and 
military vehicles. Two BMP's require routine maintenance. 
Strength level of opposing enemy is 60-65 percent. 
  Mission analysis 
  The company attacks to destroy the enemy in platoon 
strongpoint barn, rocks (excluded), west slopes of Hill 105.0 
and takes the line Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold. Direction 
for continuing attack is lone house, Hill 108.0. Support 
battalion performance of immediate mission in this manner. 
  In his commander's concept, 1st MRB commander envisages the 
following: by concentrating main efforts in direction of sand 
pit, windmill, destroy enemy in company strongpoint barn, 
Bibirevo, windmill with an assault by two MRC's from attack 
positions in coordination with the TC and take the line 
Kvadratnaya Grove, Sinkovo. Subsequently develop the attach by 
committing the second echelon, complete the rout of enemy 
battalion's personnel and weapons in coordination with 2nd MRB 
and take the first position. In the period of fire preparation 
of the assault the mortar platoon, four ATGM's, a tank and an 
IFV are destroyed (neutralized) in support of the company. 
Artillery support of the assault is by a double successive fire 
concentration to the depth of defense of the enemy battalion. 
  2nd MRC with grenade launcher squad has the mission of 
destroying the enemy in platoon strongpoint barn, rocks 
(excluded), west slopes of Hill 105.0 in coordination with 2nd 
TC (less TP) by an assault from the attack position barn 
(excluded), farmstead and taking the line Hill 110.0 (excluded), 
sheepfold; direction for continuing attack is lone house, Hill 
108.0. 
  The company attacks in a frontage of 450 m in the first 
echelon on the battalion right flank, with its left flank 
adjoining the axis of concentration of battalion main efforts. 
Company main efforts also should be concentrated on this flank. 
  4th MRC, 2nd MRB attacks on right, destroys enemy personnel 
and weapons in vicinity of spruce, barn (excluded), Hill 102.0 
and takes the line lone house, Hill 110.0; direction for 
continuing the attack--north slopes of Hill 110.0, barrow. 
  Boundary with it is lone tree (excluded), bushes, 
Kvadratnaya 
Grove. 
  On left our battalion's 1st MRC destroys enemy in vicinity 
of 
rocks, Bibirevo, Ovalnaya Grove and takes the line sheepfold 
(excluded), Belaya Grove; direction for continuing the attack is 
Ovalnaya Grove, north outskirts of Sinkovo. 
  In organizing coordination it is advisable to update with 
4th 
MRC commander the procedure for destroying the enemy on south 
slopes of Hill 110.0, and with 1st MRC commander the procedure 
for engaging the enemy in the vicinity of Ovalnaya Grove. It is 
desirable above all to update with TP commanders the procedure 
for the joint assault, negotiation of obstacles and barriers, 
fire coordination and target designation. 
  Readiness for attack 0400 7 July; a total of 16 hours are 
available for preparing for battle and 12 hours for preparing 
and executing a regrouping. 
  [Begin side line] After analyzing the mission the company 
commander determines measures which must be carried out for 
fastest preparation of subunits to perform the combat mission, 
performs a time calculation, issues instructions to platoon 
commanders and the grenade launcher squad commander on preparing 
to perform the combat mission and on the time and procedure of 
work on the terrain, and estimates the situation. [End side line] 
  Time calculation 
  Mission received 1200 hours 6 July. 
  Readiness for attack 0400 7 July. 
  There are 16 hours for preparing the attack, of which around 
9 hours are daylight, and there are 12 hours for preparing and 
executing a regrouping. 
  Distribute time as follows: 

  -  analyzing mission and determining measures which must be 
taken immediately--1200-1210 6 July; 
  -  calculating the time--1210-1220; 
  -  issuing instructions to commanders on preparing to perform 
the 
combat mission and on the time and procedure of work on the 
terrain--1220- 1230; 
  -  preparing subunits to perform the combat mission--1230 6 
July-0330 7 July; 
  -  estimating the situation--1230-1300; 
  -  making the decision--1300-1320; 
  -  briefing decision to battalion commander--1320-1340; 
  -  conducting ground reconnaissance with commanders of platoons 
and of attached and supporting subunits--1340-1600; 
  -  assigning missions to commanders of platoons and attached 
subunits and organizing regrouping, coordination and fire 
engagement-- 1600-1700; 
  -  issuing instructions on organizing comprehensive support of 
attack, C[.sup]2[/], and political work--1700-1715; 
  -  work of platoon commanders with squad commanders for 
organizing 
battle on the terrain--1715-1915; 
  -  return of commanders and practical work in their own 
subunits--1915-2130; 
  -  practical work in subunits for preparing 
them for battle-- from 1930; 
  -  conducting regrouping with 
simultaneous turnover of strongpoints of 2nd and 3rd MRP's to 
subunits of 1st and 3rd MRC's--2230-2400; 
  -  report of subunit commanders on readiness for attack--0330 7 
July; 
  -  report to battalion commander on company readiness for 
attack--0400 7 July. 


    Situation estimate (conclusions) 
  The enemy shifted to a defense along west bank of Chernyy 
Brook. 
  A mechanized infantry platoon with tank is defending ahead 
of 
the company attack frontage. A company second echelon platoon is 
defending in the depth of the company strongpoint in vicinity of 
Kvadratnaya Grove (excluded), windmill (excluded), Hill 108.0. 
Enemy is concentrating main efforts on axis Hill 104.7, north 
slopes of Hill 108.0. Weakest defense is in direction of sand 
pit, windmill. Emplacements for mechanized infantry squads, 
emplacements for tanks and IFV's, covered slit trenches, 
sections of continuous trenches in the platoon strongpoint, 
obstacles ahead of the FEBA and in the depth of the defense, 
lines of firing positions and other engineer structures may be 
prepared in his defense by the beginning of the company attack. 
  Destruction of enemy personnel and weapons in the 
strongpoint 
barn, rocks (excluded), Hill 105.0 will sharply reduce stability 
of his defense and support performance of immediate mission. 
Company is at 85 percent strength and, with consideration of 
fire damage by senior commander's weapons, is capable of 
performing the assigned mission by fire of organic and attached 
weapons in coordination with 2nd TC (less platoon). 
  4th MRC, 2nd MRB and 1st MRC, 1st MRB are attacking on right 
and left respectively, and conditions for coordination with them 
facilitate joint destruction of the enemy on contiguous flanks. 
  The nature of terrain is favorable and permits achieving 
relatively high assault tempos; Chernyy Brook is not a barrier. 
  It is advisable to concentrate main efforts in direction of 
sand pit, tower. 
  Execute dismounted assault, with 2nd MRP on right flank, 1st 
MRP in center and 3rd MRP on left flank, and with grenade 
launcher squad behind 1st MRP. 
  It is advisable to assign combat missions to subunits as 
follows: 

  -  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 101 is to assault and 
destroy emplaced tank, ATGM, AT rocket launcher and enemy 
personnel from attack position of barn (excluded), rocks; 
direction for continuing the attack-- barrow, north edge of 
Ogurets Grove; 
  -  1st MRP in coordination with tanks Nos 102 and 103 is to 
assault and destroy enemy ATGM, machinegun and personnel from 
attack position of rocks (excluded), rock pillar; direction for 
continuing attack--Hill 100.2, lone tree; 
  -  3rd MRP in coordination with 2nd TP is to assault and destroy 
enemy ATGM, IFV, AT rocket launcher and personnel from attack 
position of rock pillar (excluded), farmstead; direction for 
continuing attack--Romb Grove, tower; 
  -  1st Grenade Launcher Squad is to neutralize personnel at 
company COP in trench on north edge of Romb Grove. Firing 
position--300 m northeast of rock pillar. In the course of 
assault the grenade launcher squad is to neutralize enemy 
personnel and weapons ahead of frontage of 1st and 3rd MRP's and 
is to displace behind left flank of 1st MRP; 
  -  company COP is behind 1st MRP, displace it in direction of 
rock 
pillar, north slopes of Hill 105.0, Hill 108.0. 

  [Begin side line] After the situation estimate and 
performance of necessary tactical calculations the company 
(battalion) commander makes the decision. 
  The basis of the decision is the commander's concept, in 
which the company (battalion) commander specifies: direction for 
concentrating main efforts; methods of routing enemy (which 
enemy, where, in what sequence and how to rout, with an 
indication of the procedure for his engagement by fire of tanks, 
BMP's and other organic and attached weapons, measures for his 
deception, and procedure of subunit operations); company 
(battalion) battle formation. After reporting the decision to 
the senior commander, the company (battalion) commander performs 
ground reconnaissance. 
  Ground reconnaissance is performed to study terrain and the 
enemy and update the decision made from the map. It is done by 
commanders under cover of subunits defending ahead or of 
specially assigned subunits. The company (battalion) commander 
involves commanders of subordinate, attached and supporting 
subunits in the ground reconnaissance. If it is impossible for 
company commanders to travel out on the terrain with their 
subordinates, the battalion commander also involves commanders 
of platoons of first echelon companies in ground reconnaissance. 
  With the ground reconnaissance party's arrival in the 
vicinity of the subunit defending in the direction of the 
company (battalion) attack, communications are established with 
its commander, who usually subsequently gives help in studying 
the enemy himself. 
  Then the company (battalion) commander performs orientation, 
designates reference points and updates the trace of the enemy 
FEBA, disposition of enemy strongpoints and weapons, especially 
AT weapons, and targets to be engaged by senior commanders' 
weapons. Enemy weapons, observation posts and other targets for 
engagement by fire of guns and tanks assigned for direct fire, 
by ATGM's and by the fire of grenade launchers are determined. 
Possible axes of operations of enemy combat helicopters and 
their lines of attack are updated. Approaches to the enemy FEBA 
and the presence and nature of obstacles and barriers are 
studied, and passages in them, time of preparation and procedure 
for marking these passages are outlined. The commander updates 
and determines the attack frontage, direction for concentrating 
main efforts, combat missions for subunits, enemy objectives 
(targets) subject to fire engagement, firing positions of 
weapons and time periods of their engineer preparation. Points 
for equipping tanks with roller-type mineclearing devices, 
forward movement routes, and points (lines) of deployment, 
departure and the safety limit are designated and updated. Sites 
and directions of displacement of C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
places for deployment of technical support and rear subunits are 
determined. 
  In an attack from a position of direct contact with the 
enemy, the company (battalion) commander additionally updates 
the attack positions (assembly area) of the company and platoons 
and places for passing tanks through positions of the motorized 
rifle subunits. If the attack is launched from the move, then in 
moving along the route the ground reconnaissance party 
additionally studies its features, the start point (line), and 
deployment points (lines); updates bypass routes and crossing 
(fording) sites; and updates lines of departure for platoons 
(companies). In a dismounted assault the MRC (MRB) commander 
specifies the platoon (company) dismount line. [End side line] 
  Operation order 
  1. The enemy shifted to a defense along west bank of 
Chernyy Brook. Platoon strongpoints have been 
prepared ahead of the company attack frontage in areas: barn, 
rocks (excluded), west slopes of Hill 100.2; 
Kvadratnaya Grove (excluded), windmill (excluded), 
Hill 108.0. 
  Weapons detected as follows: mortar platoon--50 m west of 
Ogurets Grove; tank--50 m southeast of barrow; 
IFV--south edge of Romb Grove; three ATGM's: 
first--120 m left of barn, 2nd--right of lone tree, third--50 m 
northeast of edge of Romb; two AT rocket launchers: 
first--barn, left 15; second--rocks, right 20. 
  Antitank and antipersonnel minefields emplaced ahead of 
FEBA. 
  2. On 2nd MRC axis of attack personnel and weapons in 
platoon 
strongpoints on FEBA and on Hill 108.0 are neutralized by senior 
commanders' assets in period of fire preparation of assault. 
Emplaced tank and IFV and three ATGM's are destroyed by weapons 
assigned for direct fire. Artillery support of assault is by 
double successive fire concentration. 
  4th MRC, 2nd MRB attacks on right, destroys enemy in area of 
lone tree, barn (excluded), Hill 102.0 and takes line of lone 
house, Hill 110.0; direction for continuing attack--north slopes 
of Hill 110.0, barrow. 
  1st MRC attacks on left, destroys enemy in area of rocks, 
Bibirevo, Ovalnaya Grove and takes line of sheepfold 
(excluded), Belaya Grove; direction for continuing 
attack--Ovalnaya Grove, north edge of 
Sinkovo. 
  3. 2nd MRC with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
2nd TC (less TP) destroys enemy in platoon strongpoint of barn, 
rocks (excluded), west slopes of Hill 105.0 by an assault from 
attack positions of barn (excluded), farmstead and takes line of 
Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold; direction for continuing 
attack--lone house, Hill 108.0. 
  I DECIDED: Concentrate main efforts in direction 
of forest, tower. Exploiting results of artillery fire and air 
strikes, destroy personnel and weapons in platoon strongpoint in 
area of barn, rocks (excluded), north slopes of Hill 105.0 by an 
assault from attack position of barn (excluded), farmstead by 
BMP and small arms fire and by H plus 20 minutes take line of 
Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold. Direction for continuing 
attack-- lone house, Hill 108.0. Destroy enemy in strongpoint in 
depth by assault of 1st and 2nd MRP's from front and of 3rd MRP 
against flank in direction of windmill, Hill 108.0. 
  Repel counterattack of battalion reserve from the move by 
fire of all weapons in coordination with 2nd TC and adjacent 
subunit on left. 
  Battle formation in one echelon; execute dismounted assault. 
  Ensure surprise of attack by observing previous regime of 
fire and by covertness in conducting regrouping and occupying 
attack position. 
  4. I order: 

  -  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 101 is to destroy 
emplaced enemy tank, ATGM, AT rocket launcher and personnel from 
attack position of barn (excluded), rocks; direction for 
continuing attack--barrow, north edge of Ogurets Grove; 
  -  1st MRP in coordination with tanks Nos 102 and 103 is to 
destroy enemy ATGM, machinegun and personnel from attack 
position of rocks (excluded), rock pillar; direction for 
continuing attack--Hill 100.2, lone tree; 
  -  3rd MRP in coordination with 2nd TP is to destroy enemy ATGM, 
IFV, grenade launcher and personnel from attack position of rock 
pillar (excluded), farmstead; direction for continuing 
attack--Romb Grove, tower; 
  -  1st Grenade Launcher Squad is to neutralize personnel at 
platoon COP on north edge of Romb Grove in period of 
fire preparation. Occupy firing position 100 m east of bushes. 
Direction of fire--north edge of Romb Grove, Hill 
105.0. Readiness for commencing fire--H minus 1 hour 20 minutes. 
During attack support 1st and 3rd MRP's, displace behind left 
flank of 1st MRP. 


    5. Ammunition consumption for performing mission: 0.3 unit 
of 
fire for small arms, 0.2 unit of fire for BMP weapons. Fuel 
consumption 0.08 fueling. 
  6. Readiness for attack 0400 hours 7 July. 
  7. Company COP is 150 m east of rock pillars as of 0400 
hours 
7 July, displaces behind 1st MRP during battle. Deputy is 1st 
MRP commander. 
  The company (battalion) commander further organizes 
coordination on the terrain and updates it with supporting and 
adjacent subunits. Coordination is organized to the full depth 
of the company (battalion) combat mission by missions, lines, 
time and methods of performing missions. In organizing 
coordination the commander must precisely specify the goal of 
the company (battalion) attack and be sure that subunit 
commanders have correctly understood the assigned missions and 
methods of their execution. 
  Coordination instructions 
  1st MRP occupies attack position of rocks (excluded), rock 
pillars by 2250 hours 6 July. After handing over its strongpoint 
to 3rd MRC, 2nd MRP moves out along communication trench toward 
1st MRP strongpoint and occupies attack position of barn, rocks 
by 2320. 3rd MRP hands over strongpoint to 1st MRC and, moving 
along the trench, occupies attack position of rock pillars 
(excluded), farmstead by 2330 hours. 
  BMP's of MRP's are to take up firing positions 100-150 m 
behind their subunits by H minus 20 minutes in readiness for 
assault in the period of fire preparation of the attack. 
  Grenade launcher squad is to occupy firing position 100 m 
east of bushes behind 1st MRP by 2330. 
  In the period of regrouping be ready to repel possible 
actions of enemy reconnaissance and enemy assaults. 
  Friendly minefields ahead of company frontage are removed by 
engineer subunits on the night of 6/7 July. 
  Cross minefield ahead of enemy FEBA through passages as 
follows: 2nd MRP No 4, 1st MRP No 5, 3rd MRP No 6 under cover of 
fire of BMP's and grenade launcher squad. 
  At H minus 5 minutes tanks move out to the line of departure 
of northwest slopes of Hill 104.7, north slopes of Hill 104.3 
(excluded) and continue moving in extended line, firing from the 
move. By this moment motorized riflemen use sapper shovels to 
mark passages for them through their attack positions. After 
passing tanks through themselves along passages, motorized 
riflemen launch the assault following the tanks and burst onto 
the enemy FEBA at H hour. BMP's support the assault of their 
subunits by fire from occupied firing positions. They are to 
displace after MRP's negotiate enemy minefields. The grenade 
launcher squad destroys personnel in the company COP; it is to 
begin changing its firing position when assaulting subunits take 
the enemy FEBA. 
  2nd MRP completes destruction of ATGM's, AT rocket launcher 
and personnel north of Hill 100.2. 1st MRP destroys ATGM, 
machinegun and personnel west of Hill 100.2. 3rd MRP completes 
destruction of IFV, ATGM, AT rocket launcher and personnel at 
squad position. Complete destruction of enemy in assault 
objectives by H plus 15 minutes, after which continue the attack 
nonstop in indicated directions. Forces of 1st and 2nd MRP's are 
to complete destruction of mortar platoon on west edge of 
Ogurets Grove. Company performs immediate mission and takes line 
of Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold by H plus 20 minutes. 
  2nd and 1st MRP's are to assault the enemy defending on Hill 
108.0 from the front in coordination with 2nd TC. 2nd MRP 
destroys the machinegun, and 1st MRP the ATGM and personnel. 1st 
Grenade Launcher Squad displaces to new firing positions and 
neutralizes the ATGM--lone house, up 100. 
  3rd MRP moves forward swiftly in direction of tower, 
windmill 
and completes destruction of enemy by an assault against the 
flank. 
  With the company's arrival at the line of Kvadratnaya Grove, 
southwest slopes of Hill 108.0, be ready together with 2nd TC 
and adjacent subunit on left to repel counterattack of battalion 
reserve by fire of all weapons from the move. 
  In repelling the counterattack of superior forces, tanks and 
BMP's take up firing positions behind the nearest cover and 
destroy enemy by fire from in place. 
  Signals: 

  -  warning: immediate threat of enemy use of mass 
destruction weapons--"Grom [Thunder]," radioactive 
contamination-- "Radiatsionnaya opasnost [Radiation Danger]," 
chemical and biological (bacteriological) contamination-- 
"Khimicheskaya trevoga [Chemical Alert]," air enemy-- "Vozdukh 
[Air]"; 
  -  control and coordination: assault--"Groza 
[Thunderstorm]-222," transfer artillery fire--"Perekat 
[Leapfrog]-444," request artillery fire-- "Uragan 
[Hurricane]-777"; target designations--tracer bullets and rounds 
in direction of target, for aviation "Friendly troops here"-- 
series of red-smoke signal flares. 


    [Begin side line] After organizing coordination the company 
(battalion) commander issues instructions for comprehensive 
support to battle, for C[.sup]2[/] and for political work. 
[End side line] 
  Reconnaissance instructions 
  With occupation of attack positions organize observation of 
(listening for) the ground and air enemy, having observers in 
each platoon and also at the company COP. 
  During preparation and conduct of the attack: uncover the 
location of tanks, ATGM's, machineguns, mortars and artillery, 
the system of fire and obstacles, and C[.sup]2[/] facilities; 
determine the makeup and direction of forward movement of the 
reserve for a counterattack. 
  Concentrate main reconnaissance efforts in direction of rock 
pillars, lone house. 
  With company arrival at line Kvadratnaya Grove, Hill 108.0, 
1st MRP is to be ready to act as a combat reconnaissance patrol 
in direction of west slopes of Hill 108.0, Zelenaya Grove. 
  Report information on enemy to me by radio in the course of 
battle. 
  Security instructions 
  After occupying attack position, concentrate special 
attention in direction: 2nd MRP--rocks, barrow; 1st MRP--rocks, 
Hill 100.2; 3rd MRP- -rock pillar, Romb Grove. 
  Organize observation in platoons and have duty weapons for 
preventing penetration of enemy reconnaissance to occupied 
positions. Be ready to repel enemy assaults. 
  Password "Karabin," reply "Kursk." 
  Instructions on protection against mass 
destruction weapons 
  With occupation of attack position, to protect against mass 
destruction weapons make use of available fortifications: open 
and covered slit trenches, emplacements, trench, communication 
trench, personnel dugout, and emplacements and shelters for 
BMP's. 
  Signals: 

  -  warning of immediate threat of enemy use of mass 
destruction weapons-- "Grom [Thunder]"; 
  -  warning: radioactive 
contamination--"Radiatsionnaya opasnost [Radiation Danger]"; 
chemical and biological (bacteriological) contamination-- 
"Khimicheskaya trevoga [Chemical Alert]." 

  On receiving a signal of immediate threat of enemy use of 
mass destruction weapons, continue performing missions and take 
measures for protection and for shifting to operations under 
conditions of the use of mass destruction weapons. 
  By 2330 check that personnel have preventive means and their 
readiness for use of antiradiation drugs, antidotes and 
antibiotics. 
  Check readiness of system for protection of BMP crews and 
the 
presence and serviceability of decontamination equipment. 
  Perform radiological and chemical reconnaissance by a 
trained 
chemical observer, who is to be located at the COP. 
  Maskirovka instructions 
  Carry out movement of personnel covertly along trench and 
communication trench during regrouping. Personnel movements are 
prohibited on occupying attack positions. 
  Strictly observe sound and light discipline and operate 
radios only in "listening watch" mode. 
  Platoon commanders are to constantly monitor compliance with 
camouflage discipline. 
  Engineer support instructions 
  At attack position each platoon is to make maximum use of 
previously prepared emplacements and other fortification and 
structures for personnel, machineguns, grenade launchers and 
other weapons. If necessary prepare new emplacements for them, 
strictly observing maskirovka and making maximum use of 
protective properties of the terrain. 
  Obstacles ahead of our positions are removed from 0200 to 
0400. Passages are made in enemy obstacles from H minus 22 to H 
minus 10 minutes by forces of engineer subunits of the senior 
chief by the explosive method ahead of the following frontage: 
2nd MRP--150 m southwest of bushes; 1st MRP--100 m east of lone 
tree; 3rd MRP--100 m southwest of sand pit. Passages are marked 
by signs Nos 4, 5 and 6 respectively. 
  1st MRP commander is to prepare 3rd MRS for breaching and 
crossing minefields laid by the enemy by remote assets in the 
course of our attack. 
  Chemical support instructions 
  BMP crews are to be ready to perform radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance. Have radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance devices constantly turned on in the course of the 
attack. 
  Check whether or not personnel have dose rate meters by 
2330. 
Platoon commanders are to take their readings by day's end and, 
in crossing zones of contamination, after exiting from them. 
  Perform partial decontamination with your own forces at my 
command. Perform decontamination immediately on contamination by 
chemical agents. 
  By 2330 6 July check serviceability and fit of individual 
protective gear. 
  Instructions on organizing C[.sup]3[/] 
  Carry out C[.sup]3[/] via couriers on arrival at attack 
positions. Have radios in platoon commanders' BMP's on receive. 
Location of company COP--200 m west of rock pillar; it deploys 
by 2250. 
  C[.sup]2[/] in the course of battle is accomplished over a 
radio net, through couriers and by signals. COP displaces behind 
1st MRP in the course of battle. 
  Work of preparing subunits for battle 
  Preparation of subunits for performing combat 
missions usually begins after the company (battalion) 
commander's order is issued to subordinates based on the mission 
analysis and time calculation. In accordance with the order, 
personnel first of all prepare weapons and military vehicles for 
combat employment and replenish ammunition, missiles, fuel and 
other supplies to established norms. 
  The appropriate kind of routine servicing and maintenance is 
performed depending on the expenditure of service life of 
weapons and vehicles. As a rule, daily routine servicing and 
maintenance with elements of TO [periodic servicing and 
maintenance inspection] No 1 will be carried out. The important 
thing here is to ensure their reliable operation in the course 
of the attack. Repair of vehicles and their return to formation 
also is completed by the beginning of the battle. 
  Reserves of supplies in subunits and in the battalion rear 
usually are replenished to unit-level supply norms, but as a 
rule additional reserves of ammunition are established for the 
mortar battery, attached artillery and guns used for direct 
fire. The amount of these reserves must ensure performance of 
fire missions of engaging the enemy without a change of 
positions in the period of fire preparation and support of the 
assault. Additional reserves are established at the expense of 
the senior commander and usually are laid out at firing 
positions (on the ground) before the beginning of battle. 
  The battalion aid station is cleared of sick and wounded and 
augmented with necessary medical equipment and supplies. All 
personnel must be supplied with everything necessary along the 
line of medical support. 
  Preparation of personnel to perform combat missions is 
carried out under the subunit commander's plan. There are 
provisions for the personnel to study (become clearer on) enemy 
weapons and engineer obstacles and his defense as a whole as 
well as the terrain. A check is made of the personnel's 
knowledge of missions, readiness of weapons, availability of 
ammunition and other means. War experience shows that holding 
classes with subunits together with attached forces and assets 
in a near-real situation considerably improves their preparation 
and confidence in performing combat missions. 
  Preparation of subunits for the attack ends with a check 
made 
by the commander. 
  Preparation of the position (assembly area) for attack from 
a 
situation of direct contact with the enemy usually begins after 
regrouping from a position of defense or after relief of 
defending subunits. During preparation of the attack position 
(assembly area), existing fortification structures for weapons, 
vehicles, COP's and accommodation of technical and logistic 
support subunits are used and additionally prepared, and new 
ones also are created if necessary. Forward movement routes of 
tanks are prepared from assembly positions to the line of 
departure. All work of preparing the attack position (assembly 
area) is done under the guise of improving the defense and 
conducting other deceptive actions. Elements of the position's 
fortification are carefully camouflaged. 
  In a hasty attack preparation of the assembly area 
consists of engineer preparation of platoon locations and areas 
of companies and the battalion as a whole, and accomplishment of 
maskirovka. Slit trenches, shelters and bunkers for personnel 
and emplacements and shelters (dug-in) for weapons and military 
vehicles and also firing positions for air defense weapons are 
dug and prepared in the area. All work of preparing the attack 
position (assembly area) usually is done at night and under 
other conditions of poor visibility. 
  Practical work of the company commander (battalion 
commander, his deputies, chief of staff) is performed in 
the subunits to give assistance and check their readiness to 
perform the combat mission. 
  The work of assisting subordinates essentially is performed 
with the beginning of preparation for the attack. By listening 
to decisions and suggestions in the course of the work, the 
company commander (battalion commander, his deputies) convince 
themselves of subordinates' knowledge of their missions, methods 
of performing them, and procedure for coordination within 
subunits and between elements of the battle formation, and of 
their knowledge of warning, control and coordination signals, 
and so on. 
  After occupation of an attack position (assembly area), at a 
certain time the company commander (battalion commander, chief 
of staff) checks the correctness of its occupation by subunits 
and of the work of additional preparation of the position (area) 
with fortification structures. Personal gear and equipment of 
motorized riflemen (teams, crews) and the presence and 
serviceability of weapons and necessary gear, ammunition, food 
and protective gear are carefully checked in subunits. 
  In addition, the chief of staff checks preparedness for 
operation of communications equipment and the communications 
layout diagram with the chief of communications. 
  The company senior technician (deputy battalion commander 
for 
weapons) checks readiness of weapons and military vehicles for 
combat employment. Main attention is given to serviceability of 
running gear, weapons and communications equipment. Forces and 
assets assigned to the battalion technical maintenance echelon 
as it moves from the assembly area in launching a hasty attack 
are checked. There is monitoring and a check of technical 
support forces and assets for operation as the battalion repair 
and recovery team, and of preparedness of the technical 
observation post for operation,. 
  The deputy battalion commander for rear checks the presence 
of necessary supplies in subunits and in the support platoon, 
disposition of battalion rear C[.sup]2[/] facilities in the 
assembly area and their shelter and maskirovka, and promptness 
of food preparation and its issue to personnel. 
  Deficiencies discovered are remedied by personnel on the 
spot. At the designated time the company (battalion) commander 
announces the time of fire preparation of the assault and of H 
hour to subordinate subunit commanders. 
<H5>  6. Regrouping and Relief of Defending Subunits </H5>
  Organization of regrouping is a component part of organizing 
the attack. All necessary questions of regrouping are decided by 
the commander during ground reconnaissance, and the procedure 
for accomplishing it is indicated to subordinates when 
coordination is being organized. 
  Regrouping is accomplished in accordance with the 
commander's decision for the attack, and only the most 
necessary, simple subunit movements concealed from the enemy 
should be envisaged in organizing it. 
  Under situation conditions in question, a regrouping is 
conducted by direction of the senior commander usually at night 
before an attack, with fulfillment of measures for deceiving the 
enemy regarding intentions. 
  The company commander's COP is located up to 200 m behind 
the 
company attack position, and that of the battalion commander up 
to 300 m behind first echelon companies. 
  Occupation of the attack position (assembly area) in 
trenches, communication trenches and shelters ensures subunits' 
concealment against enemy observation and protection against his 
possible fire strikes. 
  It is advisable to leave subunits in place which have taken 
up a defense in the battalion (regimental) second echelon within 
a designated zone of advance, since they can move forward for 
the assault directly from occupied areas. 
  Tanks, BMP's and other weapons which are in forward platoon 
strongpoints in the zone of upcoming attack also should be left 
in place and used for conducting direct fire. Tanks, guns and 
BMP's disposed in the defense somewhat aside from the zone of 
advance or in strongpoints of first echelon companies being 
relieved also may be used for conducting such fire. Where 
possible, during regrouping of subunits the BMP's should be left 
at previous firing positions and advanced to new ones for 
destroying assigned targets with the beginning of fire 
preparation of the assault. Sometimes it is advisable to use 
these weapons to conduct direct fire also without changing 
firing positions. 
  To achieve concealment of a regrouping of first echelon 
motorized rifle subunits in insignificant frontage, it is 
desirable to leave their BMP's in the previous strongpoint and 
have them move out to their subunits during fire preparation of 
the assault. 
  If one of the battalion's companies is being relieved by a 
newly arriving subunit, the company should be moved to the 
assembly area [rayon sbora] covertly using trenches and 
communication trenches. It is advisable to designate the 
assembly area within the first position of the defense. 
Subsequently the company displaces to its battalion's assembly 
area [iskhodnyy rayon] and occupies the second and third 
trenches. As a rule, the company is moved out of the strongpoint 
simultaneously with its relief. 
  Tanks in the zone of advance may launch the assault from the 
strongpoints they occupy. 
  If the mortar battery is to one side of the battalion 
assembly area, it displaces to new firing positions and occupies 
them up to 500 m behind first echelon companies. Air defense 
subunits are disposed at launch (firing) positions in the 
companies' battle formations. 
  The grenade launcher subunit and AT subunit occupy firing 
positions up to 300 and 100 m respectively behind first echelon 
companies. The AT squad usually is disposed in [the company] 
trench. 
  A TC (TB less company) attached to an MRB usually occupies 
assembly positions 5-7 km from the enemy FEBA. Under favorable 
situation conditions these positions may be designated to one 
side of the axis of advance, which will ensure surprise to a 
certain extent. 
  Subunits must be ready to repel enemy reconnaissance and 
assaults during regrouping. 
  A relief of defending subunits is the organized 
receipt and transfer by subunits of positions and strongpoints 
(defense areas) in a combat situation. The procedure and 
sequence of the relief are determined by the senior commander. 
  On receiving a relief order, a company (battalion) commander 
performs ground reconnaissance together with the commander of 
the subunit being relieved. During ground reconnaissance the 
nature of terrain, the enemy FEBA, and his weapons and engineer 
obstacles in the attack frontage and on flanks are studied. Then 
the company (battalion) commander familiarizes himself with the 
disposition of the subunit turning over the position, with its 
regime of behavior, system of fire, organization of air defense, 
fortification of the strongpoint (strongpoints) and obstacles 
emplaced ahead of the FEBA and in the depth of the defense. 
Familiarization with the NBC situation also is important. 
  In addition, he updates (determines) concealed forward 
movement routes to the relief area, locations of traffic control 
posts, places for arriving subunits to be met by guides, and the 
relief procedure. The procedure for joint repulse of a possible 
enemy attack launched during the relief also is established. 
  The company (battalion) commander receives a diagram and all 
available data on the enemy from the commander turning over the 
strongpoint (defense area). 
  Defending subunits are relieved in accordance with the 
senior 
commander's relief plan. Usually on the night before an attack 
the MRC (MRB) moves up from the depth in BMP's (BTR's) and motor 
vehicles and dismounts on arriving at the line which can be 
viewed by enemy ground reconnaissance equipment. Subsequently it 
proceeds along a designated concealed route or routes in 
dismounted formation to the point (place) of rendezvous with 
guides of the subunit being relieved. The company (battalion) 
moves further along communication trenches and [fighting] 
trenches to its attack positions (to the assembly area) with the 
help of the guides and occupies them in readiness to repel 
possible enemy assaults. BMP's (BTR's) remain under cover at 
dismount locations on the axes of their subunits' operations. As 
a rule, they move up to the subunits in the period of fire 
preparation of the assault. Motor vehicles remain at the 
designated assembly point and are disposed by company or by 
battalion in readiness for movement. 
  A TC (TB) attached to an MRB occupies its assigned assembly 
positions 5-7 km from the enemy FEBA. The BMP's (BTR's) of MRC's 
also may be together with it. 
  If the enemy launches an attack during the relief, the 
relief 
stops and all subunits repel his assault. Their battle is 
controlled by the commander of the subunit being relieved, since 
he knows the situation well. 
  The relief of subunits continues after repulse of the enemy 
attack. It is considered completed after the company (battalion) 
commander reports to his senior commander. 
  It should be noted that a regrouping of subunits from a 
position of defense and a relief of defending subunits for 
occupying an attack position are accomplished covertly with 
observation of sound, light and radar discipline. 
  An MRC (MRB) which has relieved defending subunits must 
strictly follow their regime of conduct before the relief. 
<H5>  7. Conduct of Attack by MRC (TC) </H5>
  As a result of regrouping and relief of defending subunits, 
a 
first echelon MRC occupies the attack position in the first 
trench and adjoining communication trench, and a TC occupies an 
assembly position and sometimes also an attack position, where 
they complete preparation for the assault. 
  In case the enemy conducts a counterpreparation, company 
personnel except for observers and duty weapons take cover in 
bunkers, dugouts, slit trenches as well as combat vehicles. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins at the prescribed 
time 
at a signal (command) from the senior commander. During this 
time tanks, ATGM launchers, guns and other weapons assigned to 
conduct direct fire destroy and neutralize enemy weapons in 
strongpoints at his first position. 
  From the COP the company commander observes results of fire 
preparation of the assault, detects enemy targets that were not 
engaged or which have newly appeared, and updates combat 
missions to platoons for their destruction. In addition, he 
monitors the timely making and marking of passages by combat 
engineer subunits ahead of the enemy FEBA and conducts 
observation of the forward movement of his own BMP's (BTR's) and 
of tank subunits interworking with the company. He reports 
readiness for the assault to the battalion commander. 
  A TC begins forward movement from the assembly (attack) 
position to the line of departure during fire preparation of the 
assault at the command (signal) of the senior commander. The 
command (signal) is given so as to ensure the arrival of tanks 
at the enemy FEBA at the prescribed H hour simultaneously with 
assaulting motorized rifle subunits. This requires taking into 
account the distance of tanks from the FEBA and their possible 
rate of movement. BMP's (BTR's) of the MRC which were located 
with the tank subunits also move forward behind them. 
  As it moves forward, the TC deploys into platoon columns 
and, 
on arriving at the line of departure, also into an extended 
line. Moving at maximum permissible speed, it destroys the enemy 
by gun fire and subsequently also by machinegun fire from the 
move. BMP's (BTR's) move up to their subunits following the 
tanks. 
  In a dismounted assault by an MRC, when tanks working 
together with it arrive at its attack position, the company 
commander gives the command "Get ready for assault," and after 
the tanks pass the position--"Charge--forward!" At this command 
the personnel leap from emplacements (the trench) and rush into 
the assault following the tanks. 
  BMP's (BTR's) displace behind their subunits by bounds from 
cover to cover (from line to line) and provide reliable support 
of assaulting tanks and motorized riflemen by fire of their 
weapons. BMP's equipped with stabilized weapons proceed in the 
extended line of motorized rifle subunits during the assault. 
  When the attack position is a considerable distance from the 
enemy FEBA, MRC subunits may board BMP's (BTR's), launch the 
assault following the tanks, and then dismount at the dismount 
line. 
  In a situation where the MRC is to assault the enemy in 
BMP's 
(BTR's), its personnel board during fire preparation of the 
assault. For this, at a command (signal) of the company 
commander, the BMP's (BTR's) approach their subunit covertly and 
stop. Subsequently the company launches the assault following 
the interworking tanks. 
  Artillery shifts to artillery support of the assault with 
the 
beginning of the tank assault. Firing into gaps between 
assaulting subunits and from behind their flanks, tanks, guns, 
ATGM launchers and other weapons assigned for direct fire 
destroy enemy targets which have survived and have newly 
appeared. Subsequently these weapons operate in accordance with 
assigned missions. 
  In a dismounted assault, company personnel usually cross 
minefields by squads following tanks in their tracks and through 
breached passages. BMP's equipped with mineclearing devices 
cross independently. Passages are made (by the explosive method) 
for BMP's (BTR's) and other combat vehicles not having 
mineclearing devices figuring one passage per assaulting 
platoon. After crossing a minefield BMP's (BTR's) catch up with 
the subunits and support their assault by fire of their weapons. 
  If an MRC is assaulting in BMP's equipped with mineclearing 
devices, it crosses the enemy minefield independently following 
tanks without closing up the battle formation, and the other 
vehicles without mineclearing devices do so through passages. In 
this case passages are made for passing the vehicles through 
figuring one or two per assaulting company. 
  The company's MRP's should move as close as possible to the 
tanks during an assault. This achieves reliable coordination 
among them and precludes the danger of motorized riflemen being 
cut off from tanks by enemy fire. 
  When assaulting subunits approach the safety limit of 
friendly shell and mortar (grenade) bursts, artillery (grenade 
launchers) shifts fire into the depth at the senior commander's 
command (signal). 
  The safe distance from friendly shellbursts is considered to 
be 400 m (200 m from grenade bursts) for motorized riflemen in a 
dismounted assault. The safe distance for tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) is 200 and 300 m respectively. 
  Motorized rifle and tank subunits burst onto the enemy FEBA 
at precisely the prescribed H hour. After destroying his 
personnel, weapons and vehicles, the company continues the 
assault nonstop into the depth right after friendly artillery 
shellbursts. 
  The grenade launcher subunit attached to an MRC may operate 
up to 300 m behind its battle formation and also in gaps between 
platoons or on one of the company flanks. If necessary, it may 
move up directly into battle formations of motorized rifle 
subunits. A subunit with grenade launchers mounted on BMP's 
(BTR's) usually operates in battle formations of motorized rifle 
subunits. 
  The company's AT squad usually attacks in the battle 
formation of MRP's, in gaps between them or on one of the 
company flanks. Occupying firing positions in succession, it 
destroys tanks, IFV's and other armored targets hampering the 
company's advance. 
  The flamethrower subunit attached to the MRC attacks in the 
company battle formation, conducting fire at the company 
commander's command or independently. 
  The air defense subunit covering the company usually 
advances 
behind it, conducts continuous reconnaissance of the air enemy, 
especially helicopters, and destroys him by fire from the move 
or from short halts. 
  A company may not deploy into battle formation and may 
operate in approach march formation in an attack on an axis 
where the enemy has been reliably neutralized and is not 
offering organized resistance. 
  In the period of fire support of the assault, artillery 
subunits continuously and successively neutralize personnel and 
weapons, above all AT weapons, and neutralize and destroy 
precision weapon system elements, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
newly detected targets. Artillery displaces to new firing 
positions after the company takes the platoon strongpoint. 
  During fire support of the subunits' assault, combat 
helicopters destroy enemy tanks, ATGM's, IFV's and other targets 
2-3 km or more ahead of the assaulting tanks. Fighter-bombers 
engage enemy objectives at a greater depth. 
  If it is impossible to bypass minefields suddenly laid by 
the 
enemy by remote minelaying equipment ahead of an attacking 
company, it negotiates them through passages made by the 
battalion obstacle clearing party and the company non-T/O 
mineclearing team. In the course of the attack the mineclearing 
team (a squad of motorized riflemen equipped with mine 
detectors, sappers' grappling hooks and a set of markers) moves 
behind the company battle formation close to the company 
commander's COP. 
  During the assault the company commander at the COP moves 
200 
m behind the extended line of armored vehicles or riflemen. As a 
rule he dismounts in a dismounted assault by the company. The 
company commander must carefully observe development of the 
battle, control the fire of all weapons, promptly support 
platoons which have achieved greatest success, and take skillful 
advantage of fire to support their maneuver and surprise assault 
against the flank and rear of the enemy strongpoint. Having 
completed destruction of the enemy in platoon strongpoints of 
the first position, the company develops the attack into the 
depth. The battle in the depth of the enemy defense is 
characterized by uneven advance of the company's platoons and 
develops in a complex, swiftly changing situation. The enemy 
will attempt to move ATGM's and tanks up to previously prepared 
firing positions for delivering a fire strike against the 
assaulting company's flank. In this situation it is advisable to 
use some of the forces, artillery fire and blinding smoke 
screens to isolate the enemy from the threatened sector and use 
the company main body to execute a maneuver and complete the 
enemy's destruction by an assault against the flank and rear of 
the strongpoint. 
  After destroying the enemy in the depth of the first 
position, the company may send out a combat reconnaissance 
patrol with the primary mission of reconnoitering enemy tanks, 
precision weapon systems, artillery, AT weapons and obstacles. 
  During battle in the depth of the first position the company 
must be ready to repel enemy counterattacks. Methods of 
combating him basically depend on the force ratio between the 
sides and directions of his counterattacks (Diagram 13). 
  In the case where a company has superiority over the enemy 
or 
equal forces with him, as a rule it destroys him by fire and a 
decisive assault on the move, i.e., in a meeting battle. If the 
enemy has superiority in forces and assets, it is more 
advantageous for the company to inflict damage on him by fire 
from in place and subsequently complete his rout by a determined 
assault in coordination with an adjacent subunit. Tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's) take up firing positions behind the nearest cover 
and MRP personnel dismount and take up positions providing 
favorable conditions for destroying the enemy and for 
coordination with the tanks. The AT squad is disposed at firing 
positions on a likely avenue of tank approach, usually in gaps 
or on the company (platoon) flank. The attached grenade launcher 
subunit as a rule takes up firing positions in the company 
battle formation on the axis with the greatest amount of enemy 
infantry. Initially the company repels a counterattack by 
concentrated fire of subunits from all weapons at maximum range. 
When the enemy approaches, the force and intensity of fire are 
brought to highest intensity. 
  One of the deciding conditions of successful combat against 
a 
counterattacking enemy is to inflict maximum damage on him by 
fire of artillery, mortars, tanks, AT weapons and BMP's and by 
strikes of combat helicopters, and make skilled use of smoke 
assets. A concealed move of company subunits to the flank and 
rear of a counterattacking enemy and surprise of the assault are 
achieved by laying down blinding and concealing smoke screens. 
  If the enemy offers no organized resistance, platoon 
personnel board vehicles at their commanders' commands and 
continue a swift attack into the depth, taking advantage of 
artillery fire, strikes by aircraft and their own weapons. 
  In terrain sectors difficult of access for tanks, dismounted 
MRP's may overtake the tanks and attack under cover of their 
fire and the fire of BMP's (BTR's). As these sectors are 
crossed, the tanks again move in front and continue the attack. 
  The company goes around obstacles and barriers encountered 
in 
the course of battle or crosses them through passages made by 
combat engineer subunits and tanks equipped with bulldozer 
attachments. Contaminated terrain sectors usually are bypassed, 
but if this is impossible they are crossed along axes ensuring 
the least degree of exposure (contamination) and wearing 
protective gear. 
  The position of platoons in the battle formation may be in a 
line, wedge (inverted wedge), or echelon right or left during 
the attack, especially in the depth of the enemy defense and 
based on the nature of his actions. 
  In case of an enemy withdrawal the company commander 
immediately organizes a pursuit, reports this to the battalion 
commander and informs adjacent subunits. In organizing the 
pursuit, the company commander first and foremost sends out a 
combat reconnaissance patrol and assigns missions to subunits. 
  The high mobility of tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and artillery 
permits a company to employ the more advisable method of 
pursuing the enemy along parallel routes. For this the company 
reforms into a column, swiftly overtakes the enemy along 
parallel routes, moves to his withdrawal routes and destroys him 
in detail by a determined assault against the flank and rear in 
coordination with subunits operating from other directions. 
  If pursuit of the enemy along parallel routes is impossible 
because of situation conditions, it is done from the front. In 
this case the company resolutely destroys enemy covering-force 
subunits, penetrates to his main body and swiftly assaults the 
enemy from the move in coordination with subunits conducting the 
pursuit along parallel routes. 
  In the pursuit a company may operate in battle, approach 
march or march formation. Personnel in motor vehicles may pursue 
the enemy as a mounted force on tanks or in the motor vehicles 
under cover of tanks. 
  With successful development of the attack a company may 
receive a mission for operations in a special detachment. Its 
mission may be to destroy means of nuclear and chemical attack, 
precision weapon systems, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and so on. 
  On receiving the mission, the company commander sends out a 
combat reconnaissance patrol, makes the decision and assigns 
missions to subunits. Taking advantage of gaps in the enemy 
battle formation and his exposed flanks, the company moves 
quickly and covertly to the designated area. Then it decisively 
assaults from the move from different directions, usually 
without dismounting the motorized riflemen, destroys the 
covering force, makes the capture and performs the assigned 
mission. Subsequently the company either receives a new mission 
or moves out to the operating area of its battalion (or of 
friendly troops). 
  In an attack on a fortified area an MRC may make up an 
assault team, which usually is part of an assault detachment. In 
this case tanks, guns (primarily self-propelled), mortars, ATGM 
launchers, flamethrowers, grenade launchers and a combat 
engineer subunit may be attached to the company. As a rule, an 
assault team consists of fire, obstacle clearing (demolition) 
and capture elements. 
  The assault team is given an immediate mission and direction 
for continuing the attack. The mission content is to capture or 
destroy a permanent emplacement or other important structure on 
the axis of attack. The direction for continuing the attack is 
assigned so as to ensure capture and destruction of the next 
enemy weapon emplacement or other emplacement. 
  An assault team begins the assault on its objective 
simultaneously with the assault of first echelon tank and 
motorized rifle subunits. The team blocks and destroys a 
surviving emplacement after fire preparation of the assault. 
Subsequently the team destroys another permanent emplacement. 
  Tanks and motorized rifle subunits of the assaulting echelon 
boldly penetrate into gaps between permanent emplacements and 
advance into the depth, and some of the forces destroy an enemy 
relief subunit together with the assault team. 
  A company also may attack with a crossing of nuclear 
minefields. In organizing an attack under these conditions, 
along with other questions the company commander decides 
questions of the capture and destruction of a nuclear mine 
located on the company axis of operations. In particular, he 
organizes reconnaissance of the nuclear mine cover and security 
outpost positions, specifies the procedure for routing the enemy 
at these positions, and also the procedure for capture and 
destruction of the mine. In addition, the commander determines 
his subunit's makeup, reinforcement, outfitting and place in the 
battle formation for immediate capture and destruction of a 
nuclear mine and the procedure of its operations. 
  An MRP, tanks with mineclearing devices and bulldozer 
equipment, combat engineers with special technical assets and 
chemical warfare scouts may be assigned to the makeup of a 
nuclear mine capture and destruction subunit. To perform the 
mission, the capture and destruction subunit is divided into a 
capture team (main body of the subunit and tanks with 
mineclearing devices and bulldozer equipment) and a destruction 
team (combat engineer subunit). 
  In an assault on nuclear mine cover and security outpost 
positions, a subunit assigned for its capture and destruction 
advances behind the company battle formation in the course of an 
attack or assaults together with it. After destruction of the 
nuclear mine cover and security outpost subunit, the capture 
team breaches obstacles, takes the nuclear mine disposition 
area, moves to a safe distance from where it is emplaced and 
cordons off this area. The destruction team reconnoiters the 
nuclear mine's location and destroys it. 
  As noted above, the company may launch a hasty 
attack. Before launching the attack it usually is in the 
battalion assembly area, disposed along a route ensuring its 
movement onto the battalion forward movement route to the start 
point. Personnel and military vehicles are in carefully 
camouflaged shelters. Observation and local security are 
organized in the company. 
  The company moves up from the occupied area at the battalion 
commander's command (signal). After the column forms up the 
company takes its prescribed place in the battalion march 
formation, which is determined by the company's place in the 
battalion battle formation alignment when it launches the 
assault. The company moves up with means of reinforcement, which 
helps it to deploy into approach march and battle formations 
from the move without a halt. As a rule the company crosses the 
start point at a given rate of movement. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins with the company's 
arrival at a line which can be reached by enemy artillery fire 
(or from a line designated by the senior commander). On reaching 
the point of deployment into company columns, the company moves 
onto its axis of attack along a cross-country route. 
  An MRC in motor vehicles moving forward behind tank subunits 
stops on arriving at the point for boarding tanks as a mounted 
force (2-4 km from the enemy FEBA) and boards, after which it 
continues moving toward the dismount line. 
  Motor vehicles freed of motorized riflemen move to the 
assembly area and remain there in readiness to move up to their 
company at the commander's signal. 
  Company tanks assigned to be outfitted with roller-type 
mineclearing devices are moved to the designated place at the 
designated time by direction of the battalion commander. 
  In the course of fire preparation the company continues 
moving forward at maximum speed, deploying into platoon columns 
from the indicated line, and arrives at the line of departure in 
battle formation. 
  During forward movement to the line of departure the company 
must observe measures of protection against precision weapons 
and must observe radar, sound and light discipline. 
  If it is impossible to bypass minefields laid by enemy 
remote 
minelaying equipment in the course of forward movement to the 
line of departure, the company crosses through passages made by 
the senior commander's movement support detachment, the 
battalion obstacle clearing party or the company nonT/O 
mineclearing team. 
  An MRC may execute an assault in BMP's (BTR's) or in 
dismounted formation. In a dismounted assault, motorized rifle 
subunit personnel dismount from BMP's (BTR's) on arriving at the 
dismount line, deploy into an extended line on the move and 
assault the enemy following the tanks. BMP's (BTR's) displace 
behind their own subunits and support them by fire. 
  On approaching the dismount line BMP's (BTR's) must speed up 
and catch up with the assaulting tanks to ensure close 
interworking of motorized riflemen with tanks when they reach 
the enemy FEBA. 
  As in a dismounted assault, in an assault in BMP's (BTR's) 
motorized rifle subunits of the company also must move as close 
to the tanks as possible (not over 200 m). This will ensure 
continuous fire coordination between motorized rifle and tank 
subunits in the interests of successful mission performance. 
  The company's negotiation of obstacles in the course of an 
assault and its operations to destroy the enemy are similar to 
company operations when launching an attack from a position of 
direct contact with the enemy. 
<H5>  8. Conduct of Attack by MRB (TB) </H5>
  The attack of an MRB from a position of direct contact with 
the enemy is made from an assembly area occupied after 
regrouping from a position of defense or simultaneously with 
relief of defending subunits. 
  In the battalion assembly area for the attack, first echelon 
companies occupy attack positions in the first trench and 
adjoining communication trenches, and the second echelon company 
does so in the second and third trenches. 
  Depending on the situation, BMP's may be in the previous 
places or together with attached tank subunits at attack or 
assembly positions. 
  Air defense subunits are in battle formations of companies, 
and the mortar (artillery) battery is up to 500 m from first 
echelon companies. 
  The AT subunit and grenade launcher subunit are disposed up 
to 100 and 300 m respectively behind first echelon companies. 
  Tank subunits attached to the battalion and which were in 
the 
defense may occupy an assembly or attack position after 
necessary regrouping. When an attack is launched as motorized 
rifle subunits are relieving defending subunits, the TB (tank 
subunit attached to an MRB) as a rule occupies an assembly 
position. In it the battalion usually is disposed by company 
with consideration of conducting a defense in case the enemy 
launches an attack after a counterpreparation. Measures of 
protection against precision weapons and of radar, sound and 
light discipline are followed. 
  When the enemy conducts counterpreparation fire, personnel 
and military vehicles are in shelters, except for observers and 
duty weapons. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins at the prescribed 
time 
at a signal (command) from the senior commander. In its course 
the AT subunit, grenade launcher subunit and artillery attached 
to the battalion and assigned to conduct direct fire destroy and 
neutralize enemy weapons and personnel in his forward 
strongpoints. 
  The battalion commander observes results of fire preparation 
of the assault from his COP, assigns supplementary missions to 
weapons for destroying surviving and newly detected targets if 
necessary, and monitors forward movement of the attached tank 
subunit from its occupied position. He reports readiness for the 
assault to the regimental commander. 
  A TB intended for attacking in the first echelon (or a tank 
subunit attached to an MRB) moves forward from the assembly 
position to the line of departure during fire preparation of the 
assault. 
  As they approach the enemy FEBA, TC's deploy into platoon 
columns and arrive at the line of departure in battle formation. 
Without stopping at this line, the TB (tank subunit attached to 
an MRB) launches the assault at the maximum permissible rate of 
movement. Tanks destroy enemy personnel and weapons by fire from 
the move. BMP's (BTR's) move up to their subunits. 
  When tanks approach the attack positions of first echelon 
MRC's, in a dismounted assault the motorized riflemen assault 
following the tanks. BMP's (BTR's) operate behind their subunits 
by bounds from line to line at a distance ensuring their 
effective fire support. When assaulting in BMP's (BTR's), 
motorized rifle subunits board personnel during fire preparation 
of the assault. 
  When tanks begin launching the assault, artillery begins 
artillery support of the assault at the senior commander's 
command (signal). Battalion weapons assigned for direct fire 
continue to destroy enemy targets, firing into gaps between 
friendly subunits and from behind their flanks. 
  In a dismounted assault by MRC's, motorized riflemen cross 
minefields following in the tracks of tanks and along passages 
which have been breached. BMP's equipped with mineclearing 
devices cross minefields independently, and those without 
mineclearing devices (including also BTR's) do so along passages 
breached by combat engineer subunits, usually by the explosive 
method. If motorized rifle subunits assault in BMP's equipped 
with mineclearing devices, they cross minefields without closing 
up the battle formation, and military vehicles without 
mineclearing devices do so along passages which have been made. 
  Artillery (grenade launcher) fire is transferred into the 
depth when assaulting MRC's and tank subunits approach the 
safety limit from bursts of friendly artillery and mortar rounds 
(grenades). At precisely the established H hour, 
motorized rifle and tank subunits of the battalion first echelon 
burst onto the enemy FEBA, destroy his personnel and weapons and 
develop the assault into the depth. 
  The battalion assault is accomplished with support of 
artillery fire and air strikes, including also combat helicopter 
strikes. Fire support of the assault is conducted continuously 
to the full depth of defense of the enemy first echelon brigade 
(regiment). Combat helicopters destroy tanks, AT weapons and 
other armored targets located 2-3 km or more ahead of the 
attacking subunits, and fighter-bombers engage enemy objectives 
at a greater depth. 
  Battalion organic and attached artillery continuously and 
successively neutralizes personnel and weapons, especially AT 
weapons, ahead of the front and on flanks of the battalion 
attack in coordination with the senior commander's weapons. This 
artillery displaces to new firing positions by order of the 
battalion commander, usually after the attackers take forward 
enemy platoon strongpoints. A transfer of or request for fire in 
conducting artillery support of the assault by a successive fire 
concentration, concentrated fire, and fire against single 
targets also may be accomplished at a command (signal) from the 
battalion commander. 
  The battalion GLP attacks behind first echelon companies, in 
their gaps or on one of the battalion flanks. If necessary the 
platoon may move up into battle formations of MRC's. 
  The ATP displaces behind one of the first echelon companies 
on a likely avenue of tank approach in readiness to repel enemy 
tank counterattacks. 
  Moving behind first echelon companies, the air defense 
subunit reconnoiters the air enemy and covers subunits from the 
air. 
  Exploiting results of fire damage, assaulting tank and 
motorized rifle subunits of the battalion destroy personnel and 
weapons in strongpoints from the move and create conditions for 
routing the enemy in the depth of the defense. The battalion may 
conduct the attack in approach march formation on an axis where 
the enemy has been reliably neutralized and offers no organized 
resistance. 
  The enemy may counterattack the battalion with brigade 
reserves. In this case, when the battalion's assaulting subunits 
have superiority over the counterattacker or equal forces and 
assets with him, as a rule he is destroyed by fire and a 
determined assault from the move. If the counterattacking enemy 
has superiority in forces and assets, it is more advantageous 
for the battalion to inflict damage on him by fire from in place 
and subsequently complete the rout by a determined assault in 
coordination with adjacent subunits, artillery and combat 
helicopters. 
  When first echelon companies have performed the immediate 
mission the battalion commander assigns them a new mission and 
takes steps to build up efforts by committing the second 
echelon (reserve). 
  Depending on the situation, it may be committed as or after 
the battalion completes performance of the immediate mission. 
The second echelon (reserve) displaces covertly from line to 
line 1- 2 km behind first echelon subunits, as a rule in 
approach march formation, taking advantage of concealing and 
protective properties of the terrain. It is committed in gaps 
between companies, from behind the flank of one of the 
companies, and sometimes also by leapfrogging over their battle 
formations (Diagram 14). 
  With commitment of the second echelon (reserve), the 
battalion commander usually updates by radio (points out to the 
reserve) the following: latest data on the enemy; situation of 
first echelon subunits; commitment line and time of moving to 
it; immediate mission and direction for continuing the attack; 
means of reinforcement and places and time of their arrival; 
missions for organic and attached artillery; procedure for fire 
support and coordination with first echelon subunits and 
adjacent subunits. 
  On receiving a mission for commitment, the commander of a 
second echelon (reserve) company of the battalion updates 
(assigns) combat missions to platoons (squads, tanks) on the 
move by radio. On arriving at the commitment line, he indicates 
on the terrain the position of the enemy and his weapons, 
commitment line, assault objectives and direction for continuing 
the attack, and he organizes coordination. 
  In coordination instructions the commander of a second 
echelon (reserve) company communicates the procedure for joint 
actions of motorized rifle and tank subunits, for their 
deployment into battle formation, and for conducting fire and 
movement and negotiating minefields and barriers; coordinates 
actions of motorized riflemen with tanks, with attached weapons, 
with each other and with adjacent subunits for destroying the 
enemy; indicates the procedure for dismounting motorized 
riflemen (if necessary) and using BMP's; and announces warning, 
control and coordination signals. 
  The battalion second echelon (reserve) moves up to the 
commitment line at maximum speed and deploys quickly into battle 
formation on approaching the line. Before its commitment, 
artillery, grenade launchers and other weapons conduct a fire 
assault. The second echelon's forward movement and deployment is 
covered by air defense subunits and supported by first echelon 
companies. Firing from the move, a second echelon company 
swiftly assaults the enemy and performs the assigned mission 
together with the battalion's first echelon companies and 
supported by artillery. With commitment of the second echelon, 
the battalion commander establishes a reserve from subunits 
operating off the axis of concentration of the battalion's main 
efforts. The battalion commander moves up a reconnaissance 
(combat reconnaissance) patrol for conducting reconnaissance on 
the axis of attack. 
  In a dismounted assault by motorized rifle subunits, after 
the enemy is destroyed in his first position personnel usually 
mount BMP's (BTR's, or as a mounted force on tanks). The 
battalion continues a determined attack into the depth, 
exploiting artillery fire, fire of its own weapons and air 
strikes. 
  Minefields laid ahead of assaulting companies by enemy 
remote 
minelaying assets are crossed through passages if it is 
impossible to go around them. Passages are breached by the 
battalion obstacle clearing party, by mineclearing teams of 
companies and by other mineclearing methods. Subunits move along 
passages in approach march formations under cover of fire of 
artillery, tanks, BMP's (BTR's), and the battalion AT subunit 
and grenade launcher subunit. To ensure timely forward movement 
of the obstacle clearing party for breaching obstacles, it is 
advisable to have it displace behind first echelon companies 
near the battalion commander's COP. 
  During the attack the battalion COP displaces behind first 
echelon companies at a distance giving the commander an 
opportunity for continuous observation of the battlefield and 
stable communications with the senior commander and with 
attached and supporting subunits. The battalion commander must 
constantly reconnoiter the enemy and terrain and observe the 
battlefield; promptly give artillery fire support to subunits 
which have achieved greatest success; and skillfully exploit the 
success for developing the attack. 
  When attacking on an axis where the enemy is reliably 
neutralized and not offering organized resistance, a battalion 
may not deploy into battle formation, but assault in approach 
march formation. Assigned subunits may deploy into battle 
formation to destroy the remaining enemy. 
  If the battalion launches an attack outside of the 
regimental 
penetration sector, then it must use aggressive actions, above 
all the fire of all weapons, to keep the enemy from removing a 
portion of his forces from the occupied position and 
transferring them to the penetration sector. When there has been 
reliable fire damage of the enemy or upon discovery of removal 
of a portion of forces or their withdrawal from the occupied 
position, the battalion should assault the enemy decisively with 
artillery fire support. It is advisable to conduct the assault 
with the main body along an axis adjoining the penetration 
sector. Making wide use of a maneuver of fire and subunits, one 
should destroy the enemy in strongpoints and develop the attack 
into the depth. A situation may take shape where the enemy 
offers stubborn resistance on the FEBA. In this case it is 
advisable to commit the battalion second echelon in the 
penetration sector with the mission of routing the enemy by 
striking the flank and rear of his strongpoints, expand the 
penetration sector and develop the attack into the depth. 
  When the regiment attacks in the entire zone without a 
penetration sector being designated, the battalion, taking 
advantage of gaps in the enemy battle formation and exploiting 
results of fire damage, penetrates the defense with the main 
body from the move and advances nonstop into the depth, covering 
its flanks with a portion of the forces. An enemy who continues 
to offer resistance is sealed off with minimal forces and 
destroyed by the second echelon (reserve) or by assigned 
subunits. 
  The battalion goes around strongpoints in the depth of the 
enemy defense which are delaying the advance, using smoke in so 
doing, and decisively destroys him by strikes against the flank 
and rear with support from the front. War experience indicates 
that only a skilled maneuver of subunits and fire and the 
delivery of strikes against the flank and rear in coordination 
with subunits of all combat arms can achieve decisive 
destruction of the enemy in strongpoints. 
  Based on the nature of enemy operations and the position 
occupied, companies in the battalion battle formation may be in 
a line, wedge (inverted wedge), or echelon right or left. 
  Lines and objectives captured in the depth of the enemy 
defense and which are of great importance are consolidated by 
subunits assigned for this. On arriving at the line the subunit 
digs in and prepares fire to repel a possible enemy 
counterattack. 
  Success attained in fighting in the depth of the enemy 
defense must be exploited immediately to achieve his total rout. 
  With an enemy withdrawal the battalion commander updates the 
mission for the reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol, 
sends out new patrols if necessary and assigns missions to 
subunits for the pursuit. The commander reports to the senior 
chief and informs adjacent subunits about shifting to the 
pursuit. 
  Depending on situation conditions a battalion usually 
conducts the pursuit by two methods: along parallel routes or 
from the front. Pursuit along parallel routes is the most 
advisable method. 
  In the course of pursuit a battalion operates in battle, 
approach march or march formation depending on the situation. 
Personnel in motor vehicles may pursue a retreating enemy as a 
mounted force on tanks or in motor vehicles covered by tanks. 
  With successful development of the attack, an MRB (TB) may 
operate in a forward or raiding detachment. 
  The mission of a forward detachment is to capture 
an important line (objective) in the depth of the enemy defense 
and hold it until the main body arrives. A raiding 
detachment may be assigned a mission to destroy or capture 
one or two important objectives: tactical missile batteries, 
individual elements of a reconnaissance-strike complex, an 
artillery battalion, fire support helicopter basing site, a 
base, a depot, bridge crossing and other objectives. After 
performing a mission the raiding detachment as a rule joins 
(moves up to) the main body, avoiding a fight with the enemy. 
  Conditions under which detachments have to operate are 
determined and characterized by the following basic factors: 
considerable separation from the main body and presence of 
exposed flanks; possibility of an enemy ground and air attack on 
the detachments from different directions; frequent changes in 
directions of detachment operations. In the course of performing 
missions, detachments often will interwork with an airborne 
(amphibious) assault force, aviation, and reconnaissance, 
forward and raiding detachments operating from adjacent units 
and formations. 
  To increase independence of operations an MRB (TB) may be 
reinforced by a TC (MRC), SP artillery battalion, air defense 
battery, and also a combat engineer platoon. 
  The alignment of a detachment's forces and assets must 
conform to the commander's decision and ensure the following: 
swift commitment and advance into the depth of the enemy 
defense; deployment of forces and assets from the move into 
approach march and battle formations from a column; independence 
of operations by companies; buildup of efforts in conducting 
battle and when it is necessary to disengage; and convenience of 
C[.sup]2[/]. 
  It is desirable to have the following alignment of a 
detachment march formation when moving up to the objective: 
march security (forward, flank and rear security elements), 
movement support detachment, main body, and necessary number of 
technical support and rear vehicles. MRC's (TC's) usually are 
reinforced by tank (motorized rifle) subunits. The combat 
reconnaissance patrol will perform reconnaissance missions in 
support of the battalion. 
  To rout the enemy a forward detachment and raiding 
detachment 
as a rule deploy into a battle formation which consists of first 
echelon subunits (two reinforced MRC's or TC's), a reserve (up 
to a company), artillery, and air defense subunits. In addition, 
there may be destruction (demolition) and capture teams in the 
raiding detachment battle formation if necessary. 
  On receiving a mission the battalion commander sends out 
reconnaissance and makes his decision based on a mission 
analysis and situation estimate. The following usually are 
specified in the commander's concept: direction of operations 
(if not indicated by the senior commander); sequence and methods 
for destruction, capture or disabling of enemy objectives during 
commitment and operations in the depth; detachment alignment 
during commitment and operations in the enemy rear; procedure 
for forward movement, methods of commitment, and nature of 
maneuver in the enemy rear; and methods of achieving surprise of 
operations. The commander's concept is determined for the full 
depth of detachment operations, while combat missions are 
assigned to subunits only for capture of a line (for the forward 
detachment) or for smashing (destroying) a priority objective 
(for the raiding detachment). 
  In accordance with the decision, the battalion commander 
assigns missions to subordinates, organizes coordination and 
issues necessary instructions for comprehensive support of 
operations. Combat missions for subunits and the procedure for 
coordination as a rule are updated on initial engagement of the 
enemy. 
  Taking advantage of gaps in the enemy battle formation, the 
detachment decisively penetrates into the depth of his defense. 
Without becoming engaged with him, the detachment moves swiftly 
up to the indicated line or objective and captures it. If 
necessary, the detachment's commitment may be supported by 
artillery fire, helicopter strikes and operations of first 
echelon subunits. After taking the designated line, the forward 
detachment shifts to a defense and holds it until the main body 
arrives. It must be a perimeter defense and ensure repulse of 
enemy assaults from different directions. If the situation 
permits, the forward detachment advances by authorization of the 
commander who sent it out in order to preempt the enemy in 
seizing a new line. 
  The past war's experience shows that the forward 
detachment's 
successful performance of the mission is achieved by its 
decisive, highly mobile operations. 
  On arrival at the planned objective and with initial 
engagement of security, the raiding detachment commander as a 
rule updates the decision and missions for subordinates. The 
detachment destroys the enemy by a surprise assault of the main 
body from the move, usually from two or three directions, puts 
his objective out of commission and moves to the assembly area. 
If necessary, the destruction team blows up structures and 
destroys vehicles and the capture team seizes documents, weapons 
and prisoners. 
  In the course of disabling or destroying the first 
objective, 
the detachment commander sends out reconnaissance to the next 
enemy objective. The detachment maneuvers onto the new axis 
covertly and quickly in columns. Measures for deceiving the 
enemy, especially regarding the true axis of operations, should 
be provided for here. 
  Nighttime and other conditions of limited visibility should 
be used fully to execute a maneuver in the depth of the enemy 
defense and deliver surprise attacks. 
  After executing a mission the raiding detachment moves up to 
the main body covertly and joins it. If necessary, it may hold 
the objective until the main body arrives. 
  An MRB (TB) also may operate in a special detachment during 
development of the attack. The detachment mission is to destroy 
means of nuclear and chemical attack and precision weapon 
systems. Operations of a special detachment essentially are 
similar to those of a raiding detachment. 
  On receiving the combat mission, the battalion commander 
immediately sends out a reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) 
patrol. Taking advantage of intervals, breaches and gaps in the 
enemy battle formation and his exposed flanks, the detachment 
moves covertly and quickly to the designated area. Then it 
decisively assaults the enemy, usually from different 
directions, destroys covering-force subunits, and captures and 
destroys his launchers (guns) and missiles (ammunition). After 
performing the assigned mission the special detachment may 
receive a new combat mission or it moves to the operating area 
of its own units. 
  When attacking a fortified area, an MRB may operate as an 
assault detachment. Assault teams are formed in the assault 
detachment to destroy the enemy or seal him off in permanent 
weapon emplacements and other important structures. Each team 
includes up to a reinforced MRC. 
  The assault detachment is reinforced by tanks, artillery, 
flamethrowers, ATGM and air defense subunits and a combat 
engineer subunit. The detachment is given an immediate mission 
and direction for continuing the attack. 
  An assault detachment's immediate mission is to seize and 
destroy permanent weapon emplacements and other important 
structures in strongpoints of enemy first echelon companies. The 
direction for continuing the attack is determined so as to 
ensure capture and destruction of enemy weapon emplacements and 
other structures in the depth of his first position. To perform 
the combat mission the assault detachment takes up an attack 
position in immediate proximity to the assault objectives. 
  An assault on the enemy by the assault detachment begins 
simultaneously with first echelon tank and motorized rifle 
subunits. In coordination with a portion of forces of tank and 
motorized rifle subunits advancing into the depth of the enemy 
defense, the detachment seals off and destroys sturdy structures 
which survived fire preparation of the assault. 
  An MRB (TB) may launch a hasty attack on a defending enemy 
with forward movement from an assembly area. In this case the 
battalion column alignment should support its swift deployment 
into approach march and battle formations and transition into 
the assault. Therefore MRC's (TC's) move forward with means of 
reinforcement, and the tank subunit attached to the MRB moves at 
the head of the MRB column. Air defense subunits are dispersed 
through the column. Heading up the COP, the battalion commander 
moves forward at the head of the column. An ATP and GLP not 
involved in fire preparation of the assault proceed in front of 
the second echelon (reserve). 
  The mortar battery and attached artillery battery which are 
used for fire preparation of the assault, and also regimental 
weapons, including those assigned for direct fire, move forward 
and take up firing positions in advance under the senior 
commander's plan. Tanks to be equipped with roller-type 
mineclearing devices also are moved up by his direction (usually 
to the vicinity of the line of deployment into company columns). 
  Minefields which the enemy may lay by remote minelaying 
assets in the period of forward movement are negotiated through 
passages breached by the senior commander's movement support 
detachment, by the battalion obstacle clearing party and by 
mineclearing teams of companies. 
  The battalion moves forward, observing measures of 
protection 
against enemy precision weapons and radar and optical 
reconnaissance. 
  If the enemy delivers nuclear and chemical strikes or massed 
precision weapon strikes, subunits which have retained combat 
effectiveness continue moving up to the line of departure. A 
first echelon company which has lost combat effectiveness is 
replaced by the second echelon (reserve). In case the enemy 
employs incendiary munitions, subunits are moved out of the area 
of the fire, extinguish centers of fire on vehicles and continue 
performing the assigned mission. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins with the battalion's 
arrival at the line reached by fire of the bulk of enemy 
artillery (or from a line designated by the senior commander). 
In the course of fire preparation, guns, tanks and other weapons 
assigned for direct fire destroy enemy armored targets in and 
between strongpoints on the FEBA and in the depth. 
  In the period of fire preparation of the assault the 
battalion deploys successively into company and platoon columns 
at appropriate lines or points. On approaching the line of 
departure, they deploy into battle formation and launch an 
assault without stopping, conducting fire from tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's). 
  Artillery and aviation shift to fire support of the assault 
when the battalion's first echelon companies begin arriving at 
the line of departure. 
  The assault on the enemy defense is made with close 
interworking of TC's and MRC's. TC's assault in an extended line 
and MRC's in dismounted formation following the tanks or in 
BMP's (BTR's) without the personnel dismounting, depending on 
the situation. In the course of the assault and development of 
the attack in the depth of the enemy defense, battalion 
operations subsequently are similar to those of a battalion 
which launches an attack from a position of direct contact with 
the enemy. 
<H5>  9. Night Attack </H5>
  One of the principles of conducting an attack is its 
continuity. Nonstop conduct of the battle both day as well as 
night is of the greatest importance in achieving this principle. 
This permits maintaining the initiative, imposing one's will on 
the enemy, disrupting his plans and, as a result, achieving 
decisive victory sometimes with lesser forces. Based on this, a 
night attack may begin with penetration of the enemy defense or 
may be a continuation of daytime combat operations. The night 
contributes to achieving covert maneuver and surprise. 
  Orientation, recognition of targets (objectives), 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits, their support by artillery fire and 
air strikes, as well as coordination among them is complicated 
at night. Driving combat and transport vehicles, executing a 
maneuver, and detecting barriers and obstacles is hampered and 
personnel fatigue increases. At night the danger arises of 
subunits losing the axis of attack, and effectiveness of all 
kinds of fire drops perceptibly. Subunits may end up in a vague 
situation and be subjected to various surprises more often than 
during the day. Performing fire missions may require 1.3-1.5 
times more time and a greater expenditure of rounds by all 
weapons even when using illumination assets and night vision 
devices. At night the casualty effect of thermal radiation from 
a nuclear burst increases sharply. 
  Therefore successful conduct of a night attack requires 
subunit personnel to have high morale, proficiency, conditioning 
and comprehensive training and requires preparation of weapons 
and vehicles, which is confirmed by war and exercise experience. 
  Poor visibility or its total absence is the chief factor 
negatively influencing conduct of a night attack. Artificial 
illumination assets and night vision devices are used to create 
favorable conditions for such a battle. 
  Illumination assets (air-dropped illumination flares, 
illuminating artillery and mortar rounds, pyrotechnic flares and 
searchlights) and light signaling assets (signal flares and trip 
flares with colored lights; tracer bullets and rounds; colored 
air-dropped parachute signal flares (colored marker-signal 
shells), sets of signal lights, route signal lights and lighted 
markers (indicators)) are used for artificial illumination. 
  Illuminating artillery and mortar rounds are used to 
illuminate the terrain and objectives, blind observation posts 
and weapon crews, adjust artillery fire and place lines of 
marker lights (light markers). Parachute flares serve to 
illuminate large terrain sectors and large enemy objectives. 
Searchlights are used to illuminate terrain and objectives, 
blind the enemy, orient friendly troops, and combat enemy 
searchlights and night vision devices. 
  Illuminating flare cartridges (pyrotechnic flares) are 
intended for illuminating terrain and enemy targets directly 
ahead of friendly subunit battle formations. Light signaling 
assets are used for orientation on the terrain; accomplishing 
target designation; calling in, transferring and ceasing fire; 
giving (or duplicating) signals (commands); identifying and 
marking friendly subunits and so on. C[.sup]2[/] of subunits 
and maintenance of continuous coordination among them are 
considerably facilitated with their help. 
  Orientation may be accomplished by placing light markers 
(lines of marker lights), illuminating boundaries between 
battalions, and marking movement routes (cross-country routes), 
lines, passages, crossings, landing sites and so on. Night 
vision devices are used to conduct observation, reconnoiter the 
enemy, and control the heading and rate of movement of tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's), and they also are used for conducting small arms 
fire and the fire of artillery systems. 
  An attack on a defending enemy at night may be launched both 
from a position of direct contact with him as well as from the 
move. The attack may begin at the beginning or in the middle of 
the night or just before dawn. Launching an attack at the 
beginning of the night permits taking advantage of more hours of 
darkness for routing the enemy, while the second half of the 
night or the time before dawn is advantageous in that enemy 
vigilance as a rule is reduced in this period. 
  When a night attack is a continuation of daytime operations, 
enemy positions and lines usually are assaulted from the move. 
This keeps him from upgrading the defense, drawing up reserves 
or disengaging and breaking off from attacking subunits to 
occupy a defense at a new line. 
  Open terrain without significant natural barriers, but with 
reference points visible in the darkness used for directing the 
operations of subunits (highways, field roads, treelines, 
streams, openings and so on), is most favorable for a night 
attack. 
  The width of attack frontage and content of company 
(battalion) combat missions are the very same as for a daytime 
attack, but in assigning missions it is advisable that the 
battalion immediate or subsequent mission be accomplished by 
dawn. If this is impossible to do, a battalion may be given a 
supplementary line which it must take by dawn. Designation of 
such a line is caused basically by the need to create favorable 
conditions for committing the second echelon and for repelling 
possible enemy counterattacks at dawn. The determination of this 
line depends basically on length of the night, time the attack 
is launched, preparedness of subunits for night battle and the 
availability of illumination support assets to them. When the 
attack occurs in the depth of the enemy defense, a battalion 
most often will receive a combat mission for the entire night in 
the course of the attack's development. 
  The battalion battle formation usually is aligned in two 
echelons. Commitment of the second echelon under nighttime 
conditions presents some difficulty. Therefore it is advisable 
to assign that number of forces and assets to the first echelon 
which would ensure its performance of the mission assigned for 
the night without committing the second echelon. 
  Illumination support is organized by the senior commander 
and 
accomplished under a unified plan. A battalion receives a 
certain amount of illumination and light signaling assets to 
perform missions envisaged by the plan and those which arise 
suddenly. A mortar (artillery) platoon may be assigned in the 
battalion for employing those assets, and two or three 
illumination posts (one per platoon) controlled by the company 
commander may be established in companies. Air defense subunits 
also should be assigned missions of destroying enemy 
illumination support assets (illuminating mortar and artillery 
rounds and parachute flares) in the air. 
  Preparation for a night attack occurs most often in hours of 
daylight and has a number of features. Thus, in addition to 
general questions, in organizing for battle the company 
(battalion) commander indicates to subordinate commanders the 
reference points visible at night and azimuth of the direction 
of attack; he may designate a guide platoon (company) and 
missions for destroying enemy night vision devices and 
illumination support assets; and he determines the procedure for 
marking friendly subunits and using night vision devices and 
short-range reconnaissance radars. In addition, the procedure is 
clarified for illumination of terrain and assault objectives and 
placement of light markers (lines of marker lights) by artillery 
fire and other means to mark the direction of the attack, and 
the procedure is established for marking lines reached 
(occupied) by subunits, their flanks, and movement routes. 
  Measures for protection against thermal radiation of nuclear 
bursts also are envisaged without fail, and support of subunits 
with illumination assets, tracer rounds, cartridges with tracer 
bullets, and signaling devices is organized. 
  The use of illumination devices should not reveal friendly 
subunits, hamper use of night vision devices or create favorable 
conditions for the enemy to conduct fire against attacking 
subunits. 
  Special attention in preparing the subunits should be given 
to checking the technical condition of night vision devices and 
external and internal illumination of vehicles, applying 
identifying markings to them and replenishing reserves of light 
signaling assets. Illumination posts are prepared. 
  The company (battalion) launches an attack as a rule after 
fire preparation of the assault. Sometimes the attack also may 
be launched without conducting such a preparation in order to 
achieve surprise. 
  Motorized rifle subunits usually assault the enemy in 
dismounted formation in close coordination with tanks and 
artillery. As a rule the tanks and BMP's (BTR's) operate in the 
motorized riflemen's extended line. 
  During an attack subunits precisely maintain their indicated 
directions, skillfully use illumination assets and mark their 
position. Special attention is given to covering flanks and 
conducting reconnaissance. Under nighttime conditions surprise 
counterattacks even by small forces may have a significant 
psychological effect on personnel. 
  The battalion second echelon (reserve) may be committed even 
before daybreak, but without executing a complicated maneuver. 
During commitment, in addition to the usual questions the second 
echelon (reserve) also is given an azimuth for the direction of 
the attack during the mission update (assignment). For 
successful operations of the second echelon (reserve), artillery 
neutralizes and illuminates the enemy and places a light marker 
in the direction of the attack. 
  When shifting from night to daytime operations, 
reconnaissance is organized, missions are updated for (assigned 
to) subunits, artillery and weapons move closer to them, air 
defense is reinforced, flanks are secured, and subunits' 
ammunition and other supplies are replenished. 
<H5>  10. Forcing Water Obstacles </H5>
  The attack of an MRC or TC (MRB or TB) often will be 
accomplished with the forcing of a water obstacle. The 
surmounting of a water obstacle by attacking subunits when its 
opposite bank is defended by the enemy is called forcing. Water 
obstacles above all are rivers, which are narrow (up to 100 m), 
medium (from 100 to 250 m), wide (250-600 m) and major (over 600 
m). 
  A forcing is made by a company (battalion) as a rule from 
the 
march with preparation back before approaching the water 
obstacle. If a forcing from the march did not succeed, it is 
done with deployment of the main body at the water obstacle 
after additional preparation in a short time or after thorough 
preparation. In this case the forcing may be done from a 
position of direct contact with the enemy or from the march with 
forward movement from a staging area [iskhodnyy rayon]. 
  Airborne assault forces may be landed prior to forcing of a 
water obstacle from the march to seize crossings and prohibit 
the approach of reserves. 
  A company (battalion) usually forces a water obstacle as 
part 
of the battalion (regimental) main body, and independently when 
operating in a forward security element (or a battalion in a 
forward or raiding detachment or the advance guard). In all 
cases the forcing of water obstacles requires careful 
preparation of personnel, weapons and military vehicles, conduct 
of measures to keep them from accumulating at crossings, and 
strict compliance with safety measures. 
  Primary and secondary crossings are assigned to a company 
when forcing a water obstacle as part of the main body, and a 
crossing sector [uchastok] is assigned to a battalion. When the 
regimental main body deploys at a water obstacle, a battalion 
additionally is assigned a staging area for the forcing directly 
at the water obstacle. A company usually occupies a staging 
position [iskhodnoye polozheniye] in the battalion area. When 
the regiment occupies a staging area at certain distance from a 
water obstacle, a company (battalion) is assigned a staging area 
for the forcing. 
  Amphibious vehicle crossings, ferry crossings, a fording 
site 
or a fully submerged crossing site may be organized in the 
battalion forcing sector. Amphibious vehicle crossings are 
organized on tracked amphibian carriers and ferry crossings on 
amphibious river-crossing equipment or tracked selfpropelled 
ferries. Motorized rifle subunits usually cross water obstacles 
in BMP's (BTR's); tanks cross on ferries (amphibious river- 
crossing equipment, tracked self-propelled ferries), by fording, 
or fully submerged; and nonamphibious artillery and wheeled 
vehicles cross on tracked amphibian carriers. The number and 
kinds of crossings are determined by availability of crossing 
equipment, nature of the water obstacle and established 
procedure for the crossing of subunits. 
  For an organized forcing from the march, a line of 
departure for the forcing [iskhodnyy rubezh dlya forsirovaniya] 
is designated 1-2 km from the water's edge, and an area for 
boarding (loading) on assault crossing equipment and an armor 
inspection and deepfording preparation area 5-6 km from the 
water's edge. When a staging area for the forcing is occupied 
right at the water obstacle, the line of departure for the 
forcing is designated 100300 m from the water's edge and the 
boarding (loading) area and armor inspection and deepfording 
preparation area are designated in sheltered places near the 
water obstacle. 
  Commandants are appointed from among commanders of engineer 
troop subunits to ensure firm order in the forcing sector and at 
crossings, and the TB commander (chief of staff) or tanker 
officer is assigned for this at a fully submerged tank crossing 
(or fording). 
  The width of attack frontage and content of combat missions 
of the company (battalion) with forcing of a water obstacle as 
part of the main body basically are the very same as in an 
attack on a defending enemy without a forcing. 
  The mission of a company operating in a forward security 
element usually is to destroy the enemy on approaches to the 
water obstacle, force it from the march, destroy the enemy in 
the platoon strongpoint on the opposite bank and take a line 
supporting the forcing of the water obstacle from the march by 
the main body of a forward (raiding) detachment or advance guard. 
  As a rule, a battalion assigned to a forward detachment is 
assigned the mission to seize from the march crossings (bridges) 
and sectors favorable for forcing and hold them until the main 
body approaches. The depth of the captured bridgehead must not 
permit enemy AT weapons and tanks to conduct direct fire against 
the crossing. 
  The mission of a battalion operating in the advance guard 
may 
be to destroy the enemy on approaches to the water obstacle, 
support the main body in moving to it, force it from the march 
and rout the enemy on the opposite bank. 
  To support the forcing of a water obstacle from the march, 
in 
addition to usual means of reinforcement, an MRB operating in a 
forward (raiding) detachment or the advance guard may receive 
the attachment of an amphibious river-crossing equipment platoon 
or tracked self-propelled ferry platoon and a tracked amphibian 
carrier platoon, and a TB may receive the attachment of one or 
two amphibious river-crossing equipment or tracked self- 
propelled ferry platoons and a tracked amphibian carrier 
platoon. Crossings are prepared under the senior commander's 
plan during company (battalion) operations as part of the main 
body. 
  The commander must organize reconnaissance of the water 
obstacle, make the decision for the forcing, assign missions to 
subordinates and organize coordination in advance. 
  A combat reconnaissance patrol and patrol squads (tanks) are 
assigned for reconnoitering the enemy, the water obstacle and 
planned crossing sites. On arriving at the water obstacle, 
reconnaissance must determine enemy forces and assets on the 
opposite bank; the presence and condition of crossings and fords 
and the most convenient places for preparing amphibious vehicle 
crossings, ferry crossings and tank crossings by fording or 
fully submerged. Reconnaissance entities cross independently in 
the absence of an enemy on the opposite bank. 
  Based on reconnaissance data the commander updates the 
decision made from the map, the crossing sites and the procedure 
for using attached crossing equipment. In addition to the usual 
questions the commander determines the following in the decision 
for the forcing: procedure for destroying the enemy on 
approaches to the water obstacle and on the opposite bank; sites 
and kinds of primary and alternate crossings and the 
distribution of crossing equipment; routes and procedure for 
moving up to the water obstacle; sequence of the crossing of 
subunits. In organizing the forcing, the commander also 
determines the procedure for preparing weapons and military 
vehicles. 
  In forcing a water obstacle from the march, combat missions 
are communicated to (updated for) subordinates by operational 
instructions, usually by radio. First of all missions are 
assigned to those subunits which must perform them (act against 
the enemy) earlier than others and which need more time to 
prepare. Coordination instructions also are issued 
simultaneously in the operational instructions. If the forcing 
is being done with deployment of the regimental main body at the 
water obstacle, missions as a rule are assigned to subordinates 
by a verbal operation order. 
  In assigning the mission to subunits for the forcing of a 
water obstacle, the company (battalion) commander additionally 
indicates the following in the operation order: 

  -  for platoons (companies)--missions on the 
approach to the water obstacle, during the forcing and on the 
opposite bank, primary and alternate crossing sites, armor 
inspection and deepfording preparation area, locations for 
boarding personnel and loading weapons and vehicles on self 
propelled assault crossing equipment, line of departure for the 
forcing and the time of crossing the line; 
  -  for artillery subunits, grenade launcher subunit and AT 
subunit-missions for supporting subunits in forcing the 
water obstacle and in the battle on the opposite bank, and also 
firing positions, readiness time for commencing fire and the 
crossing procedure; 
  -  for the air defense subunit--missions for covering 
subunits against enemy air strikes during forward movement to 
the water obstacle, during the forcing, and in the battle on the 
opposite bank, and also launch (firing) positions, readiness 
time for commencing fire and the crossing procedure; 
  -  for attached subunits of engineer troops--missions 
for engineer reconnaissance of crossing sites, preparing and 
maintaining crossings, and preparing forward movement routes to 
them, and also locations of assault crossing equipment during 
forward movement to the water obstacle. 


    Amphibious combat vehicles are prepared before they arrive 
at 
the water obstacle. Special attention must be given to tight 
closure of hatches, firing ports and doors and to serviceability 
of bilge pumps and the presence and tight closure of drain 
plugs. Personnel in vehicles put on life vests. Tanks are 
prepared for a fully submerged crossing on the approach, and 
this is completed in the armor inspection and deepfording 
preparation area. 
  Subunits move up to the water obstacle at maximum rate of 
speed in readiness for forcing it from the march. 
  Fire preparation of forcing and the assault usually is 
conducted before forcing, and fire support of forcing and the 
assault is carried out on completion of fire preparation (during 
forcing). The moment first echelon subunits shove off from the 
near bank is considered to be the beginning of forcing (H), and 
the arrival of all company (battalion) forces and assets at the 
opposite bank is the end of forcing. 
  A company operating in a forward security element decisively 
destroys the enemy on approaches to the water obstacle, seizes 
crossings (bridges, fords) and moves to the opposite bank. In 
the absence of crossings or if they have been blown up by the 
enemy, the company forces the water obstacle from the march. 
Exploiting results of artillery and tank fire, MRP's cross the 
water obstacle in BMP's (BTR's) and destroy the enemy on the 
opposite bank by fire of all weapons from afloat. The enemy 
firing against company flanks is destroyed by the fire of tanks 
and guns and blinded by aerosols (smoke). On arriving at the 
opposite bank the company captures the indicated line, 
supporting the main body's crossing and commitment. SP 
amphibious artillery crosses independently and tanks cross on 
ferries or by fording depending on the situation. The company 
commander crosses to the opposite bank right after the platoons. 
  If a water obstacle has failed to be forced from the march, 
the company consolidates on the captured bank. It neutralizes 
and destroys the enemy on the opposite bank by fire of all 
weapons and thereby creates favorable conditions for main body 
commitment. 
  A battalion assigned to a forward detachment moves up to a 
water obstacle swiftly without engaging the enemy on approaches 
to it. Exploiting success of the forward security element and 
results of air strikes and artillery fire, it crosses the water 
obstacle at crossings and in amphibious BMP's (BTR's) and 
assault crossing equipment. It destroys the enemy on the 
opposite bank by decisive actions, captures a bridgehead with 
favorable sectors for forcing, and holds it until the main body 
arrives. The battalion often performs its mission in 
coordination with a tactical airborne assault force. 
  If the battalion is operating in a raiding detachment, it 
usually crosses the water obstacle in the course of forward 
movement to its indicated objective over a bridge or ford 
captured by the forward security element, in amphibious fighting 
vehicles and assault crossing equipment. 
  A battalion operating in an advance guard decisively 
destroys 
the enemy covering approaches to the water obstacle and moves up 
to it. Exploiting success of the forward security element, it 
crosses the water obstacle from the march over captured 
crossings or in assault crossing equipment. Subsequently the 
battalion continues the attack into the depth of the enemy 
defense, supporting the main body's forcing and crossing. 
  Actions of a reinforced TB, the advance guard of 61st Guards 
Tank Brigade, on 20 January 1945 were an example of such 
actions. Decisively destroying the enemy on approaches to the 
Warta River as a forward security element, it took a bridge from 
the march (combat engineers disarmed explosives emplaced in it). 
The entire battalion rushed in on the heels of the forward 
security element, took the terrain sector ahead of the bridge 
and supported the crossing of the brigade main body and 
development of success into the depth.[.sup]1[/] 
  Organic and attached artillery and the grenade launchers 
take 
up firing positions from the march and use their fire to support 
battle of the forward security element and the main body's 
crossing and battle on the opposite bank. Tanks and guns moved 
up to conduct direct fire and ATGM systems destroy enemy AT 
weapons, tanks and personnel and cover flanks. Aircraft deliver 
strikes against the enemy in the depth, especially against the 
nearest reserves. 
  Exploiting results of fire and under cover of aerosols 
(smoke), motorized rifle subunits in amphibious BMP's (BTR's) 
and assault crossing equipment force the water obstacle, destroy 
the enemy by their fire from afloat and develop the attack into 
the depth after taking the opposite bank. 
  The forcing begins and is conducted on selected axes 
simultaneously by all first echelon forces. 
  Subunits assigned to cross on self-propelled crossing 
equipment on the first trip load weapons and vehicles and board 
personnel in sheltered places. They move swiftly out from these 
places toward the water obstacle and cross to the opposite bank 
from the move. On succeeding trips weapons and vehicles are 
loaded and personnel board the crossing equipment directly at 
the water obstacle. 
  As a rule, the crossing of tanks fully submerged is 
accomplished after motorized riflemen take the opposite bank. On 
emerging onto the bank, tank subunits swiftly move out to their 
own axes and perform assigned missions. 
  Attached and organic artillery, the air defense subunit, AT 
subunit and grenade launcher subunit usually cross in amphibious 
vehicles and assault crossing equipment to ensure continuity of 
support and cover of subunits on the opposite bank. AT weapons 
and self-propelled artillery should cross first of all to assist 
motorized rifle subunits in repelling possible enemy 
counterattacks. 
  Engineer subunits conduct engineer reconnaissance of the 
water obstacle; prepare, camouflage and maintain crossings and 
approach routes to them; breach obstacles; and organize and 
perform commandant's service at the crossing. 
  Battalion technical support and rear subunits cross in 
assault crossing equipment following the artillery and air 
defense subunits. The aid station and ammunition vehicles should 
be sent across first of all. Wounded and sick usually are sent 
across to the near shore by assault crossing equipment returning 
after landing subunits, and if necessary also by specially 
assigned crossing equipment. 
  If the advance guard failed to force the water obstacle from 
the march, it consolidates on the line reached, inflicts damage 
on the enemy by fire of all weapons and supports the main body's 
forcing of the water obstacle. 
  Exploiting success of the forward detachment (advance guard) 
and a tactical airborne assault force, a company (battalion) 
operating as part of the main body forces the obstacle over 
crossings captured by them, or motorized rifle subunits do so in 
BMP's (BTR's), tank subunits do so under water, and others do so 
in assault crossing equipment nonstop as they approach the water 
obstacle. Subsequently the company (battalion) assaults the 
enemy from the move, widens the bridgehead in coordination with 
the forward detachment (advance guard) and other subunits, and 
develops the attack into the depth. 
  If the company (battalion) is performing a mission where a 
forward detachment (advance guard) is not operating, the forcing 
of a water obstacle from the move usually begins after fire 
preparation of the forcing and the assault, supported by the 
fire of artillery, aircraft, tanks and guns assigned for direct 
fire. 
  In forcing with deployment of the main body at the 
water obstacle, an MRC (MRB) operating as part of the 
battalion (regimental) first echelon boards BMP's (BTR's) and 
self- propelled assault crossing equipment in sheltered places. 
It moves up to the water obstacle in the course of fire 
preparation of the forcing and the assault. For the crossing of 
a TC (TB), assault crossing equipment and tanks move up to 
crossing sites, where tanks are loaded. 
  The battalion commander gives the signal to move forward 
based on the beginning time of the forcing and the time needed 
to cover the distance from the boarding site to the water's edge. 
  Subunits of the first trip move forward swiftly to the water 
obstacle and shove off from the near bank exactly at H hour. On 
arriving on the opposite bank, the subunits assault the enemy 
and develop the attack into the depth. Fire support of their 
assault, especially at first, also is provided by fire of guns 
and tanks assigned for direct fire, by ATGM systems and by 
grenade launchers. 
  Second echelon subunits cross the water obstacle right after 
the battalion first echelon in readiness for commitment. 
  With the arrival of the company (battalion) on the opposite 
bank the enemy will attempt to throw it back from the captured 
bridgehead. A counterattack of his superior forces usually is 
repelled by fire of all weapons from in place supported by fire 
of artillery and combat helicopters. Having inflicted damage, 
the company (battalion) completes the enemy's rout in 
coordination with adjacent subunits and continues the attack 
into the depth. 
  C[.sup]2[/] of the company (battalion) is exercised from 
the COP, which displaces in the direction of concentration of 
main efforts. The company COP usually is located at the water's 
edge and moves to the opposite bank behind the first trip of 
subunits. The battalion COP is disposed 100-200 m from the river 
bank, and COP's of the attached TC (MRC) and artillery battalion 
(battery) are located near it. The battalion commander crosses 
to the opposite bank behind first echelon subunits. 
  In winter a company (battalion) may force water obstacles 
over ice crossings. Thickness of 30 cm or more of the 
transparent part of the ice stands up to movement of BMP's 
(BTR's), and 60 cm or more stands up to movement of tanks. If 
ice thickness does not permit combat vehicles to move over it, 
the water obstacle initially is crossed by motorized rifle 
subunits in dismounted formation. Vehicles cross after the ice 
is reinforced or over ferry assault crossings prepared in gaps 
in the ice, and also over bridges. Under favorable conditions 
tanks may cross a water obstacle at fords or fully submerged. 
With intensive ice movement, water obstacles as a rule are 
crossed over captured bridges and motorized rifle subunits are 
airlifted across. 
  Actions by a forward detachment of a brigade of 6th Guards 
Tank Corps in 1945 were an example of such actions. On 13 
January the detachment approached the Nida River. Assault 
riflemen forced the river over the thin ice, and tanks and SP 
artillery forded. The ice was broken up by fire from tank guns 
so it did not hamper tank movement. Combat engineers reinforced 
the ice with wooden decking for the crossing of artillery and 
motor vehicles.[.sup]2[/] 
<H5>  11. MRC (MRB) in Tactical Airborne Assault Force </H5>
  An MRC (MRB) may be assigned to a tactical airborne assault 
force in the course of conducting the attack and the defense. It 
is landed in the enemy rear to capture and hold important lines 
(objectives) until the approach of friendly troops, to deliver 
strikes against the flank and rear of approaching enemy reserves 
and his withdrawing units and subunits, and to destroy (disable) 
means of nuclear and chemical attack, ground elements of 
reconnaissance-strike complexes and launchers. The assault 
force[.sup]3[/] also is employed to capture airfields, road 
junctions, hydraulic engineering works, bridges, crossing 
equipment, sectors convenient for forcing or crossing of units, 
passes, mountain gaps, gorges and road junctions and for 
performing other missions. 
  For example, on 19 August 1945 a group of 200 persons was 
formed from 30th Guards Mechanized Brigade for the landing of an 
assault force in Manchuria's capital of Changchun. Initially an 
advance party [peredovaya gruppa] with scouts took off in the 
aircraft, captured an airfield and supported the main body's 
landing. Subsequently the assault force took the city railroad 
station, post office and telegraph office.[.sup]4[/] 
  The conditions under which an assault force has to perform 
missions in isolation from the main body are characterized 
basically by constant, abrupt changes of the situation and also 
by the high likelihood of the enemy delivering strikes against 
it from different directions on the ground and from the air. 
  Combat operations of an assault force are distinguished by 
high mobility, swiftness, and maximum intensity of personnel's 
physical and moral efforts. To support such operations the 
assault force should not have heavy weapons and vehicles, it is 
reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and special troops, 
and it is also supported by forces and assets of the commander 
by whose decision it is being employed. 
  The landing of a company (battalion) is accomplished by one 
sortie of a subunit (unit) of transport, transport-attack and 
combat helicopters. Thus, a company less BMP's (BTR's) and 
reinforced by a mortar platoon may require 4 Mi-8 and 3 Mi-26 
helicopters, and a reinforced battalion may require up to 20 Mi- 
8 and 17-18 Mi-6 or Mi-26 helicopters. The helicopters form into 
a combat formation during airlift of the assault force. It 
usually includes an assault element (columns of helicopters of 
the main body and the advance party) and a support element, 
which may consist of reconnaissance helicopters, escort 
gunships, helicopters for neutralizing air defense weapons, and 
jamming helicopters. 
  For preparing and airlifting the assault force by 
helicopters 
to the area for performing the combat mission, it is assigned an 
assault airlift staging area [iskhodnyy rayon dlya 
desantirovaniya], an en route corridor, and primary and 
alternate landing areas [rayon desantirovaniya] (Diagram 15). 
  The assault airlift staging area is intended for 
completing preparation of the assault force and helicopters for 
the landing and operations. It may be 20-30 km from the front 
line. The assault airlift staging area usually includes a 
marshaling area [rayon sosredotocheniya] for the company 
(battalion) assigned to the assault force and primary and 
alternate helicopter landing sites [posadochnaya ploshchadka]. 
The size of this area for a company may be up to 3 
km[.sup]2[/] and for a battalion up to 10 km[.sup]2[/]. It 
should provide convenience in preparing the company (battalion) 
for the landing and performance of the mission, protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons and a rapid move 
of the assault force for boarding (loading) the helicopters. The 
battalion is disposed in it by company with means of 
reinforcement. 
  Landing sites are intended for completing 
preparation of the helicopter subunit (unit) for the air 
assault, loading weapons, military vehicles and supplies in 
them, boarding the personnel and taking off for the air assault. 
It is advisable to select and prepare them in or near the 
assault force marshaling area. One landing site is prepared for 
no more than one helicopter squadron. In case the primary 
landing site is put out of commission, an alternate one is 
prepared, usually figuring one [alternate] site for two primary 
ones. 
  The en route corridor is intended for the combat 
flight of the helicopter subunit (unit) from the assault airlift 
staging area to the landing area. It is selected along a flight 
route where the enemy has the least amount of air defense 
weapons or where they have been reliably neutralized and the 
nature of terrain permits flying at low (to 300 m) and extremely 
low (1015 m) altitudes. The en route corridor may be 2-4 km wide. 
  The primary and alternate landing area (the 
alternate area is designated away from the primary one) is 
selected on terrain suitable for landing helicopters and giving 
the assault force favorable conditions for engagement. The 
landing area may be up to 10 km from the front line for the 
company and up to 20 km for the battalion. The landing area size 
is determined basically based on the combat mission and the 
commander's concept and may reach 2 km for the company and 5 km 
for the battalion laterally and in depth. One landing site 
[ploshchadka prizemleniya] in each landing area is designated 
for a company and 2-3 for a battalion for the landing. If it is 
impossible to use designated landing sites, the assault landing 
is made from a helicopter hover mode or "like an assault," i.e., 
on the move at minimum helicopter flight speed. 
  For an organized, timely flight of the helicopter subunit 
(unit) and beginning of operations with arrival in the landing 
area, it also is assigned a line of departure and a combat 
separation line. 
  A company (battalion) assigned to an assault force is given 
a 
combat mission for the entire period of its 
operations in the enemy rear. This mission usually is divided 
into immediate and subsequent missions. If necessary, a company 
(battalion) also may be given an assembly point (area). 
  The company (battalion) immediate mission usually 
consists of completing the enemy's destruction in the landing 
area and destroying (disabling) the indicated objective or 
capturing a certain line (area). The mission depth is the depth 
of the objective (objectives), including positions of its 
defending subunits, or the depth of the line (area) which the 
assault force is taking. 
  The subsequent mission may be to hold the captured 
line (area) until the approach of friendly units or to capture 
and destroy (disable) an objective in a new area and perform 
other missions. 
  An assembly point (area) is designated for a company 
(battalion) after performance of the combat mission for checking 
its status and preparing for further operations. Sometimes it 
also may be designated directly after landing (unloading) for 
assembling the subunits and updating missions for them. The 
presence of subunits at the assembly point (area) must be covert 
and brief. 
  Depending on the nature of the assigned mission, an assault 
force may perform it by an attack, by a defense and by raiding 
operations, during which conduct of a meeting battle also is not 
precluded. Destruction of the enemy and capture of a line (area) 
or objective usually is accomplished by an attack, and holding 
them until the approach of the main body usually is accomplished 
by the defense. A raid (raiding operations) usually will be 
conducted by the battalion as a raiding detachment. 
  The following usually are indicated in assigning missions to 
an assault force: brief information on the enemy in the en route 
corridor and in the landing zone [rayon vysadki] and the 
possible nature of his operations; makeup, means of 
reinforcement, primary and alternate landing areas and combat 
mission; assault airlift staging area; en route corridor and 
readiness time for the landing. In addition, means of fire 
support during airlift of the assault force, during the landing 
and during the battle under the senior commander's plan are 
announced. 
  To increase independence in performing the combat mission, a 
company (battalion) is reinforced by artillery, ATGM's, air 
defense and reconnaissance subunits and also subunits of 
engineer and chemical troops. An artillery officer and forward 
air controller with communications equipment are included in the 
assault force for requesting and adjusting fire of the main 
body's artillery and vectoring aircraft to targets respectively. 
  All subunits are provided with ammunition (often exceeding 
unit- level supply norms), food, individual protective gear and 
means to assist the wounded and sick. An assault force also 
should be reinforced by medical personnel. 
  The company (battalion) is aligned in a battle 
formation for fighting in the enemy rear. It usually 
consists of an advance party, first echelon subunits, a reserve 
(second echelon), subunits of artillery and other weapons, and 
air defense subunits. 
  The advance party is intended for completing 
destruction of the enemy at the landing site (sites), its 
capture, and support of the landing of the assault force main 
body. If an assault force consisting of an MRC is assigned, then 
up to a platoon is assigned to its advance party (up to two 
MRP's if the assault force is at battalion strength). The 
platoons are reinforced by air defense gunners, combat engineers 
and chemical scouts. A patrol squad (reconnaissance patrol, 
combat reconnaissance patrol) as well as artillery scouts of 
supporting (attached) artillery are landed together with the 
advance party. 
  Preparation for the landing and for assault force operations 
in the enemy rear includes the following: organization of the 
landing and the battle, and preparation of personnel, weapons, 
vehicles and supplies of subunits for the landing and 
performance of the combat mission; move of subunits to the 
assault airlift staging area and to the landing sites, loading 
of weapons and military vehicles and boarding personnel in the 
helicopters; and monitoring readiness of subunits for performing 
the combat mission. 
  On receiving the mission, the company (battalion) commander 
analyzes it, estimates the situation, makes the decision, 
performs a calculation for boarding (loading) the helicopters, 
issues the operation order and organizes coordination and 
preparation of subunits. 
  In analyzing the mission, in addition to general 
questions, the company (battalion) commander must understand the 
following: goal of employing the assault force and senior 
commander's concept, and the assault force mission and role in 
the upcoming battle; procedure for delivering strikes against 
the enemy in the landing area by the senior commander's assets; 
the landing procedure; conditions and procedure for coordinating 
with helicopters, artillery and units attacking from the front 
in the direction of assault force operations; duration of its 
operations in the enemy rear; from which landing sites and by 
what makeup of helicopters the landing is accomplished; and 
readiness time for the landing. 
  As a result of mission analysis, measures are outlined which 
are advisable to conduct immediately for preparing subunits to 
perform the mission. Then the commander performs a time 
calculation, issues instructions to subordinates for preparing 
subunits, weapons and military vehicles for operations as an 
assault force, and estimates the situation. 
  The following are determined in studying and estimating the 
enemy: presence of his air defense weapons in the en 
route corridor, presence of reserves and of tactical aviation 
near the landing area; possible nature of enemy actions in the 
en route corridor and in the combat operations area; strong and 
weak points of the enemy in and near the objective; nature of 
defense and security of the line (objective) to be captured 
(destroyed); direction for concentrating main company 
(battalion) efforts in taking and holding the line (destroying 
the objective); procedure for fire engagement of the enemy; 
advisable method of his destruction and alignment of the assault 
force battle formation. 
  The following are determined in estimating the 
situation and makeup of the company (battalion) and of 
attached and supporting subunits: their capabilities for 
fire engagement of the enemy during and after the landing; 
capabilities of the helicopter subunit (unit) assigned for the 
landing; makeup of elements of the battle formation and missions 
for subunits; which subunits are to board helicopters in what 
order and at what sites and land from them in the landing area; 
combat formation in flight and so on. 
  As a result of an estimate of the situation, makeup and 
nature of operations of units (subunits) attacking in the 
direction of the company (battalion) landing, the following are 
outlined: procedure for maintaining communications, time of 
their movement to the assault force and capability for 
supporting battle; linkup points, cessation of fire and 
procedure for joint operations; coordination and recognition 
signals. 
  As a result of an estimate of the nature of 
terrain in the landing area and in the area of assault 
force operations, the following are determined: presence and 
status of helicopter landing sites; direction for concentrating 
company (battalion) main efforts in capturing the objective; 
terrain sectors on whose holding stability depends in case of 
their defense; lines desirable for subunits to take in an 
assault on the objective and the trace of strongpoints in its 
defense, and also maskirovka conditions. 
  In estimating the NBC situation, the commander 
outlines measures ensuring successful subunit operations with 
use of mass destruction weapons. 
  The effect of weather, time of year and time of day on 
assault force operations also are taken into account in the 
course of estimating the situation. 
  The decision is made as a result of the mission analysis and 
situation estimate, and after the calculation is made for 
boarding (loading) helicopters, missions are assigned to 
subunits and then coordination is organized. Then the company 
commander (battalion staff) draws up the plan for loading 
weapons and vehicles and boarding personnel, and a list of 
weapons and supplies for each helicopter. In planning the 
landing, the time calculation is made from the established time 
(H)--beginning of the landing of the assault force advance party. 
  In his decision the company (battalion) commander 
usually specifies the following: commander's concept (on what to 
concentrate main efforts of the assault force; what enemy to 
capture or destroy where, in what sequence and how, with an 
indication of the procedure for fire engagement and measures for 
his deception); battle formation and landing procedure; what 
subunits board (load) helicopters at what sites, and at what 
landing sites they disembark (unload) in the landing area; 
combat missions for subunits; basic coordination questions; and 
organization of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  In assigning the mission for the landing to subunits the 
company (battalion) commander indicates the following in 
the operation order: 

  -  for first echelon subunits--means of 
reinforcement, combat mission, who is supporting, and numbers 
(quantity) of helicopters and landing sites; 
  -  for second echelon subunit--makeup, combat mission, 
who is attached and who is supporting, numbers of helicopters 
and landing sites; 
  -  for the reserve--makeup, concentration area, nature 
of possible missions after landing, numbers of helicopters and 
landing sites; 
  -  for the advance party--makeup, combat mission, who 
is supporting, numbers of helicopters, time of landing; 
  -  for artillery subunit and other weapons--missions 
for supporting battle of the assault force, numbers of 
helicopters and of landing sites; 
  -  for air defense 
subunit--procedure for conducting fire in repelling enemy 
air raids, numbers of helicopters and of landing sites. 


    If the landing area is a considerable distance from the line 
(objective) for capture (destruction), the commander may give 
subunits a route (direction) of forward movement and lines of 
deployment and departure at which they must arrive by the 
established time. 
  In organizing coordination, initially the 
procedure for forward movement of subunits to the marshaling 
area and their boarding of helicopters is worked out, then the 
landing procedure. Here special attention should be given to 
questions of joint operations of assault force subunits and 
aviation for fire engagement of the enemy during the airlift. 
Coordination is organized in greater detail for the assault 
force's performance of the immediate mission. 
  The assault landing is the airlift of the assault force into 
the enemy rear for performing the combat mission. It includes 
takeoff of the helicopter subunit (unit), the combat flight and 
landing of helicopters with subsequent disembarking of personnel 
and unloading of equipment at landing sites. 
  Before the assault landing, the company (battalion) moves 
into the marshaling area at the established time. It is disposed 
in it using natural cover and carefully camouflages itself. 
Commanders check subunit readiness for boarding (loading) of 
helicopters in accordance with the calculation. 
  With the helicopters' arrival at the landing sites the 
commander of the assault force and commander of the helicopter 
subunit (unit) update the calculation for the assault landing; 
procedure for loading weapons, military vehicles and supplies 
and boarding of helicopters by personnel; landing sites in 
primary and alternate landing areas; combat formation in flight; 
and procedure for coordination of motorized rifle and helicopter 
subunits in flight and when disembarking. All these questions 
also can be resolved with the helicopter subunit (unit) 
commander before the helicopters arrive in order to reduce the 
time they are at the landing site. 
  Preparation, loading and securing of weapons, vehicles and 
supplies are done by subunit personnel under the direction of 
helicopter crews. Personnel board helicopters immediately before 
takeoff and finish boarding before helicopter engines are 
started. 
  Fire and nuclear damage and EW suppression of enemy air 
defense and of his troops in the en route corridor and in and 
near the landing area are carried out before the beginning of 
the landing and in its course. 
  The assault landing begins at a signal of the commander 
employing the assault force, and responsibility for its 
disembarking at the prescribed time and in the designated area 
is borne by the helicopter subunit (unit) commander. 
  The combat flight to the landing area usually is made as one 
formation in trail. Helicopters with the advance party fly ahead 
of the main body at a 1020 minute interval. As a rule, 
helicopters with motorized rifle subunits fly at the head of the 
assault force main body, and helicopters with artillery subunits 
behind them. The company (battalion) commander is with the 
helicopter subunit (unit) commander in flight. 
  Escort gunships, and sometimes also escort transport-gunship 
helicopters are used to neutralize the enemy and his air defense 
weapons in the en route corridor. Proceeding in front of and on 
flanks of the formation in trail with the assault force, they 
conduct fire against the enemy from on-board weapons, and 
assault force subunits do so with small arms. On approaching a 
zone of contamination, small windows, hatches and doors in 
helicopters are closed, cabin heating and ventilation systems 
are turned off and the personnel put on breathing masks 
(protective masks). 
  When the advance party approaches the landing site, the 
enemy 
there is neutralized and destroyed by fire of helicopter weapons 
and the party's small arms, and motorized riflemen are landed. 
After this the helicopters support the party's battle by fire 
from the air and together with it support the landing of the 
assault force main body. 
  Air defense subunits of the advance party take up launch 
(firing) positions in readiness to combat the air enemy, and at 
this time combat engineers reconnoiter landing sites and remove 
or mark obstacles and local objects hindering the landing of 
helicopters. 
  The patrol squad (reconnaissance, combat reconnaissance 
patrol) conducts reconnaissance in the direction of company 
(battalion) operations and updates the enemy makeup and 
position. Chemical warfare personnel conduct radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance. 
  Based on data received from the advance party, from 
reconnaissance and from other sources, the company (battalion) 
commander may update the procedure for unloading (disembarking) 
if necessary with the main body's landing approach to the 
landing area. The main body disembarks under cover of air and 
combat helicopter strikes and the fire of artillery and the 
advance party. Artillery subunits take up firing positions and 
conduct fire against observed targets, then perform missions of 
support to the subunits. After disembarking the company 
(battalion) commander updates missions for subunits on the 
terrain or assigns new ones, issues coordination instructions 
and controls their battle. 
  The assault force must be disembarked in a short time; this 
is done directly on or near the objective or on approaches to it 
depending on the situation. 
  When disembarking on approaches, the assault force's forward 
movement to the objective to be captured (destroyed) must be 
covert and quick, usually in approach march formation under 
cover of security elements. With its arrival at the designated 
objective, the assault force deploys into battle formation from 
the move, decisively assaults the enemy flank and rear, destroys 
(disables) his installation and moves to a new objective or to 
an assembly point (area). 
  With the capture of an important line (area), the 
assault force shifts to a defense and holds it until the 
approach of friendly troops. It must be a perimeter defense and 
ensure repulse of an enemy attack delivered from several 
directions simultaneously. The dimensions of the company 
strongpoint (battalion defense area) are the very same as and 
sometimes even larger than for defense under ordinary conditions. 
  If a mission of delivering strikes against a forward 
moving reserve of the enemy is being executed, the assault 
force should move to its likely routes of forward movement, 
occupy a favorable line and from there deliver a surprise fire 
strike against the flank, making wide use of fire ambushes. This 
mission should be performed in coordination with combat 
helicopters and friendly subunits (units) attacking from the 
front or conducting a defense. 
  In performing the mission of destroying (disabling) 
ground elements of a reconnaissance-strike complex and means of 
nuclear and chemical attack, the assault force covertly 
moves forward to their disposition, destroys covering-force 
subunits by a determined assault from the move and puts the 
installations out of commission. 
  If it is to capture nuclear mines emplaced in 
wells, the assault force destroys the enemy near them, occupies 
a favorable line and supports actions of combat engineer 
subunits to disarm the nuclear mines. 
  With the capture of hydraulic engineering works, 
bridges, crossings, crossing equipment or sectors 
convenient for forcing, the assault force moves up to the 
designated objective after disembarking, captures it by an 
assault on the enemy on one or both banks and holds it until the 
approach of friendly units. 
  To capture a pass the assault force lands near it 
and takes the adjoining commanding heights. Then it moves to the 
enemy's flank and rear and seizes the pass after destroying him. 
To take a gap the assault force lands at its entrance, takes 
commanding heights, and seals off and destroys the enemy. 
  In performing combat missions, the assault force's actions 
must be daring, determined and distinguished by high mobility, 
activeness and boldness. The enemy must be destroyed before he 
manages to organize resistance, with weapons used skillfully in 
the process. 
<H5>  12. Battalion in Amphibious Assault Force </H5>
  An assault force[.sup]5[/], in which an MRB (TB) may 
operate as a forward detachment or as part of the assault force 
main body, is landed to capture an island or the opposite shore 
of a strait. The purpose of detachment operations is to support 
the landing of the assault force main body on the coast, and 
that of a battalion in the main body is to destroy the enemy and 
seize a beachhead. 
  The battalion may operate independently as an assault force 
when our troops attack along the coast. The capture and holding 
of important coastal objectives (sectors), assistance to units 
and formations in penetrating a defense, disruption of enemy 
lines of communication, and prohibition of the approach of his 
reserves and withdrawal of units along the coast are the goals 
in employing such an assault force. The Azov and Danube naval 
flotillas made 38 assault landings to fulfill these objectives 
in just the second and third period of the Great Patriotic War. 
  The assault force usually is sealifted at night or under 
other conditions of limited visibility. 
  During the Great Patriotic War all assault forces were 
sealifted and landed at night or at dawn. The landing of an 
assault force during the day as a rule was forced. 
  A battalion is assigned a waiting area [rayon ozhidaniya] 
and 
a primary and alternate embarkation (loading) point for boarding 
and a primary and alternate landing beach (offloading point) up 
to 2 km wide for landing. 
  A waiting area is designated for preparing subunits for 
operations. A battalion is disposed in this area by company with 
means of reinforcement, with measures taken for protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons and with 
consideration for moving out to embark (load). Depending on the 
situation, an assault force may arrive at the embarkation 
(loading) point several minutes before assault transport 
vehicles depart without entering a waiting area. 
  A battalion is given a combat mission, which usually is 
divided into the immediate and subsequent mission. Thus, the 
immediate mission of a battalion operating in a forward 
detachment is to capture a landing beach and the subsequent 
mission is to hold it and support the main body's landing. When 
operating as part of the main body, the content of missions 
basically is the very same as when attacking a defending enemy. 
When a battalion operates independently in an assault force, the 
content of the immediate mission may be to destroy the enemy at 
the landing beach and take a coastal objective (line), and the 
subsequent mission may be to hold it until the approach of units 
attacking along the seacoast. 
  To ensure greater independence in performing the mission, a 
battalion is reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and 
special troops as when attacking a defending enemy. Increased 
reserves of supplies, especially ammunition, are established in 
subunits and it is desirable to reinforce the battalion aid 
station with medical personnel and means for giving medical aid 
to wounded and sick. 
  The amphibious task force, which includes assault transport 
vehicles, fire support ships and covering forces, is designated 
for landing the assault force. 
  After receiving the mission, the battalion commander 
analyzes 
it. In so doing he analyzes missions of the assault force and of 
his battalion and the senior commander's concept, especially 
targets (objectives) to be destroyed (engaged) by the senior 
commander's assets during the landing and battle in the 
beachhead, forces and assets assigned for the landing, the 
mission of an airborne assault force if it is landed, the 
procedure for coordinating with it, with aviation and with the 
amphibious task force, and readiness time for the landing. 
  In the course of the situation estimate the battalion 
commander determines and clarifies the following: nature of the 
antilanding defense, presence of obstacles in the water and on 
shore and methods of negotiating them; objectives to be 
destroyed (neutralized) in the period of fire preparation and 
support of the landing; combat capabilities of the assault force 
and of allocated assault transport vehicles and the possible 
distribution of subunits to them. The following are outlined and 
updated in addition: place and procedure for boarding (loading) 
the assault force; advisable method of operations in conducting 
battle at the landing beach; nature of terrain, battle formation 
and missions of subunits ashore; meteorological conditions 
during the sealift and at the landing beach (offloading point). 
  If the assault force is being landed in support of troops 
attacking along the coast, then missions of units moving to link 
up with the assault force and conditions of coordination with 
them also are analyzed. 
  A decision is made as a result of the combat mission 
analysis, the situation estimate and the calculations performed. 
In addition to the usual questions covered in organizing an 
attack, it spells out subunit missions for destroying the enemy 
at the landing beach (offloading point) and in the onshore area, 
distribution of organic subunits and means of reinforcement to 
the assault transport vehicles and the sequence of their 
boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading). 
  In assigning missions to subunits the battalion commander 
usually indicates the following in the operation 
order: 

  -  for companies--means of reinforcement, missions 
for destroying the enemy at the landing beach and during 
subsequent operations, landing places, assault transport 
vehicles for the sealift, and boarding (loading) and 
disembarking (unloading) sequence; 
  -  for artillery subunits and other weapons--missions 
for supporting the battle ashore, places in assault transport 
vehicles, and boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading) 
sequence; 
  -  for the air defense subunit--missions for covering 
the battalion against enemy air strikes during the sealift and 
after the landing, places in assault transport vehicles and 
boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading) sequence. 


    Coordination is organized by the battalion 
commander from a map and on a terrain model. The procedure for 
moving out and boarding (loading) assault transport vehicles may 
be worked out directly on the terrain. 
  In organizing coordination the commander gives primary 
attention to coordinating subunit actions in negotiating 
antilanding obstacles, seizing the landing beach (offloading 
point), and in the battle ashore, and to coordinating their 
actions with ship gun fire, air strikes and operations of an 
airborne assault force if one is landed. 
  Preparing the battalion for the landing usually includes 
drilling its subunits for embarking (loading) and disembarking 
(unloading) and drilling obstacle clearing parties of the 
amphibious task force and assault force in breaching antilanding 
obstacles. Based on war experience, it is also necessary to 
drill subunits in fighting to capture a beach with consideration 
of the antilanding defense and nature of terrain at the landing 
beach and preparation of weapons, vehicles and supplies for 
loading and unloading as well as preparation of tanks, 
amphibious vehicles and assault transport vehicles for crossing 
a water obstacle under their own power. 
  The battalion usually moves out to the embarkation (loading) 
point from the waiting area in company columns with means of 
reinforcement. Rear subunits proceed in front, then reserve 
(second echelon) subunits, the staff, and first echelon 
subunits. The sequence of loading weapons and military vehicles 
on assault transport vehicles must be in reverse of the order of 
their unloading with consideration of fighting ashore. Personnel 
board after equipment and supplies have been loaded. 
  The battalion commander is resubordinated to the commander 
of 
the ship on which the battalion is being sealifted from the 
moment the order is received for boarding (loading) until the 
end of disembarking (unloading). 
  The battalion commander's COP during boarding (loading) is 
near the amphibious task force C[.sup]2[/] facility if it is 
located ashore. During the sealift, C[.sup]2[/] of the 
battalion is exercised through the commander of the amphibious 
task force. The battalion commander and chief of staff usually 
are on different ships with the commander and chief of staff of 
the amphibious task force. The battalion commander controls his 
own forces and assets on arriving ashore. An embarkation point 
commander is appointed for directing the boarding (loading) and 
for maintaining order. 
  During the sealift the battalion is covered from the air and 
from enemy strikes from the sea by covering (escort) and support 
ships. 
  During battalion operations in a forward detachment or as an 
independent assault force (when our troops are attacking along 
the coast), as the assault transport vehicles approach the 
landing beach (offloading point) the battalion commander updates 
for subunits the places and procedure for landing and missions 
ashore. Missions for neutralizing the antilanding defense also 
are updated for weapons. After making ready to land, assault 
force personnel release vehicles from fastenings and place 
weapons in readiness. 
  As a rule, a battalion lands as one echelon, and amphibious 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) with motorized rifle subunits proceed in 
the first waves. Reforming of assault transport vehicles from 
cruising to battle formation ends when the first wave approaches 
the starting line. This line is designated at a distance from 
shore precluding conduct of fire against assault transport 
vehicles by enemy weapons moved up for direct fire. 
  Battalion subunits move up to the landing beach under cover 
of air strikes and the fire of ship guns and battalion weapons 
and taking advantage of passages breached in obstacles. 
Amphibious tanks and BMP's (BTR's) usually are launched before 
the landing ships approach the landing beach, and proceed to 
shore under their own power. Landing ships (fast assault landing 
craft) move behind the amphibious tanks and BMP's (BTR's) and 
land subunits on shore (or in the water when it is no more than 
one meter deep). Nonamphibious vehicles may be unloaded at 
places where the depth and bottom permit them to proceed under 
their own power. 
  An assault landing party consisting of up to a reinforced 
MRC 
may be assigned from the battalion. Taking advantage of air 
strikes and ship gun fire, it comes ashore, assaults the enemy 
at the landing beach and takes a line in supporting the 
battalion's landing, deployment and battle. 
  Under cover of air strikes and the fire of ship guns and its 
own weapons as well as of the assault landing party, the 
battalion main body proceeds in BMP's (BTR's) and assault 
landing craft and comes ashore. It deploys into battle formation 
from the move, launches an assault and seizes the landing beach 
to a depth supporting the landing of the assault force main 
body. Subsequently the battalion continues to fight to widen the 
beachhead in coordination with first echelon subunits of the 
assault force. 
  A battalion operating in support of troops attacking along 
the seacoast seizes a designated line (objective) and holds it 
until they approach, or it performs other missions. 
  If a battalion lands as part of the assault force main body, 
it comes ashore, exploiting success of the forward detachment. 
Under conditions where the sealift is accomplished in 
transportation assets, the battalion usually is transferred to 
landing craft with the approach to shore. After unloading, 
battalion subunits deploy into battle formation from the move 
and develop the attack into the depth in coordination with first 
echelon subunits of the assault force. A battalion attacking in 
the direction of operations of an airborne assault force 
continues performing the mission in coordination with it after 
linkup. 
  When a terrain sector ashore has been taken, some landing 
support forces may be used for fire support of the assault and 
fire accompaniment of the battalion attack in the depth, for 
covering it against enemy strikes from the sea, for evacuating 
wounded and for delivering supplies. 
<H5>  13. Attack in a City </H5>
  Conditions of an attack in the city basically are 
characterized by the density of construction of various sizes 
and types of buildings, presence of parks and squares, layout 
and width of streets, and the underground utility network. 
Cities usually are built up with large brick, stone and concrete 
buildings. Destructive damage and centers of fire will arise in 
a city as a result of use of aircraft, artillery and other 
weapons. Under these conditions the attack of a company 
(battalion) as a rule breaks down into isolated battles of 
platoons and squads for individual houses and other structures. 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits is complicated and the field of view 
and fire and the maneuver of forces and assets is restricted. 
The battle of subunits is characterized by ferocity which often 
develops into hand-to-hand fighting. 
  A successful attack is achieved only with close coordination 
of motorized rifle (tank) platoons (companies) maintained with 
subunits of other combat arms and special troops. For this, tank 
subunits and the bulk of artillery subunits are attached to 
motorized rifle squads, platoons and companies. 
  Helicopters and flame weapons will find wide use in street 
fighting. Direct fire, including of large caliber guns, is the 
most effective fire. Mortars can destroy the enemy successfully 
in courtyards, behind various cover, and within blocks, and 
artillery can engage his artillery and reserves from indirect 
positions. A company (battalion) attack in the city is 
characterized by a successive fight to take individual 
strongpoints, buildings and blocks. 
  The company (battalion) attack frontage will be less than 
under ordinary conditions, since a battle in the city is 
conducted along streets and in buildings, and in the latter case 
on all floors and in basements successively or simultaneously. 
It is advisable for a company to advance along one street with 
the adjoining houses or within a block, and for a battalion to 
advance along one or two parallel streets with adjoining blocks; 
frontage may reach 1,000 m in this case. A combat mission is 
assigned to the company (battalion) based on objectives and 
blocks, and to a lesser depth than on open terrain. 
  As shown by war experience, cities usually were captured 
from 
the move in the course of developing an attack, but when a city 
failed to be taken from the move, an assault on it was organized. 
  In attacking a city from the move the content of the 
company's immediate mission and of the battalion's immediate and 
subsequent missions may be the very same as under ordinary 
conditions. But as a result of the execution of missions the 
battalion must take important objectives on approaches to the 
city and within the city itself. In an assault on a city the 
company's immediate mission is to take a building (or part of a 
large building or several small buildings) in the enemy 
strongpoint. The battalion immediate mission may consist of 
capturing a strongpoint or one and sometimes two or three 
blocks. The content of its subsequent mission is to take 
important objectives (blocks) in the depth of the enemy defense. 
  Assault teams and detachments are formed to capture large 
city structures prepared for defense. An MRC usually is the 
basis of a team and a battalion the basis of an assault 
detachment. There may be 2-3 assault teams and a reserve in a 
detachment. 
  Teams and detachments include artillery, tanks, mortars, 
ATGM's, flamethrowers and grenade launchers and they also are 
supplied with demolition charges, with incendiary, smoke and 
signaling devices, and with devices for assaulting buildings and 
negotiating obstacles. 
  For example, in the assault on the city of Gdynia (March 
1945), assault detachments were formed with a strength of up to 
an MRB reinforced by a tank company, SP artillery battery, 76-mm 
gun battalion, 155-mm howitzer battery, M-13 rocket artillery 
platoon and from a platoon to a company of combat 
engineers.[.sup]6[/] 
  In organizing the attack, the company (battalion) commander 
estimates the nature of the defense and enemy system of fire on 
approaches to and within the city and studies the direction and 
width of streets and disposition of structures whose capture 
will disrupt stability of the defense. As a result of this the 
commander specifies methods for fire engagement of the enemy and 
capture of objectives and the number, makeup, combat missions 
and battle formation of assault teams. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
works out the procedure of the assault on the enemy and the 
assault on buildings and determines the place of tanks, guns, 
ATGM's and other weapons in the battle formation of subunits and 
the procedure for coordination among them and for communications 
and recognition. All commanders usually are supplied with large- 
scale maps or aerial photos (street maps). 
  In capturing a city from the move, artillery and aircraft 
inflict fire damage on the enemy in strongpoints on city 
approaches and outskirts. When subunits arrive at the outskirts, 
artillery transfers fire against buildings and shelters in enemy 
strongpoints and neutralizes artillery and reserves. Subunits 
burst into the city from the move, exploiting results of fire 
damage and weakly defended places and gaps in the defense. The 
attack is conducted along streets and through courtyards, and 
subunits take buildings and blocks. Buildings or parts of 
buildings which have not been captured are sealed off, blinding 
smoke screens are laid down and flanks and rear are covered. 
  Some platoons may advance through courtyards and gardens and 
along both sides of the street in an envelopment of buildings, 
while one platoon with tanks, ATGM's, artillery and BMP's 
(BTR's) advances along the street. Advancing along sidewalks, 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) fire on the enemy in buildings on the 
opposite side of the street. Motorized riflemen advancing to the 
right and left of the tanks and BMP's (BTR's) fire against lower 
floors, and motorized riflemen advancing directly behind the 
fighting vehicles fire against upper floors of buildings. 
  Actions of an assault team (detachment) may be as follows: 
in 
the period of fire preparation of the assault its tanks, guns 
and flamethrowers destroy the enemy in the building being 
assaulted and in adjacent buildings. Taking advantage of 
breaches in walls, underground utilities, communication tunnels, 
pedestrian subways and other concealed approaches, motorized 
riflemen move up to the objective and burst into the building 
under cover of fire from all weapons. Stairwells, entrances, 
exits, and passages within the building should be taken first of 
all, which will permit splitting the enemy and destroying him in 
detail. 
  Operations in a building must be bold, daring and 
determined; 
the enemy must be destroyed with grenades and point-blank fire 
and floors cleared simultaneously or successively. Combat 
engineer subunits clear mines, breach obstacles and if necessary 
demolish structures. 
  The actions of Stalingrad's fighters teach us: "Burst into a 
building together--you and a grenade; both be dressed light--you 
without a combat field pack and the grenade without a jacket; 
burst in with the grenade in front and you behind; go through 
the entire building, again with a grenade--grenade in front and 
you right after."[.sup]7[/] 
  A company (battalion) commander should keep a watchful eye 
on 
the situation and development of battle and be ready to support 
platoons (companies) by fire. Radio and signaling devices are 
the basic means of communication. 
<H5>  14. Attack Under Special Conditions </H5>
  Attack in the mountains. The following exert 
considerable influence on conduct of an attack by a company 
(battalion) in the mountains: ruggedness of relief and abundance 
of dead ground and concealed approaches, which hamper 
orientation, observation and use of weapons; predominance of 
rocky soils and possible landslides and roadblocks; difficulty 
of using engineer vehicles, including mineclearing devices; poor 
road network and difficulty of off-road movement; shielding 
effect of mountains on operation of radios, radars and sound 
ranging equipment; and abrupt weather changes in the course of a 
24 hour period. When tanks and BMP's (BTR's) are on upgrades, 
downgrades and slopes, their capabilities of conducting fire are 
reduced considerably, especially against targets located higher. 
  Fuel consumption and wear and tear on vehicles increase in 
the mountains and vehicle power drops at high altitudes. Rivers 
exert a substantial influence with their narrow valleys, steep, 
precipitous banks and rocky beds, which hampers crossing them. 
  Based on that nature of terrain, an attack in the mountains 
usually is conducted along hillslopes, roads, valleys, ridges 
and other possible axes, with wide use of close and deep 
envelopments for concealed movement to enemy flanks and rear in 
order to capture commanding heights, passes and other important 
objectives. Taking these objectives creates favorable conditions 
for developing the attack. The features of mountainous terrain 
also facilitate infiltration of small subunits into the enemy 
rear in places where he least expects them. Deep envelopment, 
infiltration and movement to the enemy rear even by small forces 
produce a significant result. 
  A company (battalion) may attack as part of the main body, 
it 
may attack independently in isolation from it on a separate 
axis, or it may operate in an enveloping detachment. 
  When attacking as part of the main body, a company is given 
an immediate mission and the battalion is given an immediate and 
subsequent mission. In addition, they are assigned a direction 
for continuing the attack. The content of missions is affected 
above all by the nature of the enemy defense and of the terrain 
objective he occupies. On armor terrain, the content of company 
(battalion) missions basically is the very same as when 
attacking a defending enemy under ordinary conditions. When 
attacking on rugged terrain against a defense with engineer 
development, the content of the battalion's immediate mission 
may be to destroy the enemy in platoon strongpoints and the 
subsequent mission to destroy him in coordination with adjacent 
subunits in a company strongpoint and take the strongpoint. In 
addition to destroying the enemy, the content of missions 
usually also includes taking a particular objective (hill, pass, 
gorge and so on). 
  When a company (battalion) attacks on an independent axis, 
it 
usually is given an immediate mission and direction for 
continuing the attack. The content of the mission is to defeat 
the enemy in a platoon (company) strongpoint covering this axis. 
The direction for continuing the attack must ensure the 
company's (battalion's) move to enemy flanks and rear to deliver 
a strike against him in coordination with the main body 
attacking from the front. 
  If a company (battalion) has been assigned to an enveloping 
detachment, it is assigned the mission of capturing a tactically 
important line (objective), the taking of which creates 
favorable conditions for the main body's successful attack. 
Sometimes the detachment will perform its mission in 
coordination with a tactical airborne assault force (air assault 
subunits). 
  The attack frontage of subunits may change considerably 
depending on the nature of terrain. In connection with this, the 
battle formation is formed deeper in operations along narrow 
valleys: as a rule, the company in two echelons and the 
battalion sometimes even in three echelons. 
  A company (battalion) attacking on an individual axis or in 
an enveloping detachment usually is reinforced by artillery, AT 
weapons, and combat engineer and other subunits and supported by 
the main body's artillery and by helicopter strikes. Subunits 
are supplied with mountain gear for operations in high mountain 
areas. 
  In organizing an attack in the mountains, the company 
(battalion) commander additionally studies the system of fire in 
all tiers and terrain accessibility and determines favorable 
directions for operations of combat arms subunits and for making 
deep and close envelopments. He also outlines measures for 
covering flanks and rear and for orientation, and also possible 
enemy ambush sites. 
  The following are specified in the decision in addition to 
the usual questions: procedure for capturing passes, tunnels, 
gorges and other important objectives; missions of subunits 
making a deep (close) envelopment and the procedure for their 
coordination with subunits attacking from the front or with a 
tactical airborne assault force; and measures for covering 
flanks and destroying enemy ambushes. Measures for orientation, 
maintaining direction, marking the position of attacking 
subunits and protecting against landslides, avalanches and 
mudflows, and the procedure for providing subunits with 
necessary mountain gear also are outlined. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
pays special attention to coordinating the operations of 
subunits making a deep (close) envelopment with those attacking 
from the front. Operations of artillery and assaulting subunits 
are coordinated for taking important objectives in the course of 
the attack. 
  As a rule, an attack is made from a position of direct 
contact with the enemy. Artillery destroys and neutralizes the 
enemy in all tiers in the periods of fire preparation and fire 
support of the assault. The enemy is engaged in the lower tier 
basically by direct fire of artillery, tanks and ATGM's; in the 
second tier by artillery and mortar fire; and in subsequent 
tiers by helicopter strikes. Strongpoints adjoining axes of 
attack by subunits are neutralized with greatest fire density. 
Mortars, howitzer artillery and helicopters are used to engage 
the enemy on reverse slopes. 
  Motorized rifle subunits assault in dismounted formation on 
rugged terrain. Tanks may operate in or behind the extended line 
of motorized riflemen, with BMP's (BTR's) behind the tanks, and 
by their fire destroy the enemy hampering the advance of 
attacking subunits. Air defense subunits displace behind the 
attackers in readiness to repel enemy helicopter strikes, 
especially from low altitudes. On encountering obstacles, 
motorized riflemen negotiate them together with combat engineer 
subunits under cover of artillery and tank fire, supporting the 
tanks' advance. 
  In attacking along a narrow mountain valley, it is necessary 
above all to take adjoining hills, which will ensure that the 
valley is covered by fire. Successful destruction of the enemy 
is achieved by coordinated operations of combat arms subunits 
attacking along the hills and along the valley. In assaulting 
the enemy defending a hill with a tiered system of fire, when 
subunits approach the hill artillery transfers fire against 
enemy weapons in upper tiers and on the flanks. It is advisable 
to assault the enemy from different directions, i.e., from the 
front, the flanks and the rear. 
  A company (battalion) attacking from the front may take a 
mountain pass or gorge either independently or in coordination 
with an enveloping detachment, tactical airborne assault force 
and combat helicopters. Initially the hills and slopes facing 
the pass and gorge are captured. Subsequently the enemy in the 
pass or gorge is pinned down by some of the forces from the 
captured line and destroyed by a strike of the main body against 
the flank and rear. Pass approaches, gorge entrances and exits 
and other important objectives are carefully guarded. 
  Canyons usually are negotiated by subunits from the move 
along captured passages. If the passage fails to be taken from 
the move, dismounted motorized riflemen seize it by an assault 
against the flank and rear supported by artillery and tank fire 
after a deep envelopment of the enemy. When an enemy defending a 
passage has failed to be enveloped, capture of the passage is 
organized by an assault from the front in close interworking of 
subunits of all combat arms and special troops. 
  A company (battalion) assigned to an enveloping detachment 
as 
a rule attacks in dismounted formation. Taking advantage of 
concealed approaches and gaps in the defense, the detachment 
decisively penetrates into its depth and seizes hills adjoining 
the objective (pass, mountain gap, and so on). Subsequently it 
takes the objective by assaulting the enemy in the flank and 
rear independently, in coordination with subunits attacking from 
the front, or in coordination with a tactical airborne assault 
force. 
  In an attack in the mountains the company (battalion) 
commander pays special attention to reconnoitering the enemy and 
securing the flanks. Reconnaissance is conducted by a larger 
number of observation posts, observers, patrol squads and 
reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrols than under 
ordinary conditions. Exposed flanks of the company (battalion) 
are secured by forming an echelon battle formation of platoons 
(companies), by conducting reconnaissance and observation, and 
by readiness of the second echelon (reserve) for a maneuver 
toward the flanks. 
  The company (battalion) COP and technical support and rear 
subunits come up closer to first echelon subunits. 
  An attack in the forest is one of the most 
difficult. The following affect conduct of the attack: terrain 
affording concealment with the presence of marshy sectors; 
limited number of roads; possibility of the enemy creating 
abatis in combination with mines, of the outbreak of fires and 
of the lengthy persistence of chemical agents. All this hampers 
observation, target designation, maneuver of combat vehicles, 
fire adjustment, coordination among subunits and their 
C[.sup]2[/]. 
  The limited nature of sectors of fire and difficulty of 
subunit operations on a continuous front increase the importance 
of independent squad, platoon and company operations. In a 
forest battle the role of commanders' initiative at all levels, 
surprise, and decisive actions of subunits and even of 
individual motorized riflemen grows, since the battle is fought 
basically at close ranges. 
  To achieve close coordination among combat arms subunits it 
is advisable to attach a TC and mortar (artillery) battery by 
platoon and a grenade launcher and AT subunits by squad to MRC's 
(MRP's). This also ensures their conduct of independent combat 
operations. Smoke assets are successfully employed in the forest. 
  An attack in the forest is conducted along axes, primarily 
along roads and openings, in combination with close and deep 
envelopments. A move even of small subunits to the flank and 
rear may disorganize the enemy defense. 
  A company (battalion) may attack as part of the main body or 
independently in an enveloping detachment. It is assigned a 
combat mission to a lesser depth and the mission content usually 
includes taking objectives (openings, forest crossroads, 
drainage canals, defiles and so on). The position of subunits in 
the battle formation changes more often in the course of an 
attack than under ordinary conditions. This is [caused] by the 
need to secure exposed flanks and the rear. 
  In organizing an attack, in addition to the usual questions 
the company (battalion) commander determines the following: 
azimuth of attack for subunits and measures for orientation and 
mutual recognition; procedure for negotiating abatis, other 
obstacles and sectors difficult to negotiate; procedure for 
putting out fires and directions for bypassing them; procedure 
for destroying the enemy left in the rear and for conducting 
fire from trees. The second echelon (reserve) may be used to 
destroy the enemy left in the rear, and snipers and assault 
riflemen should be assigned in platoons to destroy the enemy 
firing from trees. 
  As a rule the commander makes the decision and assigns 
missions from a map. In organizing coordination the company 
(battalion) commander coordinates in detail the actions of 
subunits attacking from the front and making a close (deep) 
envelopment to capture road junctions, openings, defiles between 
lakes and other important objectives. Attention also is given to 
rehearsing questions of ensuring reliable orientation, 
maintaining the direction of attack, target designation, and 
marking of the lines reached. 
  When the enemy FEBA runs along the treeline, the company 
(battalion) begins the assault by capturing forest salients. 
Subsequently a strike is delivered against the flank and rear to 
destroy the enemy in strongpoints and advance swiftly into the 
depth. 
  In the depth of the forest the enemy is assaulted on a 
narrower front and from closer range after his fire damage. 
Felled areas and glades are bypassed, since the enemy usually 
arranges fire ambushes in them. Necessary forces and assets are 
assigned for making a deep (close) envelopment and an assault 
against the flank and rear of enemy strongpoints. Motorized 
rifle subunits usually assault the enemy in dismounted 
formation, and tanks proceed in or immediately behind the 
riflemen's extended line. BMP's (BTR's) operate behind the tanks 
and support the advance of attacking subunits by their fire. 
Under cover of weapons, combat engineer subunits breach abatis 
and other obstacles and support their negotiation by motorized 
riflemen and tanks. Sometimes tanks and BMP's (BTR's) are used 
to reduce an abatis. Motor vehicles of motorized rifle subunits 
displace behind the battalion second echelon in a battalion 
column. 
  Enemy strongpoints covering crossroads, glades and other 
objectives are captured by an assault against the flank and rear 
in coordination with subunits attacking from the front. 
  During a battle in the depth of the forest one should not 
allow vehicles and subunits to concentrate on roads, in glades 
and in open terrain sectors, since these objectives usually are 
registered by artillery and may be engaged by enemy aircraft. In 
conducting an attack in the forest subunits constantly must be 
ready to conduct fire, they must advance swiftly, conduct 
observation continuously, employ grenades skillfully, beef up 
security from flanks and rear, send out foot patrols and conduct 
reconnaissance. 
  It is advisable for the second echelon (reserve) to displace 
in approach march formation and be closer to the assaulting 
subunits. COP's are brought closer to first echelon subunits; 
technical support and rear subunits are brought closer to battle 
formations of the companies and as a rule are disposed near 
roads and openings. 
  On emerging from the forest, subunits draw up to its edge 
and 
assume battle formation as under ordinary conditions. Guns and 
platoons operating separately join their batteries, 
C[.sup]2[/] of artillery and tanks may be centralized, and 
thorough reconnaissance is conducted. 
  In an attack in the desert (Diagram 17) it is 
necessary to take the effect of its diverse natural conditions 
into account. Open relief, an almost total absence of built-up 
areas and of clear-cut reference points, and poor road networks 
hamper orientation, target designation and maskirovka. The 
presence of rocky terrain sectors difficult of access and with 
inland sand dunes, moist solonchaks, the shortage or total 
absence of water, and the extremely sparse vegetation noticeably 
reduce the cross-country capability of vehicles and maneuver of 
subunits on a number of axes and complicate the supply of water 
and fuel. Sharp temperature fluctuations during a 24 hour period 
have a negative effect on personnel, and sand, sandstorms and 
sandy dust hamper observation and conduct of fire to long ranges 
and degrade C[.sup]2[/] of subunits. Sandy dust also has a 
negative effect on operation of weapons, engines and vehicle 
running gear. Mirages appear after sunrise on sultry days, 
distorting the appearance and nature of reference points, 
hampering a determination of distance and leading to a sharp 
deterioration in orientation. Certain desert areas may be 
unfavorable from a sanitation-epidemic standpoint. This will 
require taking preventive measures against possible sickness of 
personnel. 
  In the desert an attack usually is launched from the move 
and 
conducted across a broad front, off the roads, and along 
scattered axes basically to capture and hold vital areas, oases 
and water sources. The absence of a continuous front in the 
enemy defense and the possibility of accomplishing a wide 
maneuver create favorable conditions for delivering strikes 
against his flank and rear. It is advisable to concentrate basic 
company (battalion) efforts on an axis leading to important 
areas and objectives. The effect of high temperature is reduced, 
maskirovka is ensured and surprise of operations is achieved 
when night falls. The night also can be used for executing a 
maneuver with subsequent delivery of a strike against the enemy 
at dawn. 
  A company (battalion) performs missions as part of the main 
body, independently, or operating in an enveloping detachment; 
and the battalion in addition does so on a separate axis or in a 
raiding detachment. The company (battalion) attack frontage and 
combat missions during operations as part of the main body are 
the very same as under ordinary conditions. If a battalion is to 
operate on an independent axis, then its attack frontage as a 
rule will be wider and the combat mission is assigned to a 
greater depth than when it is employed as part of the main body. 
  Enveloping (raiding) detachment missions are to destroy 
means 
of nuclear and chemical attack, ground elements of 
reconnaissance- strike complexes, and C[.sup]2[/] facilities; 
to disorganize the enemy rear, capture oases, road junctions, 
water sources and other important objectives; and to assist 
subunits attacking from the front in encircling and destroying 
the enemy. 
  As under ordinary conditions, the company (battalion) is 
reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and special troops 
to increase independence in performing missions. The battle 
formation also is formed with consideration for covering exposed 
flanks. This is achieved by conducting intensified 
reconnaissance, by forming the battle formation in an echelon 
right or left or assigning weapons to cover the flanks, and by 
displacing the second echelon (reserve) behind the exposed flank. 
  In organizing an attack, in addition to usual questions the 
company (battalion) commander specifies the following: azimuth 
of the direction of attack; routes for subunits to move to the 
line of departure and procedure for marking them; measures for 
maskirovka, security of flanks and rear, preparation of weapons 
and military vehicles for use during sandstorms, protection of 
personnel with abrupt changes in meteorological conditions, and 
prevention of heat strokes; procedure for supplying subunits 
with water and fuel; and measures for increasing off-road 
capability of wheeled vehicles as well as for maintaining a 
sanitary and hygienic condition at personnel locations and at 
water supply points. In organizing coordination, special 
attention should be given to coordinating actions of subunits 
for capturing key positions, oases and other important 
objectives, also including on the flanks, and to the procedure 
for securing flanks. 
  A company (battalion) launches an assault after fire 
preparation of the assault, during which strongpoints, 
individual centers of defense and C[.sup]2[/] facilities 
basically are neutralized. Guns and tanks assigned for direct 
fire as well as ATGM launchers and AT grenade launchers are 
widely used for destroying and neutralizing enemy weapons during 
fire preparation of the assault. 
  The basic methods of subunit operations in fighting in the 
depth of the enemy defense are to make a deep and close 
envelopment, deliver strikes against him from the flank and rear 
and with a portion of the forces from the front, break up the 
enemy and destroy him in detail, and make a determined advance 
into the depth to capture important objectives. 
  The aid station is brought closer to first echelon subunits, 
and other logistic support points are brought closer to the 
battalion battle formation, especially when it operates on a 
separate axis. 
  Attack in northern areas and in winter. In 
organizing and conducting an attack in northern areas, one must 
take into account the effect of abundant boulders and talus and 
of vast areas of tundra terrain, marshy forest-tundra, wooded 
terrain, and on some axes also mountainous terrain with a large 
number of lakes. Northern areas also are characterized by an 
extremely limited network of roads and axes accessible for 
subunit operations, a severe climate with lengthy winter and 
presence of a deep snow cover, the arctic night and day, adverse 
meteorological conditions, ionospheric and geomagnetic 
perturbations disrupting normal operation of radio equipment and 
compasses (errors may be up to 15, difficulty of using 
engineer vehicles and mineclearing devices, and difficulty of 
orientation and maskirovka. 
  Good conditions are created for use of tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) with the onset of winter as a result of the bitter cold, 
which firmly binds lakes, marshes, rivers and bays. It should be 
borne in mind, however, that some lakes and marshes do not 
freeze but are merely covered with unconsolidated ice and a 
layer of snow. 
  Blizzards, fog and night help execute a covert maneuver and 
close with the enemy, but with greater expenditure of time than 
in the summer. In some places the snow cover may reach more than 
50 cm, which limits and sometimes even precludes the movement of 
subunits in the absence of a hard snow crust. Frequent blizzards 
drift up the roads and various obstacles and structures, which 
forces organization of snow-clearing in some sectors and removal 
of drifts and hummocks. At the same time, formation of a hard 
crust (upper layer) of snow in spring permits making wide 
off-road use of military vehicles. The snow cover changes the 
external appearance of terrain, hampers orientation, and hides 
lakes, ravines and marshes. 
  Low air temperature forces the issue of special thermal 
clothing to personnel, which to a certain extent constrains 
their actions, especially those of tank crews. In addition, time 
periods for preparing vehicles for operations are increased and 
their maintenance becomes more complicated. Steps must be taken 
against frostbite of personnel. They are equipped with white 
camouflage robes and helmets, and combat vehicles and other 
weapons are painted white. 
  As a rule an attack is launched from a position of direct 
contact with the enemy, and also from the march on terrain 
accessible for forward movement and deployment of subunits. The 
attack is conducted basically along a road, a river or other 
accessible axes. 
  A company (battalion) performs missions while operating as 
part of the main body or independently, and also as an 
enveloping detachment. 
  The company (battalion) attack frontage may change in the 
course of battle, and the battalion sometimes is forced to 
operate as companies with considerable gaps between them. In 
aligning the battle formation one should take into account the 
difficulty of changing it in the course of battle and the need 
for securing exposed flanks. This requires conducting 
reconnaissance on flanks and it requires security, especially in 
the fog and the arctic night. 
  As a rule, the content of subunit combat missions is the 
very 
same, but rates of advance on some axes will be lower than under 
ordinary conditions. 
  In an attack along roads or individual axes on terrain 
difficult of access, an MRC may be reinforced by a TP, mortar 
(artillery) platoon, grenade launcher subunit and combat 
engineer subunit and may be supported by fire of an artillery 
battery. The battalion is reinforced and supported by subunits 
of other combat arms and services, as under ordinary conditions. 
  A company (battalion) assigned to an enveloping detachment 
is 
given an objective in the depth of the enemy defense which it 
must take independently or in coordination with a tactical 
airborne assault force. Such objectives may be road junctions, 
bridges and so on. The detachment also is assigned a mission of 
destroying means of nuclear and chemical attack and 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities, disrupting work of the rear, and 
assisting subunits attacking from the front. 
  In preparing for an attack, in addition to the usual matters 
the company (battalion) commander specifies the presence of 
flanks and unoccupied gaps in the enemy defense, axes favorable 
for subunit operations, the azimuth of the direction of attack 
and the procedure for orientation and for crossing sectors 
difficult of access. He organizes warming posts and takes steps 
to prevent hypothermia and frostbite of personnel and also for 
preparing weapons, vehicles and individual protective gear for 
use under low temperature conditions. Measures are taken for 
painting vehicles to resemble the terrain background, to supply 
subunits with camouflage robes, to improve off-road capability 
of vehicles, especially wheeled vehicles, and to establish 
additional reserves of fuel, food and means of illumination. 
Measures also are envisaged for receiving supplies from 
helicopters and aircraft. In addition, the company (battalion) 
commander carries out advance preparation of the attack position 
(assembly area) under conditions of an attack launched from a 
position of direct contact with the enemy. Special attention is 
given to making emplacements out of snow and shelters for 
warming the personnel. 
  An assault of motorized rifle subunits when there is a deep 
snow cover and under other difficult conditions usually is made 
in dismounted formation, including on skis. Tanks attack in or 
behind the extended line of motorized riflemen. BMP's (BTR's) 
operate behind tanks and by their fire destroy the enemy 
hindering the advance of tanks and motorized rifle subunits. 
When attacking over a snow crust or expanse of ice, the assault 
of motorized rifle subunits may be conducted in BMP's (BTR's). 
  Taking advantage of gaps and exposed flanks in enemy battle 
formations, the enveloping detachment covertly penetrates his 
defense with the beginning of or before the attack of the main 
body, and by attacking from the rear and flanks helps subunits 
attacking from the front to destroy the enemy, or it performs 
other missions. 
  During battle in the depth, main efforts of attacking 
subunits are concentrated on destroying the enemy defending 
defiles, built-up areas, commanding heights and other objectives 
covering roads and axes accessible for attack. To capture these 
objectives, wide use should be made of deep and close 
envelopments with a move into the enemy rear, and an assault 
should be made from different directions supported by fire of 
artillery and other weapons from the front. 
  More attention is given to consolidating captured lines and 
organizing the warming of personnel with the beginning of a 
snowstorm and in snow flurries. Personnel are notified 
immediately about possible snow flurries and a snowstorm. 
  The wounded and sick must be swiftly located and carried 
(transported) from the battlefield in the course of an attack, 
especially in winter. Vehicles with good off-road capability and 
helicopters as well as deer teams, dog teams, ski mountings and 
sledges are used for their evacuation. 
Footnotes 
  1. See A. I. Radziyevskiy, "Tankovyy udar" [Tank Attack], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1977, p 158. 
  2. See Radziyevskiy, p 161. 
  3. Here and further in the section, assault force is 
understood to mean a tactical airborne assault force. 
  4. See G. T. Zavizion and P. A. Kornyugin, "I na Tikhom 
okeane..." [And in the Pacific...], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1967, p 
230. 
  5. Here and further in the section, assault force is 
understood to mean amphibious assault force. 
  6. See M. Ye. Katukov, "Na ostriye glavnogo udara" [At the 
Point of the Main Attack], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1976, p 336. 
  7. See V. I. Chuykov, "Nachalo puti" [Beginning of the 
Path], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1959, p 332. 
<H5>  Chapter VI - The Meeting Battle </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of the Meeting Battle </H5>
  The meeting battle is a variety of offensive battle. It is 
an 
attack on an enemy who also is attempting to accomplish his 
missions by an attack. 
  The goal of a meeting battle is to rout the attacking enemy 
in a short time, seize the initiative and create favorable 
conditions for further operations. It may arise during a march 
in an encounter with an enemy who is moving up; in an attack on 
a defending enemy while repelling counterattacks or in a clash 
with his subunits moving up to close breaches; in the defense 
when conducting counterattacks, and in a number of other cases. 
  A meeting battle usually begins with engagement by march 
security and with delivery of preemptive fire strikes against an 
enemy who is moving up (attacking), and it ends as soon as one 
side gives up the attack and begins shifting to a defense or 
withdrawing. 
  A meeting battle is characterized by the sides' rapid 
closing 
and their engagement from the move; by an intensive struggle to 
gain time, seize and hold the initiative and create fire 
superiority over the enemy; by an abrupt, frequent change in the 
situation; by conduct of operations on a broad front and to a 
great depth and by their fast-moving nature; and by the presence 
of significant gaps between subunits and of exposed flanks 
allowing freedom of maneuver for moving to the enemy flank and 
rear. 
  The sides' rapid closing, the complicated and constantly 
changing situation, and the highly dynamic nature of operations 
demand that the company (battalion) commander organize for 
battle in a short time and promptly update the decision and 
combat missions for subunits. 
  The struggle to win time and seize and hold the initiative 
will begin back on the approach to the line of the sides' 
probable encounter with the delivery of fire strikes and with 
operations of other forces and assets to hold up the enemy's 
forward movement and inflict considerable losses on him. With 
initiation of a meeting battle by security elements, first 
echelon subunits will unfold an intensive struggle for 
preemption in seizing a favorable line, in moving to a line of 
departure and in delivering swift assaults against the flank and 
rear of the enemy main body in order to split and swiftly 
destroy him in detail. 
  A maneuver of forces and assets executed for delivering 
strikes against the flank leads to abrupt situation changes and 
an expansion in the frontage of battle. The frontage of subunit 
operations also increases because the subunit immobilizing the 
enemy is deployed on a wider line and there are gaps between it 
and the subunit operating as part of the company (battalion) 
main body. 
  The following are conditions for achieving success in a 
meeting battle: continuous reconnaissance on a broad front and 
to a great depth for prompt collection of reliable data on the 
advancing enemy; prompt decisionmaking and rapid communication 
of missions to subordinates; advance establishment of the 
necessary grouping of forces and assets based on the concept of 
upcoming battle; preempting the enemy in commencing artillery 
fire; rapid execution of a maneuver to seize a favorable line 
and for forces and assets to move onto the axis of concentration 
of main efforts; preempting the enemy in deploying the main body 
and delivering a strong surprise attack against the flank and 
rear, breaking up his grouping and destroying it in detail; wide 
use of engineer obstacles on the enemy main body axis of 
operations; constant securing of flanks and rear; seizing the 
initiative and holding it throughout the battle, and determined, 
bold actions by subunits; reliable air defense and 
accomplishment of measures for comprehensive support of battle; 
firm, continuous C[.sup]2[/] and maintenance of close 
coordination among subunits in battle. 
  An important feature of the meeting battle is that it 
usually 
is conducted with relative equality of the sides' forces and 
assets. In fact, if forces of one side considerably surpass 
forces of the other, the commander of the latter, having 
intelligence on this, most likely will prefer to repel the enemy 
attack by defensive operations and not by a surprise 
counterstrike. 
  At the same time, preemption in commencing fire, deploying 
and launching an assault permits achieving victory over a 
stronger enemy. 
  A company (battalion) may conduct a meeting battle 
independently, operating in isolation from the battalion 
(regimental) main body (as a rule, in a forward security 
element, forward detachment, or advance guard), or as part of 
the main body. 
  Based on missions assigned to it in the course of the march 
and in the attack, a forward detachment conducts a meeting 
battle before seizure of a designated line only if it is 
impossible or inadvisable to go around the enemy. 
  The combat mission of the subunit in a meeting 
battle and its content and indicators (depth, frontage) depend 
on the place of the company (battalion) in the battalion 
(regimental) battle formation. 
  In a meeting battle a company (battalion) is assigned an 
immediate mission and is given a direction for continuing the 
attack (Diagram 18). 
  Assignment only of an immediate mission is a result of 
abrupt, frequent situation changes. In addition, by the time the 
battalion is given a combat mission for a meeting battle, there 
usually not only is no clear-cut enemy battle formation in the 
area where engagement may occur, but not even that grouping with 
which it is to do battle, since the latter still will be moving 
into this area. In connection with this, it is impossible to 
assign a battalion in advance a number of missions to be 
performed successively. 
  The immediate mission of a company operating in a 
forward security element is to destroy enemy 
reconnaissance and security subunits, seize a favorable line and 
support deployment of the battalion main body. The depth of the 
company's immediate mission depends on the makeup of enemy 
reconnaissance and security subunits, their distance from the 
main body and the time needed to consolidate at the indicated 
line; it usually is 1-2 km. 
  The immediate mission of a battalion operating in a 
forward detachment is to seize and hold the indicated 
line (designated earlier or with initiation of the meeting 
battle), inflict damage on the enemy's lead subunits by fire of 
all weapons and support forward movement and deployment of the 
regimental main body. 
  The size of the line which must be taken by a company as a 
forward security element (or by a battalion as a forward 
detachment) is directly connected with its combat capabilities. 
Counting means of reinforcement, a company is capable of 
repelling an assault by one and one-half enemy companies 
(company task forces) by fire from an unprepared line, and a 
battalion is capable of repelling an assault by up to one and 
one-half enemy battalions (battalion task forces). A line must 
be assigned for a company (battalion) to capture and hold 
against which the forces indicated above will attack. According 
to enemy views, a company attacks in a frontage of up to 1.2-1.5 
km and a battalion in a frontage of 3-5 km or more. Consequently 
a company/forward security element can seize and hold a line on 
a frontage up to 2 km and a battalion on a frontage of 4-6 km or 
more. 
  When the main body launches an assault the company 
(battalion) operates in the previously indicated direction for 
continuing the attack. 
  The immediate mission of a battalion operating in an 
advance guard is to destroy enemy security subunits, 
immobilize his main body by active operations and support 
deployment and commitment of the regimental main body. 
  The immediate mission of a company (battalion) operating 
as part of the main body of a battalion (regiment) is 
to rout the main body of the first echelon company (battalion) 
of the opposing enemy subunit (unit) on its axis, destroy or 
capture his artillery and take a line providing favorable 
conditions for destroying approaching reserves and developing 
the attack. 
  The depth of the battle formation of a reinforced enemy 
company (battalion) in a meeting battle usually is 1-2 (4-6) km 
and sometimes even more. With consideration of this, the 
immediate mission of a company (battalion) operating on the axis 
of concentration of main efforts is designated with a depth of 
1-2 (4-6) km and sometimes even more. 
  The direction in which a company (battalion) which is part 
of 
the main body is to continue an attack must ensure swift 
destruction of enemy reserves and performance of the battalion 
(regimental) immediate mission. 
  The battle formation in a meeting battle must 
ensure delivering a strong initial attack and performing 
missions that arise suddenly in the course of battle. A 
single-echelon alignment with assignment of a reserve in the 
battalion meets these requirements to the greatest extent. 
  Usually 2-3 MRC's and the organic (attached) TC are assigned 
to an MRB first echelon. First echelon companies may be 
reinforced by tanks, AT subunits and grenade launcher subunits. 
As a rule, a TC is attached to MRC's by platoon, but also may be 
employed at full strength. 
  In the TB the first echelon usually consists of 2-3 TC's and 
an attached MRC, which is attached to the TC's, but sometimes 
also is used at full strength. 
  The battalion reserve is established with the strength of 
from a platoon to a company. 
  Subunits usually enter a meeting battle with those means of 
reinforcement which they had in the course of preceding 
operations. In some cases a redistribution of forces and assets 
is accomplished if required by situation conditions and there 
are opportunities, depending on the place of subunits in the 
battle formation and the missions they are performing. 
  In a meeting battle an attack is conducted on a broader 
front 
in the presence of considerable gaps between subunits. Thus, a 
battalion operating as part of the main body usually attacks in 
a frontage of 2-3 km and sometimes even more. Companies may have 
an attack frontage of from 500 to 1,000 m. A battalion operating 
in a forward detachment (advance guard), having two MRC's and a 
TC in the main body and an MRC in the forward security element, 
will deploy and conduct a meeting battle in a frontage of 3-5 km. 
<H5>  2. Organization of the Meeting Battle </H5>
  Organization of the meeting battle usually includes 
decisionmaking; assignment of combat missions to subunits; 
ground reconnaissance; and organization of fire engagement of 
the enemy, coordination, comprehensive support to battle and 
C[.sup]2[/]. Depending on situation conditions, it may begin 
with receipt of the combat mission or intelligence about enemy 
forward movement, or it may begin with engagement by march 
security when there is a surprise encounter with him. 
  The commander of a company (battalion) operating as part of 
the main body as a rule organizes the meeting battle based on 
the combat mission received. 
  On receiving the combat mission, the commander analyzes it, 
estimates the situation, makes the decision, communicates combat 
missions to subunits, and issues instructions on organizing 
coordination and on the most important questions of 
comprehensive support to battle. This work usually is done in 
movement from a map. 
  If possible, the situation and decision must be reported to 
the senior commander before assigning combat missions. 
  Subsequently the decision made from the map is updated on 
the 
terrain as one moves up to the line of departure, and the 
updated combat missions and coordination procedure are 
communicated to subunits. 
  The commander of a company operating in a forward security 
element (or the commander of a battalion operating in a forward 
detachment or advance guard) begins organizing for a meeting 
battle on receipt of the combat mission or when march security 
encounters the enemy. 
  The content of the company (battalion) commander's work of 
organizing for a meeting battle when it begins both with 
initiation by security elements as well as on receipt of a 
combat mission essentially is identical, but in the first case 
organizing for battle begins with a situation estimate and in 
the second case with analysis of the combat mission received. 
  In analyzing the mission, the commander must 
understand the objective of upcoming operations; the senior 
commander's concept (especially the sequence of routing the 
enemy); the company (battalion) mission, place in the battle 
formation and role in the battle; missions of adjacent subunits 
and procedure for coordinating with them and with subunits of 
other combat arms; and readiness times for performing the 
mission. 
  The commander draws conclusions from analyzing the mission 
in 
which he outlines the direction for concentrating main efforts, 
the kind of maneuver, the procedure of company (battalion) 
operations for swift, effective exploitation of results of fire 
strikes, and the battle formation. 
  After analyzing the mission, he estimates the situation. In 
estimating the enemy he must study the makeup, 
status, position, degree of protection, possible forward 
movement routes, possible nature of his operations, the most 
important objectives for engagement by artillery fire, and that 
part of the grouping whose destruction will lead to disruption 
of the attack or a breakup of the enemy battle formation and 
creation of conditions for his defeat in detail. 
  Because of incompleteness of information, the enemy estimate 
is made chiefly based on his table of organization structure and 
operating tactics. 
  In the estimate of friendly troops account is 
taken of their makeup, situation and nature of operations 
preceding the meeting battle. Estimated above all are 
capabilities for inflicting fire damage on the enemy by organic 
and attached artillery and for preempting him in deploying the 
main body into battle formation. 
  As a rule, in organizing for a meeting battle the enemy and 
friendly troop estimate is made together. For example, it is 
possible to assign combat missions to subunits only based on an 
estimate of the situation, nature of operations and capabilities 
of enemy and friendly subunits. The integrated situation 
estimate lies in the fact that the company commander does not 
study its elements to the full extent, but makes an estimate of 
the enemy, friendly troops and terrain, for example, only in 
order to determine the direction for concentrating main efforts, 
then to resolve other questions, the concept, and the decision 
as a whole. That method of determining the decision permits 
significantly reducing time of organizing for battle, but 
requires commanders to have high training. 
  Based on the estimate of the enemy and friendly troops, the 
company (battalion) commander determines the ratio of forces and 
assets and the time for execution of a maneuver by subunits, and 
he performs other necessary calculations. 
  In estimating the terrain the following are 
established: most advantageous maneuver routes providing egress 
to enemy flanks and rear, lines of deployment and departure and 
the direction of attack of friendly subunits. 
  The company (battalion) commander draws conclusions from the 
situation estimate in which he notes the following: measures for 
prohibiting organized enemy deployment and for preempting him in 
seizing an advantageous line; procedure for fire engagement of 
the main enemy grouping during its deployment into battle 
formation and in the course of battle; missions of the point 
(forward security element); alignment of the battle formation; 
firing position area of organic and attached artillery and 
readiness time for commencing fire; form of maneuver of subunits 
and place of the company (battalion) COP. 
  As a result of comparing conclusions from an analysis of the 
assigned mission and from the situation estimate, the company 
(battalion) commander determines the commander's 
concept, in which he reflects the following: direction for 
concentrating main efforts and form of maneuver; methods for 
routing an enemy who is moving forward (attacking) (what enemy 
to rout where, in what sequence and how, with an indication of 
the fire engagement procedure and measures for his deception); 
and the battle formation. 
  The constant threat of use of nuclear and precision weapons, 
the growth in combat capabilities of forces and assets, changes 
in the organization of units and subunits, and the rapidly 
changing situation demand that in determining elements of the 
concept the company (battalion) commander have creativeness and 
initiative and constantly improve methods of employing forces 
and assets in battle. 
  The direction for concentrating main efforts, the form 
of maneuver, and methods and sequence of defeating the 
enemy must be determined in such a way that the company 
(battalion) main body has superiority over the enemy on its axis 
of operations. The axis for concentrating main efforts should be 
selected on terrain providing most effective employment of 
motorized rifle and tank subunits. It should lead to the flank 
of the opposing enemy's main body, support a move to the combat 
mission line [rubezh boyevoy zadachi] over the shortest distance 
and provide for defeating the enemy in detail. It is advisable 
to select the axis so as to preclude superfluous changes of 
formation and movement of subunits, to achieve superiority over 
the enemy in forces and assets by at least one and one-half 
times, and to ensure the most favorable conditions for his 
defeat. 
  In an actual situation it is hardly possible to select an 
axis of possible concentration of main efforts satisfying all 
the requirements advanced here. Therefore correct determination 
as to which of them should be deemed most important depends only 
on the commander. It may happen that main efforts will be 
concentrated on what is not the most convenient terrain sector 
if this achieves surprise and provides superiority over the 
enemy and delivery of an attack against his flank. 
  In an encounter with an equal or stronger enemy grouping, 
superiority can be achieved by preempting him in commencing 
artillery fire; by immobilizing the main body with fire of 
subunits from advantageous lines and delivering an attack with 
one's main body against the weakest place in the enemy battle 
formation; by using the bulk of forces and assets and the most 
combat effective subunits on the selected axis; and by 
displaying initiative and creativeness and employing 
nonstereotyped operations. 
  Maneuver in a meeting battle must be simple in concept and 
ensure preemption of the enemy in deploying and in inflicting 
maximum damage by fire, a breakup of his march (battle) 
formation, and his destruction in detail. Such forms of maneuver 
as close and deep envelopment are used most often in a meeting 
battle. Wide opportunities appear for their use in connection 
with the presence of exposed flanks and gaps. 
  The main method for defeating the enemy in a 
meeting battle is to engage his advancing subunits by preemptive 
fire of all weapons during deployment into battle formation and 
complete their defeat by a determined assault against the flank 
and rear with his simultaneous immobilization by part of the 
forces from the front. 
  An assault from the front is possible in those cases where 
the enemy is reliably engaged by fire (including by the senior 
commander's weapons) and where it is difficult or impossible for 
subunits to maneuver to the enemy flank and rear due to the 
shortage of time. It permits splitting the enemy apart over the 
shortest axis and simultaneously developing the attack toward 
flanks. Success of a frontal assault can be achieved if it is a 
surprise and the enemy is reliably neutralized by fire of 
artillery and other weapons, otherwise a frontal assault may 
lead to a protracted battle and loss of the initiative. 
  In determining the concept, the procedure for fire 
engagement 
is envisaged to be such that the following occurs: artillery 
fire support of subunits immobilizing the enemy and supporting 
the forward movement and deployment of the main body; 
neutralization of his artillery and mortar subunits and AT 
weapons; engagement of approaching columns and disruption of 
their organized deployment and engagement; support of the 
forward movement and deployment of friendly first echelon 
subunits for the assault; and their support throughout the 
battle. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy can be divided into three main 
stages (periods): delivery of preemptive fire strikes against 
the enemy; artillery preparation of the assault, which usually 
is conducted as one fire assault; and artillery support of the 
assault to the depth of the battalion's immediate mission. 
  In determining the battle formation, the company 
(battalion) commander should proceed from the assumption that it 
is necessary to ensure superiority over the enemy on the axis of 
concentration of main efforts, delivery of a strong initial 
blow, his breakup and his destruction in detail. 
  It must be borne in mind that in organizing for a meeting 
battle the company (battalion) commander may assign missions to 
subunits, for example artillery, to deliver preemptive fire 
strikes against the advancing enemy long before completion of 
such organization, after the situation estimate, after 
determining the concept and so on. This is dictated by the 
limited time for organizing for battle and by the desire to 
provide as much time to subordinate commanders for work as 
possible and preempt the enemy in operations. 
  Company (forward security element) commander's 
concept for a meeting battle 
  (Variant) 
  I decided: Concentrate main efforts on the axis 
Hill 150.0, Sidorovo (Fig. 7). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-10L-122A>      Fig. 7. 1st MRC commander's decision for a meeting battle </FIG>

  Point in coordination with ATP is to pin down enemy march 
security on the line lone tree, dam. Neutralize enemy personnel 
and weapons by fire of artillery battery as he moves forward and 
deploys in vicinity of edge of Temnyy Forest, trig point, curve 
in road. Execute a maneuver of two MRP's and a TP along the 
route of pipe on the road, grove and rout the enemy company main 
body in the vicinity of the lone house, barrow, Hill 164.5 by an 
assault in fighting vehicles from the line of the dam, barrow, 
take the line of the well, brook by 1030 and support deployment 
of the battalion main body. When main body launches assault, 
attack in direction of curve in road, Sidorovo. 
  Assign a tank to an ambush on the south edge of Temnyy 
Forest 
to prevent the enemy from enveloping the company right flank. 
  The company battle formation is in one echelon. Use the 
artillery battery and ATP centrally. 
  The company (battalion) commander assigns combat missions to 
subunits based on their place in the battle formation and their 
role in defeating the enemy, in accordance with the commander's 
concept and with consideration of the nature of terrain, enemy 
operations and other situation factors. 
  The company (battalion) commander determines the principal 
questions of coordination for the full depth of the meeting 
battle usually for the following missions: inflicting damage by 
preemptive artillery fire on an enemy moving up (attacking); 
capture of a favorable line by a portion of the forces; the 
battle of these subunits in the interests of supporting a 
maneuver of the company (battalion) main body; fire damage of 
the enemy when subunits move forward and deploy for an assault; 
the assault and execution of the immediate mission by the 
company (battalion); and development of the attack. 
  In each mission the company (battalion) commander singles 
out 
the most important stages of operations in which efforts of the 
subunits involved must be coordinated; determines the makeup of 
forces and assets to be working together and subunits performing 
the primary mission and in whose support all others are 
functioning; and plans the time, lines and signals with which 
coordinated operations of troops begin or end. On the whole, the 
methodology of determining the main questions of coordination in 
making a decision for a meeting battle is the very same as in 
decisionmaking for an attack on a defending enemy. 
  In organizing C[.sup]2[/] in a meeting battle the company 
(forward security element) commander determines the places and 
time of deploying COP's and attached subunits and the procedure 
for their displacement in the course of battle. 
  The company (battalion) commander additionally may specify 
tasks for political work and for kinds of support, above all 
reconnaissance, protection against mass destruction weapons, 
chemical warfare support and maskirovka. 
  After making the decision the company (battalion) commander 
assigns missions to subordinates by radio and simultaneously 
communicates the coordination procedure to them. As a rule, 
missions are communicated in brief operational instructions and 
all points, lines and objectives are indicated using codenames 
of local features and signal tables. 
  In some cases the company (battalion) commander may issue an 
operation order if the situation permits. 
  In assigning missions the battalion commander indicates the 
following in the operation order (operational 
instructions): 

  -  for forward security element--makeup, movement 
route, what line to capture and hold and by what time for 
supporting main body deployment, and the procedure of operations 
with beginning of the main body assault; 
  -  for attached 
artillery subunits, mortar (artillery) battery and grenade 
launcher subunit--missions for supporting battle of the 
forward security element and main body, firing position areas, 
readiness time to commence fire, signals for commencing, 
transferring and ceasing fire, and the procedure for 
displacement in the course of battle; 
  -  for MRC's (TC's)--immediate mission and direction 
for continuing the attack, line of departure, time of assault, 
route of forward movement to line of departure, and who is 
supporting; 
  -  for reserve--makeup, place in battle formation, and 
direction and procedure for displacement in the course of 
battle; 
  -  for AT subunit--missions for covering flanks or 
likely avenues of tank approach, firing positions (deployment 
lines), time to occupy them, procedure for commencing and 
ceasing fire, and procedure for displacement in the course of 
battle; 
  -  for air defense subunit--in what directions to 
conduct reconnaissance of the air enemy; what subunits to cover 
against air strikes during forward movement, deployment and in 
the course of battle; place in battle formation and procedure 
for displacement; 
  -  for other reinforcing subunits--procedure for 
supporting forward movement, deployment and assault of battalion 
subunits, place in battle formation and procedure for 
displacement in the course of battle. 


    In the operation order the company (forward 
security element) commander indicates the following: 

  -  for point--makeup, combat mission, procedure 
for operations on encountering the enemy and for reporting the 
situation; 
  -  for motorized rifle (tank) platoons--combat mission, 
procedure for operations on encountering the enemy; 
  -  for reinforcing subunits--missions which they are to 
be ready to execute and place in company march and battle 
formations. 


    In assigning missions to motorized rifle (tank) platoons the 
commander of a company operating as part of the battalion main 
body indicates the combat mission, line and time of departure, 
and coordination procedure. 
  With initiation of a meeting battle, the commander of a 
company operating in the forward security element indicates the 
very same data in assigning combat missions to subunits as does 
the commander of a company in the main body. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy, coordination, comprehensive 
support and C[.sup]2[/] in a meeting battle are organized 
during decisionmaking by the company (battalion) commander and 
during assignment of combat missions to subunits and are not 
singled out as a separate stage of work. In this connection the 
organization of a meeting battle essentially ends with 
assignment of combat missions to subunits. 
<H5>  3. Conduct of a Meeting Battle </H5>
  When a forward moving enemy is discovered, efforts of all 
reconnaissance forces and assets are directed toward uncovering 
his makeup, direction of column movement, and the time, areas 
and lines of deployment of tanks, mechanized infantry and 
artillery. 
  On encountering enemy reconnaissance and march security, the 
battalion's reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol 
immediately reports this to the battalion commander; without 
engaging, it covertly penetrates to his main body columns, 
determines their makeup and probable nature of operations, and 
keeps an eye out for the approach and direction of forward 
movement of reserves (second echelons). 
  Fire damage of the enemy to disrupt his forward movement and 
organized commitment and to create conditions for defeating him 
in detail begins by the senior commander's assets back before 
enemy columns enter the impact zone of company and battalion 
weapons. As the sides close, pressure on the enemy is built up 
by forces and assets of subunits. 
  A meeting battle of the forward security element, forward 
detachment and advance guard as a rule begins with battle of the 
march security. 
  On encountering small enemy groups, the point destroys them 
by fire and by a determined assault from the move and continues 
performing the assigned mission. On encountering an enemy 
superior in force, the point inflicts damage on him by fire from 
a favorable line and pins down his main body. The company 
commander immediately moves forward, and makes his decision and 
assigns combat missions to platoons and means of reinforcement 
during forward movement. 
  With the point 3-5 km from the company main body, the 
company 
commander spends approximately 8-12 minutes in moving up to it 
at a speed of 25 km/hr. Consequently, in that time he must 
estimate the situation, make a decision and assign missions to 
subordinates. 
  On arriving at the point, the company commander updates his 
decision based on results of its battle and his personal 
observations and communicates updated combat missions and if 
necessary also the coordination procedure to subunits. In 
addition, missions are updated right there on the terrain for 
the point commander and commanders of attached artillery, since 
they are with the company commander, and missions are updated 
for the others by radio. 
  Assignment of missions in meeting battle to 
subunits by the commander of a company operating 
in a forward security element 
  (Variant) 
  1st MRP, the point, is to complete destruction of the enemy 
and by 0940 hours take the line of the forest edge, road and 
hold it until the main body launches the assault. Subsequently 
continue moving in direction of lone house, well. 
  Artillery battery is to neutralize the enemy mechanized 
infantry company--head of column at Hill 160.0, prohibit his 
forward movement and deployment on the line well, trig point. 
Firing positions near road in vicinity of embankment. Readiness 
to commence fire 0925. 
  "Sosna [Pine]-12 (2nd MRP), this is Dub [Oak]-14 (company 
commander), together with Sosna-14 (TP) destroy enemy personnel 
and weapons on south slopes of Hill 164.5 by assault from line 
of trig point, barrow in direction of Hill 150.0, Sidorovo. 
Direction for continuing attack--bushes, curve in road. Route of 
forward movement--embankment, Hill 150.0, barrow. Assault at 
signal `Strela [Arrow]-444' and red flare, this is Dub-14, over." 
  "Sosna-13 (3rd MRP), this is Dub-14 (mission is assigned in 
a 
similar manner)." 
  "Zorkiy [Vigilant]-17 (ATP), this is Dub-14, destroy enemy 
tanks and IFV's by fire from in place, prevent his penetration 
in direction of Hill 164.5, spring. Take up deployment line of 
lone house, dam (excluded) by 0925. Commence-fire signal is 
`Udar [Strike]-21.' During battle displace behind Sosna-13, this 
is Dub-14, over." 
  After assigning combat missions the company commander 
monitors their execution and controls subunits. 
  The forward security element main body moves up swiftly to 
the line of departure indicated for it and, having deployed into 
battle formation from the move, assaults the enemy decisively. 
  Methods of the forward security element's operations in a 
meeting battle (Diagram 19) can be quite varied. Thus, on 
encountering lesser or equal enemy forces, it is capable of 
inflicting damage on them by fire of all weapons from in place, 
destroying tanks and IFV's (APC's), then completing the enemy's 
rout by a swift assault. 
  To ensure the enemy's defeat in detail, the forward security 
element may leave the route or, after executing a maneuver, let 
the enemy lead column pass by, take up a favorable line and 
prevent the approach of succeeding columns. In this situation 
the commander of a battalion operating in an advance guard 
(forward detachment) accomplishes defeat of the enemy who has 
broken away by swift, decisive actions from the front and by a 
flank attack. 
  On encountering an enemy superior in force, the forward 
security element takes up a favorable (designated) line, 
inflicts damage on enemy personnel, tanks and artillery by 
active operations of subunits and by fire of all weapons, and 
supports forward movement and deployment of the battalion main 
body. 
  When the forward security element engages, the commander of 
a 
battalion operating in a forward detachment (advance guard) 
moves up to it. His work of organizing for the meeting battle is 
accomplished in the very same sequence as the work of the 
forward security element commander after the point engages, 
which already has been examined. 
  Field training exercise experience shows that updating of 
the 
battalion commander's decision on the terrain and its 
communication to companies should be completed before they begin 
deploying into platoon columns. This will enable the company and 
platoon commanders to complete organization for battle in their 
subunits promptly. 
  Under cover of the forward security element and the fire of 
artillery and taking advantage of concealed approaches and if 
possible also maskirovka by aerosols (smoke), the forward 
detachment (advance guard) main body quickly executes a 
maneuver, deploys into battle formation from the move and 
completes destruction of enemy march security by a swift assault 
against the flank and rear. 
  Artillery subunits take up firing positions, open fire 
against approaching enemy columns, neutralize his artillery and 
AT weapons, support battle of the forward security element, and 
support the battalion main body's forward movement, deployment 
and commitment. Fire is commenced by battery as they are ready, 
and subsequently is conducted by the full complement of 
artillery. 
  Artillery commences and conducts fire so as to preempt the 
enemy in commencing fire and to disorganize and put his battle 
formations in disarray back before he engages. 
  Deployment of an SP artillery battery from the march and 
preparation for commencing fire takes 11-14 minutes, and a 
battalion requires 15-20 minutes. Combat missions must be 
updated for artillery above all so that all artillery is ready 
to conduct a fire assault against the enemy 10-15 minutes before 
the company (battalion) main body launches the assault. 
  A fire assault lasts 5-10 minutes and sometimes even more. 
Enemy artillery, tanks, IFV's (APC's), AT weapons and personnel 
are engaged during the fire assault. 
  During a meeting battle air defense weapons are in the 
battle 
formation of motorized rifle (tank) subunits in constant 
readiness to engage airborne targets both from short halts as 
well as in movement. 
  The battalion air defense platoon, usually operating by 
squad, covers the main body, artillery, and forward security 
element against enemy air strikes. If the battalion is 
reinforced by air defense weapons, as a rule they are used 
centrally to cover subunits of the main body and artillery. In 
this case the air defense platoon may be attached to a forward 
security element at full strength. 
  The battalion reserve displaces covertly up to 1.5-2 km 
behind first echelon subunits, as a rule on the most threatened 
flank, in readiness to exploit success or accomplish missions 
which arise suddenly. 
  The reserve as a rule is committed by authorization of the 
regimental commander. 
  On receiving his authorization the battalion commander 
assigns a mission to the reserve commander, where he indicates 
means of reinforcement and the procedure for their 
resubordination during commitment. 
  Commitment of the reserve takes around 10-15 minutes (the 
reserve covers 1.5-2 km at an average rate of forward movement 
and deployment of 15 km/hr in 6-8 minutes; in addition, 4-6 
minutes are needed for assigning the combat mission). 
  In making the decision to commit the reserve, the battalion 
commander must provide for its reestablishment at the very first 
opportunity. This may be a platoon from a company which was 
operating in the forward security element, or the company itself 
after it performs its mission. 
  Subunits of AT weapons deploy on likely avenues of tank 
approach and by their fire cover the battalion main body flanks 
against possible enemy assaults. They often operate together 
with subunits supporting commitment of the main body (with the 
forward security element). 
  With initiation of the meeting battle, the battalion 
reconnaissance platoon continues performing its missions, 
concentrating primary efforts on determining (updating) the 
makeup, possible nature of operations, forward movement routes 
and deployment lines of enemy follow-on forces. 
  Logistic and technical support subunits are used in a 
meeting 
battle as in an attack on a defending enemy. They usually deploy 
behind the battalion battle formation, where possible in an area 
difficult of access for tanks. The battalion (company) aid 
station (post) and technical observation posts displace behind 
assaulting subunits. 
  In the course of the meeting battle, combat engineer 
subunits 
attached to the battalion usually operate as part of the main 
body, supporting the forward movement and execution of a 
maneuver by MRC's and TC's. In those cases where battalion 
subunits will be unable to bypass or negotiate obstacles and 
barriers from the move, the combat engineer subunit breaches the 
obstacles and barriers with its own assets. Reinforcing the 
battalion with combat engineer subunits with wide enemy use of 
remote mining of terrain acquires special importance. The time 
for the battalion to move out of an area that has been mined and 
its losses will be considerably less in this case. 
  After destroying enemy march security, the forward 
detachment 
seizes and holds its designated line until the approach of the 
regimental main body, and the advance guard boldly penetrates to 
the enemy main body and immobilizes it. Subsequently the forward 
detachment and advance guard usually operate as part of the 
regimental first echelon. Their launching of an assault together 
with main body subunits is possible only in the presence of 
favorable conditions: gaps in the enemy battle formation and 
attempts to withdraw or execute a maneuver to another axis. 
  If superior enemy forces have preempted the forward 
detachment in moving to its designated line, have preempted the 
advance guard in deployment and are conducting an attack, the 
battalion inflicts damage on them by the fire of organic and 
attached artillery and all other weapons, immobilizes the enemy 
by active operations at the line reached and on a broad front, 
and provides the most favorable conditions for deployment of the 
regimental main body. 
  During the battle to hold a captured line, personnel of 
motorized rifle subunits dismount and the BMP's (BTR's) and 
tanks take up firing positions behind cover so as to conduct 
fire to maximum ranges. 
  A company (battalion) operating as part of the main body 
moves forward covertly to its axis at maximum possible speed, 
deploys into battle formation and assaults the enemy swiftly. 
The battalion reserve is committed after execution of the 
immediate mission and sometimes even earlier. Any kind of halt 
or delay at the battalion's immediate-mission line is 
impermissible. As a rule, at this time the regimental commander 
communicates a new mission to the battalion, but if one is not 
assigned, the battalion commander takes steps to develop the 
attack in the previously indicated direction. 
  With an enemy attempt to consolidate at a favorable line and 
support commitment of the main body, the company (battalion) 
breaks him apart by fire and a determined assault from the front 
and flanks, destroys personnel and weapons and continues 
performing assigned combat mission. 
  On detecting an enemy withdrawal the battalion immediately 
shifts to the pursuit, destroys covering-force subunits, swiftly 
penetrates to his main body and destroys it in coordination with 
subunits conducting a pursuit along parallel routes. A company 
(battalion) operating on an enveloping flank must move swiftly 
along the shortest routes onto the enemy withdrawal axis and 
assault him decisively. 
  The commander exercises C[.sup]2[/] of company (battalion) 
subunits in a meeting battle by brief commands, instructions and 
signals from the COP, which usually displaces up to 200 (300) m 
behind battle formations of first echelon companies on the axis 
of concentration of main efforts. 
  The company (battalion) commander must keep a watchful eye 
on 
a change in the situation and promptly update the decision and 
combat missions for subunits. On discovering enemy preparation 
to deliver fire strikes and an attempt to execute a maneuver or 
commit the reserve, it is necessary to inflict fire damage on 
the enemy by artillery, move friendly subunits out from under 
the strike and, making wide use of the maneuver of forces and 
assets and ambushes, complete his defeat by an assault of 
motorized rifle and tank subunits. 
  On encountering the enemy, a company operating in a flank 
security element immobilizes him by fire and active operations 
on favorable lines and gives the regimental main body an 
opportunity to maneuver for performing the assigned mission. If 
the regiment (battalion) deploys toward the flank on which the 
flank security element is located, the latter operates in the 
very same manner as the forward security element. 
  If a tactical airborne assault force is landed on the axis 
of 
company (battalion) operations, the commander must take all 
steps to link up with it and perform the assigned mission by 
joint operations. 
<H5>  Chapter VII - Battle in Encirclement and Breakout of </H5>
Encirclement 
<H5>  1. Battle in Encirclement </H5>
  An encirclement does not arise suddenly. It is the result of 
an unsuccessful outcome of battle and a move of enemy subunits 
to the flanks and rear of a company (battalion). 
  A company (battalion) may find itself in encirclement 
(Diagram 19) in an attack when it is operating in isolation from 
the main body as a tactical airborne assault force or a 
reconnaissance, special (forward) or raiding detachment. In 
addition, having halted attacking troops, the enemy may cut off 
a company (battalion) from the main body by counterattacks and 
then encircle it. 
  Encirclement also is possible with an unsuccessful outcome 
of 
a meeting battle and in a withdrawal when the pursuing enemy's 
rate of advance is higher than the rate of withdrawing subunits. 
But encirclement will occur most often in a defensive battle as 
a result of enemy penetration of the defense of adjacent 
subunits and his move to the flanks and rear of a company 
(battalion) with subsequent establishment of a perimeter of 
envelopment. 
  A company (battalion) which has ended up in encirclement or 
in the enemy rear (but not encircled) must pin down as many of 
his forces as possible by active, determined actions, thereby 
contributing to the main body's successful performance of the 
combat mission. 
  As a rule, an encirclement is preceded by battles with an 
enemy of superior force, and so a company (battalion) may have 
considerable losses and in addition may end up in encirclement 
not at full strength. 
  If subunits which are not a part of the company (battalion) 
end up in encirclement together with it, the company (battalion) 
commander is obligated to subordinate them to himself and 
subsequently employ them in accordance with the situation at 
hand. 
  The makeup of forces and assets which end up encircled 
together with the company (battalion) is impossible to determine 
in advance but, as the experience of wars and exercises shows, 
these may be air defense, artillery and technical and logistic 
support subunits which previously were located in or near a 
company strongpoint (battalion defense area) or withdrew from 
previously occupied positions (areas). 
  The company (battalion) mission in battle in 
encirclement is to firmly hold the occupied strongpoint (defense 
area), prevent the enemy from breaking subunits apart and 
inflict significant losses on him. 
  The size of a strongpoint (defense area) depends on the 
makeup of forces and assets of subunits which ended up in 
encirclement. It must ensure repulse of enemy attack and 
preclude dissipation of forces and assets and a reduction in 
fire density. At the same time, the area of the strongpoint 
(defense area) should not be restricted, otherwise it will lead 
to overcompaction of forces and assets, increased losses from 
enemy fire and impedance of maneuver. 
  These basic requirements on size of a company strongpoint 
(battalion defense area) are realized in the case where the 
company holds a strongpoint 1.5-2 km around the perimeter and 
the battalion holds a defense area up to 6-8 km in circumference 
around a circular front. In this case the average depth of a 
company strongpoint will be around 500-700 m and that of the 
battalion defense area 2-3 km, which ensures a dispersed 
disposition of the battle formation. 
  An MRC holding an area with a perimeter up to 1.5-2 km 
during 
battle in encirclement can create small arms fire densities 
(with losses up to 25 percent) of 4-6 bullets per meter of 
frontage per minute and densities of AT weapons, BMP's and tanks 
(counting RPG's and the attached TP) of 8-10, which as a whole 
is considered sufficient for creating a stable defense under 
these conditions. Usually the size of the company strongpoint 
(battalion defense area) is the very same as in the defense or 
somewhat less. 
  The battle formation of the company (battalion) 
for battle in encirclement is created as the threat arises and 
as the situation permits regrouping forces and assets for 
shifting to a perimeter defense. 
  The considerable extent of the circular defense frontage and 
usually the presence of several threatened axes and a shortage 
of forces and assets require an alignment of the company 
(battalion) battle formation which would ensure concentration of 
efforts on each threatened axis. This requirement is met to the 
greatest extent by a single-echelon alignment of the battle 
formation with assignment of a reserve: in the company up to a 
squad in strength and in the battalion up to a platoon and 
sometimes even more. Thus, the company (battalion) battle 
formation includes the following: first echelon subunits; a 
reserve; weapons and reinforcing subunits remaining directly 
subordinate to the company (battalion) commander; and armored 
groups and fire ambushes. 
  A platoon (company) of a first echelon company (battalion) 
prepares strongpoints in such a way that they intercept the most 
likely avenues of enemy assaults in order to split his company 
(battalion) battle formation and destroy him in detail. 
  The company (battalion) reserve will be disposed in the 
center of the strongpoint (defense area) in a place from where 
it is possible to execute a maneuver quickly to threatened axes. 
  As a rule, tank (motorized rifle), artillery, air defense, 
grenade launcher and AT subunits that are organic or attached to 
the battalion and which ended up in encirclement with it are 
attached to companies and disposed in their strongpoints. Part 
of the artillery is moved up to conduct direct fire. Artillery 
remaining directly subordinate to the battalion commander takes 
up firing positions in the center of the battalion defense area 
in readiness for a maneuver to repel enemy assaults from any 
threatened axis. 
  Both in the company as well as in the battalion, it is 
advisable to make wide use of armored groups and fire ambushes 
during battle in encirclement. Their makeup and the procedure 
for their combat employment will be the very same as in an 
"ordinary" defense. 
  Subunits of engineer and chemical troops attached to the 
battalion are disposed near the battalion COP. 
  The company (battalion) COP is prepared in the depth of the 
strongpoint (defense area) in a place difficult for tank access 
and providing visual observation of operations of the enemy and 
friendly subunits on the most dangerous axis. 
  On the whole, during battle in encirclement the company 
(battalion) battle formation has the very same elements as in an 
ordinary defense, but their disposition must permit reacting as 
quickly as possible to enemy attempts to penetrate the defense 
frontage on any axis. 
  The system of company (battalion) strongpoints and firing 
positions is distinguished from an ordinary defense by the 
absence of a combat security outpost position in the battalion, 
by the circular disposition of platoon (company) strongpoints, 
and by establishment of the largest possible number of alternate 
firing positions, which must ensure conduct of fire not only 
toward the front, but also to the rear and toward flanks. One 
does not always succeed in preparing trenches and communication 
trenches in strongpoints or accomplishing engineer preparation 
of the occupied position to the full extent because of the 
shortage of time and also enemy pressure. Therefore it is 
necessary to take skilled advantage of the nature of terrain and 
its protective and concealing properties and prepare fire sacks 
and ambush sites. The company (battalion) commander should take 
all steps and realize all opportunities for engineer preparation 
of the defense. 
  A feature of battle in encirclement is that battalion rear 
and technical support subunits usually are disposed together 
(having the very same entities as in a defense). There is 
engineer preparation of their location and it is included in the 
system of strongpoints and firing positions. 
  The company (battalion) system of fire in battle in 
encirclement should conform to the situation at hand and ensure 
engagement of the enemy ahead of the entire frontage and in the 
depth of the perimeter defense. The system of fire is created 
with consideration of the fire damage being accomplished by the 
senior commander. 
  Companies and platoons are assigned zones of fire and 
weapons 
conducting direct fire are assigned sectors of fire. Zones of 
fire of adjacent subunits (weapons) should overlap. 
  A first echelon company (platoon) usually prepares a firing 
position in a zone of 2-3 km (500-700 m). 
  To mislead the enemy regarding the structure of the company 
(battalion) system of fire, roving guns (BMP's, tanks) are 
assigned and fire ambushes are prepared on possible enemy 
penetration axes. 
  The system of fire is tied in in a most thorough manner with 
the disposition of minefields so that when tanks, IFV's, APC's 
and other fighting vehicles attempt to go around the minefield 
they present their most vulnerable places to fire. 
  The possibility of an enemy penetration on any threatened 
axis requires preparation of a maneuver both of weapons as well 
as of fire. 
  Lines of firing positions are prepared for reserves, armored 
groups and other weapons, and alternate firing positions are 
prepared for the SP artillery battery to destroy individual 
enemy groups that have penetrated. 
  A system of engineer obstacles is established with 
consideration of terrain and the company (battalion) battle 
formation and is tied in closely with systems of strongpoints 
and firing positions and especially with the system of fire. 
  In connection with the fact that company (battalion) 
capabilities for laying minefields are limited in a period of 
organizing and conducting battle in encirclement, it is 
necessary to make wide use of minefields laid in advance, 
coordinating the disposition of strongpoints and positions with 
their location, and sometimes relocate them if time is 
available. It is necessary to make wider use of abatis and 
demolition of various objects, which will hamper enemy maneuver. 
  Thus, alignment of the company (battalion) defense and 
missions of subunits in a battle in encirclement to a 
considerable extent remain the very same as under ordinary 
conditions. At the same time, they are distinguished by a number 
of features already noted which the commander must take into 
account in preparing for battle. 
  Preparing for battle in encirclement includes those same 
measures as preparing a defense under ordinary conditions. A 
number of them are carried out in advance, such as preparing 
subunits to perform the combat mission and organizing and 
conducting political work. Subsequently this work is only 
concretized with consideration of the situation at hand and with 
a change in missions. 
  Organization for battle in encirclement usually is preceded 
by conduct of measures to prevent encirclement. 
  If a threat of encirclement arises the company (battalion) 
commander is obligated to do the following: beef up observation 
and additionally organize reconnaissance and fire ambushes on 
flanks, boundaries and in gaps, reliably supporting them by AT 
fire and obstacles; strive not only to prevent encirclement, but 
also to defeat enveloping enemy subunits; organize the 
concentration of fire of all weapons, and especially AT fire, on 
threatened flanks; regroup forces and assets, above all tanks 
and BMP's, move the second echelon (reserve) up to a threatened 
axis, prevent the company (battalion) battle formation from 
being broken up and prevent the enemy from moving to the flanks 
and rear; and boldly, swiftly and decisively counterattack 
against the flank and rear of enveloping enemy subunits in 
coordination with the senior commander's forces and make wide 
use of artillery fire and the assistance of adjacent subunits. 
  In case measures to prevent encirclement taken by the 
company 
(battalion) commander and senior commander will not lead to 
success and a withdrawal order (instruction) is not received, a 
decision is made for battle in encirclement. It will be made 
under difficult situation conditions, where subunits are 
fighting an intensive battle with an enemy attempting to 
complete encirclement of the company (battalion). In some cases 
the decision for battle in encirclement is made based on the 
senior commander's operational instructions. 
  To make the advisable decision, the company (battalion) 
commander organizes reconnaissance by observation and by other 
methods if possible in order to clarify the situation and makeup 
of the enemy surrounding the company (battalion). 
  In estimating the enemy special attention must be given to 
where he is preparing to launch an attack and with what forces. 
  In estimating friendly troops, in addition to those 
questions 
studied under ordinary conditions the company (battalion) 
commander must study the status, capabilities, degree of 
protection and degree of supply of subunits which are not part 
of the company (battalion) but which have ended up in 
encirclement, and subordinate them to himself. 
  The commander must perform the situation estimate throughout 
the entire period of operations preceding encirclement, and so 
very little time is spent on this stage of the work of 
decisionmaking. 
  Based on the situation estimate the company commander takes 
steps to shift to a perimeter defense, reinforce likely avenues 
of tank approach with tanks, BMP's and AT weapons, close gaps in 
the battle formation by fire and obstacles, prepare a maneuver 
of forces and assets to threatened axes and establish a reserve. 
While subunits are performing these measures he determines the 
decision, which includes the very same questions as a decision 
for a defense. 
  The company commander makes the decision for battle in 
encirclement basically on the terrain and the battalion 
commander does so on the terrain and from a map, then he updates 
it once again on the terrain on those axes not viewed from the 
COP. 
  An operation order is not issued in connection with the fact 
that battle in encirclement is organized in the course of a 
defense or other operations. The company (battalion) commander 
assigns combat missions to subunits as brief operational 
instructions. The coordination procedure, and if necessary also 
some of the most important questions of comprehensive support, 
must be communicated to subordinate commanders. 
  Coordination is organized for those same missions as in 
defensive battle. The efforts of platoons (companies), weapons 
and the reserve are coordinated additionally in case the enemy 
delivers strikes from several directions and splits the battle 
formation into parts. 
  Organization of logistic support is difficult during company 
(battalion) battle in encirclement. Encircled subunits will be 
forced to fight with those reserves of ammunition and supplies 
which they have. In connection with this the company (battalion) 
commander immediately must make a strict accounting of all 
available ammunition, fuel, food and other supplies, establish a 
rigid regime of consumption and if necessary redistribute them 
among subunits in accordance with missions being performed. 
  Reserves of supplies may be replenished by air delivery, and 
use of captured weapons and ammunition is possible. 
  Conduct of battle in encirclement begins from the moment 
superior enemy forces move to the flanks and rear of a company 
(battalion) and intercept all withdrawal routes for linkup with 
friendly troops. 
  Simultaneously with encirclement, the enemy immediately will 
attempt to break up the company (battalion) battle formation and 
destroy it in detail. To keep this from happening, it is 
necessary to conduct reconnaissance constantly, estimate the 
situation at hand thoroughly and comprehensively, and update the 
decision and communicate combat missions to subunits promptly. 
  Subunits must hold occupied strongpoints firmly, maneuver 
forces, assets and fire to a threatened axis quickly and 
covertly, and be ready to destroy an enemy who has penetrated by 
fire and a determined counterattack. 
  An enemy assault is repelled by fire of all company 
(battalion) weapons. When the enemy penetrates, the company 
(battalion) commander takes all steps to stop his advance and 
then destroy him by a swift counterattack. 
  If he has not achieved success on one axis, after regrouping 
forces and assets the enemy will attempt to deliver an attack in 
another sector. In this situation a commander must promptly 
discover the transfer of enemy efforts and quickly organize and 
accomplish a maneuver of the reserve or of subunits from sectors 
not under attack to the threatened axis. 
  In those cases where the enemy has penetrated in several 
sectors, steps must be taken to destroy him on the most 
dangerous axis. A shortage of forces and assets will not allow 
routing a penetrated enemy on other axes as well, and so there 
it is advisable to prevent a further advance of his subunits 
into the depth of the company (battalion) defense. 
  During battle in encirclement the company (battalion) must 
maintain constant coordination with subunits operating outside 
of encirclement, promptly mark the position of subordinate 
subunits for friendly aviation, and participate in 
counterattacks conducted by the senior commander. 
  To receive cargoes a company (battalion) prepares sites for 
helicopters to land in its disposition and organizes the receipt 
and gathering of cargoes dropped from aircraft. 
  It is necessary to conduct political work skillfully and 
purposefully to keep the personnel's morale at a high level and 
to preserve efficiency and constant combat readiness of subunits. 
  In organizing and conducting battle in encirclement the 
company (battalion) commander must strive to inflict maximum 
damage on the enemy and create conditions for breaking out of 
encirclement. 
<H5>  2. Breakout of Encirclement </H5>
  Breaking out of encirclement consists of breaking through 
the 
noose of encirclement in a selected sector (on a selected axis) 
for linkup with friendly troops (Diagram 20). 
  To achieve surprise and concealment of operations it is 
advisable to begin the breakthrough of encirclement at night and 
under conditions of limited visibility, sometimes even without 
conducting fire preparation. 
  A breakout of encirclement is accomplished by permission of 
the senior commander in coordination with subunits conducting 
oncoming combat operations from the outer perimeter, or 
independently. 
  The senior commander indicates the direction of breakthrough 
and of further operations in a breakout of encirclement in 
coordination with subunits conducting oncoming combat operations 
from the outer perimeter. If a company (battalion) is breaking 
out independently, the company (battalion) commander determines 
the direction for breakout and procedure for further operations. 
  Breaking out of encirclement in small groups and without 
armament usually leads to heavy losses and disruption of the 
organizational integrity of subunits, and therefore is 
impermissible. 
  In aligning the battle formation it should be taken into 
account that a company (battalion) not only has to break through 
the perimeter of envelopment, but also hold the strongpoint 
(area) for a certain time, secure flanks of subunits 
accomplishing the breakthrough and perform missions that arise 
suddenly. Therefore the company (battalion) battle formation 
should include the following: breakthrough subunits; subunits 
assigned to cover the breakthrough, including those assigned to 
secure flanks (screens); a reserve; and reinforcing weapons and 
subunits remaining directly subordinate to the company 
(battalion) commander. 
  At least half of all subunits and a large part of the 
artillery are assigned to break through the noose of 
encirclement. Motorized rifle (tank) subunits are reinforced by 
tanks (motorized rifle subunits), AT weapons, and mineclearing 
(obstacle breaching) equipment. The makeup of breakthrough 
subunits includes the most combat-effective forces and assets. 
  A minimum number of subunits remains on the rest of the 
perimeter of envelopment for covering the breakthrough with the 
mission of holding occupied positions, misleading the enemy by 
active operations, diverting a portion of his forces (reserves) 
from the breakthrough axis, prevent a narrowing of the perimeter 
of envelopment and of the breakthrough sector, and supporting 
the exit of all company (battalion) subunits from the noose of 
encirclement. Usually a platoon (company) and sometimes even 
more is assigned from the company (battalion) to the covering 
force. The least amount of forces and assets is assigned in 
those cases where the enemy shows no activeness and the breakout 
of encirclement is done at night or under conditions of poor 
visibility. As a rule, an MRP (TP), tanks, and BMP-equipped 
MRS's are assigned to screens. The number of screens depends on 
the depth of the perimeter of envelopment on the breakthrough 
axis. Screens are disposed at that distance from each other 
ensuring cover of flanks of subunits making the breakthrough on 
the most threatened axes. Screens operate as flank security 
elements after the company (battalion) breaks out of the noose 
of encirclement and until linkup with friendly troops. As a 
rule, screens are assigned from the makeup of subunits assigned 
as a covering force. 
  Subunits assigned as a covering force are reinforced by 
artillery, tanks (motorized rifle subunits), and subunits of 
engineer troops with obstacle assets. 
  A company reserve usually is established consisting of an 
MRS 
(tank), and a battalion reserve consisting of a platoon, 
intended for performing missions arising in the course of 
battle. It is disposed in that place from where there is an 
opportunity to support subunits assigned for the breakthrough in 
a short time, exploit their success and if necessary repel 
assaults of an enemy who has penetrated the defense of covering- 
force subunits. 
  Attached and organic artillery as well as artillery which 
has 
ended up in encirclement together with the company (battalion), 
with the exception of that assigned to reinforce covering 
forces, is used centrally on the axis of breakthrough of the 
perimeter of envelopment. 
  Artillery, other weapons and subunits remaining directly 
subordinate to the company (battalion) commander take up firing 
positions (areas) behind battle formations of subunits breaking 
through the perimeter of envelopment, in readiness to support 
their actions and the breakout of remaining forces and assets 
from encirclement through the breach formed. When the perimeter 
of envelopment is small, they may remain at occupied firing 
positions (or in occupied areas). 
  When a company (battalion) breaks out of encirclement as 
part 
of a battalion (regiment) in coordination with subunits 
conducting oncoming combat operations from the outer perimeter, 
the combat mission is assigned to the company (battalion) by the 
senior commander. With an independent breakout of encirclement 
by a company (battalion), its combat mission as a 
rule is specified by the commander of this company (battalion). 
A company is given an immediate mission and a direction for 
continuing the attack and a battalion is given an immediate and 
subsequent mission. 
  The battalion's immediate mission usually is to destroy the 
enemy on the breakthrough axis and breach the perimeter of 
envelopment. 
  The subsequent mission is for subunits to break out of 
encirclement and link up with troops operating toward them in 
assisting the breakout, or to take an area providing favorable 
conditions for further operations. 
  The company's immediate mission usually is to destroy the 
enemy on the breakthrough axis and breach the perimeter of 
envelopment. 
  The immediate mission of a company operating as part of a 
battalion will coincide with the battalion's immediate mission 
in depth, and so the direction for continuing the attack is 
determined so as to ensure performance of the battalion's 
subsequent mission. 
  In other cases this direction should ensure a linkup with 
subunits operating toward the company from the outer perimeter 
of envelopment or the company's breakout into an area favoring 
further operations. 
  The depth of the company (battalion) immediate mission will 
depend on the makeup and alignment of the enemy grouping on the 
axis of breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment. 
  As shown by an analysis of enemy views on conduct of combat 
operations to destroy encircled groupings, the basis of troops 
forming the inner perimeter of envelopment usually consists of 
battalions (battalion task forces) whose battle formation is 
formed in one or two echelons depending on the makeup of the 
encircled grouping. In this case the depth of the perimeter of 
envelopment averages 3-5 km. The depth of the company 
(battalion) immediate mission accordingly will be the very same. 
  Enemy subunits making up the perimeter of envelopment as a 
rule are in an offensive grouping, and so a company (battalion) 
needs to create a superiority of no more than 1-1.5 times for 
success of the breakthrough. But in connection with the fact 
that in this case densities of enemy forces and assets are 
significantly higher than in the defense and subunits fighting 
the battle in encirclement have considerable losses, the 
breakthrough frontage of the company (battalion) usually is up 
to 500 (1,000) m. 
  Organizing the breakout of encirclement begins with receipt 
of the combat mission or with the senior commander's 
authorization to break out of encirclement. 
  The company (battalion) commander makes the decision from 
the 
map and updates it during ground reconnaissance of the 
breakthrough sector. 
  The very same questions are determined in the 
decision for breaking out of encirclement as in the 
decision for the attack: commander's concept, combat missions 
for subunits, the main questions of coordination, and 
organization of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  In the commander's concept the company (battalion) 
commander outlines the following: sector and axis for 
breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment; methods of 
defeating the enemy (what enemy to defeat where, in what 
sequence and how, with an indication of the procedure for his 
engagement by fire of tanks, BMP's and other organic and 
attached weapons; measures for deception, including the sector 
and axis of diversionary actions; actions of subunits in 
breaking out of encirclement; and the order of withdrawal of 
subunits covering the breakthrough and assigned to screens); 
company (battalion) battle formation; forces and assets used for 
the breakthrough and for covering and securing flanks; attack 
position of subunits intended for the breakthrough and the 
procedure and time for occupying it. 
  The breakthrough axis should be selected where it is 
possible 
to concentrate forces and assets in the breakthrough sector 
covertly in a short time, where the enemy's perimeter of 
envelopment has least depth, and so as to provide for linkup 
over the shortest distance with subunits conducting oncoming 
combat operations from the outer perimeter. 
  Choosing the time for breaking through the perimeter of 
envelopment requires the company (battalion) commander to 
perform a thorough analysis of the situation at hand. It is most 
advantageous to begin the breakthrough at that moment when the 
enemy has ceased active operations to destroy the encircled 
subunits or has shifted to sealing them off, but has not managed 
to consolidate and change his battle formation and to create a 
defensive grouping. 
  Diversionary actions are conducted to mislead the enemy 
regarding the axis of the company (battalion) breakout of 
encirclement and to divert his reserves from the breakthrough 
sector. An axis and sector are designated for conducting 
diversionary actions; up to a platoon is assigned for this in 
the company and up to a company in the battalion with means of 
reinforcement, and they are supported by artillery fire. 
Diversionary actions may begin simultaneously with the 
breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment or somewhat 
earlier, depending on the situation. If they precede the 
breakthrough, there is the possibility of diverting enemy 
reserves from the breakthrough sector, but at the same time the 
diversionary actions may give the enemy grounds to presume that 
a breakout of the company (battalion) from encirclement is 
imminent. 
  In his decision the company (battalion) commander assigns 
missions to subunits in the following sequence: 
breakthrough subunits; subunits for covering and securing 
flanks; the reserve; and reinforcing weapons and subunits 
remaining directly subordinate to him. 
  The main questions of coordination additionally 
reflect the procedure for coordinated operations of company 
(battalion) subunits with troops which are outside the perimeter 
of envelopment. 
  Subsequently the company (battalion) commander determines 
the 
following: missions by kinds of support to battle and 
organization of reconnaissance before and during the 
breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment and in the course 
of further operations; and the procedure for expenditure of 
ammunition and fuel, evacuation of wounded and destruction of 
unserviceable vehicles and weapons. 
  In the course of ground reconnaissance he clarifies the 
following: enemy makeup, situation and nature of operations; 
whether the enemy is shifting to sealing off the encircled 
troops or is preparing repeat assaults; targets, attack position 
of subunits, procedure for occupying it, and method of assault; 
missions for breakthrough subunits, procedure for breaking out 
of encirclement, and questions of coordination among weapons and 
assaulting subunits. 
  With a breakout of encirclement at night the company 
(battalion) commander specifies the line which subunits must 
reach by dawn. 
  Combat missions are communicated to subunits in the form of 
an operation order and sometimes also by brief 
operational instructions. The following are indicated in 
assigning missions: 

  -  for subunits designated for the breakthrough-- 
means of reinforcement, missions, attack position for the 
breakthrough and time of occupying it; 
  -  for covering-force subunits--means of reinforcement, 
mission, sector of diversionary actions, what forces and assets 
to allocate for covering flanks (to screens), who is supporting, 
and the time and procedure for withdrawal; 
  -  for the reserve--makeup, assembly area and procedure 
for displacement; 
  -  for attached artillery subunit, mortar (SP artillery) 
battery, grenade launcher subunit, air defense subunit and AT 
subunit--missions for fire engagement of the enemy and for 
covering friendly subunits against air strikes, and the time and 
procedure for breaking out of encirclement. 


    After assigning combat missions the company commander issues 
coordination instructions, in which he first of all 
coordinates actions of subunits breaking through the perimeter 
of envelopment with each other, with weapons and with covering- 
force subunits. 
  Coordination of efforts with covering-force subunits 
consists 
of determining the method and procedure for them to hold 
positions and withdraw from line to line. The number of 
withdrawal lines depends on the nature of enemy pressure and 
terrain conditions. 
  Special attention is given to coordinating oncoming combat 
operations of friendly subunits and troops operating outside of 
encirclement in terms of time, axes of operations and the lines 
they capture, above all in the approach to the linkup point in 
order to preclude mutual engagement by fire. 
  After assigning combat missions and organizing coordination 
the company (battalion) commander issues instructions on 
organizing comprehensive support in which he establishes the 
following: missions for observers (for reconnaissance); measures 
for ensuring concealment and surprise of the breakthrough; 
nature and procedure of engineer preparation of terrain in the 
breakthrough sector and at the covering-force position 
(positions); places, time and methods of breaching enemy 
obstacles; what should be mined, demolished or destroyed and at 
what time; organization of C[.sup]2[/] during the 
breakthrough; procedure for marking one's position for aviation 
and for recognition of friendly troops operating from the outer 
perimeter of envelopment; procedure for evacuating wounded and 
sick as well as weapons and vehicles; and commanders responsible 
for fulfilling comprehensive support measures. 
  If the breakout of encirclement is done at night, the 
company 
(battalion) commander additionally indicates the procedure for 
illumination support of the attack and withdrawal, reference 
points, and azimuth (direction) of attack. Conventional signs 
which are placed on equipment and the personnel's clothing also 
are established. 
  Ammunition and fuel are redistributed, with the bulk 
allocated to subunits making the breakthrough of the perimeter 
of envelopment. 
  Organizing comprehensive support is an important moment in 
preparing for battle, since a successful breakout of subunits 
from encirclement depends on it to a considerable extent. 
  Conduct of battle when breaking out of encirclement is 
characterized by a short duration and extreme ferocity. In a 
short time the company (battalion) commander has to break 
through the perimeter of envelopment, create a breach in the 
noose of encirclement and support the breakout of all subunits 
at full strength with weapons. 
  Success in breaking out of encirclement depends largely on 
timely establishment of the battle formation, disengagement, and 
occupation of an attack position by breakthrough subunits. 
  Disengagement and occupation of an attack position by 
breakthrough subunits can be done simultaneously or successively 
with observance of maskirovka. Depending on terrain and 
visibility conditions, it is advisable to conceal these 
operations by use of smoke (aerosols) while preserving the 
regime of previous troop activity on the entire company 
(battalion) defense frontage. 
  Covering-force subunits conducting diversionary actions 
decisively assault the enemy at the prescribed time, supported 
by fire of attached artillery, and divert his reserves to 
themselves; if the assault is disrupted they conduct a 
firefight, denying the enemy an opportunity to execute a 
maneuver of forces and assets. 
  As a rule, the breakthrough begins with fire preparation. If 
fire preparation is not conducted, for example at night, then 
fire commences when breakthrough subunits launch the assault and 
artillery immediately accomplishes fire support of the assault. 
  Tanks may be used in fire preparation. 
  It is advisable to conduct the assault in BMP's (BTR's) for 
rapid exploitation of results of fire damage of the enemy. 
Subunits assault in dismounted formation if an assault in 
fighting vehicles is impossible or inadvisable because of 
situation conditions (terrain difficult of access, insufficient 
degree of damage of enemy AT weapons). 
  Subunits which are breaking through the perimeter of 
envelopment advance swiftly without allowing an enemy who has 
been neutralized by fire to restore combat effectiveness. 
Artillery and weapons assigned for direct fire neutralize and 
destroy enemy targets which have come alive or have been newly 
detected. 
  Subunits assigned for covering flanks (screens) consolidate 
at favorable lines as the breakthrough develops, in readiness to 
repel enemy assaults against the flank of the breakthrough 
subunits, and form a corridor into which company (battalion) 
subunits immediately begin moving in the previously established 
order. If necessary, screens are reinforced by the reserve. 
Technical support and rear subunits break out of encirclement 
immediately behind subunits making the breakthrough, and 
transportation assets are provided first of all for evacuating 
the wounded and sick. Weapons, vehicles, missiles, ammunition, 
fuel and other supplies which cannot be evacuated are destroyed 
only by order of the company (battalion) commander. 
  During the breakthrough, covering-force subunits hold 
occupied positions, not allowing a narrowing of the perimeter of 
envelopment, and withdraw only by order of the company 
(battalion) commander. The withdrawal is made from line to line 
under cover of fire of all kinds of weapons, aerosols (smoke), 
obstacles and screens, which withdraw only after withdrawal of 
covering-force subunits. If the distance of subunits attacking 
from the outer perimeter is significant, the withdrawal of 
covering-force subunits can begin only after breakthrough of the 
perimeter of envelopment. 
  With a short distance to troops operating from the outer 
perimeter of envelopment, covering-force subunits withdraw after 
the company (battalion) links up with friendly troops. 
  After the breakthrough the company (battalion) continues 
nonstop movement for linkup with friendly troops, using a 
portion of the forces to hold the breach which has formed until 
all subunits break out of the noose of encirclement. 
  Artillery concentrates efforts on destroying enemy weapons 
on 
flanks of the corridor, supporting the unhindered advance of 
columns of subunits breaking out of encirclement. Artillery from 
the makeup of breakthrough forces displaces as in offensive 
battle in such a way as to ensure continuous fire support of the 
assaulting subunits. Artillery and other weapons assigned to 
reinforce the covering forces change firing positions in advance 
before motorized rifle and tank subunits begin to withdraw. 
  AT and air defense subunits displace in battle formations of 
the assaulting subunits or immediately behind them at shortened 
distances. 
  During the breakout of encirclement the company (battalion) 
commander organizes march security using screens which have 
performed their mission, and conducts continuous reconnaissance. 
  Special subunits are assigned to preempt the enemy in 
capturing favorable lines, defiles, and crossings over water 
obstacles. These same subunits are first to move to the 
established linkup point with troops attacking from the outer 
perimeter. 
  When there is a threat of the enemy closing the breach and 
breaking up the company (battalion) battle formation, some of 
the subunits which have broken out of the noose of encirclement 
return and assault the enemy, restoring the corridor. The 
company (battalion) reserve is used for this same purpose. 
  The company (battalion) commander exercises C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits during the breakout of encirclement from his COP, 
located in a BMP (BTR, tank), and proceeds with subunits making 
the breakthrough. 
  As a rule, communications are maintained over wire means 
before the beginning of the breakthrough, and subsequently by 
radio. Radio operating data for communicating with troops 
operating from the outer perimeter are communicated to 
commanders of platoons (companies, separate platoons) in case of 
independent operations when communications are lost with the 
company (battalion) commander. 
  The company (battalion) is assigned a new combat mission 
after it breaks out of encirclement (links up with friendly 
troops, takes an area providing favorable conditions for further 
operations). 
<H5>  Chapter VIII - Movement </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of Movement and the March </H5>
  A company (battalion) always must be ready for movement 
under 
conditions of the threat of enemy use of mass destruction and 
precision weapons and remote minelaying systems and the effect 
of his aviation, airborne assault forces, airmobile and raiding 
and reconnaissance parties, NBC contamination, and destructive 
damage of roads and crossings. 
  A company (battalion) may move under its own power (by 
march), be transported by rail or sea (river) transportation, or 
move by a combination method. In addition, an MRC (MRB) may be 
carried by air transport and a TC (TB) on trucktrailer rigs. 
  A march is the organized movement of subunits in 
columns along roads and cross-country routes for moving to a 
designated area or an indicated line. It is the basic method of 
company (battalion) movement. 
  Depending on the company (battalion) mission and its 
distance 
from the enemy, a march may be made in anticipation of 
engagement with the enemy or without the threat of a 
clash with him, and in terms of direction of movement it 
may be made toward or along the front or from front to rear. 
  In all cases a march must be made covertly, as a rule at 
night or under other conditions of limited visibility, and also 
during the day in a combat situation and in the deep rear of 
friendly troops. Under all situation conditions subunits must 
arrive in the designated area or at the indicated line promptly, 
at full strength and ready to perform the combat mission. 
  The company (battalion) marches as one column. The distance 
between vehicles and subunits in a column may be 25-50 m. 
Distances are increased when moving under conditions of limited 
visibility, along dusty roads, with ground surface icing, on 
steep upgrades, downgrades and turns, and at increased speed. 
Distances between combat vehicles may be 100-150 m when moving 
on open terrain when there is a threat of enemy use of precision 
weapons. 
  March capabilities of subunits and units are 
understood to mean the capability of covering the maximum 
possible distance under one's own power in one or more days with 
retention of combat effectiveness and full readiness to perform 
the assigned mission. Basic indicators of company (battalion) 
march capabilities are average rate of movement and amount of a 
day's march. Average rate of movement on a march not counting 
time for halts is the determining indicator. 
  The average rate of movement of an MRC or TC (MRB 
or TB) not counting time for halts may be 20-25 km/hr. It may be 
reduced to 15-20 km/hr when making a march in the mountains, 
deserts, northern areas, on marshy woodland, in the season of 
bad roads, in fog and under other unfavorable conditions. In all 
cases the march must be made at the maximum speed possible for 
given conditions. 
  In calculating the march the company (battalion) commander 
also determines rate of movement when forming up and 
concentrating the column. Experience shows that it is taken to 
be from 0.5 to 0.75 of the average rate of movement of a column 
on the march, i.e., approximately 10-12 km/hr. 
  The amount of a day's march is affected not only 
by average rate of movement, but also by the overall time of 
column movement in a 24 hour period. The experience of the Great 
Patriotic War and postwar exercises has established that drivers 
retain high working capacity during 10-12 hours of movement in a 
24 hour period. The amount of a day's march is determined with 
consideration of the established average rate of movement of 20- 
25 km/hr as well as the time of movement proper. 
  March capabilities of a company (battalion) in terms of fuel 
are determined from a calculation of the consumption only of its 
authorized unit reserves. They are figured by the ratio of the 
fuel reserve in vehicle tanks (less the minimum level of 
supply-- 0.2 of a fueling) to fuel consumption per kilometer of 
route and depend on fuel tank capacity (the fueling), fuel 
consumption per kilometer of route when moving in a column, and 
presence of unit- level supplies in the subunit. 
  On the march a company may operate in a forward, flank, or 
rear security element or march as part of a battalion column. A 
battalion may march as part of the regimental main body and also 
may operate in a forward detachment or advance guard. 
  The mission of a company (battalion) marching as part of the 
battalion (regimental) main body is to arrive on time in the 
designated area or at an indicated line in readiness to conduct 
battle. 
  A company operating in march security must support the 
unhindered movement of the main body, prevent penetration of 
enemy ground reconnaissance to it, preclude an enemy surprise 
attack and provide the protected column with favorable 
conditions for deploying and engaging. 
  The march formation of a company (battalion) on the march is 
a column. When a company operates in march security and a 
battalion operates in a forward detachment or advance guard, 
their march formation consists of a main body column and 
security elements. The march formation for a march in 
anticipation of engagement is formed based on the concept of 
upcoming battle and situation conditions; without the threat of 
an encounter with the enemy it is formed with consideration of 
convenience of movement and protection against enemy mass 
destruction and precision weapons and his technical 
reconnaissance assets. The more advisable place of organic and 
attached subunits of combat arms and special troops in the 
company (battalion) main body column is shown in Figs. 8 and 9. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-10L-135A>      Fig. 8. Alignment variations of company march formation for operating in forward security </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-10L-136A>      Fig. 9. Alignment variations of march formation of battalion in forward detachment: </FIG>


  a. Reinforced TB 
  b. Reinforced MRB&lt;/graphic&gt; 

  In anticipation of engagement a reconnaissance patrol is 
sent 
out from a battalion operating in a forward detachment, advance 
guard, or at the head of the regimental main body column. If the 
reconnaissance platoon is not sent out on patrol, it marches at 
the head of the battalion main body column, as a rule behind the 
COP. 
  A battalion intended for operations in a forward detachment 
or advance guard sends out a forward security element for column 
security made up of a reinforced platoon or a company to a 
distance of 5-10 km in the direction of movement, and if 
necessary sends a flank security element (rear security element) 
or patrol squads (tanks) toward the flanks and to the rear. A 
company operating in a forward security element sends out a 
point consisting of a platoon to a distance of 3-5 km in the 
direction of movement, and a forward security element up to a 
platoon in strength sends out a patrol squad (tank) to a 
distance ensuring observation of it and its support by fire. The 
distance away of march security depends on its makeup and the 
mission received and should enable conducting battle with the 
enemy independently until the approach of the main body. 
  The depth of the company (battalion) march formation is 
figured from the head of the march security to and including the 
trail vehicle (technical maintenance echelon). To calculate it, 
multiply the number of vehicles in the column (less one) by the 
prescribed distance between them, adding the distance of march 
security and the cumulative length of all vehicles in the column. 
  For the timely, organized beginning and end of the march, a 
battalion assigned to an advance guard and a company assigned to 
a forward security element is given a start point [iskhodnyy 
punkt] and control points [punkt regulirovaniya] and times of 
crossing them, and places and time of short halts and the day's 
(night's) rest halt (Diagram 21). The distance of the start 
point should ensure forming up the company (battalion) column 
from the disposition area and may be 5-10 km. 
  Short halts and the day (night) rest halt are designated for 
checking the condition of weapons and vehicles, for servicing 
and maintaining them, and for the personnel's meals and rest. 
The following are designated: short halts lasting up to one hour 
every 3-4 hours of movement, one lasting up to two hours in the 
second half of a day's march, and a day (night) rest halt at the 
end of each day's march. 
  Combat, technical and logistic support are of decisive 
importance in the company's (battalion's) successful performance 
of the mission on the march. 
  Reconnaissance is conducted on the march for timely 
collection of necessary intelligence on the enemy and terrain. 
The battalion commander sends out a reconnaissance patrol in 
anticipation of an encounter with the enemy. The company 
(battalion) commander receives data on the enemy and terrain 
from march security entities and also from the senior commander 
(chief) and reconnaissance entities. 
  Protection against mass destruction weapons is achieved by 
strict observance of prescribed distances; by preventing an 
accumulation of subunits ahead of the start point, at short 
halts and forced stops, when negotiating chokepoints, water 
obstacles and passes, and in rest areas; by skillful use of 
protective properties of combat vehicles, transport, the terrain 
and individual protective gear; and by engineer preparation of 
rest and concentration areas. 
  Concealment of the movement and concentration of company 
(battalion) subunits are goals of maskirovka on the march. This 
is achieved above all by choice of the movement route, short 
halts, and day (night) rest halt areas, with maximum advantage 
taken of the terrain's concealing properties and also by 
subunits' observance of camouflage discipline. 
  Engineer support must create conditions ensuring unhindered 
movement of the company (battalion) along the route at the 
prescribed speed and its timely arrival in the designated area 
or at the indicated line. It includes engineer reconnaissance; 
performance of engineer work on the route, in halt (rest) areas 
and in the concentration area; and accomplishment of maskirovka 
measures. 
  A forward security element at company strength usually is 
reinforced by a combat engineer squad, and an advance guard 
(forward detachment) by up to a combat engineer platoon with 
engineer assets (route clearance vehicles, bridgelayers and so 
on). In this case, the company commander usually assigns up to a 
combat engineer squad to the point to perform engineer 
reconnaissance and the battalion commander in addition assigns 
2- 3 combat engineers to the reconnaissance patrol. 
  Chemical warfare support on the march provides for 
conducting 
NBC reconnaissance of the movement route and adjoining terrain, 
at short halt sites, and in day (night) rest halt areas; 
accomplishing radiological monitoring of personnel exposure and 
contamination of equipment by radioactive substances, and 
chemical warfare monitoring of their contamination by chemical 
agents after enemy use of mass destruction weapons; performing 
decontamination of subunits and providing them with means of 
protection when preparing for the march. Chemical warfare 
support is accomplished by a specially trained squad (crew, 
team) in each company (battery), equipped with radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance devices. In some cases the radiological 
and chemical reconnaissance squad attached to the battalion may 
be included in the reconnaissance patrol or forward security 
element. 
  Technical and logistic support basically is achieved by the 
presence of the company (battalion) technical maintenance 
echelon, by making a visual inspection of weapons and vehicles 
at halts, by performing daily routine servicing and maintenance 
in the concentration area, and by organizing meals for personnel 
and medical aid for them if necessary. 
  Before the march the company (battalion) commander is 
obligated to take steps for timely replenishment of ammunition, 
fuel, food, medical equipment and supplies, and other supplies 
to prescribed norms. 
<H5>  2. Organization and Execution of the March </H5>
  Organization of the march. Successful performance 
of the mission on the march depends largely on skilled 
organization, which begins with the company (battalion) 
commander receiving the operation order or operational 
instructions. The procedure and content of his work are 
determined by the mission received, time available and the 
specific situation. In all cases the company (battalion) 
commander must analyze the mission, determine measures which 
must be taken immediately for most rapid preparation for the 
march, perform a time calculation, issue instructions to 
commanders of subordinate and attached subunits on preparing for 
the march, estimate the situation, make the decision, issue the 
operation order, organize coordination, and give instructions on 
organizing comprehensive support of the march, on C[.sup]2[/] 
and on political work. Then he directs immediate preparation of 
subunits for the march. 
  In analyzing the mission the following are studied 
from a map in addition to the usual questions: movement route, 
its length and passability, conditions for executing the march, 
lines and time of likely encounter with the enemy or for what 
actions to be ready, places and time of short halts, and also 
places, time and procedure for vehicle refueling, personnel 
messing, and replenishment of reserves of supplies consumed 
during the march. 
  Based on the mission analysis the company (battalion) 
commander determines the measures for preparing subunits for the 
march and performs a time calculation. The following 
may be such measures: familiarization of deputies and platoon 
(company) commanders with the combat mission received; issuing 
necessary instructions on preparing for the march and organizing 
reconnaissance; preparing subunits assigned to march security; 
replenishing reserves of ammunition, fuel and other supplies to 
prescribed norms; servicing and maintaining weapons and 
vehicles; evacuating the wounded and sick; and turning over 
unserviceable equipment which cannot be repaired by the 
beginning of the march. 
  The time the mission is received and the time of crossing 
the 
start point are the initial data for calculating the time for 
organizing the march. The overall time for organizing the march 
is determined based on these data and is allotted to the 
principal measures. Account is taken of the time for extending 
the company (battalion) column up to the start point. 
  Having calculated the time, with respect to questions of 
preparing for the march the commander indicates information on 
the enemy, actions for which the company (battalion) must be 
ready, procedure for preparing personnel, weapons and vehicles 
for the march and the time and place of arrival of means of 
reinforcement (if assigned). 
  In the situation estimate the company (battalion) 
commander studies march capabilities of organic and attached 
subunits; determines permissible rates of movement by route 
sectors and the distance between vehicles for purposes of 
protection against precision weapons and figures movement time 
along each sector; estimates the nature of terrain and 
conditions for protection and maskirovka in short halt and day 
(night) rest halt areas and the concentration area; determines 
the extent of their engineer preparation; performs other 
necessary calculations; and determines the procedure for 
observation and maintaining communications during the march. 
  In the course of estimating the situation the company 
(battalion) commander performs a march calculation. It consists 
of determining the length of the route, overall time for 
executing the march, average rate of movement and rate of 
movement in individual route sectors, time for crossing the 
start point and control points and time of arrival of march 
security entities in the designated area or at the indicated 
line, and places, time and duration of short halts for march 
security entities as well as for the main body column, if they 
were not indicated for the latter by the battalion (regimental) 
commander. 
  Based on analysis of the mission received, conclusions from 
the situation estimate and the march calculation, the company 
(battalion) commander makes his decision and formalizes it on 
the map. In the concept for the march the company 
(battalion) commander specifies the following: alignment of the 
march formation; makeup, missions and distance away of the march 
security; rate of movement along route sectors and distances 
between vehicles; procedure for repelling enemy air strikes; in 
addition, in anticipation of engagement with the enemy, the 
procedure for actions of the point (forward security element), 
patrol squads (tanks) and main body, alignment of the battle 
formation and form of maneuver. 
  In formalizing the decision the following are reflected 
on the map: situation of the enemy and troops operating in 
front; disposition area of the company (battalion) and its 
subunits; movement route broken down into sectors of 5-10 km 
each; start point, control points and time of crossing them by 
the column head of the point (forward security element) and main 
body; movement routes of flank security elements; locations of 
traffic control posts and commandant's posts; places, time and 
duration of short halts for the main body column and march 
security; area or line which subunits must reach after executing 
the march; probable company (battalion) deployment lines for 
battle in an encounter with the enemy and possible procedure for 
operations there by the point (forward security element) and 
main body column; movement routes of adjacent subunits and their 
missions. The following are plotted on the map in addition: 
march formation diagram indicating the distribution of forces 
and assets along the column, depth of the main body column and 
distance away of march security; route sectors in terms of 
movement conditions, and their size and rates of movement in 
each of them; overall time for the march, time for extending the 
column to the start point, and time for short halts and for 
movement; average rate of movement; and control signals. The 
combat mission is communicated to subordinates by operation 
order. 
  In the operation order for the march the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: 
  First paragraph--information on the enemy. 
  Second paragraph--missions of adjacent subunits. 
  Third paragraph--company (battalion) mission; 
movement route (direction of battalion operations in forward 
detachment); place of battalion (regiment) in march formation; 
concentration (rest) area or line; time of arrival at (movement 
to) designated area or indicated line and for what actions to be 
ready; start point, control points and time of crossing them; 
places and time of short halts; concept of the march. 
  Fourth paragraph--after the words "I 
order"--missions for subunits: 

  -  point (forward security element) and patrol squads 
(tanks)- -makeup, combat mission, time for crossing start point 
and control points and situation report procedure; 
  -  motorized rifle and tank platoons (companies)--means of 
reinforcement, mission, place in march column, procedure for 
commencing and conducting fire against airborne targets, and 
procedure for operations when making the march in anticipation 
of engagement with the enemy; 
  -  artillery subunits and other weapons--missions for the march 
and when engaging the enemy, place in march column and in 
formation; 
  -  air defense subunit--missions for covering-force subunits in 
movement, at short halts, in rest areas and in concentration 
area, place in march column, duty weapons (subunits) and their 
firing (launch) positions, time and degree of readiness; 
  -  other company (battalion) subunits and reinforcing subunits-- 
place in march column and missions which they must be ready to 
perform. 


    Fifth paragraph--places and procedure for 
refueling vehicles in the course of the march and, in 
anticipation of engagement in addition, ammunition and fuel 
consumption for mission performance. 
  Sixth paragraph--readiness time for the march. 
  Seventh paragraph--procedure for observation and 
communications in the course of the march, place of the company 
(battalion) commander's COP in the column, and deputies. 
  Having issued the operation order, he organizes 
coordination. Coordination instructions must reflect the 
following matters: procedure for extending the company 
(battalion) column and crossing the start point; procedure for 
movement, for observing march discipline and negotiating 
obstacles and destructive damage on the route; procedure for 
operations in an enemy air raid, when the enemy employs raiding 
and reconnaissance parties, airborne assault forces and 
airmobile subunits, and in an encounter with the enemy by the 
point (forward security element) and main body; warning, control 
and coordination signals and signals for recognition of friendly 
aircraft and helicopters, as well as methods for marking one's 
position in the course of the march and when conducting battle. 
  After organizing coordination the company (battalion) 
commander issues instructions on comprehensive support. He 
specifies the following in addition to the usual matters: 
procedure for negotiating obstacles, including those laid by the 
remote method, and areas of destructive damage on the route; 
extent of and procedure for engineer preparation of the day 
(night) rest halt (concentration) area; measures for protection 
against precision and incendiary weapons; procedure for using 
night vision (illumination) devices and for maskirovka, and also 
safety measures and procedures for maintaining march discipline. 
  Before the beginning of the march the company (battalion) 
commander organizes preparation of the subunits. At the 
prescribed time he reports readiness for the march to the 
battalion (regimental) commander. 
  Execution of the march. By the beginning of 
movement, at the commander's signal company (battalion) subunits 
and means of reinforcement take their places in the march 
formation in accordance with the issued order. The forward 
security element is first to move out. It advances at a rate so 
as to cross the start point at the prescribed time. Then comes 
the main body, the head of whose column crosses exactly at the 
designated time. The company (battalion) commander proceeds at 
the head of this column, compares the movement route with the 
map, maintains the prescribed march order and controls 
operations of march security. 
  Movement is made only on the right side of the road with 
observance of the prescribed rate of movement, distances between 
vehicles and safety measures. The company (battalion) column 
passes through chokepoints and tunnels and over bridges nonstop 
at maximum possible speed. 
  Radar dead ground formed by terrain folds and local 
features; 
built-up areas; and roadside vegetation are used for protection 
against enemy precision weapons. When moving along open, 
unconcealed route sectors, vehicles are not permitted to bunch 
up or columns to halt, and rate of movement and distances 
between vehicles are increased. 
  Vehicles move at night using night vision or blackout 
devices, and movement is made with external illumination devices 
completely off in sectors where terrain is viewed by the enemy 
and on a bright night. 
  Enemy air strikes on the march are repelled by fire in 
movement or from short halts by forces of air defense subunits 
and by fire of weapons of motorized rifle (tank) subunits 
assigned for this. Hatches of BMP's, BTR's and tanks, except 
those from which fire will be conducted, are closed. Subunit 
personnel shift protective masks to the ready position. 
  The company (battalion) continues movement in response to 
signals warning of NBC contamination. Before crossing a zone of 
contamination the hatches, doors, firing ports and louvers in 
BMP's, BTR's and tanks are closed and the system of protection 
against mass destruction weapons is turned on. When it is 
impossible to bypass zones with high radiation levels and areas 
of destructive damage, fires and floods, the company (battalion) 
crosses them at maximum speed using individual protective gear 
and systems of protection against mass destruction weapons 
present in the fighting vehicles. 
  Partial decontamination is performed after emerging from 
zones of radioactive contamination, and immediately when the 
enemy employs chemical agents. Complete decontamination is 
performed as a rule in the day (night) rest halt area or on 
arriving in the designated area. 
  In case the enemy delivers nuclear and chemical strikes 
against the column, the company (battalion) commander takes 
steps to restore combat effectiveness, mop up in the aftermath 
of the strikes and continue movement. 
  The hatches, firing ports and louvers of tanks, BMP's and 
BTR's are closed when the enemy employs incendiary weapons and 
also when forced to cross an area of fire. The company 
(battalion) commander quickly leads the column forward or toward 
the windward side out of the area of the fire, halts it by 
permission of the battalion (regimental) commander and organizes 
the extinguishing of centers of fire on combat and other 
vehicles, rescue of personnel, and first aid to victims. Then 
the column continues movement. 
  In the course of executing a march, raiding and 
reconnaissance parties are destroyed by march security and by 
subunits of the main body especially assigned for this purpose. 
Enemy tactical airborne assault forces or airmobile parties are 
destroyed by march security subunits or by the main body of a 
battalion operating in the advance guard or in a forward 
detachment. 
  Minefields laid by enemy remote minelaying systems are 
bypassed, and if impossible to bypass are crossed through 
passages made by attached engineer subunits, mineclearing teams 
of companies and the battalion obstacle clearing party. 
  Column alignment is not disrupted at short halts and 
vehicles 
stop on the right shoulder of the road no closer than 10 m from 
each other or at distances established by the commander. BMP's, 
BTR's and tanks are placed beneath crowns of trees and in the 
radar shadow of local features, and on open terrain are 
camouflaged by organic camouflage nets and local materials. 
  Observers, duty machinegunners (gunners) and radiotelephone 
operators (radio operator/loaders) of command vehicles remain in 
the vehicles. The duty air defense subunit takes up a firing 
(launch) position indicated by the commander in readiness to 
destroy enemy air targets. At their commanders' command, the 
remaining personnel exit the vehicles and dispose themselves to 
the right of the road. Vehicle crews (teams, drivers) perform a 
visual inspection of weapons and vehicles and perform servicing 
and maintenance together with personnel assigned to assist them. 
  Vehicles which became disabled during the march stop on the 
right shoulder of the road or are moved aside. Vehicle crews 
(drivers) determine the reasons for the malfunctions and take 
steps to remedy them. After malfunctions have been remedied the 
vehicles continue movement, joining a passing column, and take 
their places in their own subunit columns at short halts. 
  The battalion technical maintenance echelon assists crews 
(drivers) in remedying malfunctions, arranges for transfer of 
vehicles not subject to repair with their own resources and 
stuck vehicles to regimental recovery vehicle assets, and 
supports the arrival of remaining battalion vehicles in the 
designated area. The deputy company (battalion) commander for 
weapons (company senior technician) and subunit commanders 
personally report vehicles left en route to the company 
(battalion) commander. 
  Communications on the march is accomplished by mobile means, 
and in subunits in addition by prearranged signals. Radio 
equipment operates only on receive. During the march the 
battalion commander reports the number of his column and 
information on the status of the route sector that was covered 
and the situation on it via commandant's posts and dispatcher 
points, and receives instructions and orders which have arrived 
for him and information on the status of the next route sector 
and about detours from the senior member of the commandant's 
post (duty dispatcher). 
  A battalion is disposed by company in a day (night) rest 
halt 
area, dispersed with consideration for rapidly extending the 
march column. Companies are in columns along the route of 
forward movement. 
  Crews perform daily routine servicing and maintenance on 
vehicles, arrange for their refueling and remedy malfunctions 
which have been discovered under the direction of subunit 
commanders and their deputies for weapons (senior company 
technicians). The personnel are given a hot meal and a rest. 
  On receiving a new mission in the course of the march, the 
battalion commander halts the forward security element and 
indicates the procedure for further operations to it. The 
battalion is moved onto the new route by the shortest path in 
the previous march column or after a necessary change in 
formation and performs the assigned mission. 
  On encountering the enemy, the forward security element 
inflicts damage on his security. Employing decisive actions, the 
battalion main body immobilizes the enemy by battle, inflicts 
damage, and supports deployment and engagement of the regiment 
by stubbornly holding a favorable line. 
<H5>  3. March Under Special Conditions </H5>
  Preparation and execution of a march under special 
conditions 
are accomplished according to general rules, but with 
consideration of conditions typical of mountainous and desert 
terrain and the winter. 
  In decisionmaking for a march in the mountains, 
special attention is given to studying route sectors difficult 
to negotiate, determining the procedure for negotiating them and 
organizing traffic control in them. Measures are planned for 
covering flanks and rear and destroying enemy enveloping 
detachments, airborne assault forces and raiding and 
reconnaissance parties. Measures are envisaged which facilitate 
orientation and maintaining a direction of movement along routes 
at night and under other conditions of limited visibility. 
  Serviceability of vehicle running gear and steering gear is 
checked during routine servicing and maintenance of weapons and 
vehicles. For movement in high-mountain areas, personnel are 
provided with warm clothing, heating devices and sunglasses and 
vehicles are equipped with devices to increase offroad 
capability and special devices to keep them from rolling during 
stops on upgrades and downgrades. Each vehicle and the battalion 
technical maintenance echelon must have a reserve of coolant and 
distilled water. 
  As a rule, a motorized rifle subunit is assigned to march 
security. It operates at a lesser distance than under ordinary 
conditions. A security element up to a platoon in strength is 
assigned to guard the battalion column from the rear. Local 
security usually is sent out and observers are posted when 
moving along route sectors affording concealment, in places of 
possible landslides, rockfalls and talus, and in sectors where 
enemy emplacement of obstacles is possible. After the company 
(battalion) column passes, they continue moving behind it and 
join their own subunits at the next short halt. 
  Passes, gorges, mountain gaps, canyons and tunnels are 
crossed by subunits nonstop; if it is impossible to cross them 
from the move, subunits halt in a sheltered place without 
bunching up, camouflage themselves and prepare to make the 
passage in turn while preserving heightened vigilance. Personnel 
of motorized rifle subunits may dismount when crossing 
especially dangerous road sectors. 
  The battalion commander may halt the battalion column by 
authorization of the regimental commander to cool vehicle 
engines. Level roads sectors safe from rockfalls and avalanches 
are chosen for this. 
  In connection with a reduced range of radio operation in the 
mountains, it is necessary to provide for using march security 
radio equipment as an intermediate station to maintain 
communications with the reconnaissance patrol. 
  In making the decision for the march in the 
desert, the company (battalion) commander studies the 
movement route and trafficability conditions in its individual 
sectors in detail and clarifies the location of oases, hydraulic 
engineering works, water sources and fuel reserves. The azimuth 
of the direction of movement is calculated and the procedure is 
outlined for marking the route in sectors where orientation 
based on local features is hampered. The most likely avenues of 
enemy operations, lines of possible encounter with him, and 
measures to secure flanks and rear of the moving column are 
determined. Wide use of close and deep envelopments of exposed 
enemy flanks and operations along axes leading to vital enemy 
objectives are envisaged at lines of possible encounter with the 
enemy. 
  Before a march special attention is given to thorough 
preparation of weapons and vehicles for moving under conditions 
of high temperatures, no roads and sandy terrain, provision of 
additional containers, canteens and the necessary reserve of 
water and fuel to subunits, and measures for protecting 
personnel against heat stroke. 
  Distances between vehicles are increased to 100-150 m to 
ensure traffic safety during a march in a head wind and heavy 
dust content of the air. Under conditions of heavy dust 
formation, tanks move behind wheeled vehicles or to the leeward 
side of the movement route. The route axis is constantly shifted 
as soil on the movement route is destroyed. Movement may be 
stopped during sandstorms by permission of the battalion 
(regimental) commander. Steps are taken to protect personnel and 
vehicles, and observation and column security are beefed up. 
Movement is renewed by order of the commander who stopped the 
column. 
  In making a decision for a march in winter the 
company (battalion) commander thoroughly estimates the nature of 
terrain for the full depth of the march, clarifies route sectors 
difficult to negotiate and outlines the procedure for bypassing 
or negotiating them and places to prepare turnoffs from the road 
and detours of natural barriers. Measures are specified for 
supporting the movement of subunits in a snowstorm, blizzard, 
dense fog, bitter cold, deep snow cover and thaw. 
  Before the march weapons and vehicles are prepared for 
operation under lowtemperature conditions and steps are taken to 
prevent personnel frostbite and to supply vehicles with devices 
to improve their off-road capability. Additional reserves of 
ammunition, fuel and food are established. Vehicles equipped 
with bulldozer attachments are included in the march security if 
a march is being made under conditions of deep snow cover. 
  Movement may be suspended by permission of the battalion 
(regimental) commander in a heavy snowstorm, a blizzard and snow 
flurries. Under these conditions the company (battalion) 
commander brings up the remaining vehicles, arranges perimeter 
security, beefs up observation, and takes steps to warm the 
personnel. 
  Under all the most difficult situation conditions, the 
success of a march depends largely on skills and ability of the 
company (battalion) commander and the battalion staff to ready 
subunits for the march and control them during its execution. 
<H5>  4. Company Commander's Work To Organize the March and March </H5>
Security 
  [Begin side line] Organization and execution of the march of 
a company in march security have features stemming from the 
specifics of missions which it is performing: ensure unhindered 
movement of the protected column, preclude an enemy surprise 
attack and penetration of his ground reconnaissance, and create 
favorable conditions for engagement of the main body. 
  On receiving the mission the company commander analyzes it, 
determines measures for preparing the company to perform the 
mission and performs a time calculation. [End side line] 
  Mission analysis 
  1st MRC (TC), the forward security element, marches along 
the 
route Gorki, Nagornoye, Nikulino, Lipki, Gerasimovo and by 0600 
hours 23 August arrives at the line Tomino, north slopes of 
Kruglaya Hill with the mission of providing favorable conditions 
for battalion deployment and engagement. Length of route is 170 
km. 
  The company marches basically at night in anticipation of 
engaging the enemy. 
  In an encounter with the enemy the company has the mission 
of 
inflicting damage on his security elements, immobilizing the 
main body from the front and supporting deployment and 
commitment of the advance guard. 
  To perform the combat mission the company is reinforced by 
an 
artillery battery, TP (MRP), combat engineer squad and 
radiological and chemical reconnaissance squad. Reinforcing 
subunits will arrive in the vicinity of the forester's house by 
1000 22 August. 
  The company crosses the start point at 2000 22 August, 
control point No 1 at 2350 22 August, and control point No 2 at 
0440 hours 23 August. 
  Short halts: first from 2300 to 2340 22 August; second from 
0230 to 0430 23 August. 
  There are no subunits on the right. 1st/5th MRR is marching 
on the left with the mission of taking the line of west 
outskirts of Astakhovo, Tomino (excluded) by 0600 23 August. 
  The regimental reconnaissance detachment is conducting 
reconnaissance ahead along the company's movement route. 
  Time calculation 
  The mission for the march was received at 0900 hours 22 
August. Readiness for the march is at 1900 22 August. Cross 
start point at 2000 22 August. The company has 10 hours to 
prepare for the march. Allocate time as follows: 

  -  familiarization of subordinates with the mission received 
and issue of instructions for preparing for the march--30 
minutes (from 0930 to 1000); 
  -  situation estimate and march 
calculation--40 minutes (from 1000 to 1040); 
  -  decisionmaking and 
report to battalion commander--60 minutes (from 1040 to 1140); 
  -  issue operation order, organize coordination and 
C[.sup]2[/]- -20 minutes (from 1140 to 1200); 
  -  issue 
instructions on supporting the march and on political work--30 
minutes (from 1200 to 1230); 
  -  monitor and assist subunits in 
preparing for the march--390 minutes (from 1230 to 1900); 
  -  report readiness for march to battalion commander--1900. 


    [Begin side line] After calculating the time, the company 
commander issues instructions to subordinates for preparing for 
the march and estimates the situation. [End side line] 
  Instructions on preparing for the march 
  Organize fueling of vehicles in the following order: 1st MRP 
(TP), 2nd MRP (TP), 3rd MRP (TP). Refueling assets will arrive 
in the company disposition by 1000. 
  Replenish and load ammunition in the following sequence: 1st 
MRP (TP), 2nd MRP (TP), 3rd MRP (TP). Ammunition transport will 
arrive by 1200. 
  Check presence and stowage of protective and decontamination 
gear, clothing and related gear, and medical equipment and 
supplies and bring up to norm by 1330. 
  Check serviceability of weapons and combat vehicles and 
complete vehicle servicing and maintenance to the extent of 
daily routine servicing and maintenance by 1500 hours. 
  Hot meals will be brought to the company disposition by 
1630. 
Bring emergency rations up to norm. They will be delivered to 
company with delivery of hot meals. 
  Platoon commanders are to submit working maps with decision 
for the march by 1800. 
  Report readiness for the march at 1850. 
  Situation estimate (conclusions) 
  Align march formation with consideration for conducting 
meeting battle: point, COP, TP (MRP), 1st MRP (TP), 3rd MRP 
(TP), SP artillery battery. Execute march with measures of 
protection against mass destruction and precision weapons. 
  Have the following march security: point consisting of MRP 
(TP) and reinforced combat engineer squad. 
  On arriving at Nagornoye, send out patrol squad (patrol 
tank) 
in direction of Nagornoye, Nikulino, Lipki, Gerasimovo. 
  During the march receive data on the enemy from the senior 
commander, the point and by observation. During the march 
maintain communications with regimental reconnaissance 
detachment No 1. On approaching a line of likely encounter with 
the enemy establish communications with adjacent subunits for 
maintaining coordination during the conduct of battle. On 
discovering a zone of contamination, assign march security to 
reconnoiter a detour route. 
  Condition of the route permits moving in the Gorki, Nikulino 
sector at a speed of 25 km/hr, and in the Nikulino, Lipki sector 
at 20 km/hr. The march to Lipki is made in hours of darkness. 
  Favorable lines for deployment and assault of the enemy are 
the north edge of the grove (700 m north of Gerasimovo) and 
north slopes of Kruglaya Hill. Deploy company at these lines 
from behind the right (left) flank of the point. Bypass 
demolished (contaminated) route sectors in a column, and if it 
is necessary to cross them increase the rate of movement and 
distances between vehicles. 
  Then the company commander makes the decision, formalizes it 
on the map and reports to the battalion commander. After this he 
summons commanders of subordinate and attached subunits, issues 
the operation order, organizes coordination and gives 
instructions for organizing comprehensive support of the march, 
C[.sup]2[/] and political work. 
  Operation order 
  1. Having suffered defeat, the enemy is withdrawing to the 
west and at the same time moving up reserves from the depth. An 
encounter with his forward detachments is possible when moving 
toward Lipki. 
  2. Our units in front are holding the line along the 
Lazurnaya River. The regimental reconnaissance 
detachment is operating on the movement axis. On the left 2nd 
MRC (TC)--the forward security element of 1st MRB (TB), 5th MRR 
(TR)--is marching along the route Ilino, Dvorovoye, 
Tuzhilovo, Bugry and by 0600 23 August takes the line of 
the west outskirts of Astakhovo, Tomino (excluded). 
  3. 1st MRC (TC), an SP artillery battery, a TP (MRP), a 
combat engineer squad and a radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance squad are the forward security element. It 
marches along the route Gorki, Nagornoye, Nikulino, Lipki, 
Gerasimovo with the mission of supporting unhindered 
movement of the advance guard main body and by 0600 23 August 
taking the line Tomino, north slopes of 
Kruglaya Hill, supporting deployment and engagement 
of the battalion main body. It crosses the following points: 
start, 3 km south of Gorki, at 2000 hours; control 
point No 1, 1.5 km west of Nikulino, at 2350; control 
point No 2, 1 km north of Lipki, at 0440 hours. 
  Short halts: first, 2 km south of Nikulino--from 
2300 to 2340; second, 1 km south of Lipki--from 0230 
to 0430 23 August. 
  Form company main body column in following order: COP, TP 
(MRP), 1st MRP (TP), 3rd MRP (TP), SP artillery battery. 
  Have point consisting of 2nd MRP (TP) with combat engineer 
squad 3 km ahead along the movement route to support unhindered 
movement of forward security element main body. 
  Rate of movement: in Gorki, Nikulino sector--25 
km/hr, in Nikulino, Lipki sector--20 km/hr; distances 
between vehicles 25-50 m. 
  Commence fire against air enemy at my command and at 
commands 
of subunit commanders. If the point encounters the ground enemy, 
seize a favorable line, defeat enemy security in a meeting 
battle and support battalion deployment and engagement by a 
determined assault of the forward security element main body 
from behind the point's right flank. 
  4. I order: 

  -  2nd MRP (TP) with combat engineer squad, the point, is to 
march along the forward security element's route, prevent an 
enemy surprise attack and by 0550 23 August take the line 
Tomino, Gerasimovo (excluded), ensuring favorable 
conditions for deployment and engagement of the forward security 
element main body. Cross the points: start at 1950, control 
point No 1 at 2350, control point No 2 at 0440. Report passing 
of each line, condition of route and situation by prearranged 
signals, and immediately on encountering the enemy; 
  -  TP (MRP) is 
to march at head of company column and arrive on north slopes of 
Kruglaya Hill by 0600 23 August, having supported 
performance of company mission. Subsequently be ready to attack. 
On encountering the enemy assault him from behind the point's 
right (left) flank. On arriving at Nagornoye send out 
patrol tank (patrol squad) in the direction Nagornoye, 
Nikulino, Lipki; 
  -  1st MRP (TP) is to march behind TP (MRP) and arrive on west 
slopes of Kruglaya Hill by 0600 23 August, having 
supported performance of company mission. Subsequently be ready 
to attack. On encountering enemy, assault him from behind 
point's right (left) flank; 
  -  3rd MRP (TP) is to march behind 1st MRP (TP) and arrive at 
west 
outskirts of Gerasimovo by 0600 23 August, having 
supported performance of company mission. Subsequently be ready 
to attack. On encountering the enemy, assault him, operating on 
the right (left) flank of the company; 
  -  SP artillery battery is to march along company route behind 
3rd 
MRP (TP) and occupy firing positions in vicinity of southwest 
outskirts of Gerasimovo by 0600 23 August. On 
encountering enemy be ready to support battle of point and 
support the deployment and engagement of forward security 
element main body by fire. 


    5. Refuel fighting vehicles at second short halt in 
following 
order: point, TP (MRP), 1st and 3rd MRP's (TP's). Receive hot 
meals on completion of fueling. Ammunition consumption for 
performance of assigned mission is 0.5 unit of fire, and fuel 
consumption is 0.7 fueling. 
  6. Readiness for march 1900 hours. 
  7. Commanders of platoons and squads (crews) are to conduct 
observation during the march up to the line of likely encounter 
with the enemy, and after crossing it all personnel are to do 
so. Communications on the march: with point by radio using brief 
signals, with platoons in main body column by signaling devices, 
and by radio on engaging. 
  I am at the head of the main body column on the march, and 
behind 1st MRP (TP) on encountering the enemy. Deputy is 1st MRP 
(TP) commander. 
  Coordination instructions 
  Extend the company [column] to the start point in accordance 
with the march calculation at my signal. Cross start point as 
follows: point at 1950, main body at 2000. 
  During the march observe prescribed distances and rate of 
movement. Stop disabled vehicles on right shoulder of road and 
observe security and defense measures when remedying 
malfunctions. After restoration, vehicles take their places in 
the march formation only at short halts (stops); have distances 
of at least 10 m between vehicles at short halts. 
  Receive hot meals at the end of fueling. At night, march 
using night vision devices. 
  1st MRP (TP) is to be ready to destroy enemy raiding and 
reconnaissance parties during the march. 
  When the enemy employs nuclear weapons and with detection of 
radioactive (chemical) contamination, turn on the system of 
protection against mass destruction weapons, and personnel are 
to put on individual protective gear and continue performing the 
assigned mission. Bypass zones of contamination and areas of 
destructive damage, fires and floods along axes marked by the 
point; if it is impossible to bypass the zones, cross them in 
the shortest direction with an increase in rate of movement and 
distances between vehicles. Perform partial decontamination and 
extinguish centers of fire on combat vehicles at my command and 
at commands of platoon commanders. 
  In case it encounters the enemy the point is to inflict 
damage on his local security, take a favorable line and support 
deployment and engagement of the company main body. The forward 
security element is to assault the enemy swiftly, destroy him 
and continue movement. On encountering an enemy of superior 
force the forward security element is to assault him decisively 
in the flank, inflict damage on him and take a line providing 
favorable conditions for deployment and engagement of the 
battalion main body. 
  Warning, control and coordination signals are in accordance 
with the signal table. 
  Instructions on combat support of the march 
  Conduct reconnaissance of the air and ground enemy during 
the 
march as follows: in the direction of movement--point; to the 
sides--by observers from 1st and 3rd MRP's (TP's); to the rear 
by an observer from the SP artillery battery. Each squad (crew) 
is to conduct observation of the air enemy. Report immediately 
on encountering the enemy. 
  2nd MRS (crew) of 2nd MRP (TP) is to conduct radiological, 
chemical and nonspecific biological (bacteriological) 
reconnaissance on the march using onboard devices, and observers 
are to do so visually. In response to signals warning of NBC 
contamination, close firing ports and doors, on tanks close 
hatches and louvers, and turn on the system for protection 
against mass destruction weapons. 
  By 1300 check the presence, serviceability, working capacity 
and state of supply of radiological and chemical reconnaissance 
devices and individual protective gear and the airtightness of 
protective masks. Go to the battalion CW instructor to replace 
unserviceable ones. 
  Perform partial decontamination at my command. 
  Carry out radiological monitoring using dosimeters and 
radiological monitoring and survey devices. 
  Observe a regime of radio silence during the march. Turn off 
night vision devices when there is a warning about the threat of 
an enemy air attack and after passing Lipki. Prohibit starting 
bonfires and limit personnel movement at short halts. 
  Breach obstacles, destructive damage and barriers with your 
own forces together with the combat engineer squad using 
bulldozer attachments, built-in equipment and local materials. 
  In the course of the march accomplish security using the 
point, and in the area of short halts using patrols from 3rd MRP 
(TP). Be ready to combat enemy raiding and reconnaissance 
parties. 
  Instructions on technical and logistic support 
  By 1500 perform daily routine servicing and maintenance on 
weapons and vehicles, paying special attention to condition of 
running gear, steering gear and storage batteries. 
  Assemble weapons and vehicles not restored by the time of 
readiness for the march in the battalion rear disposition area 
by 1800 hours for turnover to the regimental maintenance company. 
  Vehicles which become disabled during the march and cannot 
be 
repaired by crew efforts are to await battalion repair assets. 
Organize their security and defense at the points where they 
stop. Continue movement after remedying the malfunction. They 
are to take their place in the company column at a short halt 
(stop). 
  Refuel in the company disposition area by 1100 and at the 
second short halt. 
  By 1300 bring reserves of ammunition and other supplies up 
to 
the norm. Transport with reserves will arrive in company 
disposition area. 
  Complete evacuating wounded and sick to battalion aid 
station 
by 1500. During the march give first aid in the form of self- 
administered and buddyadministered emergency first aid by 
platoon riflemen-medics and by the company medical corpsman 
NCOIC. 
  During the march hot food will be issued at the second short 
halt. 
  Company operations in march security on the 
march 
  The company begins the march by direction of the battalion 
commander. At the prescribed time the point crosses the start 
point and moves along the route at the indicated speed 3-5 km 
from the company main body. Proceeding at the head of the 
column, the company commander compares the movement route with 
the map and maintains the established march order. 
  A company assigned to a flank security element moves on line 
with the head of the protected column and up to 5 km away with 
the mission of preventing an enemy surprise attack from the 
flank. 
  In performing a mission as a stationary flank guard, the 
company moves to the line indicated for it to cover the flank of 
the protected column, deploys into battle formation fully or 
with a portion of the forces, organizes a defense and is at the 
line until the prescribed time. 
  A company assigned to a rear security element proceeds up to 
5 km behind the protected column in readiness to repel a 
possible enemy attack from the rear. 
  The forward security element passes through chokepoints and 
tunnels and across bridges nonstop, moving behind the point. 
Company personnel conduct continuous all-around observation for 
the ground and air enemy and of adjoining terrain. 
  The point bypasses demolished road sectors, bridges and 
abatis on the movement route and mined sectors, using markers to 
denote places of destructive damage (mining) and the direction 
for going around. The forward security element makes a passage 
if it is impossible to go around or when making a passage in 
destructive damage (abatis) requires less time than going 
around. With remote mining of the movement route, the forward 
security element exits the minefield as one column along a 
passage which has been made in the shortest direction. 
  The commander of the point (forward security element) 
reports 
contaminated sectors, obstacles, destructive damage, directions 
for their bypass, and an encounter with the enemy to the 
commander who sent him out. 
  At short halts the point (forward security element) stops on 
a favorable line, organizes observation and is in constant 
readiness to repel an enemy attack. On arriving in the rest area 
the forward security element takes up a designated line and 
performs the mission of security at the halt. In this area the 
security element may be replaced by security at the halt. 
  With a change in movement direction, the company column is 
moved to the new route by the shortest path in the previous 
march formation or after a necessary change of formation and 
performs the assigned mission. 
  On encountering the enemy the company immobilizes him by 
battle and, stubbornly holding a favorable line, supports the 
protected column's deployment and engagement. 
<H5>  5. Transport Movement of Subunits </H5>
  A battalion is moved by rail or sea (river) transport as one 
or two troop echelons [voinskiy eshelon], by air transport as 
several military teams [voinskaya komanda], and on heavy 
multiple truck-trailer rigs as a single column. 
  To shorten the time for organizing transport movement, the 
battalion commander must constantly have prepared variants of 
calculations for moving the battalion by various kinds of 
transport. The transport movement calculation is put together 
with consideration for preserving subunits' organizational 
integrity and ensuring their readiness for battle after 
unloading (disembarking). 
  A troop echelon is understood to mean a military 
unit, subunit, establishment as well as separate teams and 
groups of combat vehicles organized for transport movement in 
one train or on one vessel (self-propelled or nonself- 
propelled). A train with ten cars or more (in a two-axle 
calculation) occupied by subunits, teams or military cargoes is 
considered to be a troop train. 
  An echelon is given an appropriate number which it retains 
throughout the journey. An echelon must have necessary forces 
and assets for loading (unloading) vehicles and cargoes; for 
organizing air defense, communications, and NBC reconnaissance; 
for security and defense; and for providing personnel with hot 
meals and medical aid. 
  A battalion is given a loading (boarding) and unloading 
(disembarking) station, port (wharf) or airfield (site) for 
loading (boarding) flatcars (railcars), vessels and aircraft 
(helicopters) and unloading (disembarking) from them. Subunits 
are in a waiting area before loading (boarding) and they move to 
an assembly area after unloading (disembarking) (Diagram 22). 
  The distance of the waiting area and assembly area from the 
loading (boarding) and unloading (disembarking) site 
respectively is determined by terrain conditions providing for 
concealed disposition of subunits and protection against mass 
destruction and precision weapons, and may be 3-5 km (usually 10 
15 km with movement by air transport). 
  Final preparation of the company (battalion) for loading 
(boarding) occurs in waiting areas. Weapons and vehicles are 
prepared for transport movement and subsequent operations: 
refueling, usually daily routine servicing and maintenance, and 
if necessary repairs are carried out. The personnel's state of 
supply of individual protective gear is checked. 
  A chief, his deputy for political affairs, assistant for 
combat support, assistant for supply, chief of communications 
and physician (paramedic) are assigned in each troop echelon. A 
daily detail is appointed for performing routine garrison and 
guard duty. A senior person is appointed for the entire journey 
in each railcar (cabin, crew quarters and so on) from among 
junior officers or NCO's, and in addition stokers also are 
appointed from among the privates during movement by rail 
transport in winter. 
  Special teams are formed to perform the main tasks of 
supporting company (battalion) subunits and the echelon as a 
whole during loading (unloading) and en route: loading-unloading 
teams, communications teams, teams for mopping up in the 
aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction, precision and 
incendiary weapons and so on. 
  Loading-unloading teams are intended for loading tracked, 
wheeled and trailer equipment onto flatcars (into railcars) and 
for loading various cargoes in boxcars. The number of these 
teams is determined basically by the number of loading sites. In 
addition to loading (unloading), the loading-unloading team 
(teams) also is obligated to assemble and disassemble various 
gear and devices necessary for loading (unloading). 
  Weapons and combat and other vehicles are loaded and 
personnel put aboard strictly at the designated time, covertly, 
with observance of safety measures precluding a breakdown of 
weapons, vehicles and transportation assets. Weapons, combat and 
other vehicles, and reserves of ammunition, fuel and other 
supplies are loaded first. 
  As a rule, ammunition and fuel are loaded in different 
railcars (on different ships, in different aircraft and 
helicopters). Combat vehicles and air defense weapons assigned 
to cover the loading point area and also prime movers intended 
for supporting the rapid loading (unloading) of tracked 
equipment are loaded on flatcars (ships) last. 
  Equipment is fastened down on railcars by the vehicle crews, 
for which they prepare chocks and pads for vehicle rollers, 
tracks and wheels; wire; chocks and blocks; and metal stops in 
advance. 
  In forming a troop train, boxcars occupied by people and 
operating kitchens are placed in the middle of the train and 
flatcars and open cars in the front and rear. Railcars with 
dangerous cargoes are separated from the locomotive, the rear of 
the train, cars with personnel, cars with operating kitchens, 
and if necessary also one from another by a special protective 
cover. Flatcars with air defense weapons are placed at the front 
and rear of the train and, for convenience of conducting fire, 
they are separated from the diesel (electric) locomotive, 
boxcars or open cars by one or more flatcars with low cargo. 
  Personnel board railcars (ships, aircraft or helicopters) on 
completion of loading of weapons, combat and other vehicles, and 
property, usually immediately before departure of the troop 
echelon (team) or before the ship puts to sea, but no later than 
10 minutes before departure. 
  During movement by rail transport, personnel as a rule are 
carried in fouraxle boxcars figuring 64-72 persons in each. It 
is prohibited to use cars which have been used for acids, toxic 
agents and animals. A passenger car may be provided for officers 
of the echelon. As part of the train it is desirable to have an 
isolation car prepared, like the car for personnel, with 
removable military equipment. 
  Weapons, combat and other vehicles, and supplies loaded on 
rolling stock (on ships, aircraft, helicopters) are reliably 
fastened down, and in addition vehicles are braked and put in 
low gear. Rotating devices of turrets of fighting vehicles and 
guns are locked and hatches sealed. 
  Responsibility for loading, accommodating and fastening down 
of weapons, combat and other vehicles and for boarding personnel 
rests with the chief of the troop echelon, and with commanders 
of crews and of aircraft (helicopters) for movement by air 
transport. 
  A battalion being moved by rail or sea (river) transport is 
supported for the entire journey with en route and destination 
supplies of food in addition to unit-level supplies. A battalion 
aid station is set up for prompt medical aid during movement in 
a troop echelon (on a ship). Wounded and sick are evacuated from 
a troop echelon (ship) to the nearest medical facilities. 
  To preserve the personnel's strength and fighting vehicles' 
engine time and to reduce their wear (especially tracks) when 
making a march over great distances, it is advisable to 
transport tanks of a TC (TB) on heavy multiple truck-trailer 
rigs, which represent transportation complexes of wheeled prime 
movers and heavy-freight trailers. 
  A company (battalion) is assigned a primary and alternate 
loading point area for loading on heavy multiple truck- 
trailer rigs. The TC (TB) commander together with the motor 
transport subunit commander directs loading of tanks on 
trailers. A trained crew can load and secure a tank on a trailer 
in 10-15 minutes. With simultaneous loading a TC loads in 15-20 
minutes and a TB in 30-40 minutes; with successive loading a 
company will require one hour. Unloading a company may take an 
average of around 30 minutes and the battalion 45 minutes. 
  With the route in good condition, a column of trailers can 
develop a speed of 45-50 km/hr, but it is inadvisable to develop 
a column speed of over 30 km/hr because of the difficulty of 
controlling a trailer when transporting heavy equipment (the 
trailer with vehicles swerves with fast driving). Railroad 
crossings are crossed at a speed of no more than 15 km/hr. 
Distances between trailers can reach 50 m, and they increase on 
upgrades and downgrades. 
  Organization of transport movement depends on the specific 
situation, mission received and time available. On receipt of an 
operation order (operational instructions) for movement by rail 
(sea, river) transport the battalion commander (troop echelon 
commander) issues instructions on preparing for the transport 
movement; together with the military commandant of the rail 
(water) sector and station (port), he updates the calculation 
for transportation of subunit personnel, weapons, vehicles and 
property by railcars, flatcars, ships or ship spaces; draws up a 
plan for loading the troop echelon; establishes the sequence of 
loading (boarding) subunits and the time of its beginning and 
completion; determines the procedure for subunits to move up to 
loading (boarding) points; performs ground reconnaissance of the 
waiting area, the station (port, wharf), and forward movement 
routes of subunits to them and to loading (boarding) points, and 
assigns missions to subunits. 
  The battalion staff prepares calculations in advance for 
transport movement of the battalion, which permits the commander 
to reduce time for organizing it. 
  On receiving the order (operational instructions) for 
movement by air transport the MRC (MRB) commander issues 
instructions for preparing for the movement; together with the 
military transport (army) aviation subunit (unit) commander or 
civil aviation group (detachment) commander and airport military 
commandant, he updates the loading (boarding) order, ramp 
parking areas and side numbers of aircraft (helicopters); 
compiles the calculation for movement of subunit personnel, 
weapons, vehicles, missiles, ammunition, fuel and other supplies 
by aircraft (helicopters), the loading (boarding) plan and 
personnel rosters of the military teams for each aircraft 
(helicopter); determines the sequence and procedure for loading 
(boarding) and arrival of the subunits and the time of their 
beginning and completion; performs ground reconnaissance of the 
waiting area, airfield (landing sites), forward movement routes 
of subunits to them and to aircraft (helicopter) ramp parking 
areas, and assigns missions to subunits. 
  In the transport movement order the battalion 
commander indicates the following: 
  First paragraph--information on the enemy. 
  Second paragraph--battalion mission; number 
(numbers) of the troop echelon (team, teams); name of ship 
(ships) and side numbers of aircraft (helicopters); loading 
(boarding) station (port, wharf, airfield or landing site) and 
waiting area and forward movement routes to them; time for 
beginning and completion of loading. 
  Third paragraph, the transport movement concept-- 
distribution of subunits, personnel, weapons and vehicles by 
troop echelons (teams), railcars, flatcars (ships, ship spaces, 
aircraft or helicopters); sequence and procedure for subunit 
loading; organization of air defense (duty subunits, procedure 
for alert duty, for observation, and for commencing and 
conducting fire against airborne targets); and the number and 
makeup of the daily detail and loadingunloading teams. 
  Fourth paragraph--after the words I 
order, missions for subunits--places (quantity of railcars 
and flatcars, numbers of aircraft, helicopters, cabins, decks, 
holds and other spaces, numbers of military teams) for 
accommodating personnel, weapons and vehicles; sequence and 
procedure for loading (boarding); place in battalion march 
column when moving up from waiting area to loading (boarding) 
points and procedure for actions after unloading; for the air 
defense subunit in addition, missions for providing cover during 
loading, en route, and when unloading; and for subunits from 
which loading- unloading teams and the daily detail are 
assigned, makeup of the teams (detail), their missions and 
readiness time. 
  Fifth paragraph--readiness time for moving out of 
the waiting area and for loading. 
  Sixth paragraph--appointed persons of the echelon, 
their place in the echelon (aboard the ship) or the number of 
the aircraft (helicopter) in which they are proceeding, and 
warning and control signals. 
  The company commander issues the transport movement order in 
the very same sequence as the battalion commander, but in 
the fourth paragraph he usually indicates the following: 
places for accommodating platoon personnel, weapons and vehicles 
on rolling stock (on the ship, in the aircraft or helicopter); 
sequence and procedure for their loading (boarding); platoon 
places in the company column when moving up from the waiting 
area to the loading point, and to the assembly area after 
unloading; makeup of loadingunloading teams, who is senior, 
their missions, and time and procedure for them to perform 
missions; from whom and in what makeup to assign the daily 
detail and procedure for its preparation; safety measures during 
loading (boarding), en route and when unloading (disembarking). 
In addition, in the sixth paragraph of the order, instead of 
appointed persons of the echelon, he indicates senior persons of 
railcars and his own place in the train (on the ship) or the 
number of the aircraft (helicopter) in which he is proceeding. 
  Battalion commander's instructions on preparing 
for transport movement 
  (Variant) 
  Organize filling of vehicles with POL and coolant from 0930 
to 1130 20 June. 
  Receive and load ammunition from 1130 to 1330 in the 
following sequence--1st, 2nd, 3rd TC. 
  Complete loading of supplies on motor transport by 1400. 
  Deputy battalion commander for weapons is to organize 
routine 
servicing and maintenance of vehicles. Restore unserviceable 
equipment by 1630. By 1700 draw catwalks, clamps and nails at 
the loading station. 
  Subunit commanders prepare and check the presence of 
fastening materials and necessary devices for loading by 1630. 
  From 1330 to 1530 hold practical classes with personnel on 
rules for loading equipment on rolling stock and communicate 
safety measures and rules for the journey. 
  Readiness for transport movement is 1730. Issue hot food to 
personnel at 1600. 
  Departure for ground reconnaissance at 1230 from battalion 
COP. Deputies and commanders of companies and separate platoons 
are involved in ground reconnaissance. 
  TC commander's operation order for transport 
movement 
  (Variant) 
  1. Employing precision weapons, the enemy has halted the 
attack of our troops by operations of reserves which have come 
up and shifted to a defense along west bank of the Shirokaya 
River on the morning of 17 June. 
  Enemy aircraft are conducting aerial reconnaissance and 
delivering strikes against reserves and rear installations. 
  2. 2nd TC is moving by rail transport as part of the 
battalion and by 2000 hours 21 June assembles in the vicinity of 
Ternovskoye terrain feature. The troop echelon number is 12345. 
Boarding station is Sineglazovo. Waiting area is forest north of 
Voznesenskoye. Route of forward movement: Shumaki, Timofeyevka. 
Beginning of loading at 1800. Completion of loading at 1930. 
Departure at 2000. 
  3. Transport the personnel in second railcar. 
  Load equipment on 13th through 22nd flatcars in the 
following 
sequence: 1st, 2nd, 3rd TP. Assign lookouts for the air enemy 
and a duty tank from 1st TP. Commence fire against air enemy at 
the command of the echelon chief, or independently in a surprise 
attack. 
  Assign daily detail from 3rd TP. Have a loading-unloading 
team of six persons, two from each platoon. 
  4. I order: transport the company personnel in 
second railcar. 
  Accommodate equipment on the following flatcars: company 
commander's tank and 1st TP from 13th through 16th, 2nd TP from 
17th through 19th, 3rd TP from 20th through 22nd. Load from end 
(side) ramp. Move out of waiting area to loading point and to 
assembly area after unloading in the following order: company 
commander's tank, 1st, 2nd, 3rd TP. 
  Platoon commanders are to assign two persons each to the 
loading- unloading team. Senior person of team is a tank 
commander from 2nd TP. Mission: from 1730 to 1750 open sides of 
13th through 22nd flatcar for movement of combat vehicles along 
them. With beginning of loading of battalion wheeled vehicles, 
support their movement along the railcars (transfer connecting 
ramps to flatcar junctions). 
  Assign daily detail from 3rd TP made up of duty NCO--a 
sergeant, 
  and orderlies--two privates. 
  Observe prescribed safety measures when loading, en route, 
and 
  when unloading. 5. Readiness for moving out of waiting area 
  1630, and for loading 1730. 
  6. Senior person in car is company 1st sergeant. I am in 
15th 
  car. 
  Warning and control signals--according to signal table. 
  After issuing the transport movement order the battalion 
commander (chief of troop echelon) gives instructions on the 
procedure for preparing rolling stock for loading the echelon, 
on methods of accommodating and fastening weapons and vehicles 
on the rolling stock (ship), on organizing security in the 
echelon or on the ship (updates the makeup of the daily detail, 
time and procedure of its relief, post locations, duties of 
sentries and procedure for communications with them), on safety 
measures during loading (boarding) and transport movement, and 
on the procedure for actions in response to warning and control 
signals; he also gives instructions on organizing combat, 
technical and logistic support, fire protection (emergency 
rescue work) and political work for the period of the transport 
movement. 
  Before the beginning of forward movement from the waiting 
area for loading (boarding), the company (battalion) commander 
checks the personnel's knowledge of loading (boarding) rules and 
safety measures; of the procedure for accommodating and 
fastening weapons and vehicles in railcars and on flatcars (on 
ships, in aircraft and helicopters); of rules for their 
unloading and of rules of personnel conduct during the transport 
movement. A check is made of the readiness of weapons, vehicles, 
missiles, ammunition, fuel and other supplies for loading as 
well as the alignment of the company (battalion) column in 
accordance with the loading plan. Before loading, the battalion 
commander (chief of troop echelon) arrives at the loading point 
with appointed persons of the echelon, where he checks the 
presence of rolling stock; organizes receipt of railcars (ship 
spaces) and removable military equipment and preparation of 
rolling stock for loading the echelon; if necessary, he makes 
changes to the loading (boarding) plan and to the transport 
movement calculation and gives the command (signal) for subunits 
to move out to the loading (boarding) point. En route the 
battalion commander and staff (chief of troop echelon) as a rule 
are accommodated in the middle of the echelon during movement by 
rail transport. He must have telephone communications with the 
officer of the guard, with observation posts and with the diesel 
(electric) locomotive engineer. During movement by sea (river) 
transport the battalion commander is in one of the cabins or a 
separate ship space. 
  C[.sup]2[/] in a troop echelon (on a ship) is exercised 
using wire means of communication, by personal contact, by 
messengers and by light and sound signals. 
  Battalion subunits begin moving out of the waiting area in 
company columns (subunit columns) in accordance with the 
prescribed loading order. As a rule, their movement out of the 
area is directed by the battalion chief of staff. 
  The battalion commander meets subunits on the approach, 
gives instructions to commanders on the procedure for 
disposition near the loading point and reports readiness for 
loading to the military commandant. 
  The deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons 
(company senior technician) is responsible for overall direction 
of loading the equipment. The subunit commander is responsible 
for the loading of each subunit. He personally directs each 
vehicle's run onto the rolling stock. Further movement of the 
vehicle along the flatcars is directed by the vehicle commander, 
who has constant visual contact with the driver and observes 
safety measures. 
  During loading under nighttime conditions it is necessary to 
take advantage of fixed illumination, and in its absence one 
should organize illumination with headlights of specially 
assigned vehicles. 
  After loading, the loading-unloading devices are collected 
and piled in a place specified by the commander. 
  Subunit commanders with their deputies for weapons (company 
senior technicians) check the reliability and correctness of 
securing the equipment, that vehicles are braked and in low 
gear, and that fighting vehicle turrets and guns are locked; 
they seal vehicle hatches (doors); and report completion of 
loading through channels. 
  In case the enemy delivers nuclear strikes or employs 
precision, chemical and incendiary weapons during loading, 
subunits are led out of areas of bursts (fires, contamination) 
and subsequently continue loading at the previous place or move 
to another loading point depending on the situation. 
  After completion of loading the battalion commander, 
military 
commandant and the station chief check readiness of the echelon 
for movement. Special attention is given to firmness and 
correctness of fastening the sides of flatcars and the vehicles. 
  In the course of transport movement the company (battalion) 
commander receives data on the situation in the direction of 
movement via military commandants, the general warning network 
and senior commanders (chiefs), constantly keeps an eye on 
compliance with transport movement rules, and monitors the 
condition of subunits and observance of discipline and safety 
measures. 
  At a signal warning of the air enemy, the troop echelon 
(ship) continues movement. Doors, windows (portholes) and 
hatches of railcars (ship spaces) are closed and protective gear 
placed in the "ready" position. Air defense and other weapons 
assigned to repel an enemy air raid commence fire on command of 
the echelon chief (ship captain), and in a surprise attack they 
do so independently in accordance with instructions on the 
procedure for conducting fire. 
  In response to signals warning of NBC contamination, 
personnel put on protective masks (breathing masks) and other 
individual protective gear as well if necessary by order of 
subunit commanders. 
  During movement by rail and sea (river) transport, personnel 
cross zones of radioactive contamination of terrain and water 
areas contaminated by radioactive substances wearing individual 
protective gear. When a troop echelon passes through a zone of 
radioactive contamination, tank and other armored vehicle crews 
may be disposed in vehicles by instruction of the echelon chief 
(ship captain). After crossing the zone of contamination, 
partial decontamination of personnel, vehicles and means of 
transportation is performed if necessary. Complete 
decontamination of subunits and personnel is performed after 
unloading. 
  Depending on the situation at hand, the company (battalion) 
always must be ready en route for unloading at unprepared 
locations, proceeding to the destination by march, bypassing 
zones of contamination and areas of destructive damage, fires 
and floods, and engaging. 
  On arriving at the transport movement destination the 
company 
(battalion) quickly unloads and, observing combat support 
measures, moves into the assembly area in readiness to move out 
to the battalion (regimental) concentration area or for 
performing the combat mission. 
  Under present conditions subunits and units may make a 
combination movement. This is the movement of troops from one 
area to another in which different methods of movement are 
combined. A combination transport movement and a combination of 
a march and transport movement may be accomplished depending on 
distance of the movement, nature of lines of communication and 
presence and kinds of transportation assets used for movement. 
  The combination transport movement as a rule presumes a 
successive and sometimes also simultaneous combination of 
transport movement of subunits by different kinds of transport-- 
rail, water (sea, river), motor, air. 
  The simultaneous or successive combination of the march and 
transport movement may become widespread under present 
conditions. With simultaneous combination of the march and 
transport movement, one part of the subunits proceeds under its 
own power, and another (tanks, prime movers, heavy engineer 
vehicles, vehicles with little range and slow speed) is moved by 
rail or water (sea, river) transport. The advantage of that 
movement method is that capabilities of each kind of transport 
are used to the maximum. Its principal shortcomings are 
disruption of organizational integrity of subunits and 
difficulty of C[.sup]2[/]. In a successive combination, a 
march may precede transport movement or be employed after 
completion of transport movement. 
  Success of combination movement of subunits depends largely 
on the ability of the battalion commander and staff to provide 
in advance for measures ensuring a rapid transfer from movement 
by one kind of transport to movement by another kind of 
transport or to the march. With the simultaneous combination of 
march and transport movement, the art of the battalion commander 
and staff to coordinate actions of those subunits moving under 
their own power and those being conveyed acquires special 
importance. 
  Calculations for movement of subunits by different methods 
are coordinated with each other so that in case transport 
movement stops, all subunits can link up quickly and arrive 
simultaneously in the designated concentration area if possible. 
  If an abrupt situation change gives rise to an interruption 
in transport movement in the course of subunit movement by the 
combination method, subunits being moved by rail or water 
transport quickly unload from rolling stock or ships and proceed 
to a new loading point by march for continuing the transport 
movement. If the situation requires cessation of transport 
movement, subunits which have unloaded from transportation 
assets proceed independently under their own power to the 
designated concentration area or join subunits moving by march. 
<H5>  Chapter IX - Disposition at the Halt </H5>
<H5>  1. Company (Battalion) Disposition at the Halt </H5>
  A company (battalion) may be disposed at the halt in a 
concentration area, assembly area, waiting area and other areas. 
The disposition area as a rule is designated on terrain 
favorable for protection against mass destruction and precision 
weapons and for maskirovka of subunits. A subunit disposition 
area should not be designated near important installations 
(plants, rail junctions, railroad stations, bridges and so on) 
or built-up areas against which the enemy may deliver massed 
fire and nuclear strikes. 
  But we resort to disposing subunits in built-up areas under 
conditions of a severe winter or protracted bad weather when 
there is no time to perform laborious work of making shelters. 
  One should make skilled use of the nature and protective 
properties of terrain in disposing subunits. Thus, on wooded 
terrain it is more advisable to place subunits along forest 
roads, openings and treelines. Since COP's and technical support 
and rear subunits are most vulnerable to the shock wave and 
penetrating radiation of a nuclear burst, they should be located 
in ravines and deep cuts. On mountainous terrain it is advisable 
to take advantage of terrain folds, tunnels, mines, caves and 
areas not subject to avalanches, landslides or floods. In 
deserts and steppe, subunits should be disposed in a more 
dispersed manner, where possible near water sources and as a 
rule away from clear- cut reference points. 
  The duration of a company's (battalion's) disposition at the 
halt may be from several hours to several days depending on 
upcoming operations and situation conditions. 
  The long range of modern weapons and presence of a real 
possibility of enemy use of nuclear and precision weapons, 
airmobile troops and airborne assault forces to a considerable 
depth force subunits disposed at the halt to be in constant 
readiness to repel an attack by the air and ground enemy. 
  To provide protection for the company (battalion) against 
mass destruction weapons and consequently also for its 
survivability in the disposition area, it must be disposed in a 
dispersed manner and in an alignment supporting the execution of 
a maneuver and conduct of battle. Optimum limits of dispersal 
are set depending on the nature of upcoming operations, strength 
level of subunits and terrain conditions. Thus, according to 
existing views, the size of disposition areas may be 1.5-2 
km[.sup]2[/] for the company and up to 10 km[.sup]2[/] for 
the battalion. 
  Studies that have been performed and the experience of field 
training exercises show that the mutual distance between 
companies (batteries) must be 1-1.5 km, between platoons 300-400 
m, and between tanks and BMP's (BTR's) on open terrain 100-150 
m. With that dispersal of subunits a low (very low) yield 
nuclear weapon can put no more than one company (platoon) out of 
commission. 
  The configuration of the battalion disposition area depends 
on the nature of terrain, purpose of the disposition and nature 
of upcoming operations. For example, to occupy an assembly area 
during a hasty attack or a concentration area when disposed in 
the depth of the defense, it is advisable to designate an area 
corresponding to the zone of advance or the defense area. The 
configuration of day (night) or 24-hour rest halt areas should 
correspond approximately to the alignment of the march formation. 
  The order of placement of battalion subunits (Diagram 23) 
when disposed at the halt depends on upcoming operations, length 
of stay in the area, situation conditions and nature of terrain. 
Thus, when disposed at the halt for preparing to conduct battle 
involving forward movement, the disposition of subunits should 
correspond to their alignment for movement and engagement from 
the move. 
  Therefore subunits intended for operations in the first 
echelon of the battle formation are disposed in that part of the 
assembly area (concentration area) nearest the enemy and other 
subunits are disposed in its depth, and the company (battalion) 
is so disposed that subunits have an opportunity to deploy 
quickly and act together. The mortar (artillery) battery is 
disposed at full strength or by platoon on threatened axes, 
being in constant readiness to commence fire, and its COP is 
prepared together with the battalion COP. Air defense subunits 
take up launch (firing) positions in places convenient for 
conducting fire against enemy aircraft and helicopters and other 
airborne targets. A portion of air defense subunits may be 
attached to subunits of the security at the halt. The GLP and 
ATP usually are disposed with MRC's and the reconnaissance 
platoon near the COP. 
  The battalion support platoon is disposed with consideration 
for convenience of preparing battalion subunits for battle. The 
area of the platoon location may reach 1 km[.sup]2[/] and 
that of the squad 0.3 km[.sup]2[/]. Squads are disposed in a 
dispersed manner and distances between them should be 150200 m. 
  The battalion COP is prepared with consideration for 
ensuring 
continuous C[.sup]2[/] of subunits while in and when moving 
out of the disposition area. Communications with subunits 
usually is accomplished by mobile and wire means. Operation of 
radio equipment on transmit is permitted only for warning and 
for controlling the fire of air defense weapons. 
  A duty subunit consisting of a reinforced MRP is assigned in 
the battalion. As a rule, it is located near the COP in constant 
readiness to destroy enemy raiding and reconnaissance parties, 
perform other missions that arise suddenly and fight fires. 
  During disposition at the halt, troops are protected by 
local 
security, and also by security at the halt when there is a 
threat of enemy attack. Security at the halt must be all-around 
and intercept all main roads and approaches to the disposition 
area. 
  Security, communications between COP's, and warning of the 
air and ground enemy, NBC contamination, use of incendiary 
weapons and an immediate threat and beginning of enemy use of 
mass destruction and precision weapons are organized; maskirovka 
measures are conducted; and the movement of personnel and 
vehicles is restricted in the company (battalion). 
  In case the enemy uses mass destruction, precision and 
incendiary weapons or remote minelaying systems against the 
company (battalion) disposition area, the company (battalion) 
will be forced to change the area by direction or permission of 
the senior commander according to a previously developed plan, 
covertly, and in a short time. As a rule, subunits make the 
change of areas as part of their own units. The change of area 
also may be done by decision of the company (battalion) 
commander with surprise enemy use of mass destruction or 
incendiary weapons and the absence of an opportunity to report 
this promptly to the senior commander. Alternate areas and 
movement routes to them should be prepared in advance to support 
a subunit change of disposition areas. The advisability of a 
change in a battalion disposition area located in zones of 
contamination, fires and flooding is determined by the degree of 
danger of the situation at hand to personnel, weapons and 
vehicles. If their decontamination is required, it is done 
outside of new disposition areas. 
  With a change in area, one should pay attention to 
covertness 
of exiting the area, to movement and to occupation of the new 
one. As a rule, the change should be made at night or under 
other conditions of limited visibility. Allaround reconnaissance 
(observation) should be conducted in subunits and air defense 
weapons must be ready to repel a strike by enemy aircraft and 
helicopters. 
  Ground reconnaissance of the designated area is organized 
before the battalion moves out to it. Usually one of the 
battalion staff officers and one officer (warrant officer) or 
NCO from each company are included in the ground reconnaissance 
party. They clarify locations of companies, other organic and 
attached subunits, and COP's; the air defense subunit launch 
(firing) positions; and locations of technical support and rear 
subunits. They reconnoiter and mark access routes, meet their 
subunits and lead them to the designated places. Subunit columns 
are not permitted to halt on roads while awaiting disposition in 
the allotted area. 
  It is forbidden to make signs or put up markers with the 
name 
and numbering of subunits and their commanders' last names. 
  If it is proposed to dispose subunits in an area free of the 
enemy, first enemy raiding and reconnaissance parties and his 
reconnaissance-signaling devices are detected and destroyed, 
mined and contaminated terrain sectors are discovered and 
marked, and suitability of using water and the food remaining 
after the enemy's departure and the possibility of using other 
supplies is determined. 
  Areas with residual radiation as well as areas mined by the 
enemy as a rule are not occupied by troops. 
  The chief of staff prepares proposals for the battalion 
commander in advance for decisionmaking on disposition at the 
halt and draws up a report on the effective combat and numerical 
strength and a diagram of disposition area security and defense. 
The deputy commander for rear services submits a request for 
delivery of supplies, a report on battalion logistic support 
and, in addition, a diagram of the security and defense of 
disposition of battalion rear subunits; and the instructor 
(chemical warfare instructor) compiles a report on personnel 
radiation doses. 
  On receiving a mission for disposition at the halt the 
company (battalion) commander analyzes it and 
estimates the situation. In estimating the 
enemy, one determines his distance and the 
possibility of an attack and delivery of strikes by mass 
destruction weapons, aircraft, artillery and other weapons. 
Conclusions are drawn on this basis about the place, strength 
and makeup of security at the halt and about measures for 
protection against mass destruction weapons, air defense, 
maskirovka, the area's engineer preparation, and conduct of 
reconnaissance and security when moving forward to the 
disposition area. 
  In estimating his own subunits the commander takes 
into account the effect of their situation and makeup on the 
size of disposition areas. In estimating adjacent subunits, 
their primary and alternate disposition areas are studied and 
advisable locations (disposition areas) of one's own subunits 
are planned (if they were not given) and requirements for their 
preparation are specified with consideration of requirements for 
protection against mass destruction weapons. 
  In estimating the nature of terrain, the commander 
plans the locations (areas) and procedure for disposition of 
subunits, C[.sup]2[/] facilities, rear and technical support 
subunits and security at the halt in the battalion. The 
procedure for taking advantage of terrain properties and the 
measures for engineer preparation of the area are specified. 
  In estimating the NBC situation, the possibility 
of safest disposition of subunits and necessary measures for 
protecting personnel and vehicles are determined. 
  In the decision for disposition at the halt, the 
company (battalion) commander specifies the following: locations 
(disposition areas) of subunits and the procedure for moving to 
them; makeup, missions and lines of security at the halt (in the 
battalion) and from what subunits it is assigned; missions and 
places of air defense weapon launch (firing) positions; the duty 
subunit; measures for protecting against mass destruction 
weapons, supporting combat readiness, repelling an enemy 
surprise attack and engineer preparation of areas (primary and 
alternate); and locations of C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
  Based on the decision the company (battalion) commander 
issues the operation order, in which he indicates the 
following in assigning missions: 

  -  for motorized rifle (tank) platoons (companies) and 
other organic and attached subunits--primary and alternate 
locations (disposition areas) and procedure for their occupation 
and engineer preparation; 
  -  for security--makeup and position of security 
(movement route of patrols) and time of occupying it (beginning 
of patrolling); mission, procedure for commencing and conducting 
fire, maintaining communications and reporting the enemy; relief 
procedure, and the password and reply; 
  -  for air defense subunit--launch (firing) positions, 
mission, and time and degree of combat readiness; 
  -  for duty subunit--makeup, for what actions to be 
ready, disposition area and signals for requesting the 
subunit. 


    In organizing comprehensive support, measures are provided 
for repelling an enemy ground attack. For these purposes MRC's 
(TC's) and the ATP are given deployment lines and missions, the 
mortar battery, GLP and attached artillery subunit are given 
firing positions, and the procedure for preparing firing 
positions (lines of deployment) and moving out of them and a 
possible maneuver of fire and subunits are determined. The 
company (battalion) commander determines what duty weapons to 
have in the subunits to repel an enemy air attack and indicates 
the procedure for conducting fire. 
  After assigning missions and organizing comprehensive 
support, the company (battalion) commander supervises 
preparation of the disposition area, servicing and maintenance 
of weapons and vehicles, replenishment of subunits' missiles, 
ammunition and other supplies, and maintenance of subunits' 
combat readiness. 
  The following documents are drawn up in the battalion for 
disposition at the halt: operation order for the disposition, 
diagram of battalion disposition area security and defense, 
request for logistic support of subunits, report on effective 
combat and numerical strength, report on logistic support, and 
report on radiation doses. 
  A company organizes local security, performed by patrols and 
by constant alert duty of observers at the company COP. Patrols 
perform duty by making the rounds of the company disposition. In 
addition, a daily detail is assigned for guarding personnel, 
weapons and military vehicles. 
  Battalion security at the halt is accomplished by security 
posts consisting of a squad (tank) put out at a distance of up 
to 1,500 m on threatened axes where necessary; on concealed 
approaches by listening posts of 2-3 persons put out up to 400 m 
from the battalion disposition area; and within the disposition 
area by local security, including two-man patrols and constant 
alert duty of observers at the battalion COP. 
  Subunits are disposed nearer the outskirts in built-up 
areas. 
Basement rooms of buildings, local bunkers and other sturdy 
structures are used as shelters. 
  Radio-frequency and heat emitting objects are camouflaged by 
special covers (screens), and dummy objects (decoy flares) are 
prepared near them. Routes for subunits' forward movement from 
the area and for maneuver in repelling an enemy attack are 
reconnoitered and prepared in and on approaches to the area. 
  A company (battalion) in a disposition area must be in 
constant readiness to repel an enemy ground and air attack and 
destroy his airborne and raiding and reconnaissance parties. 
<H5>  2. MRC or TC (MRB or TB) in a Security Detachment at the Halt </H5>
  Security at the halt usually is accomplished by security 
detachments at the halt and outposts. 
  The following are missions of a company (battalion) in a 
security detachment at the halt: promptly detect the appearance 
of the ground enemy and warn the protected regiment of this; 
prevent penetration of enemy reconnaissance in the designated 
security zone; not allow servicemen and subunits of their 
regiment who do not know the password, as well as all civilians, 
to travel (walk) across the line of security at the halt; in 
case of enemy attack, support the protected regiment's 
deployment and organized engagement. 
  To perform these missions an MRC (MRB) is reinforced by an 
artillery battery, AT weapon subunits, grenade launchers, air 
defense subunit, and combat engineer subunit; and a TC is 
reinforced by an artillery battery, motorized rifle subunit and 
combat engineer subunit. In all cases the company (battalion) is 
provided with the necessary number of radios, and telephone 
communications is established with it. 
  A security detachment at the halt is given a defense line 
and 
zone of responsibility [polosa okhraneniya i vedeniya razvedki] 
(diagrams 24 and 25). The zone of responsibility may reach up to 
5 km in frontage for a company and up to 10 km for a battalion. 
  The distance from the unit of a company assigned to security 
at the halt should ensure its execution of a maneuver and 
organized engagement and may be up to 10 km, and that of a 
battalion up to 15 km. 
  A security detachment at the halt occupies and prepares its 
indicated line for defense, covering the most important axes 
with outposts. The line must favor defense, provide a good field 
of view toward the enemy, be prepared with emplacements and 
covered by obstacles; emplacements are connected into a 
continuous trench when there is lengthy performance of security 
duty. 
  Primary positions, and alternate positions if time is 
available, are prepared in the zone of responsibility. Based on 
combat training experience, a company may prepare a defense 
position of up to 2.5 km in frontage and a battalion up to 7.5 
km on the main axis of its zone of responsibility. Gaps between 
outposts and likely avenues of tank approach are under 
continuous observation and covered by fire of artillery and 
other weapons. Tanks attached to an MRC also may be used in 
operations from ambushes. The artillery subunit is disposed in 
the depth of the company defense, as a rule on a likely avenue 
of tank approach, and prepares several lines for conducting 
creeping and standing barrier fire and direct fire. Security 
posts are put out for observing the terrain and warning of the 
enemy's appearance ahead and to the sides in the company zone of 
responsibility, and listening posts are put out on concealed 
approaches. Reconnaissance is accomplished by observation from 
all COP's. In addition, patrol squads (tanks) and sometimes also 
a combat reconnaissance patrol are sent out. 
  The security post position is selected so it provides good 
observation and enables its stubborn defense until the security 
detachment is ready for battle. 
  Patrols are sent out to inspect the terrain, check vigilance 
of duty performance by security posts and outposts, and for 
contact with adjacent subunits of security at the halt. 
Observers assigned for this keep a lookout for signals of 
security posts and outposts. 
  The company (battalion) reserve of up to a motorized rifle 
(tank) platoon (company) is disposed in the depth in readiness 
to maneuver to threatened axes. 
  A moving ground target radar reconnaissance post may be 
deployed in the company for prompt detection of an advancing 
enemy, especially from the direction of concealed approaches. 
  On receiving the mission, the company (battalion) commander 
analyzes it, estimates the situation, makes a decision from the 
map, communicates missions to subordinates, moves the company to 
the vicinity of the indicated line, organizes observation and 
security, performs ground reconnaissance, updates the decision, 
issues the operation order and organizes occupation of the 
indicated line. 
  In assigning missions the company (battalion) commander 
indicates the following in the operation order: 

  -  for outposts--means of reinforcement, zone of 
responsibility, positions and extent of their engineer 
preparation, where to place security posts, patrols and 
listening posts, the line up to which to conduct reconnaissance, 
and the procedure for actions in repelling an enemy attack; 
  -  for reserve--disposition area and for what actions 
to be ready; 
  -  for artillery subunits--firing 
positions and missions for supporting the battle of outposts; 
  -  for air defense subunit--launch (firing) positions, 
mission, time and degree of readiness; and for motorized rifle 
(tank) subunits--procedure for conducting fire against enemy 
airborne targets. 


    In the sixth paragraph of the operation order, in 
addition to time of readiness to perform the mission, the 
company (battalion) commander indicates the time for occupying 
positions and for readiness of the system of fire, and the 
sequence and time periods for engineer preparation of positions. 
  After assigning missions to subunits the company (battalion) 
commander organizes coordination; gives them instructions on 
comprehensive support to battle and protection against precision 
weapons; and specifies the procedure for maintaining 
communications with subunits. In addition, the reply also is 
given to commanders of outposts and of subunits assigned for 
conducting reconnaissance. 
  Missions for outposts and attached means of reinforcement as 
well as locations of observers (observation posts) are updated 
on the terrain during ground reconnaissance. 
  On receipt of data on the enemy's appearance, the company 
(battalion) commander reports this to the commander who sent out 
the security element and informs adjacent subunits. Small enemy 
groups attempting to penetrate to protected subunits are 
captured or destroyed by the security detachment. With an attack 
by superior enemy forces the company (battalion) stubbornly 
holds the line and supports the regiment's deployment and 
engagement. 
  In case of an enemy airborne assault force landing in the 
zone of responsibility, the company (battalion) commander takes 
steps to destroy it and reports to the commander who sent out 
the security element. 
<H5>  Chapter X - Combat Support </H5>
<H5>  1. General Provisions </H5>
  Combat support holds an important place among factors 
determining achievement of success in modern combined arms 
battle. It consists of the organization and accomplishment of 
measures aimed at precluding an enemy surprise attack, reducing 
the effectiveness of his fire and strikes against subunits, and 
creating favorable conditions for their organized, timely 
engagement and successful conduct of battle. 
  Reconnaissance, security, protection against mass 
destruction 
weapons, maskirovka, and engineer and chemical support are the 
basic kinds of combat support. In addition, electronic warfare 
is conducted in the battalion. Measures of protection against 
enemy precision weapons are accomplished in performing combat 
support measures. 
  The subunit (battalion, company and so on) commander 
organizes combat support in accordance with the decision which 
has been made and instructions of the higher staff (commander). 
Combat support in the battalion is organized directly by the 
chief of staff in accordance with the battalion commander's 
instructions. 
  The content of combat support measures is determined in the 
course of the situation estimate based on conclusions about the 
effect of particular situation conditions and features on 
upcoming subunit operations in order to take maximum advantage 
of favorable circumstances on the one hand and to reduce and 
neutralize negative circumstances on the other hand. 
Requirements for particular kinds of combat support and their 
elements are determined and their quantitative-qualitative data 
are established, and then a decision is made on the specific 
content of each kind of combat support based on an estimate of 
existing capabilities to satisfy these requirements: goal, 
missions, forces and assets, methods of operations, time, place, 
expected result, and procedure for reporting fulfillment of 
missions. 
  Missions in terms of kinds of combat support are 
communicated 
in the form of directions (instructions). This usually is done 
after assigning the combat mission and at the conclusion of 
organizing coordination. 
  Performance of assigned missions is monitored. In case of 
abrupt situation changes, missions in terms of kinds of combat 
support are promptly updated and new forces and assets assigned 
if necessary. Successful resolution of this matter is 
facilitated by foresight of commanders at all levels of possible 
situation changes and preparation of appropriate combat support 
measures in advance on this basis. 
<H5>  2. Reconnaissance </H5>
  Reconnaissance is one of the most important conditions for 
achieving success in all kinds of battle. It is difficult to 
make substantiated decisions for battle and for accomplishing 
planned operations without knowing the enemy and features of the 
real nature of terrain in an area of operations. Its purpose is 
to collect information on the enemy and terrain in a timely 
manner. 
  Ignorance and especially underestimation of the enemy as a 
rule leads to incorrect conclusions about him, his possible 
concept of operations and the methods, time and place of their 
accomplishment, and consequently also to unsubstantiated 
operations of friendly forces and assets both in terms of 
methods as well as in terms of goal, place and time. The result 
is failure. "The most dangerous thing in war . . .," Lenin 
pointed out, "is to underestimate the enemy and be content with 
the fact that we are stronger. This is the most dangerous thing 
that can cause defeat..."[.sup]1[/] 
  The content of reconnaissance missions is determined by the 
nature of subunit operations. In the defense, reconnaissance 
must uncover enemy preparation for an attack and the possible 
time of his readiness to attack, establish the makeup of the 
enemy grouping, and identify the axis of his main attack and 
nature of maneuver for a close or deep envelopment or for 
building up efforts. It is especially important to determine the 
possible time of an assault, locations of firing positions of 
artillery and other weapons, locations of C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities, the combat effectiveness of enemy troops and their 
affiliation. 
  In the attack, reconnaissance must establish the effective 
combat strength, affiliation, combat effectiveness, situation, 
possible concept of enemy operations, and whether or not he has 
nuclear and precision weapons; and discover firing positions of 
weapons, strongpoints and the system of fire in them, gaps, and 
the nature of engineer preparation of positions. It is 
especially important to precisely establish locations of AT 
missile systems and other AT weapons, tanks, and machinegun 
emplacements and the nature of engineer obstacles. It is 
important to identify features of terrain on the FEBA and in the 
depth from the standpoint of its passability by subunits and 
convenience of employing tanks and other vehicles; establish the 
presence on it of sectors which cannot be viewed visually or by 
radar devices and the presence of natural barriers; and 
determine possibilities of negotiating them. 
  The main demands place on reconnaissance are purposefulness, 
continuity, activeness, promptness, concealment, reliability, 
and accuracy in determining coordinates of reconnoitered 
objectives (targets). Attention should be given to timeliness of 
collecting data and transmitting it to the appropriate echelon. 
The transmission of data must conform to its importance. 
Especially important information is reported immediately. 
  Intelligence is collected by various methods. The 
main ones are observation, listening, reconnaissance ambushes 
and raids, questioning local residents, interrogating prisoners 
and defectors, and studying captured enemy documents. 
Information on the enemy also may be received from higher 
headquarters and adjacent subunits. 
  Reconnaissance in the company and in subunits below company 
is conducted ahead of one's frontage to the depth of the combat 
mission (reach of weapons). 
  A general [obzornaya] reconnaissance zone to a depth up to 
10 
km and a detailed [detalnaya] reconnaissance zone to a depth up 
to 5 km are designated in the battalion for conducting 
reconnaissance. The width of reconnaissance zones usually 
coincides with the frontage of battalion operations. 
  A company (battalion) may conduct reconnaissance in 
force, which is organized and conducted just as in an 
attack on a defending enemy from a position of direct contact. 
At this time reconnaissance of all kinds is conducted actively. 
Subunit commanders in a sector where reconnaissance in force is 
conducted observe the battle and study the enemy. 
  Subunits are prepared for a reconnaissance in force in a 
most 
thorough manner. As a rule, they are reinforced by additional 
weapons. 
  Tactical reconnaissance is conducted by reconnaissance 
patrols, combat reconnaissance patrols, patrol squads (tanks) 
and observation posts. A company (battalion) may be assigned to 
a reconnaissance detachment. Radar reconnaissance is conducted 
by moving ground target radar reconnaissance posts. Engineer 
reconnaissance is performed by tactical reconnaissance entities 
and attached subunits of engineer troops. Radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance is performed by specially trained 
squads, crews and teams. Artillery reconnaissance is conducted 
by organic and attached artillery subunits. 
  A reconnaissance patrol as a rule is sent out at 
reconnaissance platoon strength; in addition, it is also sent 
out at MRP (TP) strength from a reconnaissance detachment. Such 
a patrol operates up to 15 km from its subunits, and up to 10 km 
when assigned from a reconnaissance detachment. 
  The combat reconnaissance patrol is sent out at 
MRP (TP) strength to a distance ensuring observation of it and 
its support by fire. Out of contact with the enemy, the distance 
of a combat reconnaissance patrol may reach 10 km. 
  Patrols conduct reconnaissance by patrol squads (tanks), 
observers and foot patrols. They collect intelligence by 
observation, listening, reconnaissance ambushes, raids, 
questioning local residents, interrogating prisoners, and 
studying enemy documents, weapons and vehicles. In addition, a 
combat reconnaissance patrol collects information by battle. 
  A reconnaissance patrol is sent out in all kinds of battle, 
and a combat reconnaissance patrol as a rule in the attack. In 
the defense, for example, a combat reconnaissance patrol may be 
assigned both to flanks as well as to the rear of the defense 
area during a battle when there is a threat of an airborne 
assault force landing or penetration of airmobile and 
maneuvering parties. During movement they displace by bounds, 
from cover to cover. They perform reconnaissance by all 
personnel, basically by observation. A combat reconnaissance 
patrol employs fire if necessary, destroying enemy weapons and 
personnel hampering its operations. Operations of patrols must 
be distinguished by concealment on the one hand and by speed on 
the other. Their personnel are chosen and trained especially 
thoroughly, taking into account that the enemy also conducts 
reconnaissance and attempts to mislead the other side's 
reconnaissance. Data collected must be valid, and so it is 
rechecked. By the way, this also goes for other methods of 
obtaining reconnaissance information. 
  The reconnaissance ambush is conducted to capture 
prisoners, documents and models of enemy weapons and vehicles, 
and a raid in addition is conducted to destroy (disable) an 
installation. Usually a reconnaissance or motorized rifle (tank) 
subunit up to a platoon in strength or a team of specially 
chosen privates and NCO's is assigned to an ambush. The 
raid is conducted by subunits performing 
reconnaissance. 
  The ambush and raid are a very effective reconnaissance 
method, but they must be thoroughly prepared and supported, 
especially from the standpoint of achieving surprise and speed 
in performing the mission. In the Great Patriotic War an ambush 
was prepared based on careful observation of the enemy to 
determine the most advantageous place where it was possible to 
capture prisoners without losses. Such ambushes often were used 
to intercept enemy scouts. 
  The patrol squad (tank) is sent out from a subunit 
conducting reconnaissance or from a platoon (company) performing 
a combat mission in isolation from the main body in order to 
detect the enemy promptly and reconnoiter terrain. It operates 
at a distance ensuring observation of it and its support by 
fire. A patrol squad performs the mission by moving in a BMP 
(BTR) or motor vehicle or in dismounted formation, and in winter 
also on skis. Reconnaissance is conducted by observation and by 
foot patrols. A patrol tank conducts reconnaissance by 
observation. Patrol squads (a tank) may be assigned to set up a 
reconnaissance ambush. 
  A patrol squad (tank) usually operates off the road, moving 
from one point favorable (convenient) for concealed observation 
to another (structure, bushes, edge of grove, reverse slopes of 
hill or elevation, haystack and so on). 
  In case of an encounter with a small enemy group, the patrol 
squad (tank) lets it go by or, by direction of the commander who 
sent it out, organizes an ambush and captures prisoners, 
documents and models of weapons. When there is a surprise 
encounter and it is impossible to evade, the squad (tank) opens 
fire and thereby warns of the enemy's unexpected appearance. 
  Observation is the principal method of reconnaissance in 
subunits in all kinds of battle. It is conducted continuously by 
commanders personally, by observation posts, by observers of 
tanks, squads, platoons and companies and by duty weapon crews. 
  Observation is organized so as to ensure the best view of 
the 
enemy and terrain ahead of the front, on the flanks and in the 
rear to the greatest possible depth. Special attention must be 
given to sectors difficult to view and to conducting observation 
of their approaches. 
  For the most thorough observation, it should be conducted 
systematically, in a certain sequence of actions. Thus, it is 
advisable to have observers conduct it in sectors and to divide 
a sector conditionally into zones: near, middle and far. 
  First it is desirable to inspect each zone rapidly so as not 
to miss prominent objects which may disappear in time. Then 
observation continues in the zones-first the near, then the 
middle and so on. Objects in zones should be inspected from 
right to left with consideration of terrain relief and the 
presence of local features, where disposition of particular 
enemy forces, installations and assets is possible. 
  Observation is conducted at night and under other conditions 
of limited visibility using night vision device, moving ground 
target reconnaissance radars, and terrain illumination assets 
and is supplemented by listening. 
  Observation of the air enemy is conducted by air observation 
posts of air defense subunits, by the company (battalion) 
recognition and identification point (post), and by observers 
and observation posts. Radiological and chemical observation is 
conducted by chemical observers of companies and by battalion 
observation posts. 
  In the defense (Diagram 25) the company posts one or two 
observers and a chemical observer and the battalion posts one or 
two observation posts and one chemical observation post when 
preparing the attack and during disposition at the halt. 
Observers and a chemical observer are assigned in the company 
(battalion) during an attack, meeting battle, withdrawal and on 
the march. An observer is assigned in the platoon in all cases. 
  An observation (chemical observation) post 
consists of 2-3 observers (chemical observers). They are 
equipped with observation devices, a map or terrain diagram, 
observation log, means of communication, and means of giving 
warning signals, and the chemical observation post in addition 
is equipped with chemical and radiological reconnaissance 
devices. 
  The moving ground target radar reconnaissance post 
usually is deployed together with the company (battalion) 
observer (observation post). It is attended by a specially 
trained company operator or by one assigned from the 
reconnaissance platoon. 
  The observation (chemical observation) post and moving 
ground 
target radar reconnaissance post conduct continuous observation 
and register detected instances of enemy activity right down to 
what are at first glance phenomena of little significance, which 
with subsequent comparison with each other and with other data 
may lead to important conclusions about enemy actions being 
taken or prepared. One should adhere to the rule that there are 
no trifles in reconnaissance. 
  A company (battalion) may operate as a reconnaissance 
detachment. In a reconnaissance detachment, reconnaissance 
is conducted by observation, reconnaissance ambushes, raids and 
if necessary also in force. Reconnaissance patrols and patrol 
squads (tanks) are sent out from a reconnaissance detachment. 
  A reconnaissance detachment is formed in the defense and 
offense. In the defense it is sent out in the absence of direct 
contact with the enemy for timely detection of his forward 
movement and deployment and for determining the makeup and 
direction of operations of the main enemy grouping, firing 
positions of weapons and locations of C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
In the attack a reconnaissance detachment takes advantage of 
gaps and exposed enemy flanks to penetrate into the depth of his 
defense, reconnoiters positions and strongpoints, determines 
locations and directions of forward movement of reserves, 
uncovers the system of obstacles and fortification, and 
determines firing positions of weapons and locations of 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
  A reconnaissance detachment also may perform an active 
mission such as seizure of crossings, passes, road junctions and 
other important objectives. 
  In an encounter with the enemy a reconnaissance detachment 
goes around his reconnaissance and security elements and 
covertly moves up to the main body to reconnoiter its makeup, 
direction of operations, time of passing important lines, 
deployment locations, and occupation of firing positions by 
weapons. 
  On approaching a water obstacle a reconnaissance detachment 
operates broadly and covertly, attempts to detect the enemy's 
presence on it, determines favorable sectors for operations of 
friendly forces, and determines the actual characteristics of 
the obstacle (width, depth), current velocity, steepness of 
banks, presence of fords and other crossings, presence of 
obstacles and so on. 
  In performing missions at night, in a built-up area, in the 
mountains and in the forest, a reconnaissance detachment should 
take into account features of situation conditions and employ 
advisable reconnaissance methods in accordance with them. 
  Under present conditions special attention must be given to 
the preparation and support of personnel of reconnaissance 
subunits and entities when they perform combat missions at 
night. The following is necessary in this connection: thorough 
outfitting with personal gear and equipping of reconnaissance 
entities with moving ground target reconnaissance radars and 
night vision devices; a check of their serviceability; and the 
ability of scouts to conduct observation at night, competently 
select a place for observers and posts, and have a good 
knowledge of revealing signs of targets and other objectives. 
  For example, at night the terrain is better viewed from a 
hollow inasmuch as in this case the object of observation is 
projected against the background of the sky. It is possible to 
determine the distance to it based on a light source. 
  But at night it is possible to have an error of 50 percent 
or 
more in determining a specific distance to a light source. 
  Sounds can be a good source of information at night. For 
example, a conversation is audible at 200-300 m, the sound of 
axe blows at 300-400 m, small arms being loaded up to 500 m, 
operation of a tank engine in place up to 1,000 m, a rifle shot 
up to 2-3 km and a round from an artillery piece up to 5 km. 
  The ability to orient oneself well in the darkness and use 
of 
various methods for this--azimuth, relief, roads, edges of 
groves, outskirts of built-up areas, high-voltage transmission 
lines, telegraph poles, streams and stars-play an exceptionally 
important role for successful performance of night 
reconnaissance missions. 
<H5>  3. Security </H5>
  Security is organized and accomplished in all forms of 
combat 
activity. It has the purpose of preventing penetration of enemy 
reconnaissance into the operating (disposition) area of friendly 
subunits, precluding a surprise attack of the ground enemy and 
of his airborne assault forces (airmobile groups) on them, and 
giving protected subunits time and favorable conditions for 
deployment (placing themselves in combat readiness) and 
engagement. 
  Depending on the nature of missions performed, subunits are 
secured as follows: in battle by combat security 
outposts, on the march by march security, during 
disposition at the halt by security at the halt. In 
addition, local security is organized in all cases. 
  A combat security outpost is sent out by direction 
of the senior commander or by decision of the company 
(battalion) commander. March security and security at the halt 
is sent out by direction of the senior commander, or 
independently during operations in isolation from the main body. 
Local security is organized by subunit commanders depending on 
the mission being performed, situation conditions and the senior 
commander's instructions. It is performed by sentries, patrols 
and listening posts with consideration of the organization of 
alert duty of weapons, observation, and commandant's service. 
  In organizing security it is necessary to indicate the 
following: axes on which special attention must be concentrated; 
place to have security and its makeup; time for sending it out 
(posting it) and missions; password and reply. 
  Constant combat readiness, strict observance of the 
prescribed procedure for alert duty and actions, observance of 
maskirovka measures, and a display of high vigilance as well as 
decisiveness and staunchness are required of security personnel. 
All security personnel must know the password. The reply is 
given to commanders of security subunits. 
  Usually a platoon is assigned to a combat security outpost 
from a battalion in the defense. This platoon is given a 
position up to 2 km from the FEBA. The platoon establishes a 
strongpoint at this position and conducts defense in accordance 
with requirements and provisions of the tactics of defensive 
battle. Missions of the combat security outpost are to secure 
the battalion main body against an enemy surprise attack and 
prohibit him from conducting reconnaissance. 
  In the attack, combat security outpost missions are assigned 
basically to combat reconnaissance patrols. 
  March security is an element of the march 
formation. In addition to security, it also performs the task of 
reconnaissance. A battalion usually sends out a combat 
reconnaissance patrol. In an encounter with the enemy, march 
security destroys his security element and reconnaissance, moves 
to the enemy main body and immobilizes it, providing favorable 
conditions for operations of the battalion (company) main body. 
  Security at the halt is intended for security of 
subunits during their disposition at the halt. In the battalion 
it is accomplished by security posts and listening posts. In a 
company assigned to an outpost it is accomplished by security 
posts. Obstacles are emplaced, listening posts, observation 
posts and two-man patrols are sent out and technical signaling 
devices are used ahead of the FEBA and in gaps between positions 
of security at the halt. 
  Local security is organized and accomplished 
constantly under all conditions regardless of the nature of 
actions being performed, how far off the enemy is, and the time 
of year and day. 
<H5>  4. Protection Against Mass Destruction Weapons </H5>
  Armies of the United States and other NATO countries 
continue 
to rely on use of nuclear and chemical weapons in war. Both the 
munitions as well as their delivery vehicles are constantly 
being improved. All this makes protection of troops against 
these weapons especially important. 
  Protection against mass destruction weapons is organized and 
accomplished for maximum weakening of the effect of enemy NBC 
weapons and results of destruction of enterprises of the nuclear 
and chemical industry, and for preserving combat effectiveness 
and ensuring successful performance of combat missions by 
subunits. It should be organized to the full extent in 
conducting battle both with and without the use of mass 
destruction weapons. 
  It includes the following: dispersal of subunits and a 
periodic change of the areas they occupy, and sometimes also of 
their positions; fortification of one's areas (positions) and 
preparation of maneuver routes; warning subunits about the 
immediate threat and beginning of enemy use of mass destruction 
weapons, about destruction of enterprises of the nuclear power 
and chemical industry, and about friendly nuclear strikes, and 
also warning the personnel about NBC contamination. It also 
includes accomplishment of antiepidemic, sanitary-hygienic, and 
special preventive medicine measures, identifying and mopping up 
the consequences of enemy use of mass destruction weapons, and 
assurance of personnel security and protection during operations 
in zones of contamination and areas of destructive damage, fires 
and flooding. 
  Protection against mass destruction weapons is organized and 
accomplished based on the subunit commander's decision and 
senior commander's instructions with consideration of the nature 
of the mission being performed and actions being accomplished. 
The commander usually indicates: procedure for 
dispersal of subunits, change of disposition areas, and use of 
protective properties of terrain and equipment; procedure for 
warning of the immediate threat and beginning of enemy use of 
mass destruction weapons; signals warning of NBC contamination 
and procedure of actions in response to them; time periods for 
conducting antiepidemic, sanitary-hygienic and special 
preventive medicine measures; procedure for mopping up in the 
aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction weapons; safety 
measures during operations in zones of contamination and areas 
of destructive damage, fires and flooding. 
  The specific content of each of the indicated measures 
depends on situation conditions, and particularly on missions 
being performed, the subunit's situation and makeup, missions 
and operations of adjacent subunits, nature of terrain, weather 
and time of year. 
  Dispersal, a change of areas (positions) and their 
fortification are among the most important measures of 
protection. Thus, dispersal should reduce losses of subunits and 
simultaneously ensure firm C[.sup]2[/], coordination and 
successful conduct of battle. 
  Platoons (companies) are the elements to be dispersed in the 
company (battalion). In the defense gaps may be up to 300 m 
between platoon strongpoints and up to 1,000 m between company 
strongpoints. Dispersal in depth is achieved by disposing a 
portion of the forces behind subunits defending in the first and 
second trenches. For example, the second echelon company in the 
battalion may be up to 400-600 m from first echelon companies. 
In the attack, lateral dispersal is ensured by an interval of 
50-100 m or more between vehicles and platoons (in the 
assaulting line). Dispersal in depth is achieved by the position 
of platoons (companies) in the battle formation as an echelon or 
wedge, and in the battalion in addition by the distance of the 
second echelon (reserve) and artillery from the assaulting line. 
  A change of areas (positions) is envisaged and carried out 
under the outlined plan and by direction of the senior 
commander. It is accomplished covertly and in a short time. 
Subunits usually change areas successively so a high degree of 
combat readiness is preserved on the one hand and maskirovka 
both of the portion of forces remaining in the occupied area as 
well as of subunits moving into another area is ensured on the 
other hand. The other part of subunit forces does not begin 
moving until completion of the move to the new area, 
consolidation in it, and full maskirovka. Areas left by the 
subunit should be maintained as real ones by simulating 
occupation, i.e., they become dummy ones. 
  Positions and areas are fortified and maneuver routes 
prepared in accordance with directions of company (battalion) 
commanders on engineer support. In particular, in the defense 
emplacements, trenches, communication trenches, dugouts and 
bunkers for personnel and emplacements and shelters for weapons 
and vehicles are prepared at positions and in strongpoints and 
areas. Bunkers with special equipment should support the safe 
presence of personnel in them without individual protective gear. 
  Fortification should begin immediately on subunits' arrival 
at the position or in the designated area. Fortification 
structures reduce penetrating radiation by tens of times, 
protect against thermal radiation of nuclear bursts, and protect 
against liquid-droplet chemical agents. Thus, with an air burst 
of a 20 KT nuclear weapon, the radius of the combined casualty 
zone for personnel in the open is around 1,500 m and the area of 
the zone is around 8 km[.sup]2[/]. But if personnel are in 
emplacements, slit trenches or trenches during the burst, then 
the radius of the combined casualty zone is reduced to 1,000 m 
and the area of the zone to 3 km[.sup]2[/]. Consequently, 
even very simple fortification structures reduce the area of the 
personnel casualty zone from a nuclear strike by approximately 
2.8 times. With respect to protection by such structures as 
dugouts, the casualty area of personnel in this case is reduced 
by 25 times compared with their being in the open. 
  In all cases, especially with a shortage of time, it is 
necessary to take advantage of protective and concealing 
properties of terrain--forest tracts, ravines, hollows, caves, 
mines (quarries) and other natural cover. But taking into 
account that woods, hollows and ravines facilitate persistence 
of chemical agent vapors and biological aerosols, it is also 
necessary to check such terrain features carefully. 
  With the appearance of the immediate threat and beginning of 
enemy use of mass destruction weapons or delivery of friendly 
nuclear strikes, subunits are warned by the company (battalion) 
commander by direction of (at a signal from) the battalion 
(regimental) staff based on intelligence. Subunits are notified 
immediately over all means of communication by unified signals 
constantly in effect. 
  Steps are taken ensuring protection of subunits on receiving 
a signal warning of NBC contamination. Personnel in the open put 
on individual protective gear and those in closed fighting 
vehicles (BTR's) put on breathing masks (protective masks). 
  Hatches, doors and firing ports in fighting vehicles and 
tanks are closed and the system of protection against mass 
destruction weapons is turned on. Personnel in protective 
shelters turn on the collective protection system. 
  For antiepidemic, sanitary-hygienic and preventive purposes, 
protective inoculations are given, careful monitoring of all 
servicemen's observance of rules of personal and social hygiene 
is organized, and special protective drugs (antidotes, 
antibiotics, antiradiation and other drugs) are used based on a 
comprehensive estimate of the possible situation in case of the 
use of mass destruction weapons. These measures are carried out 
by direction of the senior commander or independently when there 
is immediate danger. 
  In case of enemy use of mass destruction weapons it is 
necessary to identify the consequences without delay: determine 
losses, the personnel's morale and the scale and nature of 
contamination, destructive damages, fires and flooding. This is 
done based on subunit commanders' personal observation, reports 
from subunits and the data of various kinds of reconnaissance 
and of radiological and chemical monitoring. Based on the data 
received and their estimate, the subunit commander makes a 
decision in which he determines the procedure for moving 
subunits out of the danger area, restoring combat effectiveness, 
mopping up in the aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction 
weapons, as well as further actions. And it is important 
initially to determine the combat-effective subunits and methods 
of their actions in the situation at hand, and then the specific 
content of measures for mopping up in the aftermath of the use 
of mass destruction weapons and the procedure for carrying them 
out. 
  In mopping up in the aftermath of enemy use of mass 
destruction weapons it is necessary to reconnoiter the stricken 
area, organize rescue operations, give first aid to victims, 
transport or carry them out of the casualty (contamination) 
zone, evacuate them to aid stations and perform emergency 
prevention. Then perform decontamination of subunits and 
personnel. Simultaneously with this, one should clear rubble, 
organize the extinguishing of fires and perform restrictive 
isolation measures. 
  Partial decontamination of subunits and personnel should be 
carried out by order of the commander without ceasing to perform 
the combat mission. Complete decontamination is performed by 
order of the senior commander. 
  In connection with the vastness of zones of contamination 
and 
destructive damage, a subunit often may end up in them at full 
strength. Under these conditions it is necessary to take steps 
to ensure safety and protect personnel. For this it is necessary 
to constantly keep an eye on the NBC situation in the area of 
operations, changes on the terrain and the degree of personnel 
exposure. In case the danger of personnel injuries appears, 
promptly use protective gear, clarify the method of actions and 
strictly monitor the personnel's observance of rules of conduct 
on contaminated terrain. 
  In a situation where a subunit has to cross a zone with a 
high level of contamination, it is advisable to go around it. 
But if that is impossible, such a zone should be crossed at 
maximum speed along axes ensuring least injury and contamination 
of personnel and vehicles. In all cases reconnaissance should be 
carried out for this purpose, such as sending out a specially 
trained patrol squad (tank). 
  Maintaining direct contact with the enemy is an indirect 
measure of ensuring personnel safety from injury by mass 
destruction weapons; this will hamper him in employing his 
weapons because of the threat of injury to his own troops. 
Therefore in the attack, for example, one should close quickly 
with the enemy and pursue him relentlessly. 
  In all cases, increased safety of friendly subunits is 
ensured by thorough measures of maskirovka, use of natural 
cover, and rapid execution of a maneuver. 
  Under present conditions not only weapons of mass 
destruction, but also conventional precision weapons have begun 
to possess great casualty and damage effect. According to 
foreign specialists' views, to a certain extent their combat 
effectiveness is even becoming comparable with low-yield 
tactical nuclear weapons. Thus, just one T-22 or T-16 rocket of 
the J-SAK reconnaissance-strike complex (of the Assault Breaker 
type) is capable of killing around ten armored targets with high 
probability (0.7-0.8). Accordingly, just one salvo of a 
battalion of such rockets (6 launchers) potentially can disable 
almost up to two tank battalions. Aviation and field artillery 
presently have precision guided homing weapons. AT precision 
weapons (AT guided missiles) have become especially numerous in 
combat arms subunits and units. 
  It is obvious that without taking effective steps to counter 
enemy use of such weapons and to reduce their effectiveness 
against a subunit, it is difficult to ensure preservation of 
combat effectiveness on the modern battlefield even when nuclear 
weapons are not used. Therefore along with measures of 
protection against mass destruction weapons there also has to be 
protection against precision weapons. 
  In principle, some of the measures of protection against 
mass 
destruction weapons as well as measures of electronic warfare 
and maskirovka also provide protection against precision 
weapons. In all cases capable use of protective properties of 
terrain and combat vehicles, skilled use of maneuver and 
thorough air defense organization also serve the purposes of 
effective protection against mass destruction and precision 
weapons. 
<H5>  5. Electronic Warfare </H5>
  Various electronic equipment is playing an ever larger role 
in development of means of warfare, especially systems and 
methods of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and units in battle. Under 
present conditions C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and weapons 
essentially is based completely on the use of various electronic 
equipment. These are the radios of command and staff vehicles, 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) and the electronic equipment of AT 
missile systems, air defense subunits, aircraft, helicopters, 
and artillery, reconnaissance and other subunits. The use of 
electronic equipment for reconnaissance, C[.sup]2[/] and 
precise guidance in particular permitted realizing modern 
precision weapons systems. Such systems include the J-SAK 
reconnaissance-strike complex (Assault Breaker program), which 
uses an airborne radar system for reconnaissance and weapon 
guidance, an automated system for transmitting commands to 
weapons, and homing submunitions of the Skeet or Gem type 
delivered to the target by ground or air-launched missiles with 
cluster warheads. ATGM's also are included among precision 
weapons. Thus, the TOW ATGM has a semiactive opto-electronic 
guidance system and a range of fire up to 4 km and the Hellfire 
ATGM has a laser active guidance system and a range up to 6 km 
(in the future 8-10 km or more). The electronic guidance system 
permits having a hit probability on an armored target by an 
artillery projectile of 0.5-0.6 or more at a range around 16 km 
(Copperhead projectile and so on). 
  The use of electronic equipment in modern battle took on a 
broad character and began to characterize the so-called 
electronic environment. 
  In connection with the fact that use of electronic equipment 
led to a considerable increase in quality and reliability of 
C[.sup]2[/] and to a sharp growth in effectiveness of 
weapons, it is possible to substantially hamper reconnaissance 
and C[.sup]2[/] and reduce the effectiveness of weapons and 
other combat assets by affecting electronic equipment. Therefore 
along with inflicting direct damage on the enemy by fire and 
strikes, in accomplishing the most varied combat missions each 
of the opposing sides also will attempt to disrupt or hamper the 
operation of enemy electronic equipment and systems while 
simultaneously taking all steps to ensure stable operation of 
his similar equipment. As a result a new phenomenon arises in 
conduct of modern combat operations-- electronic warfare [EW] 
[radioelektronnaya borba]. 
  EW represents a complex of subunits' measures and actions 
interrelated by goal, missions, place and time and directed 
toward detection and subsequent destruction and electronic 
suppression [radioelektronnoye podavleniye] of enemy electronic 
equipment, and also electronic protection [radioelektronnaya 
zashchita] of friendly means of C[.sup]2[/] and fire control, 
and opposition [protivodeystviye] to enemy technical 
reconnaissance equipment. Its importance received special 
confirmation during local wars in Southeast Asia and in the Near 
East, where successful performance of EW missions had a very 
direct influence on the course and outcome of combat operations. 
  EW is organized and conducted in the battalion to 
disorganize 
C[.sup]2[/] of opposing enemy subunits, degrade the 
effectiveness of employment of his weapons and technical 
reconnaissance equipment, and also ensure stable operation of 
means of C[.sup]2[/] of friendly subunits and of fire 
control. It is accomplished in close combination with fire 
damage and destruction of the principal enemy means of 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and weapons. It is conducted by 
fulfilling certain measures of electronic suppression, 
electronic protection of friendly means of C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits and weapons, and opposition to enemy technical 
reconnaissance equipment. It is also conducted in coordination 
with performance of reconnaissance and maskirovka missions. 
  The battalion commander organizes conduct of EW in subunits. 
He should provide for and organize fulfillment of such measures 
as detection (reconnaissance) of enemy electronic targets and 
their engagement by fire of available weapons, electronic 
suppression of enemy electronic equipment, opposition to his 
technical reconnaissance equipment, and protection of friendly 
electronic equipment and other installations. 
  To resolve these matters back when analyzing the mission 
that 
was received it is necessary to understand the following: what 
EW measures are being planned by the senior commander and what 
is the mission of one's own subunit in their fulfillment; and 
what is to be done in what time periods, by what means, and by 
what methods. 
  In the course of the situation estimate, along with other 
matters the battalion commander also should determine whether or 
not the enemy has guided weapons, what their strong and weak 
points are under given conditions, locations of C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities and observation posts, and locations of his 
electronic equipment and, based on this, outline conditions and 
the advisable method and procedure of combating that equipment. 
  It is especially important to correctly estimate the terrain 
and the effect of weather and time of year and day and to 
determine on what lines and at what time it is advisable to lay 
smoke screens and turn on IR searchlights, and at what places it 
is advantageous to use concealing and camouflaging properties of 
terrain for protection against enemy technical reconnaissance 
equipment. 
  In estimating friendly subunits, one should determine the 
vulnerability of friendly guided weapon systems and necessary 
measures for their electronic protection and for ensuring stable 
C[.sup]2[/] of friendly subunits under conditions of enemy 
ECM [radioelektronnoye protivodeystviye]. It is necessary to 
take into account the operation of electronic equipment of 
adjacent subunits and of friendly troops and determine how to 
avoid mutual interference with that equipment during 
simultaneous operation. 
  In organizing EW the battalion commander indicates 
the following: what enemy C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
installations are to be destroyed by fire or captured (disabled) 
and at what time, and the forces and assets to be used for this; 
procedure for employing electronic suppression assets; missions 
for electronic protection and for opposition to enemy technical 
reconnaissance equipment; and readiness times. 
  EW measures are reflected on working maps of subunit 
commanders, where one should indicate fire damage of enemy 
electronic targets, the lines, time and methods of laying smoke 
screens, lines and time for turning on IR searchlights, areas 
and lines for radar and thermal maskirovka, dummy C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities and positions, and places for setting up decoy flares. 
  In conducting EW in the battle of motorized rifle and tank 
subunits, the primary targets for fire engagement should be 
considered the electronic equipment of C[.sup]2[/] facilities 
of enemy mechanized infantry (tank) companies and battalions, 
artillery battalions (batteries) and air defense subunits with 
their electronic equipment, reconnaissance subunits (entities) 
employing electronic equipment for surveillance (detection, 
intersection) and communications, AT subunits as a whole, 
individual ATGM systems on an armor base, portable ATGM systems, 
as well as facilities for C[.sup]2[/] of aviation (forward 
air controller points). 
  An electronic target [radioelektronnyy obyekt] is understood 
to mean one of the elements of the system for C[.sup]2[/] of 
troops (subunits) and weapons outfitted with electronic 
equipment. Thus, in the battalion C[.sup]2[/] system of 
armies of the United States and FRG the primary electronic 
targets are the communications center of the battalion command 
(observation) post and the moving ground target reconnaissance 
radar (AN/PPS-5), as well as communications centers of command 
posts of artillery battalion C[.sup]2[/], mortar locating 
radars (AN/TPQ-36) and artillery locating radars (AN/TPQ-37) 
included in the Firefinder non-visual target acquisition system, 
which in turn operate as part of the TACFIRE field artillery 
automated C[.sup]2[/] system (USA). 
  In the course of battle those targets are disposed as 
follows: battalion (mechanized infantry battalion, tank 
battalion) CP 2-4 km from forward subunits in the defense and 
0.5-1.5 km in the offense; 155-mm SP howitzer artillery 
battalion CP 3-8 km from the FEBA; and field artillery radar 
positions are selected within 3-10 km from the FEBA. 
  In addition, three radio nets are established in battalions 
for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits: command, intelligence and rear. 
Communications with subordinate subunits is accomplished only 
with radios in the UHF frequency band (30-76 MHz). With 
introduction of the TACFIRE and Adler automated field artillery 
fire control systems in armies of the United States and FRG, the 
electronics of these systems accommodated at battery CP's and 
firing positions and at forward observation posts also should be 
regarded as electronic targets to be affected at the company 
(battalion) level. As we know, the TACFIRE (Adler) system 
enables rapid computer-assisted processing of target data and 
calculation of firing data at the battery-artillery group level 
in a matter of seconds. Therefore timely detection and 
destruction of its electronic targets is an important condition 
for sharply degrading the effectiveness of enemy field artillery 
fire. 
  Forward air controllers are in battle formations of first 
echelon battalions (1-2 km from the line of forward subunits, 
including at CP's of these battalions). They help aircraft 
locate targets and vector them to targets. Forward control posts 
equipped with radios for communicating with ground air control 
facilities and with aircraft are technical air control entities 
usually disposed in operation areas of first echelon battalions 
(brigades). Laser target designation devices for illuminating 
ground targets also are installed at the forward control posts 
in support of aimed strikes by aircraft using aircraft weapons 
with laser guidance systems. 
  CP's of Chaparral-Vulcan and Stinger batteries located 2-4 
km 
from the FEBA should be considered electronic targets in the 
enemy air defense system. They have some of the elements of the 
AN/MPQ-49 radar system for acquisition of low-flying targets-- 
the AN/TPQ-32 radars. 
  MRC's (TC's) and MRB's (TB's) can successfully engage all 
the 
aforementioned targets by fire of their supporting artillery 
subunits (batteries, battalions). Performing EW missions by fire 
damage of enemy electronic targets is part of overall fire 
damage of the enemy carried out in accordance with the 
commander's concept. 
  In determining the procedure for fire damage of a target, it 
should be taken into account that a battalion CP usually is 
disposed in an area of around 1.52 hectares and up to 300 rounds 
(6 artillery pieces) are necessary for its destruction in 
shelters. At the same time it should be taken into account that 
the fire of one battery with that ammunition expenditure 
sometimes will require a time of several tens of minutes, and in 
this interval the CP may change places (move out from under the 
strike). Therefore in a number of cases it is more advantageous 
to deliver a fire strike against a CP not with a battery, but 
with a battalion. The mission will be executed faster and the 
target will not manage to get out from under the strike. 
  Engaging an artillery battalion CP (the area is the very 
same-- 1.5-2 hectares) requires around 500 rounds and conduct of 
fire by a battery or battalion. Engaging the CP of a 
Chaparral-Vulcan or Stinger battery, forward air controllers and 
radars requires around 200-220 rounds and conduct of fire by a 
battery (six pieces). Engaging those targets disposed in the 
open requires an ammunition expenditure approximately 3-4 times 
less. 
  Electronic suppression is conducted in the 
battalion to disrupt operation of enemy infrared and laser 
reconnaissance and weapon control equipment by using active and 
passive jammers mounted on the vehicles (objects) being 
protected. To perform missions of electronic suppression of 
enemy electronic equipment in the company (battalion), it is 
necessary to use tank and BMP thermal smoke apparatus, the smoke 
grenade launching system, IR searchlights and smoke hand 
grenades (smokepots) and also employ artillery smoke ammunition 
of supporting artillery subunits. Use of these assets is 
especially effective in combating enemy AT weapons such as 
ATGM's. 
  It is common knowledge that it is typical of the ATGM 
control 
system that the missile is tracked automatically during flight 
using the infrared coordinator of a device guiding on signals of 
the missile's onboard tracking flare. Based on data of the IR 
coordinator, the guidance device computer automatically produces 
commands transmitted to the missile over a wire communication 
line (at the present time) and which adjust its flight along the 
line of sight with the target. 
  Such a control system has three basic functional channels: 
target sighting (tracking), missile tracking, and transmission 
of signals--guidance commands. The first two channels are the 
most vulnerable: they have an open atmospheric sector and by 
affecting it with smoke it is possible to disrupt or hamper 
control of the missile and thereby sharply degrade its hit 
probability. Another vulnerable element of the sighting channel 
is the optical sightoperator link, which can be affected by 
blinding-type interference (such as flashes of firing or a 
shellburst) and by creating heat-emitting decoys in case a 
thermal-imaging night sight is used. Creation of interference 
using an IR searchlight which simulates missile tracking flare 
emissions is an effective form of jamming the guidance device's 
IR coordinator. 
  Interference with the new Hellfire ATGM with semiactive 
laser 
homing head also can be created successfully by electronic 
suppression assets. Vulnerable spots of this system are channels 
for laser illumination and for target tracking from aboard a 
helicopter and by the missile homing head. Operation of these 
channels can be disrupted by remote laying of smoke screens by 
artillery rounds and by creating smoke screens near the target 
using thermal smoke apparatus of tanks and BMP's. It is also 
advisable to create heatemitting decoys inasmuch as this may 
help reduce the effectiveness of Hellfire missiles and of homing 
submunitions of cluster warheads on the missiles of 
reconnaissance-strike complexes. Infrared pyrotechnic cartridges 
and smoke grenades fired from tanks (BMP's) as well as burning 
smokepots, which are a source of thermal emissions, can be such 
heat-emitting decoys. 
  Protection of friendly electronic equipment 
against damage by enemy munitions which home on emissions, 
against enemy electronic suppression, and against the effect of 
ionizing and electromagnetic emissions of nuclear bursts is an 
important component of EW. 
  The principal method of protecting company (battalion) 
electronic equipment against damage by enemy munitions which 
home on emissions is by rigid regulation of their operation. 
This is achieved, for example, by turning on electronic 
equipment only for the time necessary for performing the combat 
mission, by using intermittent emission modes, by changing 
operating frequencies and by employing diversionary (imitative) 
sources of electromagnetic emissions. Using directional 
antennas, selecting frequencies favorable (stable) for given 
conditions, maneuvering operating frequencies and radio 
operating data in a timely manner, operating radio equipment on 
reduced power, and siting operating radio equipment with 
consideration of the terrain's screening properties and of the 
location and power of adjacent radios and other sources of 
electromagnetic emissions also are advisable. 
  One should pay attention to the following in considering 
questions of protecting friendly electronic equipment. In 
conducting EW support measures [radiotekhnicheskaya razvedka] 
and in jamming, NATO armies attach great importance to 
"compelling" radio operators of the net being reconnoitered to 
shift to clear-text transmissions. it is believed that along 
with a terrain relief analysis, intercepting the names of built- 
up areas, reference points and directions mentioned in such 
transmissions can substantially facilitate reconnaissance 
missions. 
  It is obvious that one of the simplest but very important 
requirements for ensuring good protection of friendly electronic 
equipment against enemy jamming is strict observance of rules of 
radio traffic and maximum reduction of the time of going on the 
air to transmit, basically by using brief signals and commands. 
The use of redundant communication channels and signaling 
devices was a very effective measure based on the past war's 
experience. 
  Opposition to enemy technical reconnaissance 
assets is one of the most important components of 
electronic warfare. The essence of such opposition is the 
elimination (weakening) of revealing signs of friendly subunits, 
installations, weapons and measures being carried out, and also 
special protection for technical means of data processing and 
transmission. 
  The enemy can conduct space, aerial and ground 
reconnaissance 
using technical means. Radiotechnical, radar, photographic, 
television, thermal, infrared, laser, radiation, acoustic, 
magnetometric, seismic and other means are used for this. 
  Subunits and weapons are concealed and revealing signs of 
their installations and measures being carried out are 
eliminated or weakened by using means of maskirovka and 
simulation of military vehicles, by using the terrain's 
concealing properties, by fulfilling requirements of secure 
C[.sup]2[/], by creating interference to technical means of 
reconnaissance using smoke, by reducing the level of combat 
vehicle thermal emissions, and by other maskirovka measures. 
  The use of radio signaling gear (REMBASS) by the enemy may 
become widespread. He can emplace radio signaling devices on 
probable movement routes and in concentration areas. Subunits 
must constantly observe the surrounding terrain to detect and 
destroy them promptly. 
  The measures for conducting EW examined above are carried 
out 
in all kinds of battle and in other operations to the full 
extent, but with emphasis on those most essential for specific 
situation conditions. Thus, the entire enumerated set of EW 
measures may be used in the defense. In accordance with senior 
commanders' instructions, it is necessary to set up vertical 
screen camouflage nets [maska-ekran], decoy flares, and corner 
reflectors at the places planned for this. Concealing properties 
of terrain are used to the maximum extent. Radar, optical and 
thermal maskirovka measures are carried out to the full extent 
in preparing emplacements and positions in addition to 
maskirovka using improvised materials. It is advisable to create 
a low-density concealing area smoke screen ("smoke haze") and to 
create dummy installations and thermal emission sources. 
  Electronic targets detected in the course of battle should 
be 
destroyed quickly by fire of supporting artillery and mortars 
and also by fire of organic weapons, and smoke screens should be 
used to blind them (in the disposition area of the targets). 
  The necessary maneuver, a change of positions, movement to a 
line of firing positions or launching of a counterattack should 
be carried out using terrain sectors sheltered from observation 
from the enemy's direction, edges of groves, embankments, dams 
and ravines. Use smoke screens in open sectors. 
  In addition to general measures in the attack, the following 
are specific measures: moving to the line of departure using 
terrain sectors sheltered from the enemy's direction, edges of 
groves, hollows and reverse slopes; firing smoke grenades 
against terrain in the direction of enemy EW support and 
surveillance equipment, including helicopters employing ATGM's; 
and deploying and assaulting under cover of smoke screens 
(placed by supporting artillery and organic assets) ahead of the 
FEBA and on flanks. 
  It is advisable to carry out an assault of the enemy FEBA 
and 
penetration of his defense with IR searchlights switched on. 
During the assault and battle in the depth it is advisable to 
make wide use of smoke to blind the enemy and cover friendly 
subunits. It is desirable to create smoke screens in the depth 
at 2-3 lines successively 600-800 m from each other using 
organic equipment of tanks and BMP's. Smoke screens also should 
be created actively during counterattacks of the enemy and when 
going around his strongpoints on the flanks. In assigning 
missions to subunits for operations in the depth, especially for 
the pursuit, it is also necessary to assign them the mission of 
destroying enemy CP's, OP's and radars by a surprise assault, 
and assign some of the subunits (a squad, a platoon) to destroy 
detected targets (electronic equipment) by an assault. 
  When the battalion or company is in the attack position or 
disposition area, and also for countering technical means of 
reconnaissance, subunits should be placed covertly and the 
conduct of radio conversations should be completely precluded. 
Corner reflectors and thermal decoys are set up to simulate 
targets by direction of senior commanders. If the situation 
permits, smoke may be used, but on condition that it not reveal 
yourself or adjacent subunits. 
<H5>  6. Tactical Maskirovka </H5>
  The purpose of maskirovka is to achieve surprise of subunit 
operations and preserve their combat effectiveness. Maskirovka 
missions consist of ensuring concealment of friendly subunits 
and misleading the enemy regarding their makeup, situation and 
the commander's concept. The most important requirements for 
maskirovka are continuity, persuasiveness, variety and 
activeness. Maskirovka measures are carried out immediately by 
subunits when they take up a particular position and are 
accomplished in all kinds of battle and in other operations. 
  Maskirovka missions are performed by a set of measures for 
concealing the simulation and by decoy actions. The set of these 
measures includes the following: use of concealing properties of 
terrain and conditions of limited visibility; use of authorized 
means of maskirovka, local materials and aerosols (smoke); 
modifying the appearance (shape) of weapons and vehicles (by 
setting up various structures on them which change the object's 
external appearance); painting weapons and vehicles to resemble 
the background of surrounding terrain; and preparing (erecting) 
dummy installations, structures, emplacements and so on. 
  Goals of maskirovka also are served by a timely warning to 
subunits about operations of enemy reconnaissance assets and by 
observance of rules of secure C[.sup]2[/], especially of the 
previously established regime of activity in an area or at a 
position. An important role is played by strictly fulfilling 
measures and rules of light, thermal, sound, radio, 
radiotechnical and radar discipline and requirements of 
maskirovka discipline, and by promptly detecting and eliminating 
revealing signs. 
  The subunit commander organizes maskirovka. In so doing he 
indicates basic maskirovka measures; the extent, time 
periods and procedure of fulfilling them; forces and assets for 
accomplishing maskirovka measures; and procedure for observing 
maskirovka discipline in the subunit. 
  Adopting maskirovka measures to protect weapons and military 
vehicles against precision weapons plays an important role. For 
this one should use ravines, reverse hillslopes, radar dead 
ground and other concealing properties of terrain and should 
carry out measures for reducing the radar, thermal and optical 
signature of fighting vehicles with respect to the surrounding 
terrain background. It is advisable to install heat-dissipating 
screens (covers) over heat-emitting surfaces (places) of 
fighting vehicles (tanks, BMP's and so on). There should be wide 
use of thermal simulators (decoy flares) and radar and laser 
reflectors. 
  In the interests of concealment, in organizing for battle it 
is necessary to keep preparatory measures secret and preclude a 
leak of information about upcoming operations--place, times, 
methods, and especially measures for deceiving the enemy. It is 
important that maskirovka measures in turn not draw enemy 
attention (for example, by their simultaneous active 
accomplishment in certain areas). 
  In this connection, to mislead the enemy one should carry 
out 
all maskirovka measures considering the likelihood of their 
perception by the enemy, i.e., one should conjecture what he may 
take to be simulation or a dummy installation and what he may 
take to be real. Decoy actions, a deliberate display of activity 
of real forces and assets on a dummy axis or in a dummy area, 
and simulation of real installations, positions and emplacements 
by creating dummy ones, where the alleged presence and 
functioning of particular assets or subunits is shown by 
recreating appropriate revealing signs, are especially effective 
in this regard. These measures must be determined and carried 
out in accordance with the commander's concept and with the idea 
of deceiving the enemy. 
  It should be borne in mind that decoy actions, simulation, 
and creation of dummy installations of some one subunit should 
not disrupt another subunit's similar measures and not come into 
contradiction with corresponding measures under the senior 
commander's plan. Therefore they must be carried out with his 
authorization. 
  Conducting measures which would create a distorted 
impression 
on the enemy's part about the system of fire and obstacles, 
FEBA, trench trace, location of emplacements of main weapons, 
and about boundaries and flanks is of special significance in 
the defense. To this end an appropriate procedure should be 
thought out for conduct of fire by various weapons before the 
beginning of battle, their maneuver, a change of locations, and 
a change of concealing devices to change the shape of the 
general background at the position, in the defense area, in the 
strongpoint and in gaps between them. One must ensure that the 
enemy forms a distorted impression of the defense alignment or 
is constantly uncertain about its particular status. It is 
especially important to carefully conceal main forces and 
assets, fire sacks, fire ambushes and reserves. 
  In choosing maskirovka methods and means, one should 
consider 
the feature of specific situation conditions: nature of relief, 
coloration of vegetation, and color background of grass. On open 
terrain, for example, it is advisable to camouflage emplacements 
and shelters to resemble spots of bare soil. Open sectors 
unoccupied by subunits are spotted for purposes of maskirovka. 
The number of spots on the terrain should be greater than the 
number of installations being concealed. 
  Camouflage painting of equipment and structures--protective, 
imitative and disruptive--presently is widely used. For example, 
tricolor camouflage painting (black, brown, green) of combat 
vehicles almost doubles the time it takes to detect the object 
and reduces the likelihood of its visual detection by one and 
one- half times compared with single-color painting.[.sup]2[/] 
  Strictest observance of maskirovka discipline is necessary 
in 
all kinds of battle. For example, one must constantly watch to 
prevent revealing signs when on defense, especially in direct 
contact with the enemy. One should not allow excessive 
movements, preclude them in open places, not give commands in a 
loud voice and not light fires at night. In this case even a 
smoldering cigarette can be noticed at a distance up to 500 m, 
and a lit match up to 1.5 km. 
  Disturbed maskirovka should be restored without delay in the 
course of defensive battle. Carry out movements and change 
positions using sheltered routes. Simultaneously with this, 
leave either some assets or a simulation of them at previous 
positions so as not to cause the enemy to suspect a possible 
maneuver. 
  Creating dummy strongpoints, positions, installations and 
movement routes is especially effective in the defense for 
maskirovka of its true alignment. One always should bear in mind 
that dummy installations should not differ from real ones and 
their number must be such that they reliably mislead the enemy. 
  In the attack it is important to conceal preparation for it 
and the place and time of the assault and ensure its surprise. 
For this it is necessary to take advantage of natural concealing 
properties and, where they are insufficient, to employ smoke 
screening and installation of camouflage nets. Smoke screening 
and installation of camouflage nets also should be used 
especially actively on a dummy axis, where an assault also is 
possible. Moreover, it is on such a dummy axis that one must 
show it is the primary axis by means of intensive firing, engine 
noise, movements, radio conversations, conduct of reconnaissance 
and so on. 
<H5>  7. Engineer Support </H5>
  The purpose of engineer support is to create necessary 
conditions for subunits' prompt, concealed forward movement, 
deployment and maneuver; for increased protection of personnel, 
weapons and vehicles against all weapons; and for inflicting 
losses on the enemy and hampering his operations. Engineer 
support in the company (battalion) includes engineer 
reconnaissance, fortification, engineer measures for maskirovka 
and protection against precision weapons, emplacing engineer 
obstacles, breaching obstacles and rubble, making crossings over 
barriers, preparing and maintaining crossings, obtaining and 
purifying water, and preparing water supply points. 
  Successful performance of engineer support missions is 
achieved by having them properly understood by all subunit 
commanders and personnel, by a high level of the personnel's 
engineer training, by skillful use of available means of 
performing engineer work (authorized and improvised equipment 
and material), and by continuous conduct of engineer 
reconnaissance of the enemy and terrain. 
  The subunit commander organizes engineer support. To this 
end, in organizing the defense he indicates the 
following: nature and time periods of fortification and 
maskirovka of positions, strongpoints and disposition areas; 
main axes which must be covered by obstacles; what installations 
must be demolished (prepared for demolition) and the time and 
methods of performing these tasks; and what maneuver routes to 
prepare. The commander of an engineer subunit (if it is 
attached) is told the procedure for using engineer vehicles and 
explosives, places and times for laying minefields and the 
procedure for the engineer subunit's coordination with motorized 
rifle (tank) and other subunits. 
  Positions, strongpoints and defense (disposition) areas are 
fortified by efforts of the subunits themselves with maximum use 
of heavy equipment, with use of explosive charges, local 
materials, constructions and factory-made structures, and with 
consideration of protective properties of terrain. The procedure 
for fortifying strongpoints (positions, areas) and the sequence, 
time periods and extent should be determined based on the 
requirement of the subunit's constant readiness for battle and a 
build-up of the protection of personnel, weapons and vehicles 
against all weapons. 
  Fortification increases survivability of a subunit in the 
defense severalfold. The more time there is, naturally the 
higher the degree of preparation of a position or area. 
  The increase in subunit survivability is determined by the 
fact that as fortification of positions and areas is upgraded, 
personnel will be disposed in ever stronger structures. 
  Engineer measures of maskirovka and protection against 
precision weapons are carried out with consideration of the time 
of year and in accordance with situation conditions, basically 
by using authorized camouflage gear and means of simulation and 
the installation of overhead cover and heat-dissipating screens 
and covers over heat-emitting surfaces of armored equipment. 
  Engineer obstacles are arranged ahead of the FEBA, on 
flanks, 
around weapon emplacements and sometimes also in the depth. 
Subunits emplace mainly explosive obstacles (minefields, mine 
clusters, mined abatis and so on) and nonexplosive obstacles 
(wire fences and entanglements, knife rests, hedgehogs and so 
on). They should be emplaced with consideration of the system of 
fire so that each minefield and other barrier or obstacle is 
covered by fire, especially fire of AT weapons. 
  In organizing the attack the subunit commander indicates the 
following: nature, sequence and time periods for fortification 
and maskirovka of subunit disposition areas in the attack 
position (assembly area); number, places, time and methods of 
breaching passages in enemy obstacles and obstacles ahead of the 
friendly FEBA, and the procedure for marking and maintaining 
them and passing subunits through them; procedure and methods 
for crossing minefields laid by remote minelaying equipment and 
for negotiating difficult sectors; places, kinds and readiness 
time of crossings over water obstacles; forces and assets for 
performing engineer support missions; and the procedure for 
using engineer subunits and their vehicles if they are attached. 
  In the attack it is especially important to organize and 
support the breaching of obstacles and destructive damage and 
the arrangement of crossings over barriers. This mission is 
performed by the subunits themselves and by attached subunits of 
engineer troops. 
  Remotely laid minefields are bypassed along reconnoitered 
axes or, when impossible to bypass, they are crossed through 
breached passages. 
  Non-T/O mineclearing teams at squad (crew) strength usually 
are formed in companies for breaching minefields laid by remote 
minelaying equipment. The team must be trained in mineclearing 
methods. It is provided with a transportable mineclearing set 
and explosive charges. In particular, the team should have a 
mine detector, probe, grappling hook, 10-15 TNT blocks, 10-15 
safety fuze detonator sets and 8-10 standard markers. 
  An obstacle clearing party is formed in the battalion. For 
this the party may be reinforced by a combat engineer platoon, 
bridgelayer (MTU-20), mineclearing unit (UR-77), obstacle 
clearing engineer vehicle (BAT-2 route clearance vehicle), and 
tank with KMT-6 [type of tank mineclearing attachment]. If 
necessary the obstacle clearing party is reinforced by a combat 
arms subunit. Based on experience, such a party advances 400-600 
m behind battalion first echelon battle formations. 
  The preparation and maintenance of crossings in authorized 
amphibious combat vehicles by fording and crossings of tanks 
fully submerged consist of determining and marking sectors 
convenient for forcing a water obstacle, preparing descents into 
and exits from the water, maskirovka and security of crossings, 
commandant's service there, and breaching of obstacles on banks 
and in the water. Existing bridges on a water obstacle often 
will be partially or fully demolished. In the first case it will 
be necessary to strengthen and reinforce them. In the second 
case, if it is a major bridge, reconnaissance is conducted to 
locate and prepare a ford or another accessible method of 
crossing the water obstacle is prepared. Most often in this case 
subunits cross over crossings prepared by the senior commander's 
forces and assets. 
  Engineer subunits also are assigned the task of demolishing 
installations on water obstacles if they may be used by the 
enemy for his own purposes. 
  The battalion obtains and purifies water and prepares water 
supply points by its own efforts using authorized field water 
supply equipment. 
<H5>  8. Chemical Support </H5>
  Chemical support is organized and carried out in motorized 
rifle (tank) subunits to preclude or minimize losses from NBC 
contamination, provide maskirovka by aerosols (smoke), and 
inflict losses on the enemy by incendiary weapons. Chemical 
support includes the following: radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance; prompt use of individual and collective 
protective gear; radiological and chemical monitoring; 
decontamination of subunits; and use of aerosols (smoke) and 
incendiary weapons. Chemical support measures are performed by 
forces and assets of company (battalion) subunits, but its most 
difficult and specific measures are performed by subunits of 
chemical troops. 
  In resolving problems of chemical support the company 
(battalion) commander determines and issues 
instructions on the procedure for performing radiological 
and chemical reconnaissance and on the place, time and procedure 
for conducting decontamination of subunits. He also indicates 
the procedure and time periods for conducting measures for 
maskirovka of subunits by aerosols (smoke) and the forces and 
assets to be assigned for this, procedure for using attached 
flamethrower subunits, and the procedure for technical 
inspection of protective masks and for providing subunits with 
protective gear. 
  Radiological and chemical reconnaissance is organized to 
provide the commander with prompt data on the radiation and 
chemical situation and warn subunits of terrain contamination. 
It is conducted continuously. A chemical observer is appointed 
for this in the company and a chemical observation post in the 
battalion. Radiological and chemical reconnaissance devices 
which are in combat vehicles (tanks, BMP's and so on) also are 
used. 
  When there is a threat of injury, personnel make use of 
protective gear at the subunit commander's command based on 
reconnaissance data and an estimate of the chemical and 
radiation situation. For prompt use, protective masks and 
breathing masks must be constantly in a traveling position (on 
the person), protective ponchos, footwear and gloves should be 
in vehicles when operating in vehicles and should be with the 
person when operating outside the vehicles. 
  Skilled use of individual and collective protective gear 
plays an important role in protecting personnel against NBC 
contamination. This is achieved by constantly drilling personnel 
in its use and by properly determining the lines and time for 
transferring it to a particular position. 
  Radiological and chemical monitoring also must be constant 
and regular, inasmuch as a conclusion is drawn on its basis 
about combat effectiveness of personnel and the subunit as a 
whole, the possibility of removing individual protective gear, 
and the extent of decontamination. Radiological and chemical 
monitoring is performed by the CW instructor and specially 
trained servicemen. A dose rate meter (ID-1) is issued during 
operations by officers, NCO's and privates performing missions 
apart from the subunit. 
  The subunit keeps a record of the personnel's radiation 
exposure levels: in the company for all personnel, and in the 
battalion an average for the platoon. Chemical monitoring is 
performed in the automatic mode using radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance devices installed in tanks and BMP's. 
  Partial or complete decontamination is performed in 
subunits. 
It consists of NBC decontamination of weapons, equipment, 
clothing, gear, protective gear and supplies. 
  Partial decontamination is organized by order of the company 
(battalion) commander. It is performed by the personnel during 
performance of the mission using authorized means. The 
appropriate chemical decontamination devices and sets (TDP [tank 
decontamination device], DK-4 and so on) available on tanks, 
BMP's, BTR's and trucks are used. Individual chemical 
decontamination devices (of the IDPS-69 type) issued to each 
serviceman are used for decontaminating personal weapons. 
Decontamination is performed immediately when contaminated by 
chemical agents. 
  Complete decontamination of subunits is done by order of the 
senior commander in areas occupied by the subunits or in 
decontamination areas, as a rule after performance of the combat 
mission. Subunits of chemical troops with special vehicles-- 
spray trucks (ARS-14, ARS-15) and chemical decontamination sets 
(DKV)--usually are used to perform it. Crews of tanks (BMP's, 
BTR's) perform the decontamination. Several objects (usually 
four) are processed simultaneously using the spray truck. 
  Use of aerosols (smoke) is organized for maskirovka of 
friendly subunits and also for countering enemy technical means 
of reconnaissance and his means of weapon guidance (homing). The 
following smoke producing munitions and equipment are used for 
smoke generation: white and black smoke grenades, incendiary 
smoke cartridges, thermal smoke apparatus, and an armored 
vehicle smoke grenade launching system. With an oblique wind it 
is advisable to carry out smoke maskirovka by turning on the 
thermal smoke apparatus, and with a head wind toward the enemy 
by using the smoke grenade launching system. With consideration 
of the flight range of smoke grenades (around 300 m), it is 
possible to create a "smoke barrier" for supporting (covering) a 
forward dash to assault the enemy or to execute a maneuver. 
  Thermal smoke apparatus is turned on by the driver and smoke 
grenades are launched by the tank (BMP) gunner on command when 
it is necessary to conceal a crew exit from the vehicle, 
simulate a burning vehicle or cover its maneuver to another 
position. 
  Incendiary weapons are used to engage enemy personnel, 
weapons, vehicles and supplies and create centers of fire in his 
operations area. They are employed in the company (battalion) by 
attached flamethrower subunits. 
Footnotes 
  1. V. I. Lenin, "Polnoye sobraniye sochineniy" [Complete 
Collected Works], Vol 41, p 144. 
  2. See "Inzhenernoye obespecheniye boya" [Engineer Support 
to 
Battle], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1988, p 239. 
<H5>  Chapter XI - Technical and Logistic Support </H5>
<H5>  1. Technical Support </H5>
  Uninterrupted technical support is one of the basic 
conditions for successful conduct of battle. It consists of the 
organization and accomplishment of technically correct use of 
weapons and vehicles, providing subunits with weapons, vehicles, 
missiles, ammunition and military-technical property, promptly 
replenishing their expenditure and losses, and rapidly restoring 
disabled weapons and vehicles. 
  The scope and content of technical support to subunits 
depend 
on many factors: nature of combat operations, mission being 
performed, subunit's place in the unit battle formation, nature 
of terrain, time of year and day, and so on. But there are 
general principles which are the basis for organizing and 
accomplishing technical support. 
  The following are such general principles: performance of 
technical support missions directly in the course of battle; 
priority performance of primary missions; bringing technical 
support forces and assets as close to subunits as possible and 
their broad maneuver in the course of battle. 
  Technical support missions are performed in the company 
(battery) by vehicle crews (teams, drivers) using spare parts, 
tools and accessories available in each tank, BMP, BTR and motor 
vehicle, with the artillery piece, and in the battery. 
  The battalion has a servicing and maintenance platoon for 
performing technical support missions. The MRB maintenance 
platoon consists of an armored equipment servicing and 
maintenance squad and a motor transport vehicles servicing and 
maintenance squad. The TB servicing and maintenance platoon has 
a servicing and maintenance squad and recovery squad with an 
armored recovery vehicle. 
  Maintenance squads are intended for helping crews (drivers) 
perform servicing and maintenance, remedying minor malfunctions 
and performing nonlaborintensive routine maintenance on weapons, 
vehicles and communications equipment. Equipment of the 
maintenance and service shop permits performing the operations 
of washing filters; checking and adjusting assemblies, machine 
units and mechanisms; remedying failures and malfunctions; 
replacing assemblies and machine units; and touch-up painting, 
external washing and filling vehicles with POL. 
  A battalion may be reinforced by regimental recovery and 
repair assets when operating on a separate axis. 
  The company (battalion) commander is responsible for timely 
technical support of subordinate subunits. He is obligated to 
take steps to keep weapons and vehicles in constant readiness 
for combat use, rapidly restore them when disabled, and provide 
subunits with missiles, ammunition and other militarytechnical 
property. 
  In organizing for battle, in questions of technical support 
the company (battalion) commander usually indicates 
the following: time, place and extent of servicing and 
maintenance; procedure for recovery and repair of weapons and 
vehicles during preparation for and in the course of battle; 
size of reserves of missiles, ammunition and military-technical 
property, time periods for establishing them, their expenditure 
rates and supply procedure; places for deploying the battalion 
servicing and maintenance subunit and procedure for its 
displacement in the course of battle (march); place, time and 
procedure for replenishing subunits' missiles and ammunition; 
procedure for security and defense and for maintaining 
communications with technical support subunits; and he also 
announces disposition areas of maintenance company subunits, 
location of the disabled vehicle collecting point, and the 
regimental evacuation route. 
  In determining the time, procedure and extent of servicing 
and maintenance, the battalion commander proceeds from the 
nature of upcoming battle, his own decision, and the technical 
condition, types and makes of vehicles. 
  Four kinds of servicing and maintenance are established for 
armored equipment and motor vehicles: visual inspection, daily 
routine servicing and maintenance, TO [periodic servicing and 
maintenance inspection] No 1 and TO No 2. 
  The visual inspection is performed at short halts (stops) in 
the course of a march and sometimes also in battle. It averages 
15- 30 minutes for all makes and types of vehicles. 
  As a rule, TO No 1 or 2 is performed depending on engine use 
in preparing for battle to ensure reliable operation of armament 
and vehicles under conditions of lengthy, intensive operation in 
a combat situation. 
  The periodicity and duration of servicing and maintenance of 
armored equipment and motor transport vehicles are given in 
Table 5. 


Table 5 - Periodicity and Duration of Servicing and Maintenance of Weapons and 
Vehicles 

Vehicle      Daily Routine   TO No 1                        TO No 2 
Make         Servicing and 
             Maintenance 

Duration,    Periodicity,    Duration,      Periodicity,    Duration, 
hrs          km              hrs            km              hrs 

T-72         1.5             1,600-1,800    4.5-5.5         3,300-3,500    10-12 

T-64         3.5             2,500          9-10            5,000          13-14 

T-62         2.5-3.5         1,000          5-6.5           2,000          8-12 

BMP          2-3             2,500- 2,600   5-6             4,800-5,000    8-10 


BTR-80       1.1- 1.6        2,000          1.8-2           6,000          6.4-6.6 

BTR- 70      3               2,000          7-8             6,000          14 

Motor        1-2             1,200-1,800    5-6             6,000-9,000    14 
vehicles 


  Experience of the Great Patriotic War and postwar field 
training exercises permitted developing principles of servicing 
and maintenance and of recovery and repair of weapons and 
vehicles under combat conditions. The main ones are the 
following: routine servicing and maintenance of vehicles is 
performed directly in battle formations without removing them to 
the rear, servicing and maintenance assets are brought to the 
vehicles to be serviced, and servicing and maintenance is 
performed by the crews (drivers) using the vehicles' spare 
parts, tools and accessories and with involvement of battalion 
and sometimes also regimental servicing and maintenance 
personnel and assets; vehicles requiring the least amount of 
repair work are evacuated first from under enemy fire to the 
nearest shelters and help is given to lightly stuck vehicles; 
vehicles intended for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and for 
conducting fire (command and staff vehicles, tanks, BMP's) and 
requiring the least volume of work are repaired initially; 
repair assets are brought to vehicles to be repaired. 
  Technical reconnaissance and control of battalion technical 
support in the course of battle are accomplished from the 
technical observation post, which is headed by the deputy 
battalion commander for weapons. Reserve crew members may be at 
the technical observation post in addition to deputy company 
commanders for weapons (company senior technicians). A technical 
observation post also may be established in a company when it 
operates on a separate axis. The technical observation post is 
located behind battle formations of first echelon companies near 
the battalion (company) COP. Technical reconnaissance is 
performed for prompt detection of disabled weapons and vehicles; 
determination of the causes, nature and degree of their damages; 
determination of the extent of restoration work and necessary 
amount of forces and assets for this; determination of locations 
of the recovery and repair team or repair party. The technical 
observation post maintains constant communications with the 
battalion (company) COP, the recovery and repair team (repair 
party), fighting vehicle commanders, the regimental recovery and 
repair team and the deputy regimental (battalion) commander for 
weapons. 
  A battalion recovery and repair team or repair party is 
established for the time of combat operations from battalion 
servicing and maintenance assets. They perform routine 
maintenance on damaged weapons and vehicles at the places they 
are disabled or in the nearest shelters. 
  In determining the size of and time periods for establishing 
ammunition reserves, its expenditure rates and delivery 
procedure, the battalion commander is guided by the order 
establishing norms of unit-level supplies in the battalion and 
the regimental commander's instructions on ammunition supply and 
consumption norms in a given kind of battle and the procedure 
for their delivery. 
  An ammunition supply point is deployed in the battalion and 
company (during operations in defense) for replenishing tank, 
BMP and BTR ammunition in the course of battle. 
  Local security and defense of disposition areas (locations) 
of technical support subunits and protection against mass 
destruction and precision weapons are accomplished with their 
own forces and assets and within the regiment's overall system. 
  Technical support is organized by the deputy company 
(battalion) commander for weapons (company senior technician) 
based on the commander's decision for battle, his instructions 
on technical support, and instructions of the senior commander 
(chief). 
  The deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons 
(company 
senior technician) is obligated to do the following: constantly 
know the company (battalion) mission, its strength level in 
weapons and vehicles and their technical condition, and state of 
supply of missiles, ammunition and militarytechnical property; 
direct preparation of weapons and vehicles for battle (march) 
and their servicing and maintenance; organize and conduct 
observation of fighting vehicles in battle and determine the 
reasons for their being out of commission; organize the recovery 
and repair of weapons and vehicles, their timely return to duty 
and the transfer of disabled vehicles to the senior commander's 
assets; maintain constant communications with the deputy 
battalion (regimental) commander for weapons and the recovery 
and repair team (repair party), and report to them and his 
commander about the number, location and technical condition of 
disabled weapons and vehicles and steps taken for their 
restoration. 
  In the course of battle the company (battalion) commander 
personally (through the chief of staff, deputy for weapons and 
commanders of platoons or companies) monitors the technical 
condition and combat readiness of weapons and vehicles and the 
expenditure of missiles and ammunition and their timely delivery 
to the subunits, reports on this to the battalion (regimental) 
commander or his deputy for weapons and submits requests for 
replenishing subunits with necessary supplies. 
  Technical support in main forms of battle. In the 
defense the conditions of subunits' shift to the defense exert a 
substantial effect on organization and accomplishment of their 
technical support. 
  The most favorable conditions are created with the advance 
shift of a company (battalion) to the defense or when it is in 
the regimental reserve. In this case there is more time for 
performing technical support measures (Diagram 26). 
  Shifting to a defense in direct contact with the enemy 
hampers the resolution of matters of organizing and 
accomplishing servicing and maintenance. In this situation the 
time for servicing and maintenance of weapons and vehicles will 
be limited and many vehicles will have a considerable 
expenditure of engine time. In addition, vehicle crews (drivers) 
will be engaged in organizing the system of fire and engineer 
preparation of firing positions, shelters and emplacements for 
vehicles and will not be able to take part at full strength in 
the work of servicing and maintenance of weapons and vehicles. 
  The following factors basically influence organization of 
servicing and maintenance under the conditions in question: a 
subunit's defense frontage, nature of terrain, technical 
condition of vehicles, level of training of crews (drivers) and 
the presence of servicing and maintenance and of recovery and 
repair assets. 
  Servicing and maintenance of tanks, BMP's and BTR's when 
shifting to the defense begins with their fueling and 
replenishment of ammunition, performance of visual inspection 
and remedying of detected malfunctions. The procedure for 
fueling vehicles and replenishing ammunition is established by 
the company (battalion) commander and the procedure for using 
means of refueling and ammunition supply by the deputy for 
weapons. 
  Servicing and maintenance is accomplished basically by 
vehicle crews (drivers) with the involvement of the battalion 
maintenance platoon. Sometimes motorized riflemen also may be 
used to assist BMP (BTR) drivers by direction of the company 
commander. 
  The procedure for using the servicing and maintenance 
platoon 
by companies and other subunits is established by the deputy 
battalion commander for weapons, and within companies by the 
commanders and their deputies for weapons (company senior 
technicians). Assets are assigned first to subunits which are 
shifting to defense in the first echelon. 
  Vehicles usually are serviced and maintained directly in 
subunit battle formations. The sequence of servicing and 
maintenance and time allocated are established by the company 
(battalion) commander depending on the situation. The extent of 
servicing and maintenance is determined by the deputy company 
(battalion) commander for weapons (company senior technician). 
  Work connected with partial disassembly of vehicles and 
their 
loss of mobility as well as with moving them to the nearest 
shelters for servicing and maintenance is done only by 
permission of the company (battalion) commander. In all cases, 
at least two- thirds of the vehicles must be in full combat 
readiness when performing servicing and maintenance. 
  Additional ammunition reserves are established in organizing 
defense in subunits and at tank and BMP firing positions. It is 
replenished as expended. Ammunition reserves in subunits are 
immediately replenished after repelling enemy assaults. 
  Recovery and repair of weapons and vehicles in the course of 
battle are done by the battalion recovery and repair team, which 
is located behind the first echelon. Damaged vehicles with 
serviceable weapons capable of fighting are left in the battle 
formation and recovered only by permission of the battalion 
commander. 
  The recovery of damaged tanks, BMP's and BTR's within the 
battalion defense area is done by organic prime movers, and 
recovery to the regimental disabled vehicle collecting point by 
regimental recovery assets. Motor vehicles are recovered by 
battalion assets and also by incidental regimental transport 
delivering supplies, and by vehicles specially assigned for this. 
  With enemy penetration, damaged fighting vehicles are 
evacuated from under fire under cover of the regimental second 
echelon or reserve. In this case fighting vehicles also may be 
used for recovery by permission of the battalion (regimental) 
commander. 
  The procedure for work of commanders and their deputies for 
weapons and the extent of technical support measures taken 
depend on the time allotted for preparing subunits for battle. 
  The following basic measures usually are carried out before 
the beginning of an attack: technical preparation of personnel, 
servicing and maintenance of weapons and vehicles to ensure 
reliable operation in the course of battle, their repair, 
replenishment of ammunition and replenishment of vehicle spare 
parts, tools and accessories. If there is to be a forcing, tanks 
are prepared for a fully submerged crossing of water obstacles 
and the seal of hulls and operation of water jets are checked on 
amphibious BTR's. 
  If the attack is made from a position of direct contact with 
the enemy and tank subunits are moving forward from assembly 
positions, a visual inspection of weapons and vehicles usually 
is made before battle. In a hasty attack, their servicing and 
maintenance is performed in the assembly area, as a rule to the 
extent of daily routine servicing and maintenance. Unserviceable 
fighting vehicles and weapons which cannot be repaired in the 
company and battalion are transferred to assets of the senior 
commander (chief) for repair. 
  A battalion's hasty attack begins with forward movement to 
the line of departure. At this time the support platoon makes up 
the battalion technical maintenance echelon and performs the 
following missions: establishes the places and causes of vehicle 
halts; determines methods of remedying malfunctions; provides 
technical assistance to crews (drivers) of damaged vehicles and 
issues spare parts to them; recovers unserviceable vehicles and 
lightly stuck vehicles from movement routes. 
  Battalion technical maintenance echelon assets are not used 
for repairing vehicles on the march, but move up to the line of 
departure together with the subunits. The technical support 
procedure in the course of battle is shown in Diagram 27. 
  With the beginning of an assault the technical maintenance 
echelon begins performing missions of a recovery and repair team 
or repair party. In the course of battle the recovery and repair 
team recovers damaged vehicles out from under enemy fire, 
performs routine maintenance on them, and extracts lightly stuck 
vehicles. If it is impossible to repair vehicles with one's own 
assets, they are transferred to the regimental disabled vehicle 
collecting point. After repair, weapons and combat and other 
vehicles are immediately returned to their subunits. 
  The duration of work by the recovery and repair team is 
established so as to ensure its arrival at the battalion battle 
formation by the moment the battalion is performing the next 
mission. Duration of the battalion recovery and repair team work 
may be 2-3 hours depending on depth of the mission and planned 
rates of advance. 
  When an MRC attacks in dismounted formation or is on 
defense, 
i.e., when a company ammunition supply point has been 
established, ammunition goes directly to the point and then is 
delivered by ammunition bearers to battle formations of platoons 
and squads and to the BMP's (BTR's). 
  In tank subunits in all cases and in motorized rifle 
subunits 
when attacking in BMP's (BTR's), combat vehicles are replenished 
with ammunition in the course of battle by platoon or by 
vehicle, usually in battle formations and also in breaks between 
battles. 
  After mission accomplishment the battalion commander reports 
the presence and technical condition of weapons and vehicles and 
the state of ammunition supply to the regimental commander and 
gives instructions on the procedure for repairing vehicles for 
the next day of combat operations. 
  Daily routine servicing and maintenance usually is conducted 
on all equipment and weapons of the battalion by day's end. As a 
rule, fighting vehicles are replenished with ammunition and 
filled with fuel and lubricants first. 
  Technical support on the march. Maximum exertion 
of personnel efforts and a large expenditure of engine time will 
be required in a relatively short time interval during a march. 
During 10-12 hours of movement at a speed of 20-25 km/hr, the 
average daily engine expenditure may be 200-250 km or more. 
Therefore technical support during preparation for and in the 
course of the march is one of the deciding factors on which 
company (battalion) combat effectiveness largely depends at the 
line of probable encounter with the enemy or in the 
concentration area. 
  When preparing for the march, reserves of ammunition, fuel 
and technical property are replenished to prescribed norms, 
weapons and vehicles are serviced and maintained and 
unserviceable vehicles which cannot be repaired by the beginning 
of the march are evacuated. Subunits intended for operating in 
reconnaissance and security are serviced first. 
  Before making a march under conditions of difficult terrain, 
special attention is given to preparing devices to increase 
vehicle off-road capability and to the presence and 
serviceability of devices and entrenching tools. The servicing 
and maintenance platoon and vehicles with spare parts and fuel 
are assigned to the technical maintenance echelon. 
  In questions of technical support the deputy commander for 
weapons indicates the following: extent of work of servicing and 
maintenance of weapons and vehicles on the march, methods and 
places for conducting it and assets used; makeup and missions of 
the technical maintenance echelon, its place en route, procedure 
for transferring vehicles not being repaired by one's own 
resources to the senior chief's assets. The makeup and missions 
of the recovery and repair team and the battalion technical 
observation post, their possible locations by the beginning of a 
meeting battle, and direction of displacement in battle are 
determined in addition under conditions of a probable encounter 
with the enemy. 
  In the course of a march the company (battalion) commander 
proceeds at the head of the column and his deputy for weapons in 
the last vehicle in the company or with the technical 
maintenance echelon at the tail of the battalion column. 
  Technical support on the march (Diagram 28) is performed 
directly on the route, at short halts and in the day (night) 
rest halt area. Weapons and vehicles are serviced and maintained 
every 3-4 hours of movement at short halts to the extent of a 
visual inspection; in addition, vehicles are refueled in the 
second half of a day's march and they are serviced and 
maintained to the extent of daily routine servicing and 
maintenance in day (night) rest halt areas. 
  Combat and other vehicles disabled during the march stop on 
the right shoulder of the road. The crew (driver) determines the 
cause of the malfunction and takes steps to remedy it. The 
deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons estimates the 
extent and nature of repair work. If the crew is capable of 
remedying the malfunction, it is issued spare parts and briefed 
on the procedure for performing the work. If necessary, one or 
more specialists are left for the repair. The duration of 
vehicle repair by the technical maintenance echelon on the route 
usually should not exceed the time necessary for the next 
battalion column to approach. 
  In the day (night) rest halt area the deputy company 
(battalion) commander for weapons organizes preparation of 
vehicles for the next day's march or for battle. Fighting 
vehicles which cannot be restored by the technical maintenance 
echelon are transferred to regimental repair assets or recovered 
from the route to shelters. After repair, vehicles continue 
moving and join a passing column. They take their place in the 
subunit at short halts. It is prohibited to overtake columns in 
movement. 
  The deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons reports 
vehicles left en route, steps taken, and the presence and 
technical condition of weapons and vehicles to the company 
(battalion) commander and senior chief. 
<H5>  2. Logistic Support </H5>
  Logistic support is one of the main conditions for 
successful 
battle by a company (battalion). It includes the delivery of all 
kinds of supplies and satisfaction of subunits' needs for them; 
organization and accomplishment of fueling of combat and other 
vehicles; meals for personnel; and medical support. To perform 
these missions the battalion has a support platoon with reserves 
of supplies and an aid station. Logistic support in the company 
is performed by the first sergeant, and in the MRC in addition 
also by the medical party NCOIC. 
  The support platoon consists of a motor transport squad and 
supply squad. The motor transport squad is intended for receipt, 
upkeep and delivery of battalion ammunition and fuel reserves 
and the fueling of vehicles. The supply squad receives and 
maintains reserves of food, delivers and issues it to subunits, 
prepares hot meals and safeguards servicemen's personal articles. 
  The following are deployed to perform logistic support 
missions in battle: in the company during operations 
in defense--ammunition supply point and aid station; 
in the battalion-ammunition supply point, 
refueling point, ration distribution point, and in the 
defense in addition an aid station. 
  Ammunition supply points are intended for replenishing 
subunit ammunition, the refueling point for refueling vehicles, 
and the ration distribution point for preparing hot meals and 
supplying personnel with water. The company aid station and 
battalion aid station determine the sick, search for wounded, 
collect and carry or transport them from the battlefield and 
from stricken areas, give first aid to the wounded and sick and 
prepare them for further evacuation. In addition, where possible 
the battalion aid station gives paramedic assistance and 
accomplishes sanitary-hygienic and anti-epidemic measures, 
medical reconnaissance, and the receipt, storage and issue of 
medical equipment and supplies to subunits. 
  Unit-level reserves are established in prescribed amounts 
for 
uninterrupted support of the company (battalion) with supplies. 
They are kept in fighting vehicles, with the weapons and 
personnel, and in battalion transport. 
  Reserves are divided into expendable supplies and emergency 
reserve (for fuel, a minimum level of supply), which is used by 
authorization of the regimental commander or, in a case brooking 
no delay, by authorization of the battalion commander with a 
subsequent report about this to the senior commander. 
  The requirement for missiles, ammunition, fuel and other 
supplies, their state of supply to subunits and expenditure 
rates are figured in supply units (units of fire, fuelings, 
rations, sets) and other measurement units. The requirement for 
supplies for battle is determined with consideration of their 
established expenditure and the presence of reserves in 
necessary amounts by the end of battle. 
  The amount of missiles and ammunition established per weapon 
or per fighting vehicle is called the unit of fire. 
  The amount of fuel contained in a vehicle (generator) fuel 
system or ensuring its prescribed range (time of operation) is 
called a fueling. 
  A ration is the amount of food prescribed under 
established norms for feeding one person in a 24-hour period. It 
is figured for the roster strength of a subunit. 
  A set of spare parts, tools and accessories for 
weapons and vehicles as well as of clothing, medical and other 
property consists of a set of items according to a specific list 
and in an established amount. 
  Company and battalion needs for supplies are met through 
their own unit-level reserves and by delivery from unit depots. 
If necessary, additional reserves of ammunition, fuel and other 
supplies may be established in the battalion by authorization of 
the senior commander. They are established in battalion 
transport by compact stowage or by freeing up a portion of the 
transport, and before battle also at firing positions of 
artillery and mortars participating in artillery preparation of 
the assault. 
  In the course of battle the expenditure of supplies is 
strictly limited by the having the senior commander (chief) 
establish their consumption rates, especially for ammunition and 
fuel. If it is necessary to replenish subunit ammunition in the 
course of battle the chief of the battalion ammunition supply 
point arranges for delivery (issue) of missiles and ammunition 
by order of the battalion commander (chief of staff). The 
delivery of missiles and ammunition to platoons and to fighting 
vehicles in the company is arranged by the first sergeant by 
direction of the company commander and is carried out by 
appointed ammunition bearers. 
  Replenishment of ammunition and refueling of tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) in the course of battle is done directly in battle 
formations. If it is impossible to deliver supplies to combat 
vehicles, transportation assets with ammunition and fuel come as 
close to them as possible. Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) take turns 
moving covertly to locations of the transportation assets, 
replenish ammunition and refuel. The support platoon commander 
is responsible for delivering supplies to battalion subunits, 
and subunit commanders are responsible for replenishing 
ammunition and refueling vehicles. 
  Supply delivery usually is by regimental transport to the 
support platoon and from the latter to companies by battalion 
transport. In some cases battalion transportation assets are 
used for delivering supplies from the logistic support company 
to subunits. Missiles, ammunition and fuel are delivered based 
on verbal requests of commanders of companies and separate 
platoons and by order of the battalion commander (chief of 
staff). Stockpiles in subunits should be replenished to unit- 
level norms by the end of the day (or the battle). 
  Personnel are supplied with hot meals through the ration 
point, as a rule three times a day. If it is impossible to 
arrange three meals, personnel are provided with hot meals twice 
a day and a portion of the daily food norm is issued in dry form 
by permission of the battalion (regimental) commander. 
Preparation, delivery and issue of food to subunits is organized 
by the chief of the ration point in accordance with instructions 
of the deputy battalion commander for rear, who determines for 
what number of personnel, for which subunits and by what time to 
prepare food and the procedure for delivering (issuing) it to 
battalion subunits. The first sergeant receives and issues food 
to personnel in accordance with the company commander's 
instructions. 
  With forced organization of meals in zones of radioactive 
contamination the preparation, issue and eating of food is 
accomplished as follows: with a radiation up to 1 rad/hr, in the 
usual manner; from 1 to 5 rads/hr, in radiologically 
decontaminated covered structures. Under these conditions, only 
canned and concentrated food in protected containers and 
packaging is used to prepare meals. In areas contaminated by 
chemical agents it is permitted to prepare and eat food only in 
special structures equipped with air filtration and ventilation 
systems. On terrain contaminated by biological (bacterial) 
agents, meals are prepared and eaten after thorough biological 
decontamination of the grounds, field kitchens and equipment as 
well as complete decontamination of personnel. 
  Subunits are supplied with water from the battalion water 
supply (diversion) point. Delivery of water is organized as a 
rule by the deputy battalion commander for rear. Water for 
preparing food in zones of contamination is delivered in sealed 
containers. 
  Medical support is organized directly in the battalion by 
the 
paramedic; in MRC's (MRP's) by the medical party NCOIC (by 
riflemen-medics); and in TC's and other subunits by their 
commanders. 
  First aid is given to wounded and sick in the form of self- 
administered and buddy-administered emergency first aid, by 
riflemen-medics of platoons and by company medical party NCOIC's 
at the spot of the wound, in the nearest shelter or at the 
company aid station, and also by personnel of subunits assigned 
for rescue operations and for treatment and evacuation measures 
in stricken areas. Paramedic assistance is given at the 
battalion aid station and emergency medical treatment at the 
regimental aid station and at battalion aid stations headed by 
physicians. 
  The wounded are collected and carried or transported from 
the 
battlefield (from stricken areas) with their personal weapons 
and protective masks by battalion aid station forces and assets, 
and if necessary by personnel and transportation assets 
additionally assigned by the battalion (company) commander. When 
there is a significant number of wounded and sick in the 
battalion, the seriously-wounded and seriously-ill are subject 
to evacuation first. Lightly-wounded persons not requiring 
hospitalization are sent to their subunits after being given 
medical aid. 
  The company commander organizes logistic support personally, 
through the first sergeant and through platoon commanders; the 
battalion commander does so through the deputy for rear and the 
company commanders. 
  In questions of logistic support the company (battalion) 
commander usually indicates: size and times for 
establishing reserves of fuel, food, medical equipment and 
supplies, and other supplies, their consumption rates and 
delivery procedure; procedure for searching for, collecting and 
evacuating wounded and sick; places for deployment of battalion 
rear subunits and procedure for their displacement in the course 
of battle (or march); places, time and sequence for refueling 
equipment and vehicles; organization of meals for personnel; 
procedure for security and defense and for maintaining 
communications with rear subunits; and he also announces the 
disposition areas of the regimental logistic support company and 
maneuver, delivery and evacuation routes. 
  During battle the company (battalion) commander monitors 
fuel 
and food consumption and its timely delivery to subunits; 
reports to the battalion commander (regimental commander or his 
deputy for rear) on the supply of fuel and other supplies and on 
the presence of wounded and sick; and submits requests for 
replenishing subunits with necessary supplies. 
  Logistic support in principal forms of battle. The 
scope, times and procedure for carrying out measures for 
preparing the battalion rear depend on the nature of the combat 
mission, status of rear subunits, time available for preparation 
and other factors. When disposed in a defense area, rear 
subunits are reliably sheltered and carefully camouflaged and 
their protection against mass destruction and precision weapons 
and their security and defense are organized. 
  In the period of preparation for battle, reserves of 
supplies 
are built up to prescribed norms in battalion transport, in 
companies and in separate platoons. Battalion subunits and the 
aid station are cleared of wounded and sick. 
  The location of the battalion rear must ensure the 
following: 
rapid, effective use of its forces and assets; possibility of 
executing a flexible maneuver; close coordination of battalion 
rear subunits with each other and with corresponding regimental 
rear subunits; firm C[.sup]2[/]; and a decrease in losses 
from enemy effect. The procedure for battalion logistic support 
in the defense is shown in Diagram 29. Battalion rear subunits, 
including the aid station, are disposed behind its battle 
formation. This is dictated by the need for creating favorable 
conditions for their operation in case the enemy penetrates. 
  Tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and other vehicles are fueled directly 
in battle formations in lulls between battles, as a rule at 
night and under other conditions of limited visibility. 
  In both defensive as well as offensive battle meals are 
organized for personnel so the principal messing falls in hours 
of a drop in combat intensity. The issue to personnel of 
prepared food that has been checked by the paramedic is done by 
permission of the battalion commander or his deputy for rear. 
For this the truck-mounted field kitchen moves to the company, 
where it is met by a guide and directed to cover nearest the 
battle formation. The company first sergeant organizes the issue 
of food by bearers assigned from platoons, who receive it in 
insulated food containers and deliver it directly to the 
personnel. 
  Artillery and mortar subunits attached to the company as a 
rule are fed through their own subunit ration points and the 
others are fed together with the company. 
  Water usually is delivered from the battalion ration point 
simultaneously with hot food. 
  Organization of medical support depends chiefly on 
conditions 
in which subunits shift to the defense and the sanitary 
condition of terrain. 
  When shifting to a defense in direct contact with the enemy, 
evacuation of wounded and sick is organized above all from 
subunits actively fighting the enemy. Trenches and communication 
trenches are widely used in evacuation. 
  An aid station with reserves of means for giving first aid 
and of potable water is prepared in each company for temporary 
shelter of wounded and sick. It usually is located in a 
sheltered spot with consideration of the possibility of 
concealed carrying (transporting) of wounded and sick from 
platoons, evacuating them to the battalion aid station and 
maintaining stable communications with the company commander. As 
a rule, the battalion aid station is deployed near the rear 
boundary of the battalion defense area. 
  After enemy conduct of fire preparation and the beginning of 
the assault, subunit commanders, riflemen-medics, medical party 
NCOIC's and the paramedic clarify the sick and wounded and 
arrange for their first aid, for carrying (transporting) them 
from the battlefield and for evacuation to aid stations. Self- 
administered and buddy-administered emergency first aid is given 
where the wound was received. Then riflemen-medics and medical 
party NCOIC's supplement the first aid, shelter the wounded and 
sick from getting wounded again and evacuate them to the 
battalion and regimental aid station at the first opportunity. 
  At the battalion aid station the wounded and sick are 
examined directly in the motor vehicles where possible and those 
in acute need are given assistance and sent to the regimental 
aid station. 
  The battalion rear proceeds behind the combat subunits in a 
hasty attack when moving up to the line of deployment into 
company columns. It is advisable to align its column in the 
following sequence: aid station, motor vehicles with ammunition 
and fuel, and supply squad motor vehicles. The procedure for 
logistic support of the battalion in the attack is shown in 
Diagram 30. 
  By the beginning of the assault the battalion aid station is 
disposed directly behind battle formations of first echelon 
companies on the axis of the presumed greatest casualties of 
assaulting subunit personnel at a distance ensuring protection 
against small arms fire. The ammunition supply point, ration 
distribution point and refueling point displace behind battalion 
second echelon subunits. 
  Before an attack from a position of direct contact with the 
enemy, vehicles usually are refueled in the assembly area (at 
the assembly position), using the senior chief's assets as a 
rule. During the attack refueling is accomplished if necessary 
directly in battle formations of companies (in places not viewed 
by the enemy), with refueling assets coming up to the vehicles. 
The most favorable conditions for refueling fighting vehicles 
may be when the company (battalion) is in the second echelon or 
reserve. All vehicles must be fully refueled by the end of the 
day (battle). 
  In organizing medical support in the attack, main attention 
is devoted to giving first aid to wounded and sick, collecting 
them, and carrying (transporting) and evacuating them from the 
battlefield, especially at the dismount line and during the 
battle to take enemy strongpoints on the FEBA and in the depth 
of his defense. 
  In the course of an attack the wounded and sick are given 
first aid directly on vehicles in the form of self-administered 
and buddy-administered emergency first aid. If necessary they 
are transferred to battalion (regimental) medical transport or 
evacuated to the nearest deployed aid stations. 
  During operations in dismounted formation, riflemen-medics 
of 
platoons and medical party NCOIC's of companies who are 
advancing behind their subunits observe the battlefield, note 
places where personnel have become casualties, locate the 
wounded, give them first aid and concentrate them in the nearest 
shelter for subsequent evacuation to the battalion and 
regimental aid station. 
  As a rule battalion rear subunits displace during an attack 
as combat subunits advance so the uninterrupted nature of their 
logistic and medical support is not disturbed. 
  With beginning of pursuit of a withdrawing enemy the 
battalion rear comes closer to the subunits and steps are taken 
to clear the battalion aid station of wounded and sick. During a 
pursuit it is advisable to displace the rear at full strength in 
a column immediately behind combat subunits. 
  Logistic support on the march. In preparing for 
the march, special attention is given to establishing additional 
reserves of fuel and to accomplishing measures for improving 
off- road capability of transport. 
  On the march, logistic subunits usually proceed at the rear 
of the battalion main body column. When movement of motor 
transport behind tanks and BMP's will be difficult, the rear can 
proceed as a separate column where possible, in constant 
readiness to move forward rapidly onto the main body's route. 
  When making a march the ammunition of tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) 
is replenished and they are refueled in areas of short halts and 
the day (night) rest halt area and on arrival in the designated 
area. 
  Organization of refueling of vehicles on the march is 
determined by the length of the march and conditions for making 
it, the number of vehicles in the company (battalion), and 
availability of refueling equipment. At short halts it is 
advisable to perform refueling with the senior chief's assets. 
Regimental and division fuel tanker trucks are included in the 
battalion column for this. Subsequently all vehicles are 
refueled in day (night) rest halt areas and on arrival in the 
designated area using all refueling assets. 
  Refueling on the march may be done by various methods. The 
most characteristic ones are when refueling assets approach 
subunit vehicles or visa versa. A mixed method also may be used, 
where some fighting vehicles are fueled by the first method and 
others by the second. The procedure for refueling a company at a 
short halt is shown in Diagram 28. 
  During a march being made over a great distance, by 
direction 
of the regimental commander, refueling of all or some groups of 
battalion vehicles may be done at field fueling points deployed 
along the movement route by forces and assets of senior chiefs. 
Characteristics of field fueling points and the duration of 
subunit refueling are shown in tables 6 and 7. 


Table 6 - Basic Tactical-Technical Characteristics of Field Fueling Points 

Characteristics            PZP-10            PZP-10A            PZP- 20 

Number of fueling points   10                10                 20 


Overall capacity, l/min    1200              1000               2400 

Fueling capacity of one    120               100                120 
point, l/min 

Deployment time, min       20                5-7                30 




Table 7 - Duration of Refueling Subunits Using Field Fueling Points 

                                Refueling Time, min 

Subunit         Type of field   25% Fueling     50% Fueling     80% Fueling 
                fueling point 


TC              PZP-10          8               10              13 

MRC             PZP-10          4               5               7 

TB              PZP-20          20              25              30 

MRB             PZP-20          20              25              30 


  Messing for personnel on the march is organized in rest halt 
areas, concentration areas, and during a two-hour halt. Under 
favorable situation conditions, during a day (night) rest halt 
and two-hour halt some or all company (battalion) personnel may 
receive hot food in mess tins directly from field kitchens 
located at the battalion ration distribution point or in 
companies moved to a disposition area. Under other situation 
conditions, hot food is issued to company first sergeants 
(deputy commanders of separate platoons), who come to the ration 
distribution point together with bearers from platoons. 
  Companies (artillery batteries) attached to the battalion as 
a rule are provided with meals through the ration distribution 
points of their own subunits (units), and smaller subunits 
(platoons, squads) do so through the battalion ration 
distribution point. Subunits (up to a platoon) attached to the 
company receive hot food and other food products together with 
company personnel. Larger subunits (up to a company) operating 
with it receive food from ration distribution points of their 
own battalions (artillery battalions). 
  During the march first aid is given to wounded and sick 
directly in BMP's (BTR's), tanks, motor vehicles and at short 
halts. Wounded and sick needing emergency medical treatment and 
subsequent evacuation are transferred by the company medical 
party NCOIC and battalion paramedic to temporary aid stations 
deployed near their movement route by forces and assets of 
senior chiefs, or to local military and civilian medical 
facilities. The battalion aid station proceeds in the column, in 
readiness to assist injured personnel in case the enemy delivers 
air strikes and uses mass destruction weapons. 
  Battalion commander's instructions on technical 
and logistic support on defense 
  (Variant) 
  Deputy battalion commanders for weapons and rear, and 
subunit 
commanders are to conduct daily routine servicing and 
maintenance of weapons and vehicles with occupation of firing 
positions. In conducting servicing and maintenance have two- 
thirds of vehicles in constant readiness to repel possible enemy 
assaults. Evacuate BMP No 223 (2nd MRC) to regimental disabled 
vehicle collecting point in area 700 m south of Dubrovka. 
  Weapons and vehicles are to be restored in the course of 
battle by the battalion recovery and repair team at locations 
where disabled and in nearest cover. Transfer vehicles that 
cannot be restored to the regimental disabled vehicle collecting 
point. 
  By 1600 12 June replenish ammunition and fuel, above all for 
1st and 2nd MRC's. Ammunition and fuel reserves in the battalion 
will be concentrated in area 1 km east of Astakhovo by 1530 12 
June. Ammunition expenditure norms: artillery 1.0 unit of fire, 
small arms 0.3 unit of fire; fuel 0.2 fueling. 
  During battle company commanders are to replenish ammunition 
from the battalion ammunition supply point. Refuel fighting 
vehicles at firing positions at night by platoon. Send wounded 
and sick to Kruglaya Grove to battalion aid station before 1800 
12 June. 
  Wounded are to be evacuated to company aid stations by 
riflemen- medics in the course of battle. 
  Deploy battalion technical observation post and recovery and 
repair team behind 2nd MRC by 1600 12 June, and battalion aid 
station and other support platoon subunits behind second echelon 
in Kruglaya Grove. 
  Deploy ammunition supply points and aid stations of 
companies 
in strongpoints by 1500 12 July. 
  Chief of ration distribution point is to provide three hot 
meals a day to personnel. 
  Organize security and defense of technical and logistic 
support subunits with own forces and resources. 
  Accomplish communications of technical observation post and 
recovery and repair team with battalion COP by mobile equipment 
and, with initiation of battle, by radio. 
  Regimental technical and logistic support subunits are 
located as follows: disabled vehicle collecting point on east 
outskirts of Rubtsovo, rear subunits in Redkiy Forest, 
regimental aid station 3 km south of Glinki. 
  Battalion commander's instructions on technical 
and logistic support in the attack 
  (Variant) 
  Deputy battalion commanders for weapons and rear, and 
subunit 
commanders are to complete preparation of weapons and vehicles 
and perform TO No 1 by 1900 23 August. Vehicles requiring 
routine maintenance are to be restored by own resources before 
1900 23 August. Transfer BMP No 213 (1st MRC) to regimental 
maintenance company. 
  Perform daily routine servicing and maintenance of weapons 
and vehicles by end of day (battle) by decision of subunit 
commanders. 
  During the attack the recovery and repair team is to perform 
the following: evacuation of damaged vehicles out from under 
enemy fire to cover and to sites of repair by battalion assets; 
perform routine maintenance on weapons and vehicles lasting up 
to 3 hours. 
  Company commanders are to replenish reserves of ammunition, 
fuel and other supplies to unit-level norms by 1900 23 August. 
  Establish consumption norms of ammunition and supplies for 
performing the combat mission as follows: artillery ammunition 
1.8 units of fire; small arms ammunition 0.4 unit of fire; fuel- 
-0.3 fueling. 
  Ammunition will be delivered directly to companies by 
regimental transport before the beginning of the attack. 
Organize its replenishment from the battalion ammunition supply 
point during battle. 
  Vehicles will be refueled in assembly area by regimental 
assets from 1800 to 1900 23 August. 
  Collect wounded on the battlefield using riflemen-medics and 
subsequently evacuate them to the battalion aid station by 
battalion assets. 
  The technical observation post, recovery and repair team and 
battalion aid station are to move behind 3rd MRC in the 
battalion column, and when subunits arrive at the line of 
departure they are to be disposed in Figurnaya Grove. Have the 
other logistic support points 2 km southwest of Strelkovo by the 
beginning of the assault. Displace in the direction Stepnoye, 
Ivanovo during battle. 
  Chief of ration distribution point is to arrange hot meals 
for personnel twice a day: at 0500 24 August in the assembly 
area and at 1900 at my command, and issue the remaining part of 
the day's norm of food products in dry form. 
  Provide security and defense of technical and logistic 
support subunits with own forces and assets. 
  Communications with technical observation post and recovery 
and repair team is by radio and signaling devices. 
  From H plus 1 hour 30 minutes regimental disabled vehicle 
collecting point deploys 1.5 km east of Hill 112.6; with 
launching of assault the regimental aid station deploys on south 
outskirts of Klinkovo; regimental rear subunits are located in 
Redkiy Forest. 

